<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070702084747.txt.gz
TIME:20070702084747
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant	Changes in Control of Registrant	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant
ITEM: Changes in Control of Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
On July 1, 2007 (the "Effective Date"), each of Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company"), with the Company as the surviving corporation in each case (collectively, the "Merger") pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated December 3, 2006, as amended and restated on February 23, 2007, and as further amended and restated on March 30, 2007 (the "Merger Agreement"). Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, upon completion of the Merger, each outstanding share of Mellon common stock was converted into the right to receive one share of Company common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Company Common Stock") and each outstanding share of BNY common stock was converted into the right to receive 0.9434 shares of Company Common Stock. The description of the Merger Agreement contained herein does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Merger Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. A copy of the press release announcing the completion of the Merger is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.01.
The issuance of Company Common Stock in the Merger was registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-140863) (the "Registration Statement") filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and declared effective on April 17, 2007. The joint proxy statement/prospectus of Mellon and BNY (the "Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus") included in the Registration Statement contains additional information about the Merger and is incorporated by reference herein.
The Company Common Stock is deemed registered under Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Rule 12g-3 under the Exchange Act. The Company Common Stock has been approved for listing on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol "BK." The description of the Company Common Stock set forth under the caption "Description of Newco Capital Stock" in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus is incorporated by reference herein.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
(a) In the Merger, by operation of law, all prior debts, liabilities and duties of Mellon and BNY attach to the Company and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if those debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by it. For information concerning these debts, liabilities and duties of Mellon and BNY, see generally Mellon and BNY's Annual Reports on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, Mellon and BNY's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007, and the Current Reports on Form 8-K filed by Mellon and BNY subsequent to December 31, 2006. Also, in connection with the Merger, the Company expressly assumed, as of the Effective Date, an aggregate principal amount of approximately $13.1 billion
1
of indebtedness, which consists primarily of debentures, notes and other evidence of indebtedness previously issued by Mellon and BNY and indebtedness previously guaranteed by Mellon.
The Company assumed BNY's obligations by entering into the following supplemental indentures:
(i) Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among BNY, as issuer, the Company, as successor issuer and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (f/k/a Bankers Trust Company) ("Deutsche"), as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of BNY under the Indenture, dated as of July 18, 1991, between BNY and Deutsche (the "BNY Senior Indenture"). In connection with the assumption of the obligations under the BNY Senior Indenture, the Company also agreed to assume senior unsecured notes issued pursuant to the BNY Senior Indenture in the aggregate principal amount of approximately $5.6 billion, comprised of the following series:
 
 
(ii) Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among BNY, as issuer, the Company, as successor issuer and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company ("M&T Bank"), as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of BNY under the Indenture, dated as of October 1, 1993, between BNY and M&T Bank (successor to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association ("JPMT Co.")) (the "BNY Senior Subordinated Indenture"). In connection with the assumption of the obligations under the BNY Senior Subordinated Indenture, the Company also agreed to assume senior subordinated unsecured notes issued pursuant to the BNY Senior Subordinated Indenture in the aggregate principal amount of approximately $3.4 billion, comprised of the following series:
 
 
(iii) Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among BNY, as issuer, the Company, as successor issuer and M&T Bank, as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of BNY under the Indenture, dated as of December 25, 1996, between BNY and M&T Bank (successor to JPMT Co.) (the "BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture"). In connection with the assumption of the obligations under the BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture, the Company also agreed to assume the junior subordinated debentures issued pursuant to the Second BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture in the aggregate principal amount of $850 million, comprised of the following series:
 
The notes are held by Delaware statutory trusts (the "BNY Trusts") as follows: BNY Capital I holds the Series B Notes; BNY Capital IV holds the Series E Notes and BNY Capital V holds the Series F Notes. The notes held by each trust represent the sole assets of such trust. Each BNY Trust previously issued trust preferred securities and the Company has assumed BNY's guarantees of the trust preferred securities.
The foregoing description of the BNY Senior Indenture, the BNY Senior Subordinated Indenture and the BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture are qualified in their entirety by the complete terms and conditions of such indentures, which are incorporated by reference into Exhibits 4.7, 4.8 and 4.10, respectively, of BNY's Form S-3 Registration Statement, filed on June 5, 2006.
(iv) First Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among BNY, as issuer, the Company, as successor issuer and M&T Bank, as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of BNY under the Indenture, dated as of December 1, 1996, between BNY and M&T Bank (successor to JPMT Co. (the "Second BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture"). In connection with the assumption of the obligations under the Second BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture, the Company also agreed to assume the 7.78% Junior Subordinated Deferrable Interest Debentures, Series A (the "Series A Notes"), issued pursuant to the Second BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture in the aggregate principal amount of $300,000,000. The Second BNY Subordinated Indenture contains affirmative covenants, negative covenants and events of default that are customary for similar agreements. The Series A Notes are held by BNY Institutional Capital Trust A ("Capital A Trust"), a Delaware statutory trust. The Series A Notes are the sole assets of Capital A Trust. Capital A Trust previously issued trust preferred securities and the Company has assumed BNY's guarantees of the trust preferred securities.
The Company assumed Mellon's obligations by entering into the following supplemental indentures:
(i) Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Funding Corporation ("Funding"), as issuer, Mellon, as guarantor, the Company, as successor guarantor and M&T Bank, as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of Mellon, pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of May 2, 1988, among Funding, Mellon and M&T Bank (successor to The Bank of New York (as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 29, 1990 and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 12, 2000, the "Mellon Senior Indenture"), to unconditionally guarantee the due and punctual payment of the principal of, interest on, and any premium or sinking fund payments due on, the senior unsecured notes (the "Mellon Senior Notes") issued by Funding pursuant to the Mellon Senior Indenture. As of the Effective Date, approximately $800 million of aggregate principal amount of Mellon Senior Notes was outstanding, comprised of the following series:
 
 
The foregoing description of the Mellon Senior Indenture is qualified in its entirety by the complete terms and conditions of such indenture and the supplemental indentures, which are incorporated by reference into Exhibits 4.3, 4.4 and 4.5 of Mellon's Form S-3 Registration Statement, filed on July 21, 2006.
(ii) First Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among Funding, as issuer, Mellon, as guarantor, the Company, as successor guarantor and M&T Bank, as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of Mellon, pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of August 25, 1995, among Funding, Mellon and M&T Bank (successor to The Bank of New York (the "Mellon Senior Subordinated Indenture"), to unconditionally guarantee the due and punctual payment of the principal of, interest on, and any premium or sinking fund payments due on, the senior subordinated unsecured notes (the "Mellon Senior Subordinated Notes") issued by Funding pursuant to the Mellon Senior Subordinated Indenture. As of the Effective Date, $600 million of aggregate principal amount of Mellon Senior Subordinated Notes was outstanding, comprised of the following series:
 
The foregoing description of the Mellon Senior Subordinated Indenture is qualified in its entirety by the complete terms and conditions of such indenture, which are incorporated by reference into Exhibit 4.3 of Mellon's Form S-3 Registration Statement, filed on August 25, 1995.
(iii) Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among Funding, as issuer, Mellon, as guarantor, the Company, as successor guarantor and Union Bank of California, National Association ("UBOC") (successor to JPMT Co.), as Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of Mellon, pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of June 12, 2000, among Funding, Mellon and UBOC (as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 30, 2001 and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2004, the "UBOC Senior Subordinated Indenture"), to unconditionally guarantee the due and punctual payment of the principal of, interest on, and any premium or sinking fund payments due on, the senior subordinated unsecured notes (the "UBOC Senior Subordinated Notes") issued by Funding pursuant to the UBOC Senior Subordinated Indenture. As of the Effective Date, $950 million of aggregate principal amount of UBOC Senior Subordinated Notes were outstanding, comprised of the following series:
 
The foregoing description of the Mellon Senior Indenture is qualified in its entirety by the complete terms and conditions of such indenture and the supplemental indentures, which are incorporated by reference into Exhibits 4.6, 4.7 and 4.8 of Mellon's Form S-3 Registration Statement, filed on July 21, 2006.
(iv) Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon, as issuer, the Company, as successor issuer, The Bank of New York, as Trustee, U.S. Bank National Association, as Series C Trustee, and M&T Bank, as Series L Trustee, incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, whereby the Company agreed to assume the obligations of Mellon under the Indenture, dated as of December 3, 1996, between Mellon and The Bank of New York (successor to JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, successor to The Chase Manhattan Bank, National Association) (as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 19, 2006, and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 19, 2007, the "Mellon Junior Subordinated Indenture"). In connection with the assumption of the obligations under the Mellon Junior Subordinated Indenture, the Company also agreed to assume the junior subordinated debentures issued pursuant to the Second BNY Junior Subordinated Indenture in the aggregate principal amount of $901 million, comprised of the following series:
 
 
The notes are held by Delaware statutory trusts (the "Mellon Trusts") as follows: Mellon Capital III holds the Series C Notes and Mellon Capital IV holds the Series L Notes. The notes held by each trust represent the sole assets of such trust. Each Mellon Trust previously issued trust preferred securities and the Company has assumed Mellon's guarantees of the trust preferred securities. The foregoing description of the Mellon Junior Subordinated Indenture is qualified in its entirety by the complete terms and conditions of such indenture and the supplemental indentures, which are incorporated by reference into Exhibits 4.9 and 4.10 of Mellon Form S-3 Registration Statement, filed on July 21, 2006 and Exhibit 2 to Mellon's Form 8-A, filed on June 19, 2006.
Item 4.01 Changes in Registrant's Certifying Accountant
(a) On the Effective Date, the Audit and Examining Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board") appointed KPMG LLP as the Company's registered public accounting firm to audit the Company's 2007 financial statements.
Item 5.01 Changes in Control of Registrant
(a) Upon the completion of the Merger on July 1, 2007, a change of control of the Company occurred. Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, each outstanding share of Mellon common stock was converted into the right to receive one share of Company Common Stock and each outstanding share of BNY common stock was converted into the right to receive 0.9434 shares of Company Common Stock. The two shares of Company Common Stock previously held by BNY and Mellon were cancelled. As of July 1, 2007, the former shareholders of BNY and Mellon owned all of the issued and outstanding shares of Company Common Stock. The Merger is described in greater detail under Item 2.01 above.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
(b) Donald R. Monks, who has been a member of the Board since the Company's incorporation, tendered his letter of resignation from the Board on June 29, 2007. The resignation of Mr. Monks became effective upon the election of eighteen new members to the Board, as described in paragraph (d) below.
(c) On July 1, 2007, the Board appointed Gerald L. Hassell as President of the Company. Mr. Hassell has served as President of BNY and its principal subsidiary, The Bank of New York (the "Bank"), since September 1998. Mr. Hassell had previously served as Executive Vice President of the Bank from June 1990 to December 1994, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Commercial Banking Officer of the Bank from December 1994 to September 1998, and Senior Executive Vice President of BNY from August 1998 to September 1998. Mr. Hassell also has served on the Boards of Directors of BNY and Private Export Funding Corporation. Mr. Hassell is 55 years old. As previously disclosed in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus, Mr. Hassell has received a special option grant in respect of 500,000 shares of BNY common stock in connection with the Merger. The Company also has assumed a transition agreement that Mr. Hassell entered into with BNY in connection with the Merger, which provides Mr. Hassell with severance protections during the first three years following completion of the Merger substantially similar to the severance protections contained in the change-in-control agreements that Mellon had with its senior officers before the signing of the Merger Agreement, as well as special termination rights that apply after the end of the initial three-year transition period. The terms of Mr. Hassell's special option grant and transition agreement are described more fully in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and BNY's Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on June 29, 2007, the terms of which are incorporated herein.
Also on July 1, the Board appointed Michael K. Hughey as the Company's Controller. Mr. Hughey has served as Senior Vice President and Controller at Mellon and Mellon Bank, N.A. ("Mellon Bank") since 2004. Previously, he was Director of Taxes for Mellon Bank from 1985 to 2004. Mr. Hughey is 55 years old.
Robert P. Kelly has served as the Company's Chief Executive Officer since he was appointed to that position by the Board on February 22, 2007. Since February 2006, Mr. Kelly has been Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Mellon and Mellon Bank and Chairman of the Executive Committee of Mellon's Board of Directors. From 2000 to 2006, Mr. Kelly was Chief Financial Officer of Wachovia Corporation. He previously had spent 19 years with Toronto-Dominion Bank, where he served as Vice Chairman and head of the retail and commercial bank. Mr. Kelly is 53 years old. As previously disclosed in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus, on February 24, 2007 the Compensation and Management Succession Committee of Mellon's Board of Directors granted to Mr. Kelly an award of 32,630 restricted stock units, the vesting of which is conditioned on (1) the completion of the Merger, (2) the satisfactory progress of the integration of Mellon
 
and BNY (as determined by the Integration Committee of the Board); and (3) Mr. Kelly's continued service through the vesting dates with the Company. The terms of Mr. Kelly's restricted stock units are described more fully in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus.
Bruce W. Van Saun has served as the Company's Chief Financial Officer since he was appointed to that position by the Board on February 22, 2007. Mr. Van Saun previously served as Vice Chairman of BNY and the Bank and leader of the Bank's market-related business. Mr. Van Saun joined BNY as Chief Financial Officer in 1997, a position he held through August 2006. Prior to joining BNY, Mr. Van Saun had been Chief Financial Officer of Deutsche Bank North America from 1994 to 1997, Chief Operating Officer and Chief Financial Officer at Wasserstein Perella Group, Inc. from 1990 to 1994 and had held leadership positions at several other financial services firms, including as Senior Vice President & Controller, and Senior Vice President for international business development, at Kidder Peabody & Company, Inc. Mr. Van Saun is 50 years old. The Company has assumed a transition agreement that Mr. Van Saun entered into with BNY in connection with the Merger, which provides Mr. Van Saun with severance protections during the first three years following completion of the Merger substantially similar to the severance protections contained in the change-in-control agreements that Mellon had with its senior officers before the signing of the Merger Agreement, as well as special termination rights that apply during the 30 days immediately following the second anniversary of the Merger on July 1, 2009. The terms of Mr. Van Saun's transition agreement are described more fully in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and BNY's Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on June 29, 2007, the terms of which are incorporated herein.
(d) On June 29, 2007, pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement, the Board expanded the number of directors to eighteen, to be elected by the stockholders of the Company for a term to expire at the first Annual Stockholders Meeting, which is due to be held on March 10, 2008. On June 29, 2007, BNY and Mellon, as the sole stockholders of the Company at that time, elected eighteen members to the Board, effective at the Effective Date. Of these eighteen individuals, the Board of Directors of BNY had designated ten persons (the "Continuing BNY Directors"), including eight independent directors, plus Thomas A. Renyi, the Chief Executive Officer of BNY immediately prior to the Merger, and Gerald L. Hassell, the President of BNY immediately prior to the Merger. The Board of Directors of Mellon had designated eight persons (the "Continuing Mellon Directors"), including six independent directors, plus Robert P. Kelly, the Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Mellon immediately prior to the Merger, and Steven G. Elliott, the Senior Vice Chairman of Mellon immediately prior to the Merger. The names of the newly elected directors and information about the Board Committee(s) on which each will serve are listed below.
 
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
(a) In connection with the Merger, on June 29, 2007, the Board and BNY and Mellon, as the stockholders of the Company at that time, approved and adopted the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "Charter"), which restates, integrates and amends the provisions of the Company's original Certificate of Incorporation that was filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware on February 9, 2007. The Charter became effective immediately prior to the completion of the Merger. In addition to certain technical amendments to the original Certificate of Incorporation, the Charter (i) authorizes the Company to issue 3,600,000,000 shares of capital stock, consisting of 3,500,000,000 shares of Common Stock and 100,000,000 shares of Preferred Stock, in each case with a par value of $0.01 per share, (ii) provides that the affirmative vote of the holders of at least 75% of the outstanding voting power of the Company is required to modify, amend or repeal Article Five of the Company's By-Laws (the "By-Laws"), which contains certain corporate governance provisions, during the first 36 months following completion of the Merger and (iii) contains provisions regarding indemnification of officers and directors of the Company. This description of these provisions and of the remainder of the Charter is qualified in its entirety by reference to the information set forth under the captions "Proposal No. 2: Supermajority Voting Provision in Newco's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation," "Proposal No. 3: Provision in Newco's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation Providing for 3,600,000,000 Shares of Capital Stock Authorized for Issuance" and "Comparison of Shareholders' Rights" in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and to the Charter itself, which is included as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The Charter as adopted is in the form attached as an exhibit to the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus.
Also on June 29, 2007, the Board adopted the By-Laws in substantially the form in which they had been attached as an exhibit to the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus. As adopted, the By-Laws contain certain technical changes with respect to uncertificated shares and the number of directors on certain Board Committees, and they clarify that directors may be removed by the vote of stockholders representing a majority of the outstanding voting power of the Company, in accordance with Delaware law.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Financial statements of business acquired
The audited financial statements required by this item are incorporated by reference to the Consolidated Financial Statements contained in Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006, filed on February 23, 2007, and Bank of New York's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006, filed on February 23, 2007, respectively, which are included as Exhibits 99.2 and 99.3 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The unaudited financial statements required by this item are incorporated by reference to the Consolidated Financial Statements contained in Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2007, filed on May 4, 2007, and Bank of New York's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2007, filed on May 9, 2007, respectively, which are included as Exhibits 99.4 and 99.5 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
(b) Pro forma financial information
The pro forma financial information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information of BNY and Mellon for the three months ended March 31, 2007 included as Exhibit 99.1 to the Current Reports on Form 8-K filed by BNY and Mellon on May 11, 2007 and May 10, 2007, respectively, and is included as Exhibit 99.6 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
THIS AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER dated December 3, 2006, as amended and restated as of February 23, 2007, as further amended and restated as of March 30, 2007 (this "Agreement"), is between MELLON FINANCIAL CORPORATION, a Pennsylvania corporation ("Mellon"), THE BANK OF NEW YORK COMPANY, INC., a New York corporation ("BNY"), and THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation ("Newco").
A. . Mellon and BNY have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of December 3, 2006 (the "Original Agreement"). On February 22, 2007, Newco became a party to the Original Agreement through the execution and delivery of a Supplement to Agreement and Plan of Merger between Newco, Mellon and BNY. On February 23, 2007, Mellon, BNY and Newco amended and restated the Original Agreement in its entirety. In accordance with Section 8.5 thereof, Mellon, BNY and Newco wish to further amend the Original Agreement (as amended and restated) and to restate the Original Agreement (as previously amended and restated) in its entirety.
Original Agreement and First Amended and Restated Agreement
B. . The Boards of Directors of Mellon and BNY have determined that the transactions described herein are consistent with, and will further, their respective business strategies and goals, and are in the best interests of Mellon and BNY, respectively, and their respective shareholders.
Approvals
C. . This Agreement provides for a strategic business combination through the merger of Mellon with and into a newly-formed Subsidiary of BNY and Mellon to be named "The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation" and organized under Delaware law with Newco as the surviving corporation, followed immediately thereafter by the merger of BNY with and into Newco with Newco as the surviving corporation.
The Merger
D. . It is the intention of the Parties that (i) the First Step Merger shall qualify for all tax purposes as a reincorporation of Mellon in Delaware and for federal income Tax purposes as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a)(1)(A) and 368(a)(1)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) the Second Step Merger shall qualify for federal income Tax purposes as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and (iii) this Agreement shall constitute a "plan of reorganization" for purposes of Sections 354 and 361 of the Internal Revenue Code.
Intention of the Parties
E. . Concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, (i) as a condition and inducement to BNY's willingness to enter into this Agreement and the BNY Stock Option Agreement referred to below, BNY and Mellon are entering into a Stock Option Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, in the form of Exhibit 1-A (the "Mellon Stock Option Agreement") pursuant to which Mellon is granting to BNY an option to purchase shares of Mellon Common Stock and (ii) as a condition and inducement to Mellon's willingness to enter into this Agreement and the Mellon Stock Option Agreement referred to below, BNY
Reciprocal Stock Options
and Mellon are entering into a Stock Option Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, in the form of Exhibit 1-B (the "BNY Stock Option Agreement") pursuant to which BNY is granting to Mellon an option to purchase shares of BNY Common Stock.
F. . Certain capitalized terms used in this Agreement are defined in Section 8.1 of this Agreement. All references in this Agreement to the "transactions contemplated hereby" shall include the execution, delivery and performance of the Stock Option Agreements.
Defined Terms
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the above and the mutual warranties, representations, covenants, and agreements set forth herein, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the Parties agree as follows:
1.1. . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the First Effective Time, Mellon shall be merged with and into Newco in accordance with the provisions of the PBCL and the DGCL (the "First Step Merger"). Newco shall be the surviving corporation in the First Step Merger and shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware. Upon consummation of the First Step Merger, the separate corporate existence of Mellon shall cease.
First Step Merger
1.2. . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, on or before the Closing Date, the Parties will cause articles of merger to be filed with the Department of State of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania (the "Pennsylvania Department of State") as provided in Section 1927 of the PBCL and a certificate of merger to be filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware (the "Delaware Secretary of State") as provided in Section 252 of the DGCL to effect the First Step Merger. The First Step Merger shall take effect when such articles and certificate of merger are filed, or at such other time as may be agreed by the Parties and specified therein (the "First Effective Time"). Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon by the duly authorized officers of each Party, the Parties shall cause the First Effective Time to occur on the second business day following the date on which satisfaction or waiver of the last of the conditions set forth in Article 6 has occurred (other than those conditions that by their nature are to be satisfied at the Closing, but subject to the fulfillment or waiver of those conditions), or such other date mutually agreed upon in writing by the Parties.
First Effective Time
1.3. . At the First Effective Time, in each case subject to Sections 1.3(c) and 1.5, by virtue of the First Step Merger and without any action on the part of the Parties, Newco or the holder of any of the following securities:
Conversion of Mellon Common Stock
(a) Each share of Mellon Common Stock that is Outstanding immediately prior to the First Effective Time (other than shares of Mellon Common Stock held by Mellon (in each case other than (i) shares held in trust, managed, custodial, nominee or similar accounts and shares held by mutual funds or other pooled investment vehicles for
 
which Mellon or any of its Subsidiaries acts as investment advisor or in a similar capacity (collectively, "Trust Account Shares") or (ii) shares held as a result of debts previously contracted)) shall be converted into the right to receive the number of shares of Newco Common Stock equal to the Mellon Exchange Ratio.
(b) All shares of Mellon Common Stock converted pursuant to this Section 1.3 shall no longer be Outstanding and shall automatically be cancelled and retired and shall cease to exist as of the First Effective Time, and each certificate previously representing any such shares of Mellon Common Stock (the "Old Mellon Certificates") shall cease to have any rights except it shall thereafter represent the right to receive with respect to each underlying share of Mellon Common Stock (i) a certificate representing the number of whole shares of Newco Common Stock into which the shares of Mellon Common Stock represented by such Old Mellon Certificate have been converted pursuant to this Section 1.3, and (ii) any dividends or distributions which the holder thereof has the right to receive pursuant to Section 3.1(a).
(c) If, following the date of this Agreement and prior to the First Effective Time, the Outstanding shares of BNY Common Stock or Mellon Common Stock shall have, except as provided herein, been increased, decreased, changed into or exchanged for a different number or kind of shares or securities as a result of a reorganization, recapitalization, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, reverse stock split, or other similar change in capitalization, then an appropriate and proportionate adjustment shall be made to the Mellon Exchange Ratio.
1.4. . At and after the First Effective Time, each share of Newco Common Stock held by Mellon immediately prior to the First Effective Time shall be cancelled and retired and shall resume the status of authorized and unissued shares of Newco Common Stock, and no shares of Newco Common Stock or other securities of Newco shall be issued in respect thereof.
Cancellation of Newco Common Stock
1.5. . Each of the shares of Mellon Common Stock held by Mellon (in each case other than Trust Account Shares or shares held as a result of debts previously contracted) shall be cancelled and retired and shall cease to exist at the First Effective Time and no consideration shall be issued in exchange therefor.
Cancellation of Shares Held by Mellon
1.6. .
Mellon Stock Options and Other Equity-Based Awards
(a) Each option to purchase shares of Mellon Common Stock (a "Mellon Stock Option") granted under an equity compensation plan of Mellon (a "Mellon Stock Plan"), whether vested or unvested, that is outstanding and unexercised immediately prior to the First Effective Time shall cease, at the First Effective Time, to represent a right to acquire shares of Mellon Common Stock and shall be converted at the First Effective Time, without any action on the part of any holder of any Mellon Stock Option, into an option to purchase shares of Newco Common Stock (a "Newco Stock Option") on the same terms and conditions, including any reload feature (but taking into account any changes thereto, including any acceleration thereof, provided for in the relevant Mellon Stock Plan, or in the related award document by reason of the transactions contemplated hereby) as were applicable under such Mellon Stock Option prior to the First
 
Effective Time. The number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to each such Newco Stock Option shall be equal to the number of shares of Mellon Common Stock subject to each such Mellon Stock Option multiplied by the Mellon Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock, and such Newco Stock Option shall have an exercise price per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the per share exercise price specified in such Mellon Stock Option divided by the Mellon Exchange Ratio; provided that, in the case of any Mellon Stock Option to which Section 421 of the Internal Revenue Code applies as of the First Effective Time (after taking into account the effect of any accelerated vesting thereof, if applicable) by reason of its qualification under Section 422 or Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code, the exercise price, the number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to such option and the terms and conditions of exercise of such option shall be determined in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 424(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; and provided further, that in any event, the conversion of each Mellon Stock Option shall be effected in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) At the First Effective Time, each Right consisting of, based on or relating to shares of Mellon Common Stock granted under a Mellon Stock Plan, other than Mellon Stock Options (each, a "Mellon Stock-Based Award"), whether vested or unvested, contingent or accrued, which is outstanding immediately prior to the First Effective Time shall cease, at the First Effective Time, to represent a Right with respect to shares of Mellon Common Stock and shall be converted without any action on the part of any holder of a Right, at the First Effective Time, into a Right consisting of, based on or relating to shares of Newco Common Stock (a "Newco Stock-Based Award"), on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under the Mellon Stock-Based Awards, including any reload feature (but taking into account any changes thereto, including any acceleration thereof, provided for in the relevant Mellon Stock Plan or in the related award document by reason of the transactions contemplated hereby), as were applicable under such Mellon Stock-Based Award prior to the First Effective Time; provided that in any event, the conversion of each Mellon Stock-Based Award shall be effected in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code. The number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to each such Newco Stock-Based Award shall be equal to the number of shares of Mellon Common Stock subject to the Mellon Stock-Based Award multiplied by the Mellon Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock and, if applicable, such Newco Stock-Based Award shall have an exercise price per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the per share exercise price specified in the Mellon Stock-Based Award divided by the Mellon Exchange Ratio. Any dividend equivalents credited to the account of each holder of a Mellon Stock-Based Award as of the First Effective Time shall remain credited to such holder's account immediately following the First Effective Time, subject to adjustment in accordance with the foregoing.
(c) As soon as practicable after the First Effective Time, Newco shall deliver to the holders of Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards any required notices setting forth such holders' rights pursuant to the relevant Mellon Stock Plans and award documents and stating that such Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards have been assumed by Newco and shall continue in effect on the same terms and conditions (subject to the adjustments required by this Section 1.6 after giving effect to the Merger and the terms of the relevant Mellon Stock Plans).
 
(d) Following the First Effective Time, Newco may maintain the Mellon Stock Plans for purposes of granting future awards to individuals who were employees or directors of Mellon at the First Effective Time. If so, the provisions of the Mellon Stock Plans, including the respective terms of such plans, will be unchanged, except that all Rights issued by Newco pursuant to the Mellon Stock Plans following the First Effective Time shall be Rights in respect of Newco Common Stock, and the number of shares of Newco Common Stock available for future issuance pursuant to each Mellon Stock Plan following the First Effective Time (the "Available Mellon Stock Plan Shares") shall be equal to the number of shares of Mellon Common Stock so available immediately prior to the First Effective Time, multiplied by the Mellon Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock.
(e) Prior to the First Effective Time, Mellon shall take all necessary action for the adjustment of Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards under this Section 1.6. Newco shall reserve for future issuance in respect thereof a number of shares of Newco Common Stock at least equal to the number of shares of Newco Common Stock that will be subject to Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards as a result of the actions contemplated by this Section 1.6, plus the number of Available Mellon Stock Plan Shares in the event that Newco maintains the Mellon Stock Plans as contemplated by this Section 1.6. As soon as practicable following the Effective Time, Newco shall file a registration statement on Form S-8 or S-3, as the case dictates (or any successor form, or if Form S-8 or S-3 is not available, other appropriate forms), with respect to the shares of Newco Common Stock subject to such Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards (and the Available Mellon Stock Plan Shares, as the case dictates) and shall maintain the effectiveness of such registration statement or registration statements (and maintain the current status of the prospectus or prospectuses contained therein) for so long as such Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards remain outstanding.
(f) Mellon shall take such action as is necessary to provide that as of no later than three business days prior to the Closing Date no further shares of Mellon Common Stock will be purchased under the Mellon Direct Stock Purchase and Dividend Reinvestment Plan (the "Mellon DRIP"); provided, that such cessation of further purchases following the Closing Date shall be conditioned upon the consummation of the Merger. Immediately prior to and effective as of the First Effective Time and subject to the consummation of the Merger, Mellon shall terminate the Mellon DRIP. Mellon shall take such action as is necessary to cause suspension of the Mellon Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the "Mellon ESPP") for the purchase period during which the Closing Date is scheduled to occur.
1.7. . Prior to the Effective Time, Newco will be duly organized by BNY and Mellon under Delaware Law as a direct subsidiary of BNY and Mellon. The Organizational Documents of Newco in effect at the First Effective Time shall be as set forth in Exhibits 2-A and 2-B, until thereafter amended in accordance with applicable Law and Newco's Organizational Documents. Prior to the Effective Time, the Board of Directors of Newco shall consist of one BNY officer designated by BNY and one Mellon officer designated by Mellon, and at and following the Effective Time, the Board of Directors of Newco shall be constituted as provided in Section 5.19 below. At or prior to the Effective Time, the Parties will take such actions as may be required to ensure that: (i) Newco has the requisite corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and assets and to carry on its business;
Organization of Newco
 
(ii) Newco is duly qualified or licensed to do business and (to the extent applicable) in good standing in the States and territories of the United States and foreign jurisdictions where the character of its assets or the nature of the conduct of its business requires it to be so qualified or licensed; and (iii) Newco will have engaged in no business and incurred no liabilities or obligations other than as necessary to consummate the Merger. The authorized capital stock of Newco shall be as agreed by the Parties, of which, as of the First Effective Time, two shares of Newco Common Stock will be Outstanding, one of which shares will be held by BNY and one of which shares will be held by Mellon. The authorized capital stock of Newco immediately following consummation of the First Step Merger (and prior to the Effective Time) will be as set forth in the form of Newco Certificate of Incorporation. No change in such capitalization will occur prior to the Effective Time except as provided in or contemplated by this Agreement. At the Effective Time, no capital stock of Newco (and no Rights to acquire any such capital stock) will be Outstanding, except as contemplated by this Agreement. The shares of Newco Common Stock to be issued in the Merger, when so issued in accordance with this Agreement, will have been duly authorized and validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable and not subject to any preemptive rights. The Parties agree to cause Newco to comply with all of Newco's agreements, covenants and obligations under this Agreement and to promptly effect the Newco Shareholder Approval.
2.1. . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the Effective Time, BNY shall be merged with and into Newco in accordance with the provisions of the NYBCL and the DGCL (the "Second Step Merger" and, together with the First Step Merger, the "Merger"). Newco shall be the surviving corporation in the Second Step Merger and shall continue to be governed by the Laws of the State of Delaware. Upon consummation of the Second Step Merger, the separate corporate existence of BNY shall cease.
Second Step Merger
2.2. . The closings of the First Step Merger and the Second Step Merger (the "Closing") shall take place sequentially (with the Second Step Merger occurring immediately after the First Step Merger), on the same day when the First Effective Time and the Effective Time (as defined in Section 2.3) are to occur (the "Closing Date"), unless another time is agreed to in writing by the Parties. The Parties shall coordinate filing to ensure the timing of the foregoing. The Closing shall be held at the offices of Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP, 425 Lexington Avenue, New York, New York 10017, unless another place is agreed to in writing by the Parties.
Time and Place of Closing
2.3. . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, on or before the Closing Date, the Parties will cause a certificate of merger to be filed with the Department of State of the State of New York (the "New York Department of State") as provided in Section 907 of the NYBCL and a certificate of merger to be filed with the Delaware Secretary of State as provided in Section 252 of the DGCL to effect the Second Step Merger. The Second Step Merger shall take effect when such certificates of merger are filed, or at such other time as may be agreed by the Parties and specified therein (the "Effective Time").
Effective Time
 
2.4. . At the Effective Time, in each case subject to Section 2.5, by virtue of the Second Step Merger and without any action on the part of the Parties, Newco or the holder of any of the following securities:
Conversion of BNY Common Stock
(a) Each share of BNY Common Stock that is Outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of BNY Common Stock held by either BNY or Newco (in each case other than Trust Account Shares or shares held as a result of debts previously contracted)) shall be converted into the right to receive the number of shares of Newco Common Stock equal to the BNY Exchange Ratio.
(b) All shares of BNY Common Stock converted pursuant to this Section 2.4 shall no longer be Outstanding and shall automatically be cancelled and retired and shall cease to exist as of the Effective Time, and each certificate previously representing any such shares of BNY Common Stock (the "Old BNY Certificates" and together with the Old Mellon Certificates, the "Old Certificates") shall cease to have any rights except it shall thereafter represent the right to receive with respect to each underlying share of BNY Common Stock (i) a certificate representing the number of whole shares of Newco Common Stock into which the shares of BNY Common Stock represented by such Old BNY Certificate have been converted pursuant to this Section 2.4, (ii) in accordance with Section 2.4(c), cash in lieu of fractional shares of Newco Common Stock represented by such Old BNY Certificate which have been converted pursuant to this Section 2.4, and (iii) any dividends or distributions which the holder thereof has the right to receive pursuant to Section 3.1(a).
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, each holder of shares of BNY Common Stock exchanged pursuant to the Second Step Merger who would otherwise have been entitled to receive a fraction of a share of Newco Common Stock (after taking into account all Old BNY Certificates delivered by such holder) shall receive, in lieu thereof, cash (without interest and rounded to the nearest cent) in an amount equal to the product obtained by multiplying (i) such fractional part of a share of Newco Common Stock by (ii) the closing sale price of Mellon Common Stock on the NYSE Composite Transaction Tape on the trading day immediately preceding the Closing Date as reported by The Wall Street Journal or if not reported therein, in another authoritative source.
(d) If, following the date of this Agreement and prior to the Effective Time, the Outstanding shares of BNY Common Stock or Mellon Common Stock shall have, except as provided for herein, been increased, decreased, changed into or exchanged for a different number or kind of shares or securities as a result of a reorganization, recapitalization, reclassification, stock dividend, stock split, reverse stock split, or other similar change in capitalization, then an appropriate and proportionate adjustment shall be made to the BNY Exchange Ratio.
2.5. .
Effects on Common Stock
(a) At and after the Effective Time, each share of Newco Common Stock Outstanding immediately prior to the Closing Date shall remain an Outstanding share of
 
common stock of the Surviving Corporation and shall not be affected by the Second Step Merger; provided that any shares of Newco Common Stock held by BNY (other than any Trust Account Shares or shares held as a result of debts previously contracted) prior to the Effective Time shall be cancelled and retired and shall resume the status of authorized and unissued shares of Newco Common stock, and no shares of Newco Common Stock or other securities of Newco shall be issued in respect thereof.
(b) Each of the shares of BNY Common Stock held by either BNY or Newco (in each case other than Trust Account Shares or shares held as a result of debts previously contracted) shall be cancelled and retired and shall cease to exist at the Effective Time and no consideration shall be issued in exchange therefor.
2.6. .
BNY Stock Options and Other Equity-Based Awards
(a) Each option to purchase shares of BNY Common Stock (a "BNY Stock Option") granted under an equity compensation plan of BNY (a "BNY Stock Plan"), whether vested or unvested, that is outstanding and unexercised immediately prior to the Effective Time shall cease, at the Effective Time, to represent a right to acquire shares of BNY Common Stock and shall be converted at the Effective Time, without any action on the part of any holder of any BNY Stock Option, into a Newco Stock Option on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under such BNY Stock Option prior to the Effective Time. The number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to each such Newco Stock Option shall be equal to the number of shares of BNY Common Stock subject to each such BNY Stock Option multiplied by the BNY Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock, and such BNY Stock Option shall have an exercise price per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the per share exercise price specified in such BNY Stock Option divided by the BNY Exchange Ratio; provided that, in the case of any BNY Stock Option to which Section 421 of the Internal Revenue Code applies as of the Effective Time (after taking into account the effect of any accelerated vesting thereof, if applicable) by reason of its qualification under Section 422 or Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code, the exercise price, the number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to such option and the terms and conditions of exercise of such option shall be determined in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 424(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; and provided, further, that in any event, the conversion of each BNY Stock Option shall be effected in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) At the Effective Time, each Right consisting of, based on or relating to shares of BNY Common Stock granted under a BNY Stock Plan, other than BNY Stock Options (each, a "BNY Stock-Based Award"), whether vested or unvested, contingent or accrued, which is outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall cease, at the Effective Time, to represent a Right with respect to shares of BNY Common Stock and shall be converted without any action on the part of any holder of a Right, at the Effective Time, into a Newco Stock-Based Award, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under the BNY Stock-Based Awards prior to the Effective Time. The number of shares of Newco Common Stock subject to each such Newco Stock-Based Award shall be equal to the number of shares of BNY Common Stock subject to the BNY Stock-Based Award multiplied by the BNY Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock and, if applicable, such Newco
 
Stock-Based Award shall have an exercise price per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the per share exercise price specified in the BNY Stock Based Award divided by the BNY Exchange Ratio; provided that in any event, the conversion of each BNY Stock-Based Award shall be effected in a manner consistent with the requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code. Any dividend equivalents credited to the account of each holder of a BNY Stock-Based Award as of the Effective Time shall remain credited to such holder's account immediately following the Effective Time, subject to adjustment in accordance with the foregoing.
(c) As soon as practicable after the Effective Time, Newco shall deliver to the holders of BNY Stock Options and BNY Stock-Based Awards any required notices setting forth such holders' rights pursuant to the relevant BNY Stock Plans and award documents and stating that such BNY Stock Options and BNY Stock-Based Awards have been assumed by Newco and shall continue in effect on the same terms and conditions (subject to the adjustments required by this Section 2.6 after giving effect to the Merger and the terms of the relevant BNY Stock Plans).
(d) Following the Effective Time, Newco may maintain the BNY Stock Plans for purposes of granting future awards to individuals who were employees or directors of BNY at the Effective Time. If so, the provisions of the BNY Stock Plans, including the respective terms of such plans, will be unchanged, except that all Rights issued by Newco pursuant to the BNY Stock Plans following the Effective Time shall be Rights in respect of Newco Common Stock, and the number of shares of Newco Common Stock available for future issuance pursuant to each BNY Stock Plan following the Effective Time (the "Available BNY Stock Plan Shares") shall be equal to the number of shares of BNY Common Stock so available immediately prior to the Effective Time, multiplied by the BNY Exchange Ratio, rounded, if necessary, to the nearest whole share of Newco Common Stock.
(e) Prior to the Effective Time, BNY shall take all necessary action and make all necessary arrangements for the adjustment of BNY Stock Options and BNY Stock-Based Awards under this Section 2.6. Newco shall reserve for future issuance a number of shares of Newco Common Stock at least equal to the number of shares of Newco Common Stock that will be subject to Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards as a result of the actions contemplated by this Section 2.6, plus the number of Available BNY Stock Plan Shares in the event that Newco maintains the BNY Stock Plans as contemplated by this Section 2.6. As soon as practicable following the Effective Time, Newco shall file a registration statement on Form S-8 or S-3, as the case dictates (or any successor form, or if Form S-8 or S-3 is not available, other appropriate forms), with respect to the shares of Newco Common Stock subject to such Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards (and the Available BNY Stock Plan Shares, as the case dictates) and shall maintain the effectiveness of such registration statement or registration statements (and maintain the current status of the prospectus or prospectuses contained therein) for so long as such Newco Stock Options and Newco Stock-Based Awards remain outstanding.
(f) BNY shall take such action as is necessary to provide that as of no later than three business days prior to the Closing Date no further shares of BNY Common Stock will be purchased under the BNY Dividend Reinvestment and Direct Stock Purchase and Sale Plan (the "BNY DRIP"); provided, that such cessation of further purchases following the Closing Date
 
shall be conditioned upon the consummation of the Merger. Immediately prior to and effective as of the Effective Time and subject to the consummation of the Merger, BNY shall terminate the BNY DRIP. BNY shall take such action as is necessary to cause suspension of the BNY Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the "BNY ESPP") for the purchase period during which the Closing Date is scheduled to occur.
3.1. .
Exchange Procedures
(a) At or prior to the First Effective Time, Newco shall deposit, or shall cause to be deposited, with the Exchange Agent, for the benefit of the holders of Old Certificates, for exchange in accordance with Article 1 and Article 2 and this Article 3, certificates or evidence of shares in book entry form representing Newco Common Stock (collectively, "New Certificates") (together with any dividends or distributions with respect thereto and any cash to be paid hereunder in lieu of fractional shares of Newco Common Stock (without any interest thereon), the "Exchange Fund") to be paid pursuant to Article 1 and Article 2 and this Article 3 in exchange for Outstanding shares of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock.
(b) As promptly as practicable after the Effective Time, Newco shall send or cause to be sent to each former holder of record of shares of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock immediately prior to the First Effective Time or the Effective Time, as applicable (each, a "Holder"), transmittal materials for use in exchanging such Holder's Old Certificates for the consideration set forth in Article 1 and Article 2 (which shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title to the certificates theretofore representing such shares of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock shall pass, only upon proper delivery of such certificates to the Exchange Agent, and which shall be in such form and have such other provisions as Mellon and BNY may reasonably specify). Newco shall cause the New Certificates for shares of Newco Common Stock into which shares of a Holder's Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock, as the case may be, are converted at the First Effective Time or the Effective Time, if applicable, or dividends or distributions which such Person shall be entitled to receive and any fractional share interests (in the case of BNY Holders only), to be delivered to such Person upon delivery to the Exchange Agent of Old Certificates representing such shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock, as the case may be, together with the transmittal materials, duly executed and completed in accordance with the instructions thereto. No interest will accrue or be paid on any such cash to be paid pursuant to Article 1 and Article 2 and this Article 3 upon such delivery. If any New Certificate is to be issued or any cash payment is to be made in a name other than that in which the Old Certificate surrendered in exchange therefor is registered, it shall be a condition of such exchange that the Person requesting such exchange shall pay any transfer or other Taxes required by reason of the issuance of such New Certificate or the making of such cash payment in a name other than that of the registered Holder of the Old Certificate surrendered, or shall establish to the satisfaction of Newco and the Exchange Agent that any such Taxes have been paid or are not applicable. Any Person whom the Parties reasonably believe to be an "affiliate" of Mellon or BNY for purposes of Rule 145 of the 1933 Act shall not be entitled to receive any New Certificate or payment pursuant to Article 1 or Article 2 or this Article 3 until such Person shall have duly executed and delivered an appropriate agreement as described in Section 5.16.
 
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, none of the Exchange Agent, Newco, any of the Parties or any of their respective Subsidiaries shall be liable to any former Holder of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock for any amount properly delivered to a public official pursuant to applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar Laws.
(d) If any Old Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the Person claiming such Old Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed and, if required by Newco or the Exchange Agent, the posting by such Person of a bond in such reasonable amount as Newco or the Exchange Agent may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against it with respect to such Old Certificate, Newco or the Exchange Agent shall, in exchange for the shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock represented by such lost, stolen or destroyed Old Certificate, issue or cause to be issued a New Certificate and pay or cause to be paid the amounts, if any, deliverable in respect to the shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock, as the case may be, formerly represented by such Old Certificate pursuant to this Agreement.
(e) Any portion of the Exchange Fund that remains unclaimed by the Holders of Mellon and BNY for six months after the Effective Time shall be returned to Newco (together with any dividends or earnings in respect thereof). Any Holders of Mellon or BNY who have not theretofore complied with this Article 3 shall thereafter be entitled to look only to Newco, and only as a general creditor thereof, for payment of the consideration deliverable in respect of each share of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock such Holder holds as determined pursuant to this Agreement, in each case, without any interest thereon.
(f) Newco and the Exchange Agent shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable pursuant to this Agreement to any Holder of shares of BNY Common Stock or shares of Mellon Common Stock such amounts as it is required to deduct and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Internal Revenue Code and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or any provision of state, local or foreign tax Law. To the extent that amounts are so withheld by Newco or the Exchange Agent, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Holder of the shares of BNY Common Stock or shares of Mellon Common Stock in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by Newco or the Exchange Agent.
3.2. . At the First Effective Time, in the case of Mellon, and the Effective Time, in the case of BNY, the stock transfer books of such Party shall be closed and no transfer by any Holder shall thereafter be made or recognized. At the First Effective Time or Effective Time, as the case may be, Old Certificates presented to Mellon or BNY for transfer shall be cancelled and exchanged for the consideration provided for in Sections 1.3 and 2.4, as the case may be. Until surrendered for exchange in accordance with the provisions of Section 3.1, each Old Certificate (other than shares to be cancelled pursuant to Sections 1.5 or 2.5(b)) shall from and after the First Effective Time or the Effective Time, as the case may be, represent for all purposes only the right to receive the consideration provided in Sections 1.3 and 2.4, as the case may be, and any dividends or any other distributions with a record date prior to the First
Rights of Holders
 
Effective Time or Effective Time, as the case may be, which have been declared or made by Mellon in respect of such shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY in respect of BNY Common Stock in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and which remain unpaid at the Effective Time. To the extent permitted by Law, former holders of record of shares of Mellon Common Stock (a "Mellon Holder") shall be entitled to vote after the First Effective Time at any meeting of Newco shareholders the number of whole shares of Newco Common Stock into which their respective shares of Mellon Common Stock are converted, regardless of whether such Mellon Holders have exchanged their certificates representing Mellon Common Stock for New Certificates representing Newco Common Stock in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, but beginning 30 days after the First Effective Time no such Mellon Holder shall be entitled to vote on any matter until such Mellon Holder surrenders such Old Certificate for exchange as provided in Section 3.1. To the extent permitted by Law, former holders of record of shares of BNY Common Stock (a "BNY Holder") shall be entitled to vote after the Effective Time at any meeting of Newco shareholders the number of whole shares of Newco Common Stock into which their respective shares of BNY Common Stock are converted, regardless of whether such BNY Holders have exchanged their certificates representing BNY Common Stock for New Certificates representing Newco Common Stock in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, but beginning 30 days after the Effective Time no such BNY Holder shall be entitled to vote on any matter until such BNY Holder surrenders such Old Certificate for exchange as provided in Section 3.1. Whenever a dividend or other distribution is declared by Newco on Newco Common Stock, the record date for which is at or after the Effective Time, the declaration shall include dividends or other distributions on all shares of Newco Common Stock issuable pursuant to this Agreement, but no dividend or other distribution payable to the holders of record of Newco Common Stock as of any time subsequent to the Effective Time shall be delivered to the Holder of an Old Certificate until such Holder surrenders such Old Certificate for exchange as provided in Section 3.1. However, upon surrender of the Old Certificate, both the New Certificate, together with all such undelivered dividends or other distributions (without interest) and any undelivered cash payments to be paid for fractional share interests (without interest), shall be delivered and paid with respect to each share represented by such New Certificate.
4.1. . Prior to the execution and delivery of this Agreement, each Party has delivered to the other Party a letter (its "Disclosure Letter") setting forth, among other things, items the disclosure of which is necessary or appropriate either in response to an express disclosure requirement contained in a provision hereof or as an exception to one or more of such Party's representations or warranties contained in Section 4.3 or to one or more of its covenants contained in Article 5; provided, that (i) no such item is required to be set forth in a Party's Disclosure Letter as an exception to any representation or warranty of such Party if its absence would not result in the related representation or warranty being deemed untrue or incorrect under the standard established by Section 4.2, and (ii) the mere inclusion of an item in a Party's Disclosure Letter as an exception to a representation or warranty shall not be deemed an admission by that Party that such item represents a material exception or fact, event or circumstance or that such item is reasonably likely to result in a Material Adverse Effect with
Disclosure Letters
 
respect to such Party. Any disclosures made with respect to a subsection of Section 4.3 shall be deemed to qualify (a) any subsections of Section 4.3 specifically referenced or cross-referenced and (b) other subsections of Section 4.3 to the extent it is reasonably apparent (notwithstanding the absence of a specific cross reference) from a reading of the disclosure that such disclosure (i) applies to such other subsections and (ii) contains sufficient detail to enable a reasonable person to recognize the relevance of such disclosure to such other subsections.
4.2. .
Standards
(a) No representation or warranty of any Party hereto or Newco contained in Section 4.3 (other than the representations and warranties in (i) Sections 4.3(c)(i) and (ii), which shall be true and correct in all material respects with respect to it, and (ii) Section 4.3(e) which shall be true and correct in all respects with respect to it) shall be deemed untrue or incorrect, and no Party hereto or Newco shall be deemed to have breached a representation or warranty, as a consequence of the existence or absence of any fact, circumstance or event unless such fact, circumstance or event, individually or taken together with all other facts, circumstances or events inconsistent with any representation or warranty contained in Section 4.3, has had or is reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect on such Party or Newco.
(b) The term "Material Adverse Effect," as used with respect to a Party or Newco, means an effect which (i) is materially adverse to the business, properties, financial condition or results of operations of such Party and its Subsidiaries, or Newco (including, from and after the Effective Time, its Subsidiaries), taken as a whole, or (ii) materially impairs the ability of such Party or Newco to consummate the Merger and the transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis; provided that, in determining whether a Material Adverse Effect has occurred with respect to such Party or Newco, there shall be excluded (with respect to each of clause (A), (B) and (C), to the extent that the effect of a change on it is not materially different than the effect on comparable banking organizations) any effect to the extent attributable to or resulting from (A) any changes in Laws, regulations or interpretations of Laws or regulations generally affecting the financial services industries in which the Parties operate, (B) any change in GAAP or regulatory accounting requirements generally affecting the financial services industries in which the Parties operate, (C) events, conditions or trends in economic, business or financial conditions generally affecting the financial services industries in which the Parties operate, including changes in prevailing interest rates, currency exchange rates and price levels or trading volumes in the United States or foreign securities markets, (D) changes in national or international political or social conditions including the engagement by the United States in hostilities, whether or not pursuant to the declaration of a national emergency or war, or the occurrence of any military or terrorist attack upon or within the United States, or any of its territories, possessions or diplomatic or consular offices or upon any military installation, equipment or personnel of the United States, (E) the effects of the actions expressly required by this Agreement or that are taken with the prior written consent of the other Party and Newco in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, and (F) the announcement of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby; and provided, further, that in no event shall a change in the trading prices of a Party's common stock, by itself, constitute a Material Adverse Effect.
 
4.3. . Subject to and giving effect to Sections 4.1 and 4.2 and except as set forth in the relevant Disclosure Letter, BNY hereby represents and warrants to Mellon, and Mellon hereby represents and warrants to BNY, that:
Representations and Warranties of the Parties
(a) . It, and each of its Subsidiaries, is duly organized, validly existing, and (to the extent applicable) in good standing under the Laws of the jurisdiction in which it is organized. It, and each of its Subsidiaries, has the requisite corporate power and authority to own, lease, and operate its properties and assets and to carry on its business as now conducted. It, and each of its Subsidiaries, is duly qualified or licensed to do business and (to the extent applicable) in good standing in the States and territories of the United States and foreign jurisdictions where the character of its assets or the nature or conduct of its business requires it to be so qualified or licensed. It has made available to the other Party a complete and correct copy of its Organizational Documents, each as amended to the date hereof and as in full force and effect as of the date hereof. A true and complete list of its direct and indirect Subsidiaries that would constitute Significant Subsidiaries of such Party within the meaning of Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X of the SEC as of the date hereof is set forth in Section 4.3(a) of its Disclosure Letter.
Organization, Standing, and Power; Subsidiaries
(b) .
Authority; No Breach of Agreement
(i) It has, and Newco will have, the corporate power and authority necessary to execute, deliver, and perform its obligations under this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. The execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and the Stock Option Agreements, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, including the Merger, by it, have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action (including valid authorization and unanimous adoption of this Agreement by its duly constituted Board of Directors), subject only to the receipt of (A) in the case of Mellon, the adoption of the plan of merger contained in this Agreement by the holders of a majority of the votes cast by all holders of shares of Mellon Common Stock and the approval of the related proposals concerning Newco's certificate of incorporation contained in the Registration Statement and the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus by the holders of a majority of the votes cast by all holders of shares of Mellon Common Stock (the "Mellon Shareholder Approval"), (B) in the case of BNY, the adoption of the plan of merger contained in this Agreement by the holders of two-thirds of the Outstanding shares of BNY Common Stock and the approval of the related proposals concerning Newco's certificate of incorporation contained in the Registration Statement and the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus by the holders of a majority of the votes cast by all holders of shares of BNY Common Stock (the "BNY Shareholder Approval") and (C) in the case of Newco, the authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Board of Directors of Newco and the adoption of this Agreement by Mellon and BNY, as the sole shareholders of Newco (the "Newco Shareholder Approval"). Subject to the Mellon Shareholder Approval in the case of Mellon, the BNY Shareholder Approval in the case of BNY, and the Newco Shareholder Approval in the case of Newco and assuming due authorization,
 
execution, and delivery of this Agreement and the Stock Option Agreements by the other Party and this Agreement by Newco, each of this Agreement and the Stock Option Agreements represent a legal, valid, and binding obligation of it, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms (except in all cases as such enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, conservatorship, moratorium, or similar Laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except that the availability of the equitable remedy of specific performance or injunctive relief is subject to the discretion of the court before which any proceeding may be brought).
(ii) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the Stock Option Agreements by it, nor the consummation by it of the transactions contemplated hereby, nor compliance by it with any of the provisions hereof, will (A) conflict with or result in a breach or violation of any provision of its Organizational Documents, (B) constitute or result in a Default under, or require any Consent pursuant to, or result in the creation or acceleration of any Lien (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) on any material asset of it or its Subsidiaries under, any Contract or Permit of it or its Subsidiaries, or any change in its rights or obligations under any Contract, or (C) subject to receipt of the Regulatory Consents and the expiration of any waiting period required by Law, violate any Law, Order or governmental license applicable to it or its Subsidiaries or any of their respective material assets.
(iii) Other than (A) the filing with the SEC of (1) the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and (2) such reports under Sections 13(a), 13(d), 13(g) and 16(a) of the 1934 Act as may be required in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and the obtaining from the SEC of such Consents as may be required in connection therewith, (B) the filing of the articles of merger with the Pennsylvania Department of State and the certificate of merger with the Delaware Secretary of State with respect to the First Step Merger and the filing of the certificate of merger with the New York Department of State and the certificate of merger with the Delaware Secretary of State with respect to the Second Step Merger, (C) the filing of applications and notices with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System under the BHC Act and the Federal Reserve Act and approval of same, (D) such applications, filings and Consents as may be required under the banking laws of any state, and approval thereof, (E) Consents, filings or exemptions required under Securities Laws relating to the regulation of broker-dealers, investment companies and investment advisors and federal commodities laws relating to the regulation of futures commission merchants and the rules and regulations of the SEC and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission thereunder and of any applicable industry self-regulatory organization and the rules of the NYSE, or which are required under consumer finance, mortgage banking and other similar laws of the various states in which it or any of its Subsidiaries is licensed or regulated, (F) notices or filings under the HSR Act, (G) such filings and Consents as may be required pursuant to applicable antitrust or competition laws of any foreign Governmental Entity (the "Foreign
 
Antitrust Approvals"), (H) such other filings, Consents and exemptions as may be required under foreign banking and similar laws in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, (I) such filings, notifications and Consents as are required under the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and the rules and regulations of the Small Business Administration thereunder, and (J) Consent of the Commissioner of Insurance of the State of Delaware or other state insurance regulators (clauses (C) through (J) collectively, the "Regulatory Consents"), no notice to, application or filing with, or Consent of, any Governmental Authority is necessary in connection with the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement and the Stock Option Agreements and the consummation by it of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby.
(c) .
Common Stock
(i) In the case of Mellon only, the authorized capital stock of Mellon consists of 800,000,000 shares of Mellon Common Stock and 50,000,000 shares of Mellon Preferred Stock, of which, as of November 30, 2006, (A) 415,284,706 shares of Mellon Common Stock were Outstanding, and (B) no shares of Mellon Preferred Stock were Outstanding. As of the date of this Agreement, no more than 32,000,000 shares of Mellon Common Stock were subject to Mellon Stock Options granted under Mellon Stock Plans. As of the date of this Agreement, there were no more than 302,000 shares of Mellon Common Stock subject to outstanding Rights under the Mellon Stock Plans. Except for (1) Permitted Issuances, (2) as set forth above in this Section 4.3(c)(i), or (3) as set forth in Section 4.3(c)(i) of Mellon's Disclosure Letter, there are no shares of Mellon Capital Stock or other equity securities of Mellon outstanding and no outstanding Rights relating to the Mellon Capital Stock, and no Person has any Contract or any right or privilege (whether pre-emptive or contractual) capable of becoming a Contract or Right for the purchase, subscription or issuance of any securities of Mellon or any Subsidiary of Mellon. All of the Outstanding shares of Mellon Capital Stock are duly and validly authorized, Outstanding and are fully paid and nonassessable. None of the Outstanding shares of Mellon Capital Stock has been issued in violation of any preemptive or similar rights of the current or past shareholders of Mellon. As of the date of this Agreement, Mellon has no contractual obligation to redeem, repurchase, or otherwise acquire, or to register with the SEC, any shares of Mellon Common Stock or any capital stock of its Subsidiaries.
(ii) In the case of BNY only, the authorized capital stock of BNY consists of 2,400,000,000 shares of BNY Common Stock, 5,000,000 shares of Preferred Stock, and 5,000,000 shares of Class A Preferred Stock, of which, as of November 30, 2006, (A) 751,867,066 shares of BNY Common Stock were Outstanding, (B) 3,000 shares of Class A Preferred Stock were Outstanding, and (C) no shares of BNY Preferred Stock were Outstanding. As of the date of this Agreement, no more than 70,000,000 shares of BNY Common Stock were subject to BNY Stock Options granted under the BNY Stock Plans. As of the date of this Agreement, there were no more than 9,000,000 shares of BNY Common Stock
 
subject to outstanding Rights under the BNY Stock Plans. Except for (1) Permitted Issuances, (2) as set forth above in this Section 4.3(c)(ii), or (3) as set forth in Section 4.3(c)(ii) of BNY's Disclosure Letter, there are no shares of BNY Capital Stock or other equity securities of BNY outstanding and no outstanding Rights relating to the BNY Capital Stock, and no Person has any Contract or any right or privilege (whether pre-emptive or contractual) capable of becoming a Contract or Right for the purchase, subscription or issuance of any securities of BNY or any Subsidiary of BNY. All of the Outstanding shares of BNY Capital Stock are duly and validly authorized and Outstanding and are fully paid and nonassessable. None of the Outstanding shares of BNY Capital Stock has been issued in violation of any preemptive or similar rights of the current or past shareholders of BNY. As of the date of this Agreement, BNY has no contractual obligation to redeem, repurchase or otherwise acquire, or to register with the SEC, any shares of BNY Capital Stock or any capital stock of its Subsidiaries.
(iii) No bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness having the right to vote on any matters on which its shareholders may Vote ("Voting Debt") are issued or outstanding.
(iv) All the outstanding shares of capital stock of each of its Subsidiaries owned by it or a Subsidiary of it have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and (except, with respect to bank Subsidiaries, as provided under 12 U.S.C. 55 or any comparable provision of applicable state or foreign Law) nonassessable, and are owned by it or a Subsidiary of it free and clear of all Liens or Rights.
(d) .
SEC Filings; Financial Statements; Undisclosed Liabilities
(i) Each Party has filed all SEC Documents required to be filed by it with the SEC since December 31, 2002 (collectively, the "SEC Reports"). Its SEC Reports, including the Financial Statements, exhibits and schedules contained therein, (A) at the time filed, complied (and any SEC Reports filed after the date of this Agreement will comply) in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Laws, and (B) at the time they were filed (or if amended or superseded by another SEC Report filed prior to the date of this Agreement, then on the date of filing of such amended or superseding SEC Report), did not (and any SEC Reports filed after the date of this Agreement will not) contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated in such SEC Reports or necessary in order to make the statements made in such SEC Reports, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(ii) Each of its Financial Statements contained in its SEC Reports (including any SEC Reports filed after the date of this Agreement) fairly presented (or, in the case of SEC Reports filed after the date of this Agreement, will fairly present) the consolidated financial position of it and its Subsidiaries as at the respective dates and the consolidated results of its operations and cash
 
flows for the periods indicated, in each case in accordance with GAAP consistently applied during the periods indicated, except in each case as may be noted therein, and subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and as permitted by Form 10-Q in the case of unaudited Financial Statements.
(iii) The records, systems, controls, data and information of it and its Subsidiaries are recorded, stored, maintained and operated under means (including any electronic, mechanical or photographic process, whether computerized or not) that are under the exclusive ownership and direct control of it or its Subsidiaries or accountants (including all means of access thereto and therefrom), except for any non-exclusive ownership and non-direct control that would not reasonably be expected to have a materially adverse effect on the system of internal accounting controls described in the following sentence. As and to the extent described in the SEC Reports filed with the SEC prior to the date hereof, it and its Subsidiaries have devised and maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. It (A) has designed disclosure controls and procedures to ensure that material information relating to it, including its consolidated Subsidiaries, is made known to its management by others within those entities, and (B) has disclosed, based on its most recent evaluation prior to the date hereof, to its auditors and the audit committee of its Board of Directors (1) any significant deficiencies in the design or operation of internal controls which could adversely affect in any material respect its ability to record, process, summarize and report financial data and has identified for its auditors any material weaknesses in internal controls and (2) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in its internal controls. It has made available to the other Party a summary of any such disclosure made by management to its auditors and audit committee since January 1, 2004.
(iv) Except for (A) those liabilities that are fully reflected or reserved for in its consolidated financial statements included in its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, as filed prior to the date of this Agreement and (B) liabilities incurred since September 30, 2006 in the ordinary course of business, such Party and its Subsidiaries do not have, and since September 30, 2006, such Party and its Subsidiaries have not incurred (except as permitted by Section 5.2), any liabilities or obligations of any nature whatsoever (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise and whether or not required to be reflected in its financial statements in accordance with GAAP).
(e) . Since September 30, 2006, except as disclosed in its SEC Reports filed prior to the date of this Agreement, (i) it and its Subsidiaries have conducted their respective businesses only in the ordinary course of such businesses, (ii) there have been no events, changes, developments or occurrences which have had, or are reasonably likely to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on it and (iii) it and its Subsidiaries have not taken action that, if it had been taken after the date of this Agreement, would have required the prior written Consent of the other Party under Section 5.1.
Absence of Certain Changes or Events
 
(f) . All Tax Returns required to be filed by or on behalf of it or any of its Subsidiaries have been timely filed or requests for extensions have been timely filed and any such extension has been granted and has not expired, and all such filed returns are complete and accurate. Except as disclosed in its SEC Reports filed prior to the date of this Agreement, all Taxes attributable to it or any of its Subsidiaries that are or were due or payable (without regard to whether such Taxes have been assessed) have been paid in full or have been adequately provided for on its consolidated balance sheet and consolidated statement of earnings or income in accordance with GAAP. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to a Tax sharing, indemnification or similar agreement or any agreement pursuant to which it or any of its Subsidiaries has any obligation to any Person (other than it or one of its Subsidiaries) with respect to Taxes. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has been a party to any distribution occurring during the last five years in which the parties to such distribution treated the distribution as one to which Section 355 of the Internal Revenue Code applied.
Tax Matters
(g) . Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries or any Affiliates thereof has taken or agreed to take any action, and it has no knowledge of any fact or circumstance, that is reasonably likely to (i) prevent the Merger from qualifying as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, or (ii) materially impede or materially delay receipt of any Regulatory Consents. To its knowledge, as of the date hereof, there exists no fact, circumstance, or reason that would cause any Regulatory Consents not to be received in a timely manner.
Certain Actions
(h) . Except as described in the Disclosure Letter: (i) no Hazardous Material is contained in or has been used at or released from its Facilities other than in compliance with, and as would not reasonably be expected to result in liability under, any Environmental Laws; (ii) all Hazardous Materials used by it or stored on its Properties have been disposed of in accordance with, and as would not reasonably be expected to result in liability under, any Environmental Laws; (iii) neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries is potentially liable as a responsible party under any Environmental Law, including the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, as amended ("CERCLA"), or comparable state statute, arising out of events occurring prior to the Effective Time; (iv) there have not been in the past, and are not now, any Hazardous Materials that have been released on or under or are migrating to or from its Facilities or any of its Properties; (v) there have not been in the past, and are not now, any underground tanks or physical structures or vessels holding Hazardous Materials at, on or under any of its Properties including treatment or storage tanks, sumps, lagoons, basins, or water, gas or oil wells; (vi) there are no polychlorinated biphenyls ("PCBs") deposited, stored, disposed of or located on any of its Properties or Facilities or any equipment on any of its Properties containing PCBs at levels in excess of levels permitted by Law; (vii) it and its Subsidiaries and Affiliates are not subject to any consent orders, decrees, notices of violation, injunctions, directives or orders from any Governmental Authority or any indemnity or other agreement with any third party relating to obligations, costs or liabilities arising under any Environmental Law; (viii) its
Environmental Matters
 
Facilities and its and its Subsidiaries' activities and operations have at all times complied with all Environmental Laws; (ix) it and its Subsidiaries have received no notice of any noncompliance with, or liability under, any Environmental Laws regarding its Facilities or any of its Properties or its past or present operations; and (x) no claims, notices, administrative actions, information requests or suits are pending or, to its knowledge, threatened relating to any actual or potential violation, liability or obligation by it or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any Environmental Laws.
(i) .
Compliance with Permits, Laws and Orders
(i) It and each of its Subsidiaries has in effect all Permits and has made all filings, applications, and registrations with Governmental Authorities that are required for it to own, lease, or operate its material assets and to carry on its business as now conducted and there has occurred no Default under any Permit applicable to its business or employees conducting its business.
(ii) Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries is in Default under any Laws or Orders applicable to it, its business or employees conducting its business, including the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the USA PATRIOT Act of 2001 and other applicable federal, state and foreign anti-money laundering and sanctions Laws. Each of its Subsidiaries that is an insured depository institution has a Community Reinvestment Act rating of "satisfactory" or better.
(iii) Since January 1, 2003, neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any notification or communication from any Governmental Authority, (A) asserting that it or any of its Subsidiaries is in Default under any Permits, Laws or Orders, (B) threatening to revoke any Permits, (C) requiring it or any of its Subsidiaries (x) to enter into or consent to the issuance of a cease and desist order, written agreement, consent decree, directive, commitment or memorandum of understanding, or (y) to adopt any policy, procedure or resolution of its Board of Directors or similar undertaking, which restricts the conduct of its business, or relates to its capital adequacy, its credit or reserve policies, its management, or the payment of dividends or any other policy or procedure, or (D) threatening or contemplating revocation or limitation of, or which would have the effect of revoking or limiting, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation deposit insurance, and neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any notice from a Governmental Authority that it is considering issuing or requiring any of the foregoing.
(iv) There (A) is no unresolved violation, criticism, or exception by any Governmental Authority with respect to any report or statement relating to any examinations or inspections of it or any of its Subsidiaries and (B) have been no formal or informal inquiries by, or disagreements or disputes with, any Governmental Authority with respect to its or any of its Subsidiaries' business, operations, policies or procedures since January 1, 2003.
 
(v) There is no Order, circumstance or condition relevant or applicable to it that would prevent, or is reasonably likely to prevent, Newco from satisfying the criteria for "financial holding company" status under the BHC Act or which would otherwise reasonably be expected, either individually or in the aggregate, to have a Material Adverse Effect on Newco after the Effective Time.
(vi) It and each of its Subsidiaries have properly administered all accounts for which it acts as a fiduciary, including accounts for which it serves as a trustee, agent, custodian, personal representative, guardian, conservator or investment advisor, in accordance with the terms of the governing documents and applicable state, federal and foreign Law. None of it, any of its Subsidiaries, or any of its or its Subsidiaries' directors, officers or employees, has committed any breach of trust or fiduciary duty with respect to any such fiduciary account, and the accountings for each such fiduciary account are true and correct and accurately reflect the assets and results of such fiduciary account.
(j) . Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries is the subject of any Litigation asserting that it or any of its Subsidiaries has committed an unfair labor practice (within the meaning of the National Labor Relations Act or comparable state Law) or seeking to compel it or any of its Subsidiaries to bargain with any labor organization as to wages or conditions of employment, nor is it or any of its Subsidiaries a party to or bound by any collective bargaining agreement, Contract, or other agreement or understanding with a labor union or labor organization, nor is there any strike or other labor dispute involving it or any of its Subsidiaries pending or, to its knowledge, threatened, nor to its knowledge, is there any activity involving its or any of its Subsidiaries' employees seeking to certify a collective bargaining unit or engaging in any other organization activity. It and each of its Subsidiaries has complied in all respects with all applicable Laws relating to the employment of its employees, including applicable Laws relating to equal employment opportunity, nondiscrimination, immigration, wages, hours, benefits, data privacy, collective bargaining, the payment of social security and similar taxes, occupational safety and health, and plant closing and, to its knowledge, neither it nor its Subsidiaries is liable for the payment of any compensation, damages, taxes, fines, penalties or other amounts, however designated, for failure to comply with any of the foregoing Laws.
Labor Relations
(k) .
Employee Compensation and Benefit Plans
(i) It has disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, and has delivered or made available, to the extent requested, to the other Party prior to the date of this Agreement correct and complete copies of, all of its Compensation and Benefit Plans, other than Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained outside of the United States primarily for the benefit of its employees working outside of the United States. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has an "obligation to contribute" (as defined in ERISA Section 4212) nor have they ever had an obligation to contribute to a "multiemployer plan" (as defined in ERISA Sections 4001(a)(3) and 3(37)(A)). Each "employee pension benefit plan," as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA, that was, within six years preceding the date of this
 
Agreement, ever maintained by it or any of its Subsidiaries and that was intended to qualify under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, is disclosed as such in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter.
(ii) It has delivered or made available to the other Party, to the extent requested, prior to the date of this Agreement correct and complete copies of the following documents: (A) all trust agreements or other funding arrangements for its Compensation and Benefit Plans (including insurance Contracts), and all amendments thereto (all such trust agreements and other funding arrangements are disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter), (B) with respect to any such Compensation and Benefit Plans or amendments, the most recent determination letters, and all material rulings, material opinion letters, material information letters, or material advisory opinions issued by the Internal Revenue Service, the United States Department of Labor, or the PBGC or any equivalent foreign taxing or regulatory authority after December 31, 1996, (C) annual reports or returns, audited or unaudited financial statements, actuarial valuations and reports, and summary annual reports prepared for any Compensation and Benefit Plans with respect to the most recent plan year, and (D) the most recent summary plan descriptions and any material modifications thereto.
(iii) All of its Compensation and Benefit Plans are in substantial compliance with the applicable terms of ERISA, the Internal Revenue Code, and any other applicable Laws and have been administered in accordance with their terms. Except as disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, each of its ERISA Plans which is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code has received a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service covering all Tax Law changes prior to the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001 and, to its knowledge, there are no circumstances likely to result in revocation of any such favorable determination letter. Except as disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, each trust created under any of its ERISA Plans has been determined to be exempt from Tax under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or its foreign equivalent and it is not aware of any circumstance which will or could reasonably result in revocation of such exemption. To its knowledge, each Compensation and Benefit Plan providing deferred compensation or benefits subject to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code, including applicable transitional guidance, has been substantially operated in good faith compliance with the applicable requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code since January 1, 2005. Any voluntary employees' beneficiary association within the meaning of Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code which provides benefits under a Compensation and Benefit Plan has (i) received an opinion letter from the Internal Revenue Service recognizing its exempt status under Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) filed a timely notice with the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Section 505(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, and it is not aware of circumstances likely to result in the loss of such exempt status under Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. Each Compensation and Benefit Plan subject to regulation by any foreign tax or regulatory authority complies with such applicable foreign Law. There is no pending or, to its knowledge, threatened Litigation relating to any of its ERISA Plans.
 
(iv) Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has engaged in a transaction with respect to any of its Compensation and Benefit Plans that, assuming the Taxable Period of such transaction expired as of the date of this Agreement or the Effective Time, would subject it or any of its Subsidiaries to a Tax or penalty imposed by either Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 502(i) of ERISA.
(v) Except as disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, each of its Pension Plans had, as of the date of its most recent actuarial valuation, assets measured at fair market value at least equal to its "current liability," as that term is defined in Section 302(d)(7) of ERISA. To its knowledge, since the date of the most recent actuarial valuation, no event has occurred which would adversely change any such funded status. None of its Pension Plans nor any "single-employer plan," within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(15) of ERISA, currently maintained by it or any of its Subsidiaries, or the single-employer plan of any entity which is considered one employer with it under Section 4001 of ERISA or Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 302 of ERISA (an "ERISA Affiliate") has an "accumulated funding deficiency" (whether or not waived) within the meaning of Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 302 of ERISA. All required contributions with respect to any of its Pension Plans or any single-employer plan of any of its ERISA Affiliates have been timely made and there is no lien, nor is there expected to be a lien, under Internal Revenue Code Section 412(n) or ERISA Section 302(f) or Tax under Internal Revenue Code Section 4971. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has provided, or is required to provide, security to any of its Pension Plans or to any single-employer plan of any of its ERISA Affiliates pursuant to Section 401(a)(29) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(vi) With respect to any Compensation and Benefit Plan maintained in the United Kingdom or that is otherwise subject to the Laws thereof, to its knowledge, (A) no liability, which has not been settled in full, has been imposed on it or any Subsidiary under Section 144 of the Pension Schemes Act 1993 or Section 75 of the Pensions Act 1995; (B) all death in service benefits payable in accordance with the provisions of each such plan are fully insured (apart from money purchase benefits as defined in Section 181 of the Pension Schemes Act 1993) and it is aware of no reason why such cover may be forfeited; and (C) no employee or former employee has transferred to it or to a Subsidiary as part of a transfer of an undertaking to which the Transfer of Undertakings (Protection of Employment) Regulations 1981 applied.
(vii) With respect to any Compensation and Benefit Plan maintained in Canada or that is otherwise subject to the Laws thereof, to its knowledge, (A) no event has occurred respecting any Compensation and Benefit Plan which is a "registered pension plan" as defined under the Income Tax Act (Canada) which
 
would entitle any Person to cause the wind-up or termination, in whole or in part, of such Compensation and Benefit Plan; (B) there has been no withdrawal, and no application to any Governmental Authority for approval of such a withdrawal, of assets from such Compensation and Benefit Plan, and any application of surplus assets in such Compensation and Benefit Plan to offset required employer contributions thereto has been permitted by applicable Law and the terms of such Compensation and Benefit Plan and its associated funding agreement; and (C) with respect to any "registered pension plan", no transfers of assets, which required the approval of any Governmental Authority from or to such Compensation and Benefit Plan to or from another benefit plan or arrangement have occurred and there are no pending or anticipated applications to transfer assets to or from any such Compensation and Benefit Plan.
(viii) No Liability under Title IV of ERISA has been or is expected to be incurred by it or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any defined benefit plan currently or formerly maintained by any of them or by any of its ERISA Affiliates that has not been satisfied in full (other than Liability for PBGC premiums, which have been paid when due).
(ix) Except as disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has any obligations for retiree health and retiree life benefits under any of its Compensation and Benefit Plans other than with respect to benefit coverage mandated by applicable Law. To its knowledge, it or its Subsidiaries may amend or terminate any plan not so disclosed at any time without incurring any liability thereunder other than in respect of claims incurred prior to such amendment or termination or as imposed by applicable Law.
(x) There has been no amendment to, announcement by it or any of its Subsidiaries relating to, or change in employee participation or coverage under, any Compensation and Benefit Plan which would increase the expense of maintaining such plan above the level of the expense incurred therefor for the most recent fiscal year. In the case of Mellon only, except as disclosed in Section 4.3(k) of its Disclosure Letter, none of the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the shareholder approval of the transactions contemplated hereby, the termination of the employment of any of its or its Subsidiaries' employees within a specified time of the Effective Time or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby (A) result in any payment (including severance, golden parachute, or otherwise), whether or not in conjunction with a termination of employment, becoming due to any director or any employee of it or any of its Subsidiaries from it or any of its Subsidiaries under any of its Compensation and Benefit Plans or otherwise, other than by operation of Law, (B) increase any benefits otherwise payable under any of its Compensation and Benefit Plans, (C) result in any acceleration of the time of payment or vesting of any such benefit or funding (through a grantor trust or otherwise) of any such payment or benefit, (D) limit or restrict the right of it to merge, amend or terminate any of the Compensation and Benefit Plans or any related trust or (E) result in payments under any Compensation and Benefit Plans which would not be deductible under Section 280G of the Internal Revenue Code.
 
(xi) In the case of BNY only, the transactions contemplated under this Agreement will not constitute a "change in control" as that term is defined under any of its Compensation and Benefits Plans.
(l) .
Material Contracts
(i) Except for Contracts reflected as exhibits to its SEC Reports filed prior to the date of this Agreement, as of the date of this Agreement, neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries, nor any of their respective assets, businesses, or operations, is a party to, or is bound or affected by, or receives benefits under, (A) any Contract relating to the borrowing of money by it or any of its Subsidiaries or the guarantee by it or any of its Subsidiaries of any such obligation (other than Contracts pertaining to fully-secured repurchase agreements, and trade payables, and Contracts relating to borrowings or guarantees made in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice), (B) any Contract containing covenants that limit the ability of it or any of its Subsidiaries to compete in any line of business or with any Person, or that involve any restriction of the geographic area in which, or method by which, it or any of its Subsidiaries may carry on its business (other than as may be required by Law or any Governmental Authority) or which requires referrals of business or requires it or any of its Affiliates to make available investment opportunities to any Person on a priority, equal or exclusive basis, (C) any Contract with respect to the employment of any directors or executive officers, or with any consultants that are natural Persons involving the payment of $10,000,000 or more per annum, (D) any Contract that could reasonably be expected to prohibit, delay or materially impair the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (E) any Contract that involves expenditures or receipts by it or any of its Subsidiaries in excess of $25,000,000 per year not entered into in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (F) any Contract with any Governmental Authority (other than routine or customary Contracts with any self-regulatory body) or (G) any other Contract or amendment thereto that would be required to be filed as an exhibit to any SEC Report (as described in Items 601(b) of Regulation S-K under the 1933 Act) that has not been filed as an exhibit to or incorporated by reference in its SEC Reports filed prior to the date of this Agreement. With respect to each of its Contracts that are (A) reflected as an exhibit to any SEC Report, (B) would be required under Items 601(b)(4) and 601(b)(10) of Regulation S-K under the 1933 Act to be filed as an exhibit to any of its SEC Reports, or (C) that is disclosed in its Disclosure Letter: (w) each such Contract is in full force and effect; (x) neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries is in Default thereunder; (y) neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has repudiated or waived any material provision of any such Contract; and (z) no other party to any such Contract is, to its knowledge, in Default thereunder in any material respect.
 
(ii) All interest rate swaps, caps, floors, option agreements, futures and forward contracts, and other similar risk management arrangements, whether entered into for its own account or for the account of one or more of its Subsidiaries or their respective customers, were entered into (A) in accordance with prudent business practices and all applicable Laws and (B) with counterparties believed to be financially responsible, and each of them is enforceable against it or its Subsidiaries and, to its knowledge, the applicable counterparties thereto, in accordance with its terms (except in all cases as such enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, conservatorship, moratorium, or similar Laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except that the availability of the equitable remedy of specific performance or injunctive relief is subject to the discretion of the court before which any proceeding may be brought), and is in full force and effect. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries, nor to its knowledge, any other party thereto, is in Default of any of its obligations under any such agreement or arrangement. Its Financial Statements disclose the value of such agreements and arrangements on a mark-to-market basis in accordance with GAAP (including but not limited to Financial Accounting Statement 133) and, since September 30, 2006, there has not been a change in such value that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in a Material Adverse Effect on it.
(m) . There is no Litigation pending or, to its knowledge, threatened against it or any of its Subsidiaries, or against any asset, interest, or right of any of them nor are there any Orders of any Governmental Authority or arbitrators outstanding against it or any of its Subsidiaries, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or the other relief sought and other relevant factors, would be reasonably expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on it.
Legal Proceedings
(n) . Since January 1, 2003, or the date of organization if later, it and each of its Subsidiaries has filed all reports and statements, together with any amendments required to be made with respect thereto, that it was required to file with any Governmental Authority, and it and each of its Subsidiaries have paid all fees and assessments due and payable in connection therewith.
Reports
(o) .
Intellectual Property
(i) It and its Subsidiaries own, or are licensed or otherwise possess sufficient legally enforceable rights to use, all Intellectual Property (including the Technology Systems) that is used by it and its Subsidiaries in their respective businesses as currently conducted. Neither it nor any of its Subsidiaries has (A) licensed any Intellectual Property owned by it or its Subsidiaries in source code form to any Person or (B) entered into any exclusive agreements relating to Intellectual Property owned by it or its Subsidiaries.
 
(ii) It and its Subsidiaries have not infringed or otherwise violated the Intellectual Property rights of any third Person since January 1, 2003. There is no claim asserted, or to its knowledge threatened, against it and its Subsidiaries or any indemnitee thereof concerning the ownership, validity, registerability, enforceability, infringement, use or licensed right to use any Intellectual Property.
(iii) No third Person has infringed, misappropriated or otherwise violated it or its Subsidiaries' Intellectual Property rights since January 1, 2003. There are no claims asserted or threatened by it or its Subsidiaries, or decided by them to be asserted or threatened, that (A) a third Person infringed or otherwise violated any of their Intellectual Property rights; or (B) a third Person's owned or claimed Intellectual Property interferes with, infringes, dilutes or otherwise harms any of their Intellectual Property rights.
(iv) It and its Subsidiaries have taken reasonable measures to protect the confidentiality of all Trade Secrets that are owned, used or held by them.
(p) . It or one of its Subsidiaries (i) has good and marketable title to all the properties and assets reflected in its latest audited balance sheet included in the Financial Statements as being owned by it or one of its Subsidiaries or acquired after the date thereof which are material to its business on a consolidated basis (except properties sold or otherwise disposed of since the date thereof in the ordinary course of business), free and clear of all Liens, and (ii) is the lessee of all leasehold estates reflected in the latest audited financial statements included in the Financial Statements or acquired after the date thereof which are material to its business on a consolidated basis (except for leases that have expired by their terms or been legally terminated by it or one of its Subsidiaries since the date thereof) and is in possession of the properties purported to be leased thereunder, and each such lease is valid without Default thereunder by the lessee or, to its knowledge, the lessor.
Properties
(q) . It has taken all action required to be taken by it in order to exempt this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby from, and this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby are exempt from, the requirements of any "moratorium," "control share," "fair price," "affiliate transaction," "anti-greenmail," "business combination" or other antitakeover Laws of any jurisdiction, including but not limited to (i) in the case of Mellon, Sections 2538 through 2588 inclusive of the PBCL, and (ii) in the case of BNY, Section 912 of the NYBCL (collectively, "Takeover Laws"). It has taken all action required to be taken by it in order to make this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby comply with, and this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby do comply with, the requirements of any provisions of its Organizational Documents concerning "business combination," "fair price," "voting requirement," "constituency requirement" or other related provisions.
State Takeover Laws
(r) . Except for UBS Securities LLC and Lazard Frres & Co. LLC as to Mellon and Goldman Sachs & Co. as to BNY (in each case pursuant to engagement letters which have been set forth as an exhibit to their respective Disclosure
Brokers and Finders
 
Letter), neither it nor any of its officers, directors, employees, or Affiliates has employed any broker or finder or incurred any Liability for any financial advisory fees, investment bankers' fees, brokerage fees, commissions, or finders' fees in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
(s) . Prior to the execution of this Agreement, the Board of Directors of Mellon has received separate opinions of UBS Securities LLC and Lazard Frres & Co. LLC and the Board of Directors of BNY has received an opinion of Goldman Sachs & Co., each to the effect that as of the date thereof and based upon and subject to the matters set forth therein, (i) in the case of Goldman Sachs & Co., the BNY Exchange Ratio is fair, from a financial point of view, to the holders of BNY Common Stock, and (ii) in the case of UBS Securities LLC and Lazard Frres & Co. LLC, the Mellon Exchange Ratio is fair, from a financial point of view, to the holders of Mellon Common Stock. Such opinions have not been amended or rescinded as of the date of this Agreement.
Opinion of Financial Advisors
(t) . It and its Subsidiaries are insured with reputable insurers against such risks and in such amounts as its management reasonably has determined to be prudent in accordance with industry practices.
Insurance
(u) . (i) It and certain of its Subsidiaries (the "Advisory Entities") provide investment management, investment advisory and sub-advisory services (including management and advice provided to separate accounts and participation in wrap fee programs). For purposes of this Agreement, "Advisory Contract" means each contract for such services provided by an Advisory Entity; "Advisory Client" means each party to an Advisory Contract other than the applicable Advisory Entity; "Fund Client" means each Advisory Client that is registered as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "Investment Company Act"); and "Sponsored" means, when used with reference to any Fund Client, any such Fund Client, a majority of the officers of which are employees of it or any of its Subsidiaries, or of which it or any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates holds itself out as the sponsor.
Investment Adviser Subsidiaries; Funds; Clients
(ii) Each Sponsored Fund Client and, to its knowledge, each other Fund Client and each Advisory Entity (A) has since January 1, 2003 (or such later date as it became a Sponsored Fund Client, Fund Client or Advisory Entity), operated and is currently operating in compliance with all laws, regulations, rules, judgments, orders or rulings of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its business and (B) has all Permits required for the operation of its business or ownership of its properties and assets as presently conducted. There is no Litigation pending or, to its knowledge, threatened which would reasonably be expected to lead to the revocation, amendment, failure to renew, limitation, suspension or restriction of any such Permits. Each Sponsored Fund Client has been operated in compliance with its objectives and restrictions
 
(iii) Each Advisory Entity has been since January 1, 2003 (or such later date as it became an Advisory Entity) and is in compliance with each Advisory Contract to which it is a party.
(iv) The accounts of each Advisory Client subject to ERISA have been managed since January 1, 2003 (or such later date as it became an Advisory Client) by its applicable Subsidiary in compliance with the applicable requirements of ERISA.
(v) As of the date hereof, neither it nor any of its Advisory Entities nor any "affiliated person" (as defined in the Investment Company Act) of any of them is ineligible pursuant to Section 9(a) or (b) of the Investment Company Act to serve as an investment adviser (or in any other capacity contemplated by the Investment Company Act) to a registered investment company; and no such Advisory Entity or any "person associated with an investment advisor" (as defined in the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended (the "Investment Advisers Act")) of any of them is ineligible pursuant to Section 203 of the Investment Advisers Act to serve as an investment advisor or as a person associated with a registered investment advisor.
(v) . (i) It and its Subsidiaries required to so act have at all times acted as the fiduciary (to its knowledge, validly appointed) or agent (to its knowledge, validly appointed) under all indenture, trust, pooling and servicing, private label, paying agency, collateral or disbursing agency, securities (whether bond, note, debenture or other) registrar, transfer agency, document custody, and all other fiduciary and agency Contracts under which such Party or its Subsidiaries have been so appointed and are active as of the Closing Date, but excluding any accounts (and agreements for such accounts) that, on or prior to the Closing Date, have been fully called or matured and for which all cash has been distributed or escheated and the corporate trust agreement for such account has been terminated regardless of whether it or any of its Subsidiaries continues to have any obligations with respect thereto (collectively, "Corporate Trust Agreements").
Corporate Trust Agreements
(ii) To its knowledge, each of it and its Subsidiaries has performed all obligations (including any record keeping obligations) required to be performed by it under the Corporate Trust Agreements and is not in default thereunder.
(iii) Each of it and its Subsidiaries has to the extent required by applicable Law or by the applicable Corporate Trust Agreement, taken all action to maintain, for the benefit of the holders or other beneficiaries or obligees under the applicable Corporate Trust Agreement, all interests in collateral granted or pledged to secure obligations thereunder, and the foregoing is accurately reflected in the applicable books and records of the Corporate Trust Business.
(iv) Each of it and its Subsidiaries have (A) fulfilled all of their respective escheat obligations; and (B) not waived, amended or modified any provision of any Corporate Trust Agreement except in accordance with the provisions of such Corporate Trust Agreement and as shown in the records maintained by it and its Subsidiaries.
 
5.1. . During the period from the date of this Agreement through the Effective Time, except as set forth in its Disclosure Letter, except as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and except as Consented to in writing by the other Party (which Consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), each of the Parties shall, and shall cause each of their respective Subsidiaries and Newco to, (a) conduct its business in the ordinary course, (b) use reasonable best efforts to maintain and preserve intact its business organization, assets, employees and relationships with customers, suppliers, employees and business associates, and (c) take no action that would reasonably be expected to adversely affect or delay the ability of either Party to obtain any Required Consents, to perform its covenants and agreements under this Agreement, or to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis.
Conduct of Business Prior to Effective Time
5.2. . During the period from the date of this Agreement through the Effective Time, except as set forth in its Disclosure Letter and except as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement or as otherwise provided in this Section 5.2, neither Party shall, and neither Party shall permit any of its Subsidiaries or Newco to, without the prior written Consent of the other Party (which Consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed):
Forbearances
(a) amend its Organizational Documents (except as provided herein), or enter into a plan of consolidation, merger, share exchange, reorganization or similar business combination (other than with respect to consolidations, mergers, share exchanges, reorganizations or similar business combinations solely among its wholly owned Subsidiaries), or a letter of intent or agreement in principle with respect thereto;
(b) except for Permitted Issuances and Permitted Repurchases and except as provided in Section 5.3, (i) adjust, split, combine or reclassify any capital stock or authorize the issuance of any securities in respect of, in lieu of or in substitution for, shares of its capital stock, (ii) make, declare or pay any dividend, or make any other distribution on, or directly or indirectly redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire, any shares of its capital stock or any securities or obligations convertible (whether currently convertible or convertible only after the passage of time or the occurrence of certain events) into or exercisable or exchangeable for any shares of its capital stock, (iii) grant or issue any Rights, (iv) issue any additional shares of capital stock or any Voting Debt, or (v) make any change in any instrument or Contract governing the terms of any of its securities;
(c) other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or pursuant to Contracts in force at the date of or permitted by this Agreement and other than by way of foreclosures or acquisitions of control in a fiduciary or similar capacity or in satisfaction of debts previously contracted in good faith, make any material investment in or acquisition of (either by purchase of stock or securities, contributions to capital, property transfers, or purchase of any property or assets) any other Person other than its wholly owned Subsidiaries as of the date of this Agreement;
 
(d) enter into any new line of business, or change its lending, investment, underwriting, risk and asset liability management and other banking and operating policies that are material to it and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except as required by applicable Law or any regulations or policies imposed on it by any Governmental Authority, or make application for the opening, relocation or closing of any, or open, relocate or close any, branch office, loan production office or other significant office or operations facility;
(e) sell, transfer, mortgage, encumber or otherwise dispose of any part of its business or any of its properties or assets to any Person other than a wholly owned Subsidiary, or cancel, release or assign any indebtedness of any Person to any Person other than a wholly owned Subsidiary or any claims against any Person to any Person other than a Subsidiary, except in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or pursuant to Contracts in force as of the date of this Agreement and disclosed in Section 5.2(e) of its Disclosure Letter;
(f) other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice: incur any long-term indebtedness for borrowed money (or modify any of the material terms of any such outstanding long-term indebtedness); assume, guarantee, endorse or otherwise as an accommodation become responsible for the obligations of any Person; or make any loan or advance to any Person;
(g) other than in consultation with the other Party and Newco, restructure or make any material change to its investment securities portfolio, its derivatives portfolio or its interest rate exposure, through purchases, sales or otherwise, or the manner in which the portfolio is classified or reported, in any material respect;
(h) other than in the ordinary course of business, terminate, waive or knowingly fail to use reasonable best efforts to enforce, any material provision of any material Contract other than normal renewals of Contracts without materially adverse changes, additions or deletions of terms;
(i) other than as required by Compensation and Benefit Plans and Contracts as in effect at the date of this Agreement or applicable Law, (i) increase in any manner the compensation or benefits of any of its officers, employees or directors (for avoidance of doubt, all references to "directors" in this Section 5.2(i) refer to members of its Board of Directors) other than (x) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (y) the payment of incentive compensation based upon the performance of such employee and, if applicable, such employee's business, (ii) pay any pension or retirement allowance not required by any existing Compensation and Benefit Plan or Contract to any such officers, employees or directors other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (iii) become a party to, amend or commit itself to any Compensation and Benefit Plan or Contract (or any individual Contracts evidencing grants or awards thereunder) or employment agreement with or for the benefit of any
 
officer, employee or director other than with respect to employees who are not directors or executive officers and then only in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, or (iv) accelerate the vesting of, or the lapsing of restrictions with respect to, Rights pursuant to BNY Stock Plans in the case of BNY, and Rights pursuant to Mellon Stock Plans in the case of Mellon;
(j) settle any Litigation, except for any Litigation involving solely money damages in an amount that is not material to such Party and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and that does not involve or create an adverse precedent for Litigation that is reasonably likely to be material to it and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
(k) implement or adopt any change in its financial accounting principles, practices or methods, including reserving methodologies, other than as may be required by GAAP, regulatory accounting guidelines or applicable Law;
(l) file or amend any material Tax Return except in the ordinary course of business; settle or compromise any material Tax Liability; make, change or revoke any material Tax election except to the extent consistent with past practice or as required by Law; or change any material method of Tax accounting, except as required by applicable Law;
(m) knowingly take, or knowingly omit to take, any action that is reasonably likely to result in any of the conditions to the Merger set forth in Article 6 not being satisfied on a timely basis except as may be required by applicable Law; provided, that nothing in this Section 5.2(m) shall preclude any Party from exercising its respective rights under Section 5.13;
(n) take any action that would reasonably be expected to prevent the Merger from qualifying as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(o) adopt a plan of complete or partial liquidation or resolutions providing for or authorizing such a liquidation or dissolution, restructuring, recapitalization or reorganization; or
(p) agree to take any of the actions prohibited to it by this Section 5.2.
5.3. .
Dividends
(a) Each Party agrees that, from and after the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time, (i) Mellon may (to the extent legally and contractually permitted to do so), but shall not be obligated to, declare and pay quarterly dividends on Outstanding shares of Mellon Common Stock at a rate not to exceed $0.22 per share per quarter, with usual record and payment dates for such dividends in accordance with past practice, (ii) BNY may (to the extent legally and contractually permitted to do so), but shall not be obligated to, declare and pay dividends on Outstanding shares of BNY Series A Preferred Stock in accordance with the terms of its Organizational Documents and applicable Law, (iii) BNY may (to the extent legally and contractually permitted to do so), but shall not be obligated to, declare and pay quarterly
 
dividends on Outstanding shares of BNY Common Stock at a rate not to exceed $0.22 per share per quarter, with usual record and payment dates for such dividends in accordance with past practice, and (iv) its direct and indirect Subsidiaries may (to the extent legally and contractually permitted to do so), but shall not be obligated to, declare and pay dividends on their capital stock in cash, stock or other property to the Parties or their wholly owned Subsidiaries and to the holders of any trust preferred securities issued by Subsidiaries of the Parties.
(b) After the date of this Agreement, each Party shall coordinate with the other with respect to the declaration of any dividends in respect of BNY Common Stock and Mellon Common Stock and the record dates and payment dates relating thereto, it being the intention of the Parties that holders of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock shall not receive two dividends, or fail to receive one dividend, for any quarter with respect to their shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock, as the case may be.
5.4. . As promptly as practicable, and in any event within 20 days of the date of this Agreement, BNY shall take all action necessary to effect the redemption (subject to the rights of the holders of shares of BNY Series A Preferred Stock to convert such shares into shares of BNY Common Stock) of all Outstanding shares of BNY Series A Preferred Stock in accordance with the terms of the BNY Amended and Restated Charter and the applicable provisions of the NYBCL so that such redemption shall occur no later than 50 days after the date of this Agreement.
Redemption of BNY Series A Preferred Stock
5.5. .
Reasonable Best Efforts
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, each of the Parties will, and will cause Newco to, use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, in good faith, all actions, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or desirable, or advisable under applicable Laws, including using its reasonable best efforts to lift or rescind any Order adversely affecting its ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis, to cause to be satisfied the conditions in Article 6, and to permit consummation of the Merger as promptly as practicable and otherwise to enable consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, and each will cooperate fully with and furnish information to, the other Party and Newco to that end; provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude any Party or Newco from exercising its rights under this Agreement.
(b) Each of the Parties agrees to execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, by or on behalf of Newco, at or prior to the Effective Time, one or more supplemental indentures and other instruments required for the due assumption of Mellon's and BNY's outstanding debt, guarantees, securities, and other agreements to the extent required by the terms of such debt, guarantees, securities or other agreements.
(c) Each of the Parties agrees to use, and to cause Newco to use, its reasonable best efforts to cause the Merger, and to take no action which would reasonably be expected to cause the Merger not, to qualify for treatment as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income Tax purposes.
 
(d) The Parties shall consult with respect to the character, amount and timing of restructuring charges to be taken by each of them in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and shall take such charges in accordance with GAAP, as such Parties mutually agree upon.
5.6. .
Shareholders' Approvals
(a) BNY shall call a meeting of its shareholders (the "BNY Shareholders' Meeting") to be held as soon as reasonably practicable for the purpose of obtaining the BNY Shareholder Approval and such other matters as the Board of Directors of BNY may direct, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause such meeting to occur as soon as reasonably practicable. The Board of Directors of BNY shall use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the BNY Shareholder Approval, and nothing contained in this Agreement shall be deemed to relieve BNY of its obligation to submit this Agreement to its shareholders for a vote on the adoption hereof.
(b) Mellon shall call a meeting of its shareholders (the "Mellon Shareholders' Meeting") to be held as soon as reasonably practicable for the purpose of obtaining the Mellon Shareholder Approval and such other matters as the Board of Directors of Mellon may direct, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause such meeting to occur as soon as reasonably practicable. The Board of Directors of Mellon shall use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the Mellon Shareholder Approval, and nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to relieve Mellon of its obligation to submit this Agreement to its shareholders for a vote on the adoption hereof.
(c) BNY and Mellon shall use their reasonable best efforts to hold the BNY Shareholders' Meeting and the Mellon Shareholders' Meeting on the same day.
5.7. .
Registration Statement; Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus
(a) Each Party agrees to, and agrees to cause Newco to, cooperate with the other Party and Newco, and their Representatives, in the preparation and filing of the Registration Statement and the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus. Neither the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus nor the Registration Statement shall be filed, and, prior to the termination of this Agreement, no amendment or supplement to the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus or the Registration Statement shall be filed, by Newco, BNY or Mellon without the approval of the other Party (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed) and its counsel. The Parties shall each cause Newco to use all reasonable efforts to cause the Registration Statement to be declared effective under the 1933 Act as promptly as practicable after filing thereof and to keep the Registration Statement effective as long as necessary to consummate the Merger and the transactions contemplated thereby. The Parties agree to, and to cause Newco to, use all reasonable efforts to obtain all Permits required by the Securities Laws to carry out the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and each Party agrees to, and agrees to cause Newco to, furnish all information concerning them and the holders of their capital stock as may be reasonably requested in connection with any such action. Newco will advise the Parties, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when the Registration Statement has become effective, the issuance of any stop order, the suspension of the qualification of the Newco Common Stock issuable in connection with the Merger for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or any request by the SEC for amendment of the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus or the Registration Statement.
 
(b) Each Party agrees, as to itself, its Subsidiaries and Newco, that none of the information supplied or to be supplied by it for inclusion or incorporation by reference in (i) the Registration Statement will, at the time the Registration Statement and each amendment and supplement thereto, if any, become effective under the 1933 Act, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and (ii) the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto, at the date of mailing to shareholders and at the times of the meetings of BNY shareholders and Mellon shareholders, will contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or necessary to correct any statement in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto. Each Party further agrees that if it shall become aware prior to the Effective Time of any information furnished by it that would cause any of the statements in the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus or the Registration Statement to be false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or to omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not false or misleading, to promptly inform the other Party thereof and to take the necessary steps to correct the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus or the Registration Statement.
5.8. . The Parties shall use their reasonable best efforts to cause the shares of Newco Common Stock to be issued in the Merger to be approved for listing on the NYSE under the current ticker symbol for BNY, subject to official notice of issuance, as promptly as practicable, and in any event before the First Effective Time.
Listing of Newco Common Stock
5.9. .
Applications and Consents; Governmental Filings
(a) The Parties shall, and shall cause Newco to, cooperate and use their reasonable best efforts in seeking all Consents of Governmental Authorities and other Persons necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby as promptly as practicable.
(b) Without limiting the foregoing, the Parties shall, and shall cause Newco to, cooperate with each other and use their reasonable best efforts to prepare as promptly as practicable all documentation and to effect all filings with respect to, and to obtain, all Regulatory Consents.
(c) Each Party will, and will cause Newco to, promptly furnish to the other Party copies of applications filed with all Governmental Authorities and copies of written communications received by such Party and Newco from any Governmental Authorities with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby. Each Party agrees that it will, and will cause Newco to, consult with the other Party with respect to the obtaining of all Regulatory Consents and other material Consents advisable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and each Party will, and will cause Newco to, keep the other Party and Newco apprised of the status of material matters relating to completion of the transactions contemplated hereby, and will use reasonable efforts to include representatives of the other Party in any meetings or discussions with Governmental Authorities. Each Party shall have the right to review
 
in advance, and to the extent practicable each will consult with the other, in each case subject to applicable laws relating to the exchange of information, with respect to all the information relating to the other Party or Newco, and any of their respective Subsidiaries, which appears in any filing made with, or written materials submitted to, any third party or any Governmental Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. In exercising the foregoing right, each of the Parties hereto agrees to, and to cause Newco to, act reasonably and as promptly as practicable. All documents that the Parties or their respective Subsidiaries and Newco are responsible for filing with any Governmental Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby (including to obtain Regulatory Consents) will comply as to form in all material respects with the provisions of applicable Law.
5.10. . Each Party will, and will cause Newco to, give prompt notice to the other Party and Newco (and subsequently keep the other Party and Newco informed on a current basis) upon its becoming aware of the occurrence or existence of any fact, event or circumstance that (a) is reasonably likely to result in any Material Adverse Effect on it, or (b) would cause or constitute a material breach of any of its representations, warranties, covenants, or agreements contained herein; provided, that any failure to give notice in accordance with the foregoing with respect to any breach shall not be deemed to constitute the failure of any condition set forth in Sections 6.2(b) or 6.3(b) to be satisfied, or otherwise constitute a breach of this Agreement by the Party or Newco failing to give such notice, in each case unless the underlying breach would independently result in a failure of the conditions set forth in Section 6.2(a), 6.2(b), 6.3(a) or 6.3(b), to be satisfied or give rise to such termination right.
Notification of Certain Matters
5.11. .
Investigation and Confidentiality
(a) Each Party shall, and shall cause Newco to, permit the other Party and Newco to make or cause to be made such investigation of the business and Properties of it and its Subsidiaries and of their respective financial and legal conditions as the other Party and Newco reasonably requests; provided, that such investigation shall be reasonably related to the transactions contemplated hereby and shall not interfere unnecessarily with normal operations; and provided further, that neither Party nor any of their respective Subsidiaries nor Newco shall be required to provide access to or to disclose information where such access or disclosure would jeopardize the attorney-client or other privilege with respect to such information or contravene any Law, Order, or Contract and the Parties will, and will cause Newco to, use their reasonable efforts to make appropriate substitute disclosure arrangements, to the extent practicable, in circumstances in which the restrictions of the preceding sentence apply. No investigation by a Party or Newco shall be deemed to modify, waive or otherwise affect the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements of the other Party or Newco.
(b) Each Party shall, and shall cause Newco to, and shall cause its and Newco's Representatives to, maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information furnished to it by the other Party and Newco concerning its and its Subsidiaries' businesses, operations, and financial positions to the extent required by and in accordance with the Confidentiality Agreement, and shall not use such information for any purpose except in furtherance of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. If this Agreement is terminated prior to the Effective Time, each Party and Newco shall promptly return or certify the destruction of all documents and copies and extracts thereof, and all work papers containing confidential information received from the other Party and Newco.
 
(c) Nothing contained in this Agreement shall give either Party, directly or indirectly, the right to control or direct the operations of the other Party prior to the Effective Time. Prior to the Effective Time, each Party shall exercise, consistent with the terms and conditions of this Agreement, complete control and supervision over its and its Subsidiaries' respective operations.
5.12. . Prior to the Effective Time, the Parties shall, and shall cause Newco to, consult with each other before issuing any press release or public statement or making any other public disclosure (including any broad-based employee communication that is reasonably likely to become the subject of public disclosure) materially related to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and will not issue any such press release or public statement or make any other public disclosure without the prior written consent of the other party, which will not be unreasonably withheld or delayed; provided, that nothing in this Section 5.12 shall be deemed to prohibit any Party or Newco from making any disclosure necessary in order to satisfy such Party or Newco's disclosure obligations imposed by Law or the NYSE or any other self-regulatory organization. In addition to the foregoing, except to the extent disclosed in or consistent with the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus in accordance with the provisions of Section 5.7, no Party shall issue any press release or otherwise make any public statement or disclosure concerning the other Party or the other Party's business, financial condition or results of operations without the consent of such other Party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed.
Press Releases; Public Announcements
5.13. .
Acquisition Proposals
(a) Each Party agrees that it will not, and will cause its Subsidiaries and its and its Subsidiaries' officers, directors, Representatives and Affiliates not to, directly or indirectly, (i) initiate, solicit, encourage or knowingly facilitate inquiries or proposals with respect to, (ii) engage or participate in any negotiations concerning, (iii) provide any nonpublic information or data to, or have or participate in any discussions with, any Person relating to, or (iv) approve or recommend, or propose to approve or recommend, or execute or enter into, any letter of intent, agreement in principle, merger agreement, asset purchase or share exchange agreement, option agreement or other similar agreement related to, an Acquisition Proposal; provided that, in the event either Party receives an unsolicited bona fide written Acquisition Proposal and such Party's Board of Directors concludes in good faith that there is a reasonable likelihood that such Acquisition Proposal constitutes or is reasonably likely to constitute a Superior Proposal, such Party may, and may permit its Subsidiaries and its and its Subsidiaries' Representatives to, prior to (but not after) the BNY Shareholders' Meeting or the Mellon Shareholders' Meeting, as applicable, furnish or cause to be furnished nonpublic information or data to, and participate in negotiations or discussions with, the Person making such Acquisition Proposal to the extent that the Board of Directors of such Party concludes in good faith (after receiving the advice of its outside counsel and consultation with its financial advisors) that failure to take such actions would result in a violation of its fiduciary duties under applicable Law; provided further that, prior to providing any nonpublic information or data permitted to be provided pursuant to the foregoing proviso, it shall have entered into a confidentiality agreement with such third party on terms no less favorable to it than the Confidentiality Agreement. Each Party will immediately
 
cease and cause to be terminated any activities, discussions or negotiations conducted before the date of this Agreement with any Persons other than the other Party with respect to any Acquisition Proposal. Each Party will promptly (and in all events within 24 hours) advise the other Party following receipt of any Acquisition Proposal or any inquiry which could reasonably be expected to lead to an Acquisition Proposal, and the substance thereof (including the identity of the Person making such Acquisition Proposal and the material terms thereof), will keep the other Party apprised on a current basis of any related developments, discussions and negotiations (including the terms and conditions of the Acquisition Proposal as it may be amended, revised or supplemented from time to time, and of the execution and delivery of any confidentiality agreement between such Party and the Person making such Acquisition Proposal) and will provide to the other Party on a current basis all material and information delivered or made available to the Person making such Acquisition Proposal to the extent such material and information was not previously furnished or made available to such other Party. Without limiting the foregoing, each Party shall notify the other Party, orally and in writing, within 24 hours if it enters into discussions or negotiations with another Person concerning an Acquisition Proposal or provides non-public information or data to any Person in accordance with this Section 5.13. Each of the Parties shall, and shall cause Newco to, use its reasonable best efforts to enforce (and not waive or amend any provision of) any existing confidentiality or standstill agreements to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is a party relating to an Acquisition Proposal in accordance with the terms thereof.
(b) Nothing contained in this Agreement shall prevent a Party (or Newco) or its Board of Directors from complying with Rule 14d-9 and Rule 14e-2 under the 1934 Act with respect to an Acquisition Proposal; provided, that such Rules will in no way eliminate or modify the effect that any action pursuant to such Rules would otherwise have under this Agreement.
(c) Nothing in this Section 5.13 shall (x) permit either Party to terminate this Agreement or (y) affect any other obligation of the Parties under this Agreement, including the obligation to submit this Agreement to a vote of their respective shareholders. Neither Party shall submit to the vote of its shareholders any Acquisition Proposal other than the Merger.
5.14. . No Party will or will cause or permit Newco to, take any action that would cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be subject to requirements imposed by any Takeover Law. If any Takeover Law may become, or may purport to be, applicable to the transactions contemplated hereby, each Party and the members of its Board of Directors will, and will cause Newco to, grant such approvals and take such actions as are necessary (other than any action requiring the approval of its shareholders (other than as contemplated by Section 5.6)) so that the transactions contemplated by this Agreement may be consummated as promptly as practicable on the terms contemplated hereby and otherwise act to eliminate or minimize the effects of any Takeover Law on any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Takeover Laws; No Rights Triggered
5.15. . BNY and Mellon agree that, in order to most effectively compensate and retain Mellon Insiders and BNY Insiders (as defined below) in connection with the Merger, both prior to and after the Effective Time, it is desirable that Mellon Insiders and BNY Insiders not be subject to a risk of liability under Section 16(b) of the 1934 Act to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law in connection with the conversion
Exemption from Liability Under Section 16(b)
 
of shares of Mellon Common Stock, Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards or BNY Common Stock, BNY Stock Options and BNY Stock-Based Awards into Newco Common Stock, Newco Stock Options or Newco Stock-Based Awards, as the case may be, in the Merger, and for that compensatory and retentive purpose agree to the provisions of this Section 5.15. Assuming Mellon and BNY deliver to Newco in a reasonably timely fashion prior to the Effective Time accurate information regarding those officers and directors of Mellon and BNY subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the 1934 Act (respectively, the "Mellon Insiders" and the "BNY Insiders"), the number of shares of Mellon Common Stock or BNY Common Stock held or to be held by each such Mellon Insider or BNY Insider expected to be exchanged for Newco Common Stock in the Merger, and the number and description of Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards or BNY Stock Options and BNY Stock-Based Awards held by each such Mellon Insider or BNY Insider and expected to be converted into Newco Stock Options or Newco Stock-Based Awards, the Board of Directors of Newco, or a committee of non-employee directors thereof (as such term is defined for purposes of Rule 16b-3(d) under the 1934 Act), shall reasonably promptly thereafter, and in any event prior to the Effective Time, adopt a resolution providing in substance that the receipt by the Mellon Insiders and BNY Insiders of Newco Common Stock in exchange for shares of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock, and of Newco Stock Options upon conversion of Mellon Stock Options or BNY Stock Options, or Newco Stock-Based Awards upon conversion of Mellon Stock-Based Awards or BNY Stock-Based Awards, in each case pursuant to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, are approved by such Board of Directors or by such committee thereof, and are intended to be exempt from Liability pursuant to Section 16(b) of the 1934 Act to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law.
5.16. . Mellon and BNY have disclosed in Section 5.16 of their Disclosure Letters each Person whom they reasonably believe may be deemed an "affiliate" of Mellon or BNY, respectively, for purposes of Rule 145 under the 1933 Act. Mellon and BNY shall use their reasonable efforts to cause each such Person to deliver to Newco, not later than the date of mailing of the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus, a written agreement in substantially the form of Exhibit 3-A and 3-B, respectively.
Agreement of Affiliates
5.17. .
Employee Matters
(a) Following the Effective Time, Newco at its election shall either (i) provide generally to officers and employees of Mellon and its Subsidiaries, who at or after the Effective Time become employees of Newco or its Subsidiaries ("Mellon Continuing Employees"), employee benefits under Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco, on terms and conditions which are the same as for similarly situated officers and employees of BNY and its Subsidiaries, who at or after the Effective Time become employees of Newco or its Subsidiaries ("BNY Continuing Employees"), and/or (ii) maintain for the benefit of the Mellon Continuing Employees, the Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Mellon immediately prior to the First Effective Time ("Mellon Plans"); provided that Newco may amend any Mellon Plan to comply with any Law or as necessary and appropriate for other business reasons. Following the First Effective Time, Newco at its election shall either (x) provide generally to BNY Continuing Employees, employee benefits under Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco, on terms and conditions which are the same as for similarly situated Mellon Continuing Employees, and/or (y) maintain for the benefit of the BNY Continuing Employees, the Compensation and
 
Benefits Plans maintained by BNY immediately prior to the Effective Time ("BNY Plans"); provided that Newco may amend any BNY Plan to comply with any Law or as necessary and appropriate for other business reasons. For purposes of this Section 5.17, Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by BNY or Mellon are deemed to include Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by their respective Subsidiaries. As soon as practicable following the Effective Time, Newco shall review, evaluate and analyze the Mellon Plans and the BNY Plans with a view towards developing appropriate and effective Compensation and Benefit Plans for the benefit of employees of Newco and its Subsidiaries on a going forward basis that does not discriminate between the Mellon Continuing Employees and the BNY Continuing Employees (together, the "Continuing Employees"). Newco will honor, or cause to be honored, in accordance with their terms, all vested or accrued benefit obligations to, and contractual rights of, the Continuing Employees, including, without limitation, any benefits or rights arising as a result of the Merger (either alone or in combination with any other event).
(b) For purposes of eligibility, participation, vesting and benefit accrual (except not for purposes of benefit accrual to the extent that such credit would result in a duplication of benefits) under Newco's Compensation and Benefit Plans, service with or credited by Mellon or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their predecessors or BNY or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their predecessors shall be treated as service with Newco. To the extent permitted under applicable Law, Newco shall cause welfare Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco that cover the Continuing Employees and their dependents after the Effective Time to (i) waive any waiting period and restrictions and limitations for preexisting conditions or insurability (except for pre-existing conditions that were excluded, or restrictions or limitations that were applicable, under welfare Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Mellon or BNY), and (ii) cause any deductible, co-insurance, or maximum out-of-pocket payments made by the Mellon Continuing Employees or BNY Continuing Employees and their dependents under welfare Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Mellon or BNY, respectively, to be credited to such Continuing Employees under welfare Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco, so as to reduce the amount of any deductible, co-insurance, or maximum out-of-pocket payments payable by such Continuing Employees under welfare Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco.
(c) From the First Effective Time or the Effective Time, as the case may be, Newco shall cause each medical Compensation and Benefit Plan maintained by Mellon or BNY, respectively, to continue in effect for the benefit of the Mellon Continuing Employees or BNY Continuing Employees, respectively, and their dependents so long as such Continuing Employees and their dependents remain eligible to participate and until they shall become eligible to become participants in the corresponding medical Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco (and, with respect to any such plan or program, subject to complying with the eligibility requirements after taking into account the crediting of service and benefits accruals and other provisions set forth above and subject to the right of Newco to terminate such plan or program).
(d) From the First Effective Time or the Effective Time, as the case may be, until the expiration of the transitional period described in section 410(b)(6)(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, Newco shall cause each qualified and related non-qualified pension Compensation and Benefit Plan maintained by Mellon or BNY, respectively, to continue in effect for the benefit of
 
the Mellon Continuing Employees or BNY Continuing Employees, respectively, so long as such Continuing Employees remain eligible to participate and until they shall become eligible to become participants in the corresponding qualified and related non-qualified pension Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Newco (and, with respect to any such plan or program, subject to complying with the eligibility requirements after taking into account the crediting of service and benefits accruals and other provisions set forth above and subject to the right of Newco to terminate such plan or program).
(e) Effective as of the Effective Time, Newco hereby assumes all Compensation and Benefit Plans maintained by Mellon or BNY, as applicable, that require express assumption by any successor to Mellon or BNY, as applicable.
(f) The Board of Directors of BNY will have the ability to create severance and other compensation and benefit arrangements for the BNY members of the Newco executive management that it determines in good faith are reasonable, appropriate and provide termination protection in connection with the Merger that is comparable, as of the Effective Time (taking into account the following sentence), to that of Mellon members. The Board of Directors of Mellon will have the ability to change severance and other compensation and benefit arrangements of the Mellon members of the Newco executive management in a manner that it determines in good faith is reasonable, appropriate and necessary to retain such Mellon members through and after the Effective Time, in light of any other changes to such arrangements that Mellon may implement as part of or in connection with the Parties' efforts to create, as of the Effective Time, comparable and appropriate severance and other compensation and benefit arrangements for all members of the Newco executive management. The Parties agree to consult with one another with respect to the foregoing.
(g) The Parties agree that their Boards of Directors will work together in good faith to create appropriate retention bonus arrangements for the members of Newco executive management.
(h) Nothing in this Section 5.17 shall be interpreted as preventing Newco, from and after the Effective Time, from amending, modifying or terminating any BNY Plans, Mellon Plans , or other Contracts, arrangements, commitments or understandings, in accordance with their terms and applicable Law.
(i) To the extent applicable, each of Mellon and BNY will satisfy any service of notice and other obligations under the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Act of 1988 or similar local Laws with respect to its officers and employees.
(j) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, this Agreement is not intended, and it shall not be construed, to create third party beneficiary rights in any current or former employee, including the Continuing Employees (including any beneficiaries or dependents thereof), under or with respect to any plan, program or arrangement described in or contemplated by this Agreement and shall not confer upon any such current or former employee, including each Continuing Employee, the right to continued employment for any period of time following Closing.
 
(k) With respect to any Compensation and Benefits Plans of Mellon or BNY that are and will continue to be maintained or contributed to outside of the U.S. primarily for the benefit of Continuing Employees employed outside of the U.S., the principles set forth in Section 5.17(a) through (d) will apply to the extent the application of such principles does not violate applicable local Law and will be modified as and to the extent necessary to comply with applicable local Law.
5.18. .
Indemnification
(a) From and after the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, in the event of any threatened or actual claim, action, suit, proceeding, or investigation, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, in which any Person who is now, or has been at any time prior to the date of this Agreement, or who becomes prior to the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, a director or officer of Mellon or BNY or any of their Subsidiaries (the "Indemnified Parties") is, or is threatened to be, made a party based in whole or in part on, or arising in whole or in part out of, or pertaining to (i) the fact that he is or was a director, officer, or employee of Mellon, BNY, any of their Subsidiaries, or any of their respective predecessors, or (ii) this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated hereby, whether in any case asserted or arising before or after the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, Newco shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law, each such Indemnified Party against any Liability (including advancement of reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses prior to the final disposition of any claim, suit, proceeding, or investigation to each Indemnified Party to the fullest extent permitted by Law upon receipt of any undertaking required by applicable Law), judgments, fines, and amounts paid in settlement in connection with any such threatened or actual claim, action, suit, proceeding, or investigation.
(b) Without limiting the indemnification and other rights provided in clause (a), all rights to indemnification and all limitations on Liability existing in favor of the directors, officers, and employees of Mellon, BNY and their Subsidiaries (the "Covered Parties") as provided in their respective Organizational Documents as in effect as of the date of this Agreement or in any indemnification agreement in existence on the date of this Agreement with Mellon, BNY or their Subsidiaries shall survive the Merger and shall continue in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by Law, and shall be honored by Newco and its Subsidiaries or their respective successors as if they were the indemnifying party thereunder, without any amendment thereto; provided that nothing contained in this Section 5.18(b) shall be deemed to preclude any liquidation, consolidation, or merger of any Mellon or BNY Subsidiaries, in which case all of such rights to indemnification and limitations on Liability shall be deemed to so survive and continue notwithstanding any such liquidation, consolidation, or merger.
(c) Newco, from and after the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, will directly or indirectly cause the Persons who served as directors or officers of Mellon and BNY immediately prior to the Effective Time to be covered by Mellon's or BNY's, respectively, existing directors' and officers' liability insurance policy with respect to acts or omissions occurring prior to the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, which were committed by such officers and directors in their capacity as such; provided, that (i) Newco may substitute therefor policies of at least the same coverage and amounts containing
 
terms and conditions which are not less advantageous than such policy, (ii) in no event shall Newco be required to expend more than 250% per year of coverage of the amount currently expended by Mellon and BNY per year of coverage as of the date of this Agreement (the "Maximum Amount") to maintain or procure insurance coverage pursuant hereto, and (iii) if notwithstanding the use of reasonable best efforts to do so, Newco is unable to maintain or obtain the insurance called for by this Section 5.18(c), Newco shall obtain as much comparable insurance as available for the Maximum Amount. Such insurance coverage shall commence at the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be, and will be provided for a period of no less than six years after the Effective Time or the First Effective Time, as the case may be.
(d) Any Indemnified Party wishing to claim indemnification under Section 5.18(a), upon learning of any claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation described above, shall promptly notify Newco thereof; provided that the failure so to notify shall not affect the obligations of Newco under Section 5.18(a) unless and to the extent that Newco is actually and materially prejudiced as a result of such failure.
(e) The provisions of this Section 5.18 are intended to be for the benefit of, and shall be enforceable by, each Indemnified Party and his or her heirs and representatives.
5.19. .
Corporate Governance
(a) Prior to the Effective Time, Newco shall take all actions necessary to adopt the by-laws set forth in Exhibit 2-B and to effect the requirements referenced therein. The provisions of Article Five of such by-laws shall also be considered an agreement of the Parties in this Agreement mutatis mutandi.
(b) On or prior to the Effective Time, Newco's Board of Directors shall cause the number of directors that will comprise the full Board of Directors of the Surviving Corporation at the Effective Time to be 18. Of the members of the initial Board of Directors of Newco at the Effective Time, eight shall be current independent BNY directors designated by BNY plus the current Chief Executive Officer of BNY and the current President of BNY, and six shall be current independent Mellon directors designated by Mellon plus the current Chief Executive Officer of Mellon and the current Senior Vice Chairman of Mellon.
(c) On or prior to the Effective Time, the Newco Board of Directors shall take such actions as are necessary to cause the persons indicated in Exhibit 4 to be elected or appointed to the offices of Newco specified in such Exhibit as of the Effective Time.
(d) In accordance with, and to the extent provided in, the by-laws of Newco, (i) effective as of the Effective Time, Mr. Thomas Renyi shall become Executive Chairman of Newco, Mr. Robert Kelly shall become Chief Executive Officer of Newco and Mr. Gerald Hassell shall become President of Newco and (ii) Mr. Robert Kelly shall be the successor to Mr. Thomas Renyi as Executive Chairman of Newco and hold the position of Chairman, with such succession to become effective on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Closing Date or any such earlier date as of which Mr. Thomas Renyi ceases for any reason to serve in the position of Executive Chairman of Newco.
 
(e) The headquarters of Newco will be located in New York City, New York.
5.20. .
Commitments to the Community
(a) Following the Effective Time, Pittsburgh will serve as the headquarters for the cash management and stock transfer businesses of Newco. A Center of Excellence for Technology, Operations and Administration will be organized and based in Pittsburgh and will be a primary location at which administrative services such as human resources, accounting, facilities, technology and operations will be conducted.
(b) Promptly following the Effective Time, Newco will establish an advisory board for the Pittsburgh metropolitan area (the "Advisory Board"). Newco will invite all current Western Pennsylvania-domiciled Mellon external Board members, Steven G. Elliott and local heads of Newco businesses to become members of the Advisory Board, and shall cause all such individuals who accept such invitation to be elected or appointed as members of the Advisory Board. The role of the Advisory Board shall be to advise Newco with respect to Newco's Western Pennsylvania community development and reinvestment, civic and charitable activities in the greater Pittsburgh area and to focus on jobs, monitor the integration status of Newco and foster revenue growth with corporate and wealth management clients throughout the Western Pennsylvania area. The Advisory Board shall exist for at least three years following the Effective Time, and the individuals who accept the invitation to join the Advisory Board, as described above, shall be entitled to serve as members of the Advisory Board throughout such three-year period (unless removed for cause). Members of the Advisory Board who are not employees of Newco or its Subsidiaries or members of the Board of Directors of Newco will receive a per annum retainer of $45,000 and meeting fees of $1,500 per meeting attended.
(c) Promptly following the Effective Time, Newco shall appoint one or more Senior Executives, designated by Mellon prior to the Closing, who shall be the heads of Newco's Pittsburgh office and, in addition to their regular duties, shall be responsible for advising the CEO on Pennsylvania state and civic issues and representing Newco with major Pennsylvania business and civic organizations.
(d) On the Closing Date, Newco shall cause the Mellon Financial Corporation Foundation to file Articles of Amendment to become the newly named Mellon Charitable Foundation, dedicated to grant making in Western Pennsylvania. On the Closing Date, Newco shall contribute to the Mellon Charitable Foundation an amount in cash equal to $20 million, which with the approximately $60 million currently in the Mellon Financial Corporation Foundation will total approximately $80 million. While serving as such, the members of the Advisory Board shall serve, with others designated from time to time by Newco, as trustees of the Mellon Charitable Foundation. At and after the Effective Time, in addition to the activities of the Mellon Charitable Foundation, Newco shall maintain Mellon's strong commitment to charitable giving in the greater Pittsburgh metropolitan area of not less than $1.2 million annually. On the Closing Date, The Bank of New York Foundation shall be renamed The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Foundation and remain in effect, and Newco shall contribute $40 million to this entity. Following the transfer of assets referred to above, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Foundation shall direct its charitable giving outside the greater Pittsburgh metropolitan area. It is agreed by the Parties that Mellon may effectuate the formation
 
and funding of the Mellon Charitable Foundation and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Foundation set forth in this Section 5.20(d) by alternative steps if appropriate to comply with applicable Law or facilitate the intended purposes.
(e) It is the intent of the Parties that Newco shall use its reasonable best efforts, in light of and subject to business needs, market conditions and other relevant factors, to create jobs in the Western Pennsylvania area over the 3-5 year period following the Effective Time so that the Newco employment levels within such area and at the end of such period are equal to or greater than those of Mellon within such area at the Effective Time.
(f) It is the current expectation of the Parties that Newco will pay quarterly dividends from and after the Effective Time at the initial rate of $0.235 per share of Newco Common Stock, it being understood that the payment of dividends is subject to declaration by, and solely within the discretion of, the Board of Directors of Newco.
(g) The commitments set forth in this Section 5.20 will be reflected in the minutes of Newco following the Closing Date.
5.21. . Mellon and BNY shall be empowered, upon their mutual agreement and without additional approval of their respective Boards of Directors, at any time prior to the Effective Time, to change the method or structure of effecting the combination of Mellon and Newco, and/or of BNY and Newco (including the provisions of Article 1 and Article 2), if and to the extent they both deem such change to be necessary, appropriate or desirable; provided, however, that no such change shall (i) alter or change the BNY Exchange Ratio or the Mellon Exchange Ratio, (ii) adversely affect the tax treatment of Mellon's shareholders or BNY's shareholders pursuant to this Agreement, (iii) adversely affect the tax treatment of Mellon or BNY pursuant to this Agreement or (iv) materially impede or delay the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in a timely manner. The Parties agree to reflect any such change in an appropriate amendment to this Agreement executed by both Parties and Newco in accordance with Section 8.5.
Change of Method
5.22. . If either BNY or Mellon shall have failed to obtain the requisite vote or votes of its shareholders for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement at a duly held meeting of its shareholders or at any adjournment or postponement thereof, each of the Parties shall in good faith use its reasonable best efforts to negotiate a restructuring of the transactions provided for herein (it being understood that neither Party shall have any obligation to alter or change any material terms of this Agreement, including the amount or kind of the merger consideration, in a manner adverse to such Party or its shareholders) and/or to resubmit the transaction to their respective shareholders for approval.
Restructuring Efforts
6.1. . The respective obligations of each Party and Newco to consummate the Merger are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions, unless waived by each Party pursuant to Section 8.6:
Conditions to Obligations of Each Party
(a) . Mellon shall have obtained the Mellon Shareholder Approval and BNY shall have obtained the BNY Shareholder Approval.
Shareholder Approvals
 
(b) . All Regulatory Consents required to consummate the Merger (the "Required Consents") shall (i) have been obtained or made and be in full force and effect and all waiting periods required by Law shall have expired and (ii) not be subject to any term or condition that would, after the Effective Time, have or be reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect on Newco.
Regulatory Approvals
(c) . No Order issued by any Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction (whether temporary, preliminary, or permanent) preventing the consummation of the First Step Merger or the Second Step Merger shall be in effect and no Law or Order shall have been enacted, entered, promulgated or enforced by any Governmental Authority that prohibits, restrains, or makes illegal the consummation of the First Step Merger or the Second Step Merger.
No Orders or Restraints; Illegality
(d) . The Registration Statement shall be effective under the 1933 Act, no stop orders suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued, and no action, suit, proceeding, or investigation by the SEC to suspend the effectiveness thereof shall have been initiated and not withdrawn.
Registration Statement
(e) . The shares of Newco Common Stock to be issued to the holders of Mellon Common Stock and BNY Common Stock in connection with the Merger shall have been authorized for listing on the NYSE (and holders of BNY Stock Options and Stock-Based Awards and Mellon Stock Options and Stock-Based Awards), subject to official notice of issuance.
Listing of Newco Common Stock
6.2. . The obligations of Mellon to consummate the First Step Merger are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions, unless waived by Mellon pursuant to Section 8.6:
Conditions to Obligations of Mellon
(a) . The representations and warranties of BNY and Newco set forth in this Agreement, after giving effect to Sections 4.1 and 4.2, shall be true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date as though made at and as of the Closing Date (except that representations and warranties that by their terms speak specifically as of the date of this Agreement or some other date shall be true and correct as of such date) and Mellon shall have received certificates, dated the Closing Date, signed on behalf of BNY by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer of BNY and signed on behalf of Newco by a senior officer thereof to such effect.
Representations and Warranties
(b) . BNY and Newco shall each have duly performed and complied with the agreements and covenants required to be performed and complied with by it pursuant to this Agreement prior to the Effective Time in all material respects and Mellon shall have received certificates, dated the Closing Date, signed on behalf of BNY by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer of BNY and signed on behalf of Newco by a senior officer thereof to such effect.
Performance of Agreements and Covenants
 
(c) . Mellon shall have received a written opinion from Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP in a form reasonably satisfactory to Mellon, dated the date of the Effective Time, substantially to the effect that, (i) each of the First Step Merger and the Second Step Merger will constitute a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) each of Mellon and Newco will be a party to the reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Internal Revenue Code in respect of the First Step Merger and each of BNY and Newco will be a party to the reorganization in respect of the Second Step Merger, and (iii) no gain or loss will be recognized by holders of Mellon Common Stock who exchange all of their Mellon Common Stock solely for Newco Common Stock pursuant to the First Step Merger. In rendering such opinion, such counsel shall be entitled to rely upon representations of officers of Mellon, BNY and Newco reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to such counsel.
Tax Opinion
(d) . All conditions to the consummation of the Section Step Merger, other than the condition in Section 6.3(d) shall have been satisfied or waived.
Second Step Merger
6.3. . The obligations of BNY to consummate the Second Step Merger are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions, unless waived by BNY pursuant to Section 8.6:
Conditions to Obligations of BNY
(a) . The representations and warranties of Mellon and Newco set forth in this Agreement, after giving effect to Sections 4.1 and 4.2, shall be true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date as though made at and as of the Closing Date (except that representations and warranties that by their terms speak specifically as of the date of this Agreement or some other date shall be true and correct as of such date) and BNY shall have received certificates, dated the Closing Date, signed on behalf of Mellon by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer of Mellon and signed on behalf of Newco by a senior officer thereof to such effect.
Representations and Warranties
(b) . Mellon and Newco shall each have duly performed and complied with the agreements and covenants required to be performed and complied with by it pursuant to this Agreement prior to the Effective Time in all material respects and BNY shall have received certificates, dated the Closing Date, signed on behalf of Mellon by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer of Mellon and signed on behalf of Newco by a senior officer thereof to such effect.
Performance of Agreements and Covenants
(c) . BNY shall have received a written opinion from Sullivan & Cromwell LLP in a form reasonably satisfactory to BNY, dated the date of the Effective Time, substantially to the effect that, (i) each of the First Step Merger and the Second Step Merger will constitute a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) each of Mellon and Newco will be a party to the
Tax Opinion
 
reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Internal Revenue Code in respect of the First Step Merger and each of BNY and Newco will be a party to the reorganization in respect of the Second Step Merger, and (iii) no gain or loss will be recognized by holders of BNY Common Stock who exchange all of their BNY Common Stock solely for Newco Common Stock pursuant to the Second Step Merger. In rendering such opinion, such counsel shall be entitled to rely upon representations of officers of Mellon, BNY and Newco reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to such counsel.
(d) . The First Effective Time shall have occurred and the First Step Merger shall have been consummated.
Consummation of the First Step Merger
7.1. . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, and notwithstanding the Mellon Shareholder Approval and BNY Shareholder Approval, this Agreement may be terminated and the Merger abandoned at any time prior to the First Effective Time, by action taken or authorized by the Board of Directors of the terminating Party or Parties:
Termination
(a) By mutual consent of both Parties; or
(b) By either Party, upon written notice to the other Party, in the event of a breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement on the part of the other Party, which breach, individually or in the aggregate, would result in, if occurring or continuing on the Closing Date, the failure of the conditions to the terminating Party's obligations set forth in Section 6.2 or 6.3, as the case may be, and which cannot be or has not been cured within 30 days after the giving of written notice to the breaching Party of such breach; or
(c) By either Party, upon written notice to the other Party, in the event that any Required Consent has been denied by final nonappealable action of the relevant Governmental Authority; or any Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction shall have issued an Order or taken any other action permanently restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the Merger, and such Order or other action has become final and nonappealable; or
(d) By either Party, upon written notice to the other Party, in the event that the Merger has not been consummated by December 31, 2007 (the "Termination Date"), provided, however, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 7.1(d) shall not be available to any Party whose failure to comply with any provision of this Agreement has been the cause of, or resulted in, the failure of the Merger to be consummated on or before the Termination Date; or
(e) By either Party, upon written notice to the other Party, if the Board of Directors of the other Party shall have (i) failed to recommend adoption of this Agreement; or withdrawn, modified or qualified (or proposed to withdraw, modify or qualify) such recommendation in any manner adverse to the terminating Party; or taken any other action or made any other statement in connection with the BNY Shareholders Meeting or Mellon Shareholders Meeting, as the case may be, inconsistent with such
 
recommendation (any such action in this clause (i), a "Change in Recommendation") (or resolved to take any such action), whether or not permitted by the terms hereof, (ii) materially breached its obligations under this Agreement by reason of (x) a failure to call in the case of BNY, the BNY Shareholders' Meeting in accordance with Section 5.6(a) or, in the case of Mellon, the Mellon Shareholders' Meeting in accordance with Section 5.6(b) or (y) a failure to prepare and mail to its shareholders the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus in accordance with Section 5.7(a) or (iii) materially breached its obligations under Section 5.6 or 5.13; or
(f) By either Party, if it determines in good faith by a majority vote of its Board of Directors that the other Party has substantially engaged in bad faith in breach of its obligations under Section 5.22 of this Agreement; or
(g) By either Party, if a tender offer or exchange offer for 20% or more of the outstanding shares of the other Party's Common Stock is commenced (other than by the terminating Party), and the Board of Directors of the other Party recommends that its shareholders tender their shares in such tender or exchange offer or otherwise fails to recommend that such shareholders reject such tender offer or exchange offer within the 10 business day period specified in Rule 14e-2(a) under the 1934 Act.
7.2. . In the event of the termination and abandonment of this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.1, this Agreement shall become void and have no effect, and none of BNY, Mellon, any of their respective Subsidiaries, or any of the officers or directors of any of them, shall have any Liability of any nature whatsoever hereunder or in conjunction with the transactions contemplated hereby, except that (a) the provisions of Sections 4.3(r) and 5.11(b), this Section 7.2 and Article 8 shall survive any such termination and abandonment, and (b) a termination of this Agreement shall not relieve the breaching Party from Liability for any uncured willful and material breach of a covenant or agreement of such Party contained in this Agreement.
Effect of Termination
8.1. .
Definitions
(a) Except as otherwise provided herein, the capitalized terms set forth below shall have the following meanings:
"1933 ACT" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"1934 ACT" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"ACQUISITION PROPOSAL" shall mean, other than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, any offer, proposal or inquiry relating to, or any third party indication of interest in, (i) any acquisition or purchase, direct or indirect, of 20% or
 
more of the consolidated assets of a Party and its Subsidiaries (including Stock of its Subsidiaries) or 20% or more of any class of equity or voting securities of a Party or its Subsidiaries whose assets, individually or in the aggregate, constitute more than 20% of the consolidated assets of the Party, (ii) any tender offer (including a self-tender offer) or exchange offer that, if consummated, would result in such third party (or the shareholders of such third party) beneficially owning 20% or more of any class of equity or voting securities of a Party or its Subsidiaries whose assets, individually or in the aggregate, constitute more than 20% of the consolidated assets of the Party, or (iii) a merger, consolidation, share exchange, business combination, reorganization, recapitalization, liquidation, dissolution or other similar transaction involving a Party or its Subsidiaries whose assets, individually or in the aggregate, constitute more than 20% of the consolidated assets of the Party.
"AFFILIATE" of a Person shall mean any other Person directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controlling, controlled by or under common control with such Person.
"BHC ACT" shall mean the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended.
"BNY CAPITAL STOCK" shall mean BNY Common Stock, BNY Class A Preferred Stock and BNY Preferred Stock.
"BNY CLASS A PREFERRED STOCK" shall mean the $2.00 par value per share preferred stock of BNY.
"BNY COMMON STOCK" shall mean the $7.50 par value per share common stock of BNY.
"BNY EXCHANGE RATIO" shall mean 0.9434.
"BNY PREFERRED STOCK" shall mean the no par value per share preferred stock of BNY.
"BNY RESTATED CERTIFICATE OF INCORPORATION" shall mean the restated certificate of incorporation of BNY in effect as of the date of this Agreement and amended from time to time thereafter.
"COMPENSATION AND BENEFIT PLAN" shall mean any pension, retirement, profit-sharing, deferred compensation, stock option, employee stock ownership, severance pay, vacation, bonus, or other incentive plan, any other employee program or agreement, any medical, vision, dental, or other written health plan, any life insurance plan, and any other employee benefit plan or fringe benefit plan, including any "employee benefit plan" (as that term is defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA), maintained by, sponsored in whole or in part by, or contributed to by a Party for the benefit of its and its Subsidiaries' employees, retirees, dependents, spouses, directors, independent contractors, or other beneficiaries and under which such employees, retirees, dependents, spouses, directors, independent contractors, or other beneficiaries are eligible to
 
participate and, except for the purposes of the first sentence of Section 4.3(k)(i) and the provisions of Section 5.17 (other than Section 5.17(e)), any employment, severance, termination, consulting or retirement Contract with its or its Subsidiaries' current or former employees.
"CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT" shall mean that certain Confidentiality Agreement, dated November 1, 2006, by and between BNY and Mellon.
"CONSENT" shall mean any consent, approval, authorization, clearance, exemption, waiver, or similar affirmation by any Person pursuant to any Contract, Law, Order, or Permit.
"CONTRACT" shall mean any written or oral agreement, arrangement, commitment, contract, indenture, instrument, lease, understanding, or undertaking of any kind or character to which any Person is a party or that is binding on any Person or its capital stock, assets, or business.
"CORPORATE TRUST BUSINESS" shall mean (i) providing (whether directly or under the name of another bank or trust company through a private label relationship) corporate trust and agency services for corporate, municipal, governmental agency and other issuers of debt and asset-backed, mortgage-backed, collateralized debt obligation, trust preferred, commercial paper issued by municipalities in the United States, project finance, Eurobonds, repacks, conduits, structured investment vehicles (SIV) and other securities under various indentures, agreements and resolutions, including providing investment execution, document custody, master servicing, common and specialized depositary, bond analytics, debt defeasance and other escrow services in conjunction with acting in a capacity otherwise included in the Corporate Trust Business, and other related services, all as provided in a Corporate Trust Capacity; and (ii) serving as loan agency, collateral agent and other specialty agencies arising in a Corporate Trust Capacity.
"CORPORATE TRUST CAPACITY" shall mean acting in a trustee, registrar, agency, custodial or other similar capacity under a Corporate Trust Agreement, and any rights or duties arising from, or the provision of any services in connection with, any such capacities.
"DEFAULT" shall mean (i) any breach or violation of or default under any Contract, Law, Order, or Permit, (ii) any occurrence of any event that with the passage of time or the giving of notice or both would constitute a breach or violation of or default under any Contract, Law, Order, or Permit, or (iii) any occurrence of any event that with or without the passage of time or the giving of notice would give rise to a right to terminate or revoke, change the current terms of, or renegotiate, or to accelerate, increase, or impose any Liability under, any Contract, Law, Order, or Permit.
"DGCL" shall mean the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
"ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS" shall mean all Laws relating to pollution or protection of human health or the environment (including ambient air, surface water, ground water, land surface, or subsurface strata) and which are administered, interpreted,
 
or enforced by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and state and local agencies with jurisdiction over, and including common Law in respect of, pollution or protection of the environment, including CERCLA, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 6901, et seq., and any other Laws relating to emissions, discharges, releases, or threatened releases of any Hazardous Material, or otherwise relating to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport, or handling of any Hazardous Material.
"ERISA" shall mean the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
"ERISA PLAN" shall mean any Compensation and Benefit Plan which is an "employee welfare benefit plan," as that term is defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA, or an "employee pension benefit plan," as that term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA.
"EXCHANGE AGENT" shall mean an exchange agent mutually agreed upon by BNY and Mellon, which may be an Affiliate of either Party.
"EXHIBITS" 1 through 4, inclusive, shall mean the Exhibits so marked, copies of which are attached to this Agreement. Such Exhibits are hereby incorporated by reference herein and made a part hereof, and may be referred to in this Agreement and any other related instrument or document without being attached hereto.
"FACILITIES" shall mean all buildings and improvements on the Property of any Person and any of its Subsidiaries.
"FINANCIAL STATEMENTS" shall mean the consolidated statements of condition or balance sheets (including related notes and schedules, if any) of a Party included in any SEC Report filed by a Party, and the related statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity, and cash flows (including related notes and schedules, if any) included in any SEC Report filed by a Party.
"GAAP" shall mean United States generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied during the periods involved.
"GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY" shall mean each Regulatory Authority and any other domestic or foreign court, administrative agency, commission or other governmental authority or instrumentality (including the staff thereof), or any industry self-regulatory authority (including the staff thereof).
"HAZARDOUS MATERIAL" shall mean (i) any hazardous substance, hazardous material, hazardous waste, regulated substance, or toxic substance (as those terms are defined by any applicable Environmental Laws), and (ii) any chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, petroleum, petroleum products that are or become regulated under any applicable local, state, or federal Law (and specifically shall include asbestos requiring abatement, removal, or encapsulation pursuant to the requirements of governmental authorities, black mold and any polychlorinated biphenyls).
 
"HSR ACT" shall mean Section 7A of the Clayton Act, as added by Title II of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY" shall mean all patents, trademarks, trade names, service marks, domain names, database rights, copyrights, and any applications therefor, mask works, technology, know-how, Trade Secrets, inventory, ideas, algorithms, processes, computer software programs or applications (in both source code and object code form), and tangible or intangible proprietary information or material and all other intellectual property or proprietary rights.
"INTERNAL REVENUE CODE" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"JOINT PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS" shall mean the joint proxy statement and prospectus and other proxy solicitation materials of BNY and Mellon constituting a part of the Registration Statement.
"LAW" shall mean any code, law (including common law), ordinance, regulation, rule, or statute applicable to a Person or its assets, Liabilities, or business, including those promulgated, interpreted, or enforced by any Governmental Authority.
"LIABILITY" shall mean any direct or indirect, primary or secondary, liability, indebtedness, obligation, penalty, cost, or expense (including costs of investigation, collection, and defense), claim, deficiency, or guaranty of any type, whether accrued, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, matured or unmatured, or otherwise.
"LIEN" shall mean any mortgage, pledge, reservation, restriction (other than a restriction on transfers arising under the Securities Laws), security interest, lien, or encumbrance of any nature whatsoever of, on, or with respect to any property or property interest, other than (i) Liens for property Taxes not yet due and payable and (ii) in the case of depository institution Subsidiaries of a Party, pledges to secure deposits.
"LITIGATION" shall mean any action, arbitration, cause of action, claim, complaint, criminal prosecution, demand letter, governmental or other examination or investigation, hearing, inquiry, administrative or other proceeding, suit or notice (written or oral) by any Person alleging potential Liability, but shall not include regular, periodic examinations by Regulatory Authorities.
"MELLON RESTATED ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION" shall mean the restated articles of incorporation of Mellon in effect as of the date of this Agreement and as amended from time to time thereafter.
"MELLON CAPITAL STOCK" shall mean the Mellon Common Stock and Mellon Preferred Stock.
"MELLON COMMON STOCK" shall mean the $0.50 par value per share common stock of Mellon.
 
"MELLON EXCHANGE RATIO" shall mean 1.0.
"MELLON PREFERRED STOCK" shall mean the $1.00 par value per share preferred stock of Mellon.
"NASD" shall mean the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.
"NEWCO COMMON STOCK" shall mean the common stock of Newco.
"NYBCL" shall mean the New York Business Corporation Law, as amended.
"NYSE" shall mean the New York Stock Exchange, Inc.
"ORDER" shall mean any administrative decision or award, decree, injunction, judgment, order, quasi-judicial decision or award, ruling, or writ of any federal, state, local, or foreign or other court, arbitrator, mediator, tribunal, administrative agency, or Governmental Authority.
"ORGANIZATIONAL DOCUMENTS" shall mean the articles of incorporation, certificate of incorporation, charter, by-laws or other similar governing instruments, in each case as amended as of the date specified, of any Person, including the Mellon Restated Charter and the BNY Restated Certificate of Incorporation.
"OUTSTANDING" shall mean, with respect to shares of capital stock of a Party or Newco, shares of such capital stock that are issued and outstanding at a particular time.
"PARTY" shall mean either BNY or Mellon, and "PARTIES" shall mean both BNY and Mellon.
"PBCL" shall mean the Pennsylvania Business Corporation Law, as amended.
"PENSION PLAN" shall mean any ERISA Plan which is also subject to Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 302 of ERISA.
"PERMIT" shall mean any federal, state, local, and foreign governmental approval, authorization, certificate, easement, filing, franchise, license, order or permit from Governmental Authorities that are required for the operation of a Party's respective businesses.
"PERMITTED ISSUANCES" shall mean (a) in the case of BNY, (i) issuances of BNY Common Stock upon exercise of Rights outstanding as of the date hereof issued under the BNY Stock Plans, (ii) issuances of new Rights pursuant to and in accordance with the BNY Stock Plans for up to 105% of the number by type (i.e., options, restricted stock) of Rights issued by BNY during the twelve months prior to the date hereof, provided that (A) such new issuances are in the ordinary course of business and consistent in all material respects with past practice in terms of the timing, type, terms and amount of such issuances and (B) such Rights do not vest in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (iii) issuances of BNY Common Stock in
 
accordance with the BNY Stock Plans pursuant to Rights issued under (a)(ii) above, (iv) issuances of BNY Common Stock pursuant to the BNY DRIP and the BNY ESPP to the extent permitted hereunder, (v) issuances of BNY Common Stock upon conversion of BNY Series A Preferred Stock, and (vi) issuances set forth in Section 8.1(a) of the BNY Disclosure Letter; and (b) in the case of Mellon, (i) issuances of Mellon Common Stock upon exercise of Rights outstanding as of the date hereof issued under the Mellon Stock Plans, (ii) issuances of new Rights pursuant to and in accordance with the Mellon Stock Plans for up to 105% of the number by type (i.e., options, restricted stock) of Rights issued by Mellon during the twelve months prior to the date hereof, provided that (A) such issuances are in the ordinary course of business and consistent in all material respects with past practice in terms of the timing, type, terms and amount of such issuances and (B) such Rights do not vest in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (iii) issuances of Mellon Common Stock in accordance with the Mellon Stock Plans pursuant to Rights issued under (b)(ii) above, (iv) issuances of Mellon Common Stock pursuant to the Mellon DRIP and the Mellon ESPP in accordance with the terms and provisions of those plans as currently in effect, (v) issuances of Mellon Common Stock pursuant to earn-out or other similar provisions under Contracts set forth in Section 8.1(a) of the Mellon Disclosure Letter, (vi) issuances of Mellon Common Stock in the form of (A) Mellon matching contributions to the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan (the amount of which contributions may be increased as set forth in Sections 4.3(k)(x) and 8.1(a) of the Mellon Disclosure Letter) and (B) elections of participants in such Retirement Savings Plan as to the investment of their balances thereunder, and (vii) issuances set forth in Sections 4.3(k)(x) and 8.1(a) of the Mellon Disclosure Letter.
"PERMITTED REPURCHASES" shall mean (a) repurchases of BNY Capital Stock or Mellon Capital Stock in accordance with any stock repurchase program announced prior to the date of this Agreement by a Party, or any extension or renewal of such program, provided that all such repurchases are made in compliance with the safe harbor contained in Rule 10b-18 under the 1934 Act, (b) repurchases or redemptions (including any cancellation upon conversion into Mellon Common Stock) of the issued and outstanding shares of BNY Series A Preferred Stock in accordance with Section 5.4 and (c) any repurchases set forth in Section 8.2(b) of the BNY Disclosure Letter or the Mellon Disclosure Letter, as the case may be.
"PERSON" shall mean a natural person or any legal, commercial, or governmental entity, including a corporation, general partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability company, trust, business association, group acting in concert, or any person acting in a representative capacity.
"PROPERTY" shall mean all real property leased or owned by any Person and its Subsidiaries, either currently or in the past.
"REGISTRATION STATEMENT" shall mean the Registration Statement on Form S-4, or other appropriate form, including any pre-effective or post-effective amendments or supplements thereto, filed with the SEC by Newco under the 1933 Act with respect to the shares of Newco Common Stock to be issued to the shareholders of Mellon and BNY in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
"REGULATORY AUTHORITIES" shall mean, collectively, the Federal Trade Commission, the United States Department of Justice, the Board of the Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of Thrift Supervision, the Internal Revenue Service, the PBGC, all state regulatory agencies having jurisdiction over the Parties and their respective Subsidiaries, the NASD, the NYSE, and the SEC (including, in each case, the staff thereof).
"REPRESENTATIVE" shall mean any investment banker, financial advisor, attorney, accountant, consultant, agent or other representative of a Person.
"RIGHTS" shall mean, with respect to any Person, securities, or obligations convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for, or giving any Person any right to subscribe for or acquire, or any options, calls, restricted stock, deferred stock awards, stock units, phantom awards, dividend equivalents, or commitments relating to, or any stock appreciation right or other instrument the value of which is determined in whole or in part by reference to the market price or value of, shares of capital stock or earnings of such Person, and shall include the BNY Stock Options, BNY Stock-Based Awards, Mellon Stock Options and Mellon Stock-Based Awards.
"SEC" shall mean the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
"SEC DOCUMENTS" shall mean all forms, proxy statements, registration statements, offering circulars, information statements, reports, schedules, and other documents filed, or required to be filed, by a Party or any of its Subsidiaries with the SEC.
"SECURITIES LAWS" shall mean the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act, the Investment Company Act, the Investment Advisers Act, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, each as amended, and state securities and "Blue Sky" Laws, including in each case the rules and regulations of any Governmental Authority promulgated thereunder.
"STOCK OPTION AGREEMENTS" shall mean the collective reference to the Mellon Stock Option Agreement and the BNY Stock Option Agreement.
"SUBSIDIARY" or "SUBSIDIARIES" shall have the meaning assigned in Rule 1-02(x) of Regulation S-X of the SEC; provided that there shall not be included any such entity acquired through foreclosure or any such entity the equity securities of which are owned or controlled in a fiduciary capacity; provided, that unless the context otherwise requires, Newco shall not be considered a Subsidiary of either Party.
"SUPERIOR PROPOSAL" shall mean a bona fide written Acquisition Proposal which the Board of Directors of a Party concludes in good faith, after consultation with such Party's financial advisors and outside legal counsel, taking into account all legal, financial, regulatory and other aspects of the proposal and the person making the proposal
 
(including any break-up fees, expense reimbursement provisions and conditions to consummation), (i) is demonstrably more favorable to the shareholders of such Party from a financial point of view than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (ii) is fully financed, has no more than an immaterial risk of not receiving all required governmental approvals on a timely basis and is otherwise reasonably capable of being completed on the terms proposed; that, for purposes of this definition of "Superior Proposal," the term Acquisition Proposal shall have the meaning assigned to such term in this Section 8.1(a), except that each reference to "20% or more" in the definition of "Acquisition Proposal" shall be deemed to be a reference to "a majority" and "Acquisition Proposal" shall only be deemed to refer to a transaction involving Mellon or BNY, as the case may be, and not any of their respective Subsidiaries.
provided
"TAX" or "TAXES" shall mean all federal, state, local, and foreign taxes, levies, imposts, duties, or other like assessments, including income, gross receipts, excise, employment, sales, use, transfer, license, payroll, franchise, severance, stamp, occupation, windfall profits, environmental, federal highway use, commercial rent, customs duties, capital stock, paid-up capital, profits, withholding, Social Security, single business and unemployment, disability, real property, personal property, registration, ad valorem, value added, alternative or add-on minimum, estimated, or other tax of any kind whatsoever, including any related interest and penalties, or additions thereto.
"TAX RETURN" shall mean any report, return, information return, or other information required to be supplied to a Taxing authority in connection with Taxes, including any return of an Affiliated or combined or unitary group that includes a Party or its Subsidiaries.
"TAXABLE PERIOD" shall mean any period prescribed by any governmental authority, including the United States or any state, local, or foreign government or subdivision or agency thereof for which a Tax Return is required to be filed or Tax is required to be paid.
"TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS" shall mean the electronic data processing, information, record keeping, communications, telecommunications, hardware, third party software, networks, peripherals, portfolio trading and computer systems, including any outsourced systems and processes, and Intellectual Property which are used by Person and its Subsidiaries.
"TRADE SECRETS" means all trade secrets and confidential information and know-how, including without limitation processes, schematics, business methods, formulae, drawings, prototypes, models, designs, customer lists and supplier lists.
(b) The terms set forth below shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the referenced sections:
 
 
 
(c) Any singular term in this Agreement shall be deemed to include the plural, and any plural term the singular. Whenever the words "include," "includes," or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed followed by the words "without limitation." The words "hereby," "herein," "hereof" or "hereunder," and similar terms are to be deemed to refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any specific section. The phrase "date hereof" or "date of this Agreement" shall be deemed to refer to December 3, 2006.
8.2. . Except for Article 1, Article 2 and Article 3, Sections 5.5(c), 5.11(b), 5.17, 5.18, 5.19 and 5.20, and this Article 8, the respective representations, warranties, obligations, covenants, and agreements of the Parties and Newco shall be deemed only to be conditions of the Merger and shall not survive the Effective Time.
Non-Survival of Representations and Covenants
 
8.3. . Except as otherwise provided in this Section 8.3, each of the Parties and Newco shall bear and pay all costs and expenses incurred by it or on its behalf in connection with the transactions contemplated hereunder, including filing, registration, and application fees, printing fees, and fees and expenses of its own financial or other consultants, investment bankers, accountants, and counsel, except that the Parties shall each bear and pay one-half of the filing fees payable in connection with the Registration Statement and the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus, one half of the printing and mailing costs incurred in connection with the printing and mailing of the Registration Statement and the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus and one half of the filing fees in connection with any filing under the HSR Act.
Expenses
8.4. . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, this Agreement (including the Disclosure Letters and Exhibits) constitutes the entire agreement between the Parties and Newco with respect to the transactions contemplated hereunder and supersedes all prior arrangements or understandings with respect thereto, written or oral, other than the Confidentiality Agreement, which shall remain in effect. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, is intended to confer upon any Person, other than the Parties or Newco or their respective successors, any rights, remedies, obligations, or liabilities under or by reason of this Agreement except as provided in Sections 5.18 and 5.19.
Entire Agreement
8.5. . Before the Effective Time, this Agreement may be amended by a subsequent writing signed by each of the Parties and Newco, by action taken or authorized by their respective Boards of Directors, whether before or after the Mellon Shareholder Approval or BNY Shareholder Approval has been obtained, except to the extent that any such amendment would violate applicable Law or would require the approval of the shareholders of Mellon or shareholders of BNY, unless such required approval is obtained.
Amendments
8.6. .
Waivers
(a) Prior to or at the Effective Time, either Party or Newco shall have the right to waive any Default in the performance of any term of this Agreement by the other Party or Newco, to waive or extend the time for the compliance or fulfillment by the other Party or Newco of any and all of such other Party's or Newco's obligations under this Agreement, and to waive any or all of the conditions precedent to its obligations under this Agreement, except any condition which, if not satisfied, would result in the violation of any Law. No waiver by a Party or Newco shall be effective unless in writing signed by a duly authorized officer of such Party or Newco.
(b) The failure of any Party or Newco at any time or times to require performance of any provision hereof shall in no manner affect the right of such Party or Newco at a later time to enforce the same or any other provision of this Agreement. No waiver of any condition or of the breach of any term contained in this Agreement in one or more instances shall be deemed to be or construed as a further or continuing waiver of such condition or breach or a waiver of any other condition or of the breach of any other term of this Agreement.
8.7. . Except as expressly contemplated hereby, neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests, or obligations hereunder shall be assigned by any Party or Newco (whether by operation of Law or otherwise) without the prior written consent of each other party. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement will be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by the parties and their respective successors and assigns.
Assignment
 
8.8. . All notices or other communications which are required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and sufficient if delivered by hand, by facsimile transmission, by registered or certified mail, postage pre-paid, or by courier or overnight carrier, to the Persons at the addresses set forth below (or at such other address as may be provided hereunder), and shall be deemed to have been delivered as of the date so delivered:
Notices
 
 
8.9. . This Agreement shall be governed by, and interpreted and construed in accordance with, the Law of the State of New York.
Governing Law
8.10. . This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument, and which counterparts may be delivered by facsimile.
Counterparts
8.11. . The captions contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and are not part of this Agreement.
Captions
8.12. . Neither this Agreement nor any uncertainty or ambiguity herein shall be construed or resolved against any Party or Newco, whether under any rule of construction or otherwise. No party to this Agreement shall be considered the draftsman. The Parties and Newco acknowledge and agree that this Agreement has been reviewed, negotiated, and accepted by all Parties and their attorneys and shall be construed and interpreted according to the ordinary meaning of the words used so as fairly to accomplish the purposes and intentions of the Parties and Newco. Nothing contained herein shall require any Party or person to take any action of any type in violation of applicable Law.
Interpretations
8.13. . If any term or provision of this Agreement is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remaining provisions hereof, or the application of such provision to Persons or circumstances other than those as to which it has been held invalid or unenforceable, shall remain in full force and effect and in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated thereby, so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any Party or Newco. Upon such determination, the Parties and Newco shall negotiate in good faith in an effort to agree upon a suitable and equitable substitute provision to effect the original intent of the Parties and Newco. If any provision of this Agreement is so broad as to be unenforceable, the provision shall be interpreted to be only so broad as is enforceable.
Severability
8.14. . Each Party and Newco acknowledges and agrees that any controversy which may arise under this Agreement is likely to involve complicated and difficult issues, and therefore each Party and Newco hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives any right such Party and Newco may have to a trial by jury in respect of any Litigation, directly or indirectly, arising out of, or relating to, this Agreement, or the transactions contemplated by this
Waiver of Jury Trial
 
Agreement. Each Party and Newco certifies and acknowledges that (a) no representative, agent or attorney of the other Party or Newco has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other Party or Newco would not, in the event of Litigation, seek to enforce the foregoing waiver, (b) each Party and Newco understands and has considered the implications of this waiver, (c) each Party and Newco makes this waiver voluntarily, and (d) each Party and Newco has been induced to enter into this Agreement by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications in this Section 8.14.
8.15. . Each Party and Newco hereto irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction of (i) the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware, County of New Castle, and (ii) the United States District Court for the District of Delaware, for the purposes of any suit, action or other proceeding arising out of this Agreement or any transaction contemplated hereby. Each Party and Newco hereto agrees to commence any action, suit or proceeding relating hereto either in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware or, if such suit, action or other proceeding may not be brought in such court for reasons of subject matter jurisdiction, in the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware, County of New Castle. Each Party and Newco hereto irrevocably and unconditionally waives any objection to the laying of venue of any action, suit or proceeding arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby in (A) the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware, County of New Castle, or (B) the United States District Court for the District of Delaware, and hereby further irrevocably and unconditionally waives and agrees not to plead or claim in any such court that any such action, suit or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum. Each Party and Newco hereto further irrevocably consents to the service of process out of any of the aforementioned courts in any such suit, action or other proceeding by the mailing of copies thereof by mail to such party at its address set forth in this Agreement, such service of process to be effective upon acknowledgment of receipt of such registered mail; provided that nothing in this Section shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by Law. The consent to jurisdiction set forth in this Section shall not constitute a general consent to service of process in the State of Delaware and shall have no effect for any purpose except as provided in this Section. The Parties and Newco hereto agree that a final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by Law.
Submission to Jurisdiction
8.16. . The Parties and Newco agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms on a timely basis or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that the Parties and Newco shall be entitled to an injunction or other equitable relief to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of this Agreement in any court identified in Section 8.15 above, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
Specific Performance
8.17. . This Agreement amends and restates the Original Agreement in its entirety. All amendments to the Original Agreement effected by this Agreement, and all other covenants, agreements, terms and provisions of this Agreement, shall have effect as of December 3, 2006 unless expressly stated otherwise. This Agreement shall be effective as of the date that copies hereof have been executed and delivered upon execution by each of the parties hereto.
Effectiveness of Amendment and Restatement
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the Parties has caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered on its behalf by its duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 3.1
FIRST: The name of the Corporation is The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
SECOND: The address of the Corporation's registered office in the State of Delaware is Corporation Trust Center, 1209 Orange Street, Wilmington, New Castle County, Delaware 19801. The name of its registered agent at such address is The Corporation Trust Company.
THIRD: The purpose of the Corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
FOURTH: The aggregate number of shares of all classes of capital stock that the Corporation shall have authority to issue is 3,600,000,000 of which 3,500,000,000 shares shall be Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, and 100,000,000 shares shall be Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share. Shares of Preferred Stock may be issued from time to time in one or more series, and the Board of Directors of the Corporation (or any committee thereof) may fix by resolution or resolutions, prior to the issuance of any shares of such series, the voting powers, full or limited, or no voting powers, and the designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, applicable to the shares of such series.
FIFTH: (a) Unless otherwise provided in any Certificate of Designations relating to any series of Preferred Stock, the number of authorized shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock may be increased or decreased by the affirmative vote of the holders of capital stock
representing a majority of the voting power represented by the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Corporation entitled to vote, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 242(b)(2) of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
(b) Except as required by law, holders of Common Stock, as such, shall not be entitled to vote on any amendment to this Certificate of Incorporation (including any Certificate of Designations relating to any series of Preferred Stock) that relates solely to the terms of one or more outstanding series of Preferred Stock if the holders of such affected series are entitled, either separately or together with the holders of one or more other such series, to vote thereon pursuant to this Certificate of Incorporation (including any Certificate of Designations relating to any series of Preferred Stock) or pursuant to the Delaware General Corporation Law.
SIXTH: (a) In furtherance and not in limitation of the powers conferred by the laws of the State of Delaware, the Board of Directors of the Corporation is expressly authorized to make, alter and repeal the by-laws of the Corporation.
(b) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Certificate of Incorporation to the contrary, during the period beginning at the Effective Time (as defined in the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, by and between Mellon Financial Corporation and The Bank of New York Company, Inc., as the same may be amended from time to time) and ending on the thirty-six month anniversary of the Effective Time, the affirmative vote of the holders of at least 75% in voting power represented by the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Corporation entitled to vote, voting together as a single class, shall be required in order for the stockholders to modify, amend or repeal Article Five of the by-laws of the Corporation or to adopt any by-law provision or other resolution inconsistent with Article Five.
SEVENTH: Unless and except to the extent that the by-laws of the Corporation shall so require, the election of directors of the Corporation need not be by written ballot.
EIGHTH: (a) RIGHT TO INDEMNIFICATION. The Corporation shall indemnify and hold harmless, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any person (a "Covered Person") who was or is made or is threatened to be made a party or is otherwise involved in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (a "Proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a Director or officer of the Corporation or, while a Director or officer of the Corporation, is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a Director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, including service with respect to employee benefit plans, against all expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and settlement amounts actually and reasonably incurred by such Covered Person in connection with such Proceeding. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the Corporation shall be required to indemnify a Covered Person in connection with a Proceeding (or part thereof) commenced or brought by such Covered Person only if the commencement or bringing of such Proceeding (or part thereof) by the Covered Person was authorized by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. Persons who are not Directors or officers of the Corporation may be similarly indemnified in respect of service to the Corporation or to another such entity at the request of the Corporation to the extent the Board of Directors at any time denominates any of such persons as entitled to the
 
benefits of this Article Eighth. The indemnification provided in this paragraph (a) shall be a contract right and shall include the right to receive payment in advance of any expenses incurred by the Covered Person in connection with such Proceeding in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Article Eighth.
(b) INSURANCE, CONTRACTS AND FUNDING. The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance to protect itself and any Covered Person against any liability or expense asserted or incurred by such Covered Person in connection with any Proceeding, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such Covered Person against such liability or expense by law or under the provisions of this Article Eighth. The Corporation may enter into contracts with any Director or officer or, as authorized by the Board of Directors, any other employee or agent of the Corporation in furtherance of the provisions of this Article Eighth and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Article Eighth.
(c) ADVANCEMENT OF EXPENSES. The Corporation shall to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law pay the expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred by a Covered Person in defending any Proceeding (other than any Proceeding (or part thereof) commenced or brought by such Covered Person without the specific authorization of the Board of Directors of the Corporation) in advance of its final disposition; , , that, to the extent required by law, such payment of expenses in advance of the final disposition of the Proceeding shall be made only upon receipt of an undertaking by the Covered Person to repay all amounts advanced if it should be ultimately determined that the Covered Person is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation under this Article Eighth or otherwise.
provided
however
(d) CLAIMS. If a written claim under paragraph (a) or paragraph (c) of this Article Eighth is not paid in full by the Corporation within thirty days after such claim has been received by the Corporation, the Covered Person may at any time thereafter initiate a Proceeding against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim and, if successful in whole or in part, the Covered Person shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting such Proceeding. It shall be a defense to any Proceeding to recover a claim under paragraph (a) of this Article Eighth that the Covered Person is not entitled to indemnification under applicable law, but the burden of proving such defense shall be on the Corporation. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel and its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such action that indemnification of the Covered Person is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel or its stockholders) that the Covered Person is not entitled to indemnification under applicable law, shall be a defense to such Proceeding or create a presumption that the Covered Person is not entitled to indemnification under applicable law. The only defense to any such Proceeding to receive payment of expenses in advance under paragraph (c) of this Article Eighth shall be failure to make an undertaking to repay all amounts advanced if such an undertaking is required by law or by provision in this Certificate of Incorporation, agreement or otherwise.
(e) NONEXCLUSIVITY; NATURE AND EXTENT OF RIGHTS. The right of indemnification and advancement of expenses provided in this Article Eighth shall not be
 
exclusive of any other rights to which a person seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may otherwise be entitled, under any statute, by-law, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested Directors or otherwise, both as to action in his or her official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office. The provisions of this Article Eighth (i) shall inure to the benefit of the heirs and legal representatives of any person entitled to indemnity under this Article Eighth, (ii) shall continue as to each person who has ceased to have the status pursuant to which he or she was entitled or was denominated as entitled to indemnification hereunder, and (iii) shall be applicable to Proceedings commenced or continuing after the adoption of this Article Eighth, whether arising from acts or omissions occurring before or after such adoption.
(f) AMENDMENT OR REPEAL. Any repeal or modification of the provisions of this Article Eighth shall not adversely affect any right or protection hereunder of any Covered Person in respect of any act or omission occurring prior to the time of such repeal or modification.
(g) OTHER INDEMNIFICATION. This Article Eighth shall not limit the right of the Corporation, to the extent and in the manner permitted by law, to indemnify and to advance expenses to persons other than Covered Persons when and as authorized by appropriate corporate action.
NINTH: A director of the Corporation shall not be liable to the Corporation or its stockholders or creditors for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director, except to the extent such exemption from liability or limitation thereof is not permitted under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as the same exists or may hereafter be amended. Any amendment, modification or repeal of the foregoing sentence shall not adversely affect any right or protection of a director of the Corporation hereunder in respect of any act or omission occurring prior to the time of such amendment, modification or repeal.
TENTH: Any action required or permitted to be taken by the holders of the Common Stock of the Corporation may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote, only if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holders of all outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Corporation.
ELEVENTH: The Corporation reserves the right to alter, change or repeal any provision contained in this Certificate of Incorporation to the extent now or hereafter permitted or prescribed by law, and all rights, preferences and privileges of any nature conferred upon stockholders, directors or any other persons by and pursuant to this Certificate of Incorporation in its present form or as hereafter amended are granted subject to the rights reserved in this article.
 

Exhibit 3.2
Section 1. ANNUAL MEETINGS. The annual meeting of the stockholders of the Corporation for the election of Directors and the transaction of all other business that may properly come before the meeting shall be held on such date as the Board of Directors shall determine and specify in the notice of such meeting. The annual meeting shall be held at such time and place, and upon such notice, as the Board of Directors shall determine, in the city of New York, New York, or such other city as the Board of Directors shall determine, except that, at least once every three years, the meeting shall be held in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.
Section 2. SPECIAL MEETINGS. Special meetings of the stockholders may be called for any purpose by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the Chairman, and any such special meeting shall be held at the place, day and time and upon such notice as the Board of Directors or such person shall determine.
Section 3. NOTICE OF MEETINGS. Whenever stockholders are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting, a notice of the meeting shall be given in any manner permitted by law which shall state the place, date and hour of the meeting, and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Unless otherwise provided by law, the notice of any meeting shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation.
Section 4. ORGANIZATION. Only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 11(a) of this Article One with respect to an annual meeting of stockholders and Section 11(b) of this Article One with respect to a special meeting of stockholders. The officer presiding at the meeting shall have the power and the duty to determine whether any business proposed to be brought before a meeting was proposed in accordance with the procedures set forth in these By-Laws and, if any business is not in compliance with such procedures, to declare that such defective proposal shall be disregarded. The officer presiding at the meeting shall have authority on his or her own motion to adjourn the meeting from time to time without the approval of the stockholders who are present in person or represented by proxy and entitled to vote, whether or not constituting a quorum, and without notice other than announcement at the meeting. The Board of Directors may, to the extent not prohibited by law, adopt such rules and regulations for the conduct of the meetings of stockholders as it deems appropriate. Except to the extent inconsistent with the rules and
regulations adopted by the Board of Directors, the officer presiding at the meeting of stockholders shall have the right and authority to prescribe rules, regulations and procedures and to do all acts as, in the judgment of such officer, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.
Section 5. VOTING. Unless otherwise provided in the certificate of incorporation (including any certificate of designations with respect to any series of preferred stock), each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall be entitled to one vote for each share of stock held by such stockholder that has voting power on the matter in question. Stockholders may vote at any meeting in person or may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy in any manner permitted by law. No proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by delivering to the Secretary of the Corporation a revocation of the proxy or a new proxy bearing a later date. Voting at meetings of stockholders need not be by written ballot.
Section 6. RECORD DATES.
(a) . In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be the day immediately preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, the day immediately preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; , , that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
Record Date for Meetings of Stockholders
provided
however
(b) . In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to consent to any corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than 10 days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the book in which such proceedings of meetings of stockholders are recorded. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by
Record Date for Consents of Stockholders in Lieu of Meetings
 
the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
(c) . In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than 60 days prior to such action. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
Record Date for Dividends, Distributions and Other Rights in Respect of Stock
Section 7. QUORUM; STOCKHOLDER ACTION. The presence, in person or by proxy, of stockholders entitled to cast at least a majority of the votes that all stockholders are entitled to cast shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of stockholders. Without limiting the power and authority of the officer presiding at a meeting, pursuant to Section 4 of this Article One, to adjourn such meeting without a vote of stockholders, in the absence of a quorum of the holders of all outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote on a matter, the holders of such shares so present or represented may, by majority vote, adjourn such meeting from time to time until a quorum shall be so present or represented, without notice other than announcement at the meeting. When a quorum is once present, it shall not be broken by the subsequent withdrawal of any stockholder from the meeting. Shares of its own capital stock belonging on the record date for the meeting to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; , , that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity. Unless otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation, any action of the stockholders to be taken at a meeting of stockholders (other than election of Directors to the extent set forth in Section 8 of this Article One) may be taken by a majority of the votes cast with respect to the matter at any duly convened stockholders' meeting.
provided
however
Section 8. REQUIRED VOTE FOR DIRECTORS. In order to be elected as a director by the stockholders, a person must, except as otherwise provided by law, receive a plurality of the votes cast by the holders of shares entitled to vote thereon at a meeting of the stockholders for the election of directors at which a quorum shall be present.
Section 9. LIST OF STOCKHOLDERS. The Secretary or other officer of the Corporation who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of at least 10 days prior to the
 
meeting, either (at the election of the Corporation) (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is included in the notice of the meeting or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list of stockholders shall also be open to examination by any stockholder at the meeting (and for the duration thereof) as required by applicable law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the identity of stockholders entitled to examine the list of stockholders required by this Section 9, to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders or to execute written consents to corporate action without a meeting shall be conclusively determined by reference to the stock ledger.
Section 10. INSPECTOR OF ELECTIONS. The Corporation may, and shall if required by law, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors of election, who may be employees of the Corporation, to act at the meeting or any adjournment thereof and to make a written report thereof. The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act. In the event that no inspector so appointed or designated is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting. Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath to execute faithfully the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspector or inspectors so appointed or designated shall (i) ascertain the number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share, (ii) determine the shares of capital stock of the Corporation represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots, (iii) count all votes and ballots, (iv) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors, and (v) certify their determination of the number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation represented at the meeting and such inspectors' count of all votes and ballots. Such certification and report shall specify such other information as may be required by law. In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots cast at any meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, the inspectors may consider such information as is permitted by applicable law. No person who is a candidate for an office at an election may serve as an inspector at such election.
Section 11. NOTICE OF BUSINESS TO BE PRESENTED AT STOCKHOLDER MEETINGS.
(a) . The proposal of business to be considered by the stockholders at an annual meeting of stockholders may be made (x) pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting, (y) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (z) by any stockholder of the Corporation who was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this Section 11, who is entitled to vote at the meeting and who has complied with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 11. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to clause (z) of the preceding sentence, such business must be a proper matter for stockholder action and the stockholder must have given timely notice in compliance with the following requirements in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation:
Annual Meetings of Stockholders
 
(i) To be timely, a stockholder's notice given pursuant to this Section 11 must be received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation, addressed to the Secretary, not less than 90 calendar days or more than 120 calendar days before the anniversary date of the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting; that the first such anniversary date occurring after the effective date of these By-Laws shall be deemed to be March 10, 2008. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, if the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented has been changed by more than 30 calendar days from the date of the most recent previous annual meeting, a stockholder's notice shall be considered timely if so received by the Corporation (A) on or before the later of (1) 120 calendar days before the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented or (2) 30 calendar days following the first public announcement by the Corporation of the date of such annual meeting and (B) not later than 15 calendar days prior to the scheduled mailing date of the Corporation's proxy materials for such annual meeting. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
provided
(ii) A stockholder's notice given pursuant to this Section 11 shall set forth (A) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the proposal and the classes and numbers of shares of the Corporation's stock beneficially owned by such stockholder, (B) a representation that the stockholder is and will at the time of the annual meeting be a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting on the proposal(s) specified in the notice and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to present such proposal(s), (C) a description of the business the stockholder intends to bring before the meeting, including the text of any proposal or proposals to be presented for action by the stockholders, (D) the name and address of any beneficial owner(s) of the Corporation's stock on whose behalf such business is to be presented and the class and number of shares beneficially owned by each such beneficial owner and (E) the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting and any material interest in such business of such stockholder or any such beneficial owner.
(b) . The matters to be considered and brought before any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to only such matters as shall be brought properly before such meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of such special meeting.
Special Meetings of Stockholders
(c) . (i) For purposes of this Section, (A) "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and (B) "beneficial ownership" shall be determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act or any successor rule.
General
(ii) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section 11, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this Section
 
11. Nothing in this Section 11 shall be deemed to affect any rights of a stockholder to request inclusion of a proposal in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act, or any successor rule, or to present for action at an annual meeting any proposal so included.
Section 1. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors. Except as expressly limited by law, all corporate powers of the Corporation shall be vested in and may be exercised by the Board of Directors.
Section 2. NUMBER. Except as otherwise provided in Article Five, the Board of Directors shall consist of such number of Directors as shall be fixed from time to time by a majority vote of the entire Board of Directors.
Section 3. ELECTION; TERM OF OFFICE. Each Director hereafter elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders and until his or her successor is elected and has qualified, or until his or her death or until he or she shall resign or shall have been removed or disqualified.
Section 4. NOMINATION. Nominations for the election of Directors may be made by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof or any officer of the Corporation to whom the Board of Directors or such committee shall have delegated such authority. Upon proper notice given to the Corporation, nominations may also be made by any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of Directors. Written notice of a stockholder's intent to make a nomination or nominations for Director must be given to the Corporation either by United States mail or personal delivery to the Secretary of the Corporation (i) in the case of an annual meeting, not less than 90 calendar days or more than 120 calendar days before the anniversary date of the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting; that the first such anniversary date occurring after the effective date of these By-Laws shall be deemed to be March 10, 2008 and (ii) in the case of a special meeting at which directors are to be elected, not later than the close of business on the tenth calendar day following the earlier of the day on which notice of the date of the meeting was mailed and the day on which public announcement of the date of the meeting was made. Notwithstanding clause (i) of the preceding sentence, if the date of the annual meeting at which Directors are to be elected has been changed by more than 30 calendar days from the date of the most recent previous annual meeting, a stockholder's notice of intent to make a nomination or nominations for Director shall be considered timely if so received by the Corporation (A) on or before the later of (x) 120 calendar days before the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented or (y) 30 calendar days following the first public announcement by the Corporation of the date of such annual meeting and (B) not later than 15 calendar days prior to the scheduled mailing date of the Corporation's proxy materials for such annual meeting. The notice must include: (1) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination and a representation that the stockholder is and will at the time of the annual meeting be a holder of
provided
 
record of Common Stock entitled to vote at such annual meeting and that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to make the nomination or nominations set forth in the notice, (2) the name and address of the person or persons to be nominated for election as Director and such other information regarding the proposed nominee or nominees as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission, (3) a description of all arrangements or undertakings between the stockholder and each proposed nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nomination or nominations are to be made by the stockholder and (4) a consent signed by each of the proposed nominees agreeing to serve as a Director if so elected. The Board of Directors will be under no obligation to recommend a proposed nominee, even though the notice as set forth above has been given.
Section 5. VACANCIES. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, any vacancy on the Board of Directors resulting from death, resignation, disqualification or removal from office or other cause, as well as any vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of Directors which occurs between annual meetings of the stockholders at which Directors are elected, shall be filled only by a majority vote of the remaining Directors then in office, whether or not a quorum, except that those vacancies resulting from removal from office by a vote of the stockholders may be filled by a vote of the stockholders at the same meeting at which such removal occurs. The Directors chosen to fill vacancies shall hold office for a term expiring at the end of the next annual meeting of stockholders. No decrease in the number of Directors constituting the Board of Directors shall shorten the term of any incumbent Director.
Section 6. REMOVAL. Any Director may be removed from office at any time without assigning any cause by the holders of a majority of the shares then entitled to vote at an election of directors.
Section 7. EXCEPTIONS FOR PREFERENCE DIRECTORS. The provisions of Sections 4 through 6 of this Article Two shall not apply to any Director of the Corporation who may be elected under specified circumstances by holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation of the Corporation.
Section 8. ORGANIZATIONAL MEETING. A meeting of the Board of Directors for the purpose of organizing the new Board, appointing the officers of the Corporation for the ensuing year and transacting other business shall be held without notice immediately following the annual election of Directors or as soon thereafter as is practicable at such time and place as the Secretary may designate.
Section 9. REGULAR MEETINGS. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as the Board of Directors shall determine in its Board Policies adopted at its Organization Meeting each year or which are otherwise furnished to the Directors at such Organization Meeting, and if so determined or furnished, notice of such meetings need not be given, provided that at least 25 percent of such regular meetings (but if the number of such meetings is less than eight, no more than two per year) shall be held in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.
 
Section 10. SPECIAL MEETINGS. The Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman or the President may call a special meeting of the Board of Directors at any time. Any such officer or the Secretary shall call a special meeting of the Board upon the written request of any three members of the Board. A special meeting shall be held at such time and place as may be designated by the person or persons calling the meeting. The person or persons calling the meeting shall cause such notice of the meeting and of its purpose to be given as hereinafter provided in this Section 10, but, except as otherwise expressly provided by law or by these By-Laws, the purposes thereof need not be stated in such notice. Except as otherwise provided by law, notice of the special meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each Director either (i) by mail or courier not less than 48 hours before the date of the meeting or (ii) by telephone, telegram or facsimile or electronic transmission, not less than 24 hours before the time of the meeting or on such shorter notice as the person or persons calling such meeting may deem necessary or appropriate in the circumstances (provided that notice of any meeting need not be given to any director who shall either submit, before or after such meeting, a waiver of notice or attend the meeting without protesting, at the beginning thereof, the lack of notice).
Section 11. QUORUM; BOARD ACTION. A majority of the entire Board of Directors (as defined in Article Five) shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting. Unless otherwise provided by law, by these By-Laws or in the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, any action of the Board may be taken upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors present at a duly convened meeting or upon the unanimous written consent of all Directors. In case at any meeting of the Board of Directors a quorum shall not be present, a majority of the members of the Board of Directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time until a quorum shall be present.
Section 12. PARTICIPATION OTHER THAN BY ATTENDANCE. To the full extent permitted by law, any Director may participate in any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors of which he or she is a member by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting are able to hear each other.
Section 13. ACTION BY DIRECTORS WITHOUT A MEETING. Unless otherwise restricted by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or of such committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing (which writing may include by electronic mail), and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or such committee, as the case may be.
Section 14. COMPENSATION. Each Director who does not receive a salary from the Corporation or any affiliate thereof shall be entitled to such compensation as the Board shall determine for his or her service upon the Board of Directors and any of its committees, for his or her attendance at meetings of the Board and any of its committees and for his or her expenses incident thereto. Directors shall also be entitled to such compensation as the Board shall determine for services rendered to the Corporation in any capacity other than as Directors.
 
Section 15. RESIGNATION. Any Director may resign by submitting his or her resignation to the Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman, the President or the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall become effective upon its submission or at any later time specified therein.
Section 1. APPOINTMENT; POWERS. The Board of Directors may appoint one or more standing or temporary committees consisting of two or more Directors. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member; provided, that during the Specified Period (as defined in Article Five), a Continuing BNY Director (as defined in Article Five) shall be appointed as an alternate for a member of the committee who is a Continuing BNY Director and a Continuing Mellon Director (as defined in Article Five) shall be appointed as an alternate for a member of the committee who is a Continuing Mellon Director. The Board of Directors may invest such committees with such powers and authority, subject to such conditions, as it may see fit, but no such committee shall have the power or authority with respect to the following matters: (i) approving or adopting, or recommending to the stockholders, any action or matter expressly required by law to be submitted to stockholders for approval or (ii) adopting, amending or repealing these By-Laws.
Section 2. EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members an Executive Committee which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors during the intervals between the meetings thereof. All acts done and powers conferred by the Executive Committee shall be deemed to be, and may be certified as being, done by or conferred under authority of the Board of Directors.
Section 3. AUDIT AND EXAMINING COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, an Audit and Examining Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Audit and Examining Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Audit and Examining Committee.
Section 4. CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND NOMINATING COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, a Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall
 
have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee.
Section 5. HUMAN RESOURCES AND COMPENSATION COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, a Human Resources and Compensation Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Human Resources and Compensation Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Human Resources and Compensation Committee.
Section 6. RISK COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, a Risk Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Risk Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Risk Committee.
Section 7. CORPORATE RESPONSIBILITY COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, a Corporate Responsibility Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Corporate Responsibility Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Corporate Responsibility Committee.
Section 8. INTEGRATION COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, until the Integration Date (as defined in Article Five), the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members an Integration Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Integration Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Integration Committee.
Section 9. TERM; VACANCIES. Subject to the provisions of Article Five: (a) all committee members appointed by the Board of Directors shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors; and (b) the Board of Directors may fill any committee vacancy.
Section 10. ORGANIZATION. All committees shall determine their own organization, procedures and times and places of meeting, unless otherwise directed by the
 
Board of Directors and except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws. In the absence of a provision by the Board of Directors or a provision in the rules of such committee to the contrary, a majority of the entire authorized number of members of such committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, the vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at the time of such vote if a quorum is then present shall be the act of such committee, and in other respects each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to Article Two of these By-Laws.
Section 1. CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint a Chief Executive Officer. The Chief Executive Officer shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation, shall report directly to the Board of Directors and shall be responsible for the general management of the affairs of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and of any committee thereof are carried into effect. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general executive powers concerning all the operations and business of the Corporation and shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or as may be provided by law, and he or she may delegate to any other officer such executive and other powers and duties as he or she deems advisable.
Section 2. CHAIRMAN. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint one of its members to be Chairman. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date (as such terms are defined in Article Five), the Chairman shall be designated "Executive Chairman", shall be an officer of the Corporation, and the Chief Compliance Officer of the Corporation and the Chief Auditor (for administrative purposes only) shall report to the Executive Chairman. In addition, until the Succession Date, the Executive Chairman shall be in charge of the integration of the Corporation following the Merger (as defined in Article Five) and shall report to the Integration Committee with respect to such responsibilities. The Chairman shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall have and exercise such further powers as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or as may be provided by law. In the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or the Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists and, in the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman and the Chief Executive Officer, any other officer of the Corporation or Director designated by the Board of Directors (provided that if such absence or temporary disability occurs during the Specified Period, only by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors) shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists.
Section 3. PRESIDENT. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint a President. The President shall have and exercise such powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer or as may be provided by law.
 
Section 4. SENIOR OFFICERS. The Board of Directors may appoint, or the Chief Executive Officer may appoint, subject to confirmation by the Board of Directors, one or more senior officers of the Corporation, any of whom may be designated as Vice Chairmen or as executive, senior, group or administrative vice presidents or given any other descriptive titles, as the Board of Directors or the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors shall specify from time to time. Each senior officer shall have and exercise such powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 5. SECRETARY; ASSISTANT SECRETARIES. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Secretary. The Secretary shall act as secretary of all meetings of the stockholders, of the Board of Directors and of the Executive Committee, and he or she shall keep minutes of all such meetings. The Secretary shall give such notice of the meetings as is required by law or these By-Laws. The Secretary shall be the custodian of the minute book, stock record and transfer books and all other general corporate records. The Secretary shall be the custodian of the corporate seal and shall have the power to affix and attest the same, and he or she may delegate such power to one or more officers, employees or agents of the Corporation. The Secretary shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer or as may be provided by law. The Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer may appoint one or more Assistant Secretaries who shall assist the Secretary in the performance of his or her duties. At the direction of the Secretary or in the event of his or her absence or disability, an Assistant Secretary shall perform the duties of the Secretary. Each Assistant Secretary shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the Secretary.
Section 6. TREASURER; ASSISTANT TREASURERS. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Treasurer. The Treasurer shall have and exercise such powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer may appoint one or more Assistant Treasurers who shall assist the Treasurer in the performance of his or her duties. At the direction of the Treasurer or in the event of his or her absence or disability, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer. Each Assistant Treasurer shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the Treasurer.
Section 7. CHIEF AUDITOR. Subject to any requirement of law or the rules of any exchange on which shares of Common Stock of the Corporation are listed, the Board of Directors shall appoint a Chief Auditor who shall be the chief auditing officer of the Corporation. He or she shall report to the Audit and Examining Committee and shall continuously examine the affairs of the Corporation under the general supervision and direction of the Board of Directors. He or she shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Auditing and Examining Committee or the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may also appoint other officers who shall perform such auditing duties as may be assigned to them by the Board of Directors or the Chief Auditor of the Corporation.
 
Section 8. OTHER OFFICERS. The Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the delegate of either of them may appoint or hire such additional officers of the Corporation, who may be designated as vice presidents, assistant vice presidents, officers, assistant officers, or given any other descriptive titles, and may hire such additional employees, as it or he or she may deem necessary or desirable to transact the business of the Corporation, and may establish the conditions of employment of any of the persons mentioned above and may fix their compensation and dismiss them. Such persons may have such descriptive titles as may be appropriate, and they shall, respectively, have and exercise such powers and duties as pertain to their several offices or as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, them by the appropriate appointing authority and as are not inconsistent with any provisions of these By-Laws.
Section 9. TENURE OF OFFICE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman and the President shall each hold office for the year for which the Board of Directors was elected and until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until his or her earlier death, resignation, disqualification or removal. All other officers and employees shall hold office at the pleasure of the appropriate appointing authority. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, in particular subsection 2(b) of Article Five, the Board of Directors may remove any officer with or without cause at any time.
Section 10. COMPENSATION. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall fix the compensation of those officers appointed pursuant to Sections 1, 2, 3 and 7 of this Article Four and of any other officers of the Corporation or any officers of any subsidiary of the Corporation that the Board of Directors shall deem appropriate, and it may award additional compensation to any officer or employee of the Corporation or any officer of any subsidiary for any year or years based upon the performance of that person during any such period, the success of the operations of the Corporation or any subsidiary thereof during any such period or any other reason that the Board of Directors shall deem appropriate. Unless the Board of Directors shall otherwise direct, the Chief Executive Officer or his or her delegate shall fix the compensation of all other officers or employees of the Corporation or any subsidiary thereof.
Section 1. DEFINITIONS. The following definitions shall apply to this Article Five and otherwise as applicable in these By-Laws:
(a) "BNY" means The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a New York corporation.
(b) "Continuing BNY Directors" shall mean the Directors as of the Effective Time who were nominated to be Directors by the Board of Directors of BNY prior to the Effective Time and additional Directors who take office after the Effective Time who are nominated by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee pursuant to Section 3(a) of this Article Five.
 
(c) "Continuing BNY Directors Committee" shall mean the committee established by Section 3(b) of this Article Five.
(d) "Continuing Mellon Directors" shall mean the Directors as of the Effective Time who were nominated to be Directors by the Board of Directors of Mellon prior to the Effective Time and additional Directors who take office after the Effective Time who are nominated by a majority of the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee pursuant to Section 3(a) of this Article Five.
(e) "Continuing Mellon Directors Committee" shall mean the committee established by Section 3(c) of this Article Five.
(f) "Effective Time" has the meaning specified in the Merger Agreement.
(g) "entire Board of Directors" means the total number of Directors which the Corporation would have if there were no vacancies.
(h) "Mellon" means Mellon Financial Corporation, a Pennsylvania corporation.
(i) "Merger" has the meaning specified in the Merger Agreement.
(j) "Merger Agreement" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, by and between Mellon and BNY (as the same may be amended from time to time).
(k) "Specified Period" shall mean the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six-month anniversary of the Effective Time.
(l) "Succession Date" has the meaning specified in Section 2(a) of this Article Five.
Section 2. CHAIRMAN SUCCESSION; CEO AND PRESIDENT. (a) Effective as of the Effective Time, Mr. Thomas Renyi shall become and serve as Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors, Mr. Robert Kelly shall become and serve as Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation and Mr. Gerald Hassell shall become and serve as President of the Corporation. Mr. Robert Kelly shall be the successor to Mr. Thomas Renyi as Chairman of the Board of Directors, with such succession to become effective on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time or any such earlier date as of which Mr. Thomas Renyi ceases for any reason to serve in the position of Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors (the date of succession, the "Succession Date").
(b) During the Specified Period, any removal of, or failure to reelect (if such person is willing to serve), any of the individuals serving in the capacities set forth in subsection 2(a) above, any failure to appoint or elect Mr. Robert Kelly as Chairman of the Board of
 
Directors on the Succession Date, any amendment or modification to or termination of any employment or similar agreement with any of Messrs. Thomas Renyi, Robert Kelly or Gerald Hassell in effect as of the Effective Time, or any modification to any of their respective duties, authority or reporting relationships as set forth in Article Four, shall require the affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors. In the event that during the Specified Period any of the individuals set forth in subsection 2(a) above shall be unable (whether by reason of death, permanent disability, retirement or otherwise) or unwilling to continue in such office, other than as expressly set forth in subsection 2(a) with respect to the succession of Mr. Robert Kelly as Chairman of the Board of Directors on the Succession Date, the vacancy created thereby shall be filled only by the affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors.
Section 3. COMPOSITION OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) During the period beginning on the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date, the Board of Directors shall be comprised of 18 Directors, of which 10 shall be Continuing BNY Directors and eight shall be Continuing Mellon Directors. Beginning on the Succession Date and during the remainder of the Specified Period, the Board of Directors shall be comprised of 16 Directors, of which nine shall be Continuing BNY Directors (one of whom shall be the President of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation) and seven shall be continuing Mellon Directors (one of whom shall be the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation). During the Specified Period, all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee and all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. During the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have the exclusive authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. During the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have the exclusive authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director.
(b) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing BNY Directors Committee, which shall be comprised of all the Continuing BNY Directors. The Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director and (ii) to nominate Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
(c) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing Mellon Directors Committee, which shall be comprised of all the Continuing Mellon Directors. The Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the
 
Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director and (ii) to nominate Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
Section 4. LEAD DIRECTOR. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time, the lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing BNY Director selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee. During the period beginning on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six month anniversary of the Effective Time, the lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing Mellon Director selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. Thereafter, the lead Director shall be a Director selected by a majority of the entire Board of Directors. The Lead Director shall have such duties and responsibilities as may be set forth in the Corporation's Board policies from time to time.
Section 5. COMPOSITION OF COMMITTEES. During the Specified Period, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing Mellon Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing BNY Directors on the Committee, and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, each of the Executive Committee, Audit and Examining Committee, Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee and Risk Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing BNY Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing Mellon Directors on the Committee and a Continuing BNY Director shall be the chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, the Corporate Responsibility Committee shall be comprised of at least four members, of whom two shall be Continuing BNY Directors and two shall be Continuing Mellon Directors. Until the end of the Specified Period or the date on which the Board of Directors determines to terminate the Integration Committee (which shall not be earlier than the Succession Date) (such termination date, the "Integration Date"), the Integration Committee shall be comprised of two Continuing Mellon Directors and two Continuing BNY Directors and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of such Committee. At the end of such period, the Integration Committee shall be disbanded.
Section 6. CORPORATE NAME; BRAND NAMES. (a) During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time, the Board of Directors shall not recommend for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, or otherwise approve or effect, any change to the name of the Corporation or any of the brand names specified in paragraph (b) of this Section 6 without the unanimous affirmative vote of the entire Board of Directors.
(b) BRAND NAMES. The Corporation's product lines shall use the following brand names:
(i) the Asset Management product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Asset Management";
 
(ii) the Private Wealth Management product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Wealth Management";
(iii) the Custody product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Asset Servicing";
(iv) the Stock Transfer product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Stock Transfer";
(v) the Payments and Cash Management product lines shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon" within the United States and the brand name "Bank of New York Mellon" outside of the United States;
(vi) the Client Management product line shall use both the brand names "BNY Mellon" and "Bank of New York Mellon"; and
(vii) all other lines of business of the Corporation shall use the brand name "Bank of New York Mellon" under Bank of New York Mellon Securities Services.
Section 7. AMENDMENTS. During the Specified Period, the provisions of this Article Five (other than Section 6) and Section 1 of Article One, Section 9 of Article Two and Section 1 of Article Three may be modified, amended or repealed, and any By-Law provision or other resolution inconsistent with this Article Five (other than Section 6) or Section 1 of Article One, Section 9 of Article Two or Section 1 of Article Three may be adopted, or any such modification, amendment, repeal or inconsistent By-Law provisions or other resolutions recommended for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, only by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors. Prior to the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time, the provisions of Section 6 of this Article Five may be modified, amended or repealed, and any By-Law provision or other resolution inconsistent with Section 6 may be adopted, or any such modification, amendment, repeal or inconsistent By-Law provisions or other resolutions recommended for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, only by the unanimous affirmative vote of the entire Board of Directors. In the event of any inconsistency between any other provision of these By-Laws and any provision of this Article Five, the provisions of this Article Five shall control.
Section 1. STOCK CERTIFICATES. Shares of stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates or, to the extent provided in Sections 5 and 6 of this Article Six or as otherwise required by law, shall be uncertificated. Stock certificates shall be in such form as the Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe in accordance with law and the requirements of any exchange upon which such shares are listed. Such certificates shall be signed by the Chairman, President or Vice President, countersigned by the Secretary, the Treasurer or any other officer so authorized by the Board of Directors and permitted by law and sealed with the seal of the Corporation, and such signatures and seal may be facsimile or otherwise as permitted by law. In case any officer, registrar or transfer agent who has signed, or whose facsimile
 
signature has been placed upon, any stock certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, registrar or transfer agent, as the case may be, before the certificate is issued, as a result of death, resignation or otherwise, the certificate may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if the officer, registrar or transfer agent, as the case may be, had not ceased to be such at the date of the certificate's issue.
Section 2. TRANSFER OF STOCK. Except as otherwise provided by law, transfers of shares of stock of the Corporation shall be made only upon the books of the Corporation only by the registered holder thereof, or by his or her attorney thereunto authorized by power of attorney duly executed and filed with the Secretary, or with a transfer agent duly appointed, and upon surrender of the certificate or certificates for such shares properly endorsed, if such shares are represented by a certificate, and payment of all taxes thereon.
Section 3. LOST, STOLEN OR DESTROYED CERTIFICATES. The Corporation may issue a new certificate of stock or uncertificated shares in the place of any certificate theretofore issued by it, alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, and the Corporation may require the owner of the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, or such owner's legal representative, to give the Corporation a bond sufficient to indemnify it against any claim that may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of such new certificate or shares.
Section 4. HOLDERS OF RECORD. The Corporation shall be entitled to treat any person in whose name shares of stock of the Corporation stand on its books as the holder and owner in fact thereof for all purposes.
Section 5. UNCERTIFICATED SECURITIES. All or part of the shares of common stock of the Corporation may be uncertificated shares to the extent determined by the Board of Directors from time to time; however, in no event shall shares of common stock represented by a certificate be deemed uncertificated until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
Section 6. DETERMINATIONS AS TO ISSUANCE, TRANSFER AND REGISTRATION. The Board of Directors (or any officer or other person as the Board of Directors may designate) from time to time may make such rules, policies and procedures as it, he or she may deem appropriate concerning the issue, transfer and registration of shares of stock of the Corporation, whether certificated or uncertificated.
Section 1. SIGNING AUTHORITY. The Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman, the President, any senior officer or any Vice President of the Corporation shall have full power and authority, in the name and on behalf of the Corporation, under seal of the Corporation or otherwise, to execute, acknowledge and deliver any and all agreements, instruments or other documents relating to property or rights of all kinds held or owned by the Corporation or to the operation of the Corporation, all as may be incidental to the operation of
 
the Corporation and subject to such limitations as the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer may impose. Any such agreement, instrument or document may also be executed, acknowledged and delivered in the name and on behalf of the Corporation, under seal of the Corporation or otherwise, by such other officers, employees or agents of the Corporation as the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the delegate of either of them may from time to time authorize. In each such case, the authority so conferred shall be subject to such limitations as the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the delegate may impose. Any officer, employee or agent authorized hereunder to execute, acknowledge and deliver any such agreement, instrument or document is also authorized to cause the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or any other authorized person to affix the seal of the Corporation thereto and to attest it.
Section 2. VOTING AND ACTING WITH RESPECT TO STOCK AND OTHER SECURITIES OWNED BY THE CORPORATION. The Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman, the President, any senior officer or any Vice President shall have the power and authority to vote and act with respect to all stock and other securities in any other corporation owned by this Corporation, subject to such limitations as the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer may impose. Such power and authority may be conferred upon any other officer, employee or agent by the Board, the Chief Executive Officer or the delegate of either of them, and such authority may be general or may be limited to specific instances. Any person so authorized shall have the power to appoint an attorney or attorneys, with general power of substitution, as proxies for the Corporation with full power to vote and act on behalf of the Corporation with respect to such stock and other securities.
Section 1. FISCAL YEAR. The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be determined by the Board of Directors.
Section 2. RECORDS. The Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws and the proceedings of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors, the Executive Committee, and any other committee of the Board of Directors shall be recorded in appropriate minute books provided for this purpose or in any other information storage device (whether in paper or electronic form), provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable period of time. The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same. The minutes of each meeting shall be signed by the Secretary or other person acting as secretary of the meeting.
Section 3. SEAL. The Board of Directors may from time to time prescribe the form of a suitable corporate seal.
Section 4. NUMBER. Any reference in these By-Laws to the singular includes the plural and vice versa unless the context indicates otherwise.
 
Section 1. AMENDMENTS. Except as otherwise provided in Article Five of these By-Laws or in Article SIXTH, Section (b) of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws may be amended, altered and repealed, and new By-Laws may be adopted, either by action of the stockholders or (except as otherwise provided by law or these By-Laws) by action of the Board of Directors.
Section 2. INSPECTION. A copy of the By-Laws, with all amendments thereto, shall at all times be kept in a convenient place at the principal office of the Corporation and shall be open for inspection to all stockholders during normal business hours.
 

Exhibit 4.1
THE CORPORATION WILL FURNISH TO ANY STOCKHOLDER WITHOUT CHARGE, UPON REQUEST TO THE TRANSFER AGENT, A STATEMENT OF THE POWERS, DESIGNATIONS, PREFERENCES AND RELATIVE, PARTICIPATING, OPTIONAL OR OTHER SPECIAL RIGHTS OF THE SHARES OF EACH CLASS OR SERIES OF STOCK OF THE CORPORATION AUTHORIZED TO BE ISSUED AND THE QUALIFICATIONS, LIMITATIONS OR RESTRICTIONS OF SUCH PREFERENCES AND/OR RIGHTS.
The following abbreviations, when used in the inscription on the face of this certificate, shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations:
 

Exhibit 4.2
 
 
 
 
This Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of New York having its principal executive office at One Wall Street, New York, New York 10286 (the "Company"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (f/k/a Bankers Trust Company), a New York banking corporation having its principal office at 60 Wall Street, 27
th
Floor, New York, New York 10005 (the "Trustee").
The Company executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain indenture, dated as of July 18, 1991 (the "Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities") may be issued from time to time by the Company. All capitalized terms used in this Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 801(1) of the Indenture provides that the Company shall not consolidate with, or merge into, any other Person, unless the Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all of the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Section 901(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another corporation to the Company and the assumption by the successor of the covenants of the Company in the Indenture and in the Securities.
Mellon Financial Corporation and the Company have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will, upon the consummation of the Merger, assume the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Company.
The Company desires and has requested the Trustee to join with it in the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture to evidence the assumption, upon the consummation of the Merger, of the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Company under the Indenture by Newco.
 
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
All actions necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
 
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the due and punctual payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 802 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Company shall be discharged from all covenants and obligations under the Indenture and the Outstanding Securities.
Discharge of the Company from Obligations.
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Eight of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company therein and the Company shall be discharged of all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Securities.
SECTION 3.2. This Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit, legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
 
SECTION 3.7. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.8. The Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.9.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.10. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.3
 
 
 
 
This Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of New York having its principal executive office at One Wall Street, New York, New York 10286 (the "Company"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 7
th
Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203 (as successor trustee to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association, the "Trustee").
The Company executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain indenture, dated as of October 1, 1993 (the "Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities") may be issued from time to time by the Company. All capitalized terms used in this Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 801(1) of the Indenture provides that the Company shall not consolidate with, or merge into, any other Person, unless the Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all of the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Section 901(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another Person to the Company and the assumption by such successor of the covenants of the Company in the Indenture and in the Securities.
Mellon Financial Corporation and the Company have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will, upon the consummation of the Merger, assume the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Company.
The Company desires and has requested the Trustee to join with it in the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture to evidence the assumption, upon the consummation of the Merger, of the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Company under the Indenture by Newco.
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
All actions necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and any premium and interest on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 802 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Company shall be relieved of all covenants and obligations under the Indenture and the Outstanding Securities.
Release of the Company from Obligations.
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Eight of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company therein and thereafter the Company shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Securities.
 
SECTION 3.2. This Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit, legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, attested, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.4
 
 
 
 
This Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of New York having its principal executive office at One Wall Street, New York, New York 10286 (the "Company"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 7
th
Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203 (as successor trustee to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association, the "Trustee").
The Company executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain junior subordinated indenture, dated as of December 25, 1996 (the "Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities") may be issued from time to time by the Company. All capitalized terms used in this Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 8.1(1) of the Indenture provides that the Company shall not consolidate with, or merge into, any other Person, unless the Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all of the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Section 9.1(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another corporation to the Company and the assumption by the successor of the covenants of the Company in the Indenture and in the Securities.
Mellon Financial Corporation and the Company have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will, upon the consummation of the Merger, assume the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Company.
The Company desires and has requested the Trustee to join with it in the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture to evidence the assumption, upon the consummation of the Merger, of the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Company under the Indenture by Newco.
 
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding:
 
 
 
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
All actions necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the due and punctual payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (including any Additional Interest) on the Outstanding Securities and the performance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 8.2 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Company shall be discharged from all covenants and obligations under the Indenture and the Outstanding Securities.
Discharge of the Company from Obligations.
 
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Eight of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company therein and the Company shall be discharged from all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Securities.
SECTION 3.2. This Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit, legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.5
 
 
 
 
This Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of New York having its principal executive office at One Wall Street, New York, New York 10286 (the "Company"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 7th Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203 (as successor trustee to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association, the "Trustee").
The Company executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain indenture, dated as of December 1, 1996 (the "Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities") may be issued from time to time by the Company. All capitalized terms used in this Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 8.1(1) of the Indenture provides that the Company shall not consolidate with, or merge into, any other Person, unless the Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all of the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Section 9.1(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another corporation to the Company and the assumption by the successor of the covenants of the Company in the Indenture and in the Securities.
Mellon Financial Corporation and the Company have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will, upon the consummation of the Merger, assume the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Company.
The Company desires and has requested the Trustee to join with it in the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture to evidence the assumption, upon the consummation of the Merger, of the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Company under the Indenture by Newco.
 
The following Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding: 7.78% Junior Subordinated Deferrable Interest Debentures, Series A, issued December 1, 1996.
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution and delivery of this Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
All actions necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the due and punctual payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (including any Additional Interest) on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 8.2 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Company shall be discharged from all covenants and obligations under the Indenture and the Outstanding Securities.
Discharge of the Company from Obligations.
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same
 
instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Eight of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company therein and the Company shall be discharged from all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Securities.
SECTION 3.2. This Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit, legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.6
 
 
 
 
Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Funding Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Company"), Mellon Financial Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Guarantor"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, The Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 5th Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203 (as successor trustee to The Bank of New York, as successor to JP Morgan Chase Bank, National Association, as successor to The Chase Manhattan Bank, National Association, the "Trustee").
The Company and the Guarantor executed and delivered to the Trustee a certain indenture, dated as of May 2, 1988 (the "Base Indenture"), the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 29, 1990 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 12, 2000 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities"), guaranteed by the Guarantor (the "Guarantees"), may be issued from time to time by the Company. The Base Indenture, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture and the Second Supplemental Indenture is herein called the "Indenture." All capitalized terms used in this Third Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 903(1) of the Indenture provides that nothing shall prevent any consolidation or merger of the Guarantor with or into any other corporation or corporations, provided that if the Guarantor merges into another corporation, the corporation into which the Guarantor is merged must be organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the Guarantees endorsed on the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
Section 1001(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company and the Guarantor, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another Person as the Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the covenants of the Guarantor in the Indenture and the Guarantees.
The Guarantor and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated December 3, 2006 as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will assume, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant of the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
 
The Company and the Guarantor desire and have requested the Trustee to join with them in the execution and delivery of this Third Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of amending the Indenture to evidence the assumption of the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Guarantor under the Indenture by Newco.
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") with Guarantees endorsed thereon have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding: 3 1/4% Senior Notes due April 1, 2009, 5.20% Senior Notes due 2014 and the Floating Rate Senior Notes due 2014.
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution of this Third Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Third Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Third Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
The Guarantor has furnished the Trustee with an Opinion of Counsel and an Officers' Certificate each stating that the Guarantees remain in full force and effect.
All actions necessary to make this Third Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, the Guarantor, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Guarantor to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
 
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 904 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantor shall be relieved of all covenants and obligations under the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the Indenture.
Release of the Guarantor from Obligations.
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Third Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Nine of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to and be substituted for the Guarantor with the same effect as if it had been named therein as the Guarantor and thereafter the Guarantor shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Guarantees.
SECTION 3.2. This Third Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Third Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit or legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Third Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
 
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Third Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.7
 
 
 
 
First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Funding Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Company"), Mellon Financial Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Guarantor"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 7th Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203 (as successor trustee to The Bank of New York, as successor to Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, successor by merger to First Interstate Bank of California, the "Trustee").
The Company and the Guarantor executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain indenture, dated as of August 25, 1995 (the "Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured subordinated debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities"), guaranteed on a subordinated basis by the Guarantor (the "Guarantees"), may be issued from time to time by the Company. All capitalized terms used in this First Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 903(1) of the Indenture provides that nothing shall prevent any consolidation or merger of the Guarantor with or into any other corporation or corporations, provided that if the Guarantor merges into another corporation, the corporation into which the Guarantor is merged must be organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the Guarantees endorsed on the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
Section 1001(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company and the Guarantor, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another Person as the Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the covenants of the Guarantor in the Indenture and the Guarantees.
The Guarantor and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated December 3, 2006 as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will assume, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant of the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
The Company and the Guarantor desire and have requested the Trustee to join with them in the execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of amending the Indenture to provide for the assumption of the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Guarantor under the Indenture by Newco.
 
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities"), with Guarantees endorsed thereon, have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding: 6.70% Subordinated Debentures Notes Due March 1, 2008 and 6 3/8% Senior Notes due February 15, 2010.
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution of this First Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this First Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this First Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
The Guarantor has furnished the Trustee with an Opinion of Counsel and an Officers' Certificate each stating that the Guarantees remain in full force and effect.
All actions necessary to make this First Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, the Guarantor, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Guarantor to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture.
SECTION 2.1. In accordance with Section 904 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantor shall be relieved of all covenants and obligations under the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the Indenture.
Release of the Guarantor from Obligations.
 
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this First Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article Nine of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to and be substituted for the Guarantor with the same effect as if it had been named therein as the Guarantor and thereafter the Guarantor shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Guarantees.
SECTION 3.2. This First Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this First Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this First Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit or legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this First Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This First Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this First Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this First Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.8
 
 
 
 
 
Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Funding Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Company"), Mellon Financial Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Guarantor"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), and Union Bank of California, National Association (as successor to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association, formerly known as Bank One Trust Company, National Association), a California bank having its principal office at 350 California Street, San Francisco, California 94104, as Trustee (the "Trustee").
The Company and the Guarantor executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain indenture, dated as of June 12, 2000 (the "Base Indenture"), the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 30, 2001 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), and the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2004 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured subordinated debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company (the "Securities"), guaranteed on a subordinated basis by the Guarantor (the "Guarantees"), may be issued from time to time by the Company. The Base Indenture, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture and the Second Supplemental Indenture is herein called the "Indenture." All capitalized terms used in this Third Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 903(1) of the Indenture provides that nothing shall prevent any consolidation or merger of the Guarantor with or into any other corporation or corporations, provided that if the Guarantor merges into another corporation, the corporation into which the Guarantor is merged must be organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the Guarantees endorsed on the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
Section 1001(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Guarantor and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another person as the Guarantor and the assumption by the successor of the covenants of the Guarantor in the Indenture and the Guarantees.
The Guarantor and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated December 3, 2006 as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
 
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will assume, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities (defined below) and the performance of every covenant of the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Guarantor.
The Company and the Guarantor desire and have requested the Trustee to join with them in the execution and delivery of this Third Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of amending the Indenture to provide for the assumption, upon consummation of the Merger, of the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the obligations of the Guarantor under the Indenture by Newco.
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities"), with Guarantees endorsed thereon, have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding: 6.40% Subordinated Notes Due May 14, 2011, 5.00% Subordinated Notes Due December 1, 2014, and 5.50% Subordinated Notes due November 15, 2018.
The Company has furnished the Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution of this Third Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Third Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Third Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
The Guarantor has furnished the Trustee with an Opinion of Counsel and an Officers' Certificate each stating that the Guarantees remain in full force and effect.
All actions necessary to make this Third Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, the Guarantor, Newco and the Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. . Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Guarantor to be performed or observed.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture
 
SECTION 2.1. . In accordance with Section 904 of the indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Guarantor shall be discharged from all covenants and obligations under the Guarantees endorsed on the Outstanding Securities and the Indenture.
Discharge of the Guarantor from Obligations
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Third Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the execution and delivery of the Third Supplemental Indenture, in accordance with Article Nine of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to and be substituted for the Guarantor with the same effect as if it had been named therein as the party of the first part and the Guarantor shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Guarantees.
SECTION 3.2. This Third Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Third Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit or legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Third Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Third Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Third Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
 
SECTION 3.8.
This Third Supplemental Indenture and the Notes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Third Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 4.9
 
 
 
 
This Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Financial Corporation, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having its principal executive office at One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15258 (the "Company"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Newco"), The Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation having its principal executive office at 101 Barclay Street, 8W, New York, New York, 10286, not in its individual capacity but solely as trustee (the "Trustee") U.S. Bank National Association, not in its individual capacity but solely as series trustee (the "Series C Trustee"), and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, a New York banking corporation having its principal office at One M&T Plaza, 7
th
Floor, Buffalo, New York 14203, not in its individual capacity but solely as series trustee (the "Series L Trustee").
The Company executed and delivered to the Trustee that certain junior subordinated indenture, dated as of December 3, 1996 (the "Base Indenture"), pursuant to which one or more series of unsecured junior subordinated debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Company, (the "Securities") may be issued from time to time by the Company, and to the Series C Trustee that certain Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 19, 2006 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), under which the Junior Subordinated Deferrable Interest Debentures, Series C were issued, and to the Series L Trustee that certain Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 19, 2007 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), under which the Remarketable 6.244% Junior Subordinated Notes, Series L were issued. The Base Indenture, as amended by the First Supplemental Indenture and the Second Supplemental Indenture is herein called the "Indenture." All capitalized terms used in this Third Supplemental Indenture not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Indenture.
Section 8.1 of the Indenture provides that the Company shall not consolidate with, or merge into, any other Person, unless the Person formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged is a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof and shall expressly assume by a supplemental indenture, in form satisfactory to Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of and interest on all of the Securities and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed.
Section 9.1(1) of the Indenture provides that a supplemental indenture may be entered into by the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee without the consent of any Holders to evidence the succession of another Person to the Company and the assumption by such successor of the covenants of the Company contained in the Indenture and in the Securities.
The Company and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated December 3, 2006 as amended and restated on February 23, 2007 and March 30, 2007, pursuant to which they have agreed to merge (the "Merger") with and into Newco, a newly formed Delaware corporation which will survive the Merger.
 
Pursuant to the Merger, Newco will, upon the consummation of the Merger, assume the due and punctual payment of the principal of and any interest on all the Outstanding Securities (as defined below) and the performance of every covenant in the Indenture to be observed or performed by the Company.
The Company desires and has requested that each of the Trustee, Series C Trustee and Series L Trustee join with it in the execution and delivery of this Third Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of amending the Indenture to provide for the assumption, upon the consummation of the Merger, of the Outstanding Securities and the obligations under the Indenture by Newco.
The following series of Securities (the "Outstanding Securities") have been issued prior to the execution hereof and remain outstanding: (i) 6.369% Junior Subordinated Deferrable Interest Debentures due 2066; and (ii) 6.244% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2043.
The Company has furnished each of the Trustee, Series C Trustee and Series L Trustee with (i) an Opinion of Counsel stating that the Merger and the execution and delivery of this Third Supplemental Indenture comply with the Indenture, (ii) an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in the Indenture with respect to this Third Supplemental Indenture have been complied with and (iii) a copy of the resolutions of its Board of Directors, certified by its Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, pursuant to which this Third Supplemental Indenture has been authorized.
All actions necessary to make this Third Supplemental Indenture a valid agreement of the Company, Newco, the Trustee, the Series C Trustee and the Series L Trustee and a valid amendment of and supplement to the Indenture have been taken.
For and in consideration of the premises and intending to be legally bound hereby, it is mutually covenanted and agreed, for the equal and proportionate benefit of all Holders of the Securities or of any series thereof, as follows:
SECTION 1.1. . Newco hereby fully and unconditionally agrees to assume, and hereby does assume, effective upon the consummation of the Merger (the "Effective Time"), (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (including any Additional Interest) on the Outstanding Securities and the performance and observance of every covenant of the Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed or observed and (b) responsibility and liability for the actions and omissions of the Company under the Indenture prior to the Effective Time ("Prior Acts"). Newco hereby agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Trustee, the Series C Trustee and the Series L Trustee for any and all claims, liabilities, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred or suffered by the Trustee, the Series C Trustee and the Series L Trustee, as the case maybe, as the result of any Prior Acts.
Assumption of Obligations under Indenture
 
SECTION 2.1. . In accordance with Section 8.2 of the Indenture, upon the consummation of the Merger, the Company shall be discharged from all covenants and obligations under the Outstanding Securities and the Indenture.
Discharge of the Company from Obligations
SECTION 3.1. All the provisions of this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be incorporated in, and made a part of, the Indenture; and the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Third Supplemental Indenture, shall be read, taken and construed as one and the same instrument. Upon the consummation of the Merger, in accordance with Article VIII of the Indenture, Newco shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company therein and thereafter the Company shall be discharged from all obligations and covenants under the Indenture and the Securities.
SECTION 3.2. This Third Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
SECTION 3.3. In case any provision in this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
SECTION 3.4. Nothing in this Third Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give to any person, other than the parties hereto and their successors hereunder and the Holders, any benefit, legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Third Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.5. This Third Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon its execution and delivery.
SECTION 3.6. All covenants and agreements in the Indenture, as supplemented and amended by this Third Supplemental Indenture, by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 3.7. The Indenture as supplemented by this Third Supplemental Indenture, is in all respects ratified and confirmed, and this Third Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
SECTION 3.8.
This Third Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
 
SECTION 3.9. This instrument may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Third Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
For immediate release
NEW YORK, July 2, 2007  The Bank of New York Company, Inc. (NYSE: BK) and Mellon Financial Corporation (NYSE: MEL) announced today they have completed their merger to form The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, creating the global leader in asset management and securities servicing. The new company trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "BK."
The company ranks as one of the largest global asset managers with more than $1 trillion in assets under management and is the world's leading asset servicer with more than $18 trillion in assets under custody or administration.
"Today we are establishing a global financial services growth company without peer," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of the company. "We have leadership positions across a range of high-growth businesses, unmatched product breadth, and the ability to accelerate our global expansion through strategic investments. With exceptional service and performance as the hallmarks of the new company, we will foster a culture that rewards winning through relentless client focus, teamwork and execution."
In addition to asset management and securities servicing, the company is the leading provider of corporate trust, depositary receipts, clearing and shareowner services. It ranks as a top 10 U.S. wealth manager with more than $160 billion in client assets and is a leading U.S. cash management and global payments provider. The company has a balanced business mix, with diversified revenues and earnings across all regions of the world and a presence in the fastest-growing segments of asset management and securities servicing.
"The Bank of New York Mellon is positioned to provide superior service and value to our clients and deliver faster growth to our shareholders," said Thomas A. Renyi, executive chairman of the company. "We have closed the merger on target and are now ready to execute a disciplined, thoughtful integration of our capabilities to meet the current and future demands of our clients."
The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial announced plans to merge in December 2006, and shareholders of each company overwhelmingly approved the transaction in May. The company has annual revenues of approximately $13 billion and pro-forma market capitalization approximately $50 billion. The company is headquartered in New York and has 40,000 employees around the world.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients move and manage their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $18 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1 trillion in assets under management and $11 trillion in assets under trusteeship. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial, including expectations with respect to the merged companies, integration and operations after the merger, future growth and delivery of faster growth to shareholders. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties. The following risks, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from the anticipated results or other expectations expressed in the forward-looking statements: (1) the businesses of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; (2) the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; (3) revenues following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; and (4) deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected. Additional factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and The Bank of New York Company, Inc.'s and Mellon Financial's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this press release speak only as of the date on which such statements are made, and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which such statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.

Exhibit 99.2
Management Report on Internal Controls Over Financial Reporting
The Company's management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting that is designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements and related notes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America ("GAAP").
The Company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that:
 
 
 
Any system of internal control, no matter how well designed, has inherent limitations, including the possibility that a control can be circumvented or overridden and misstatements due to error or fraud may occur and not be detected. Also, because of changes in conditions, internal control effectiveness may vary over time. Accordingly, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changed conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Management assessed the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006. In making this assessment, the Company's management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in Internal Control-Integrated Framework. Based on this assessment, management believes that the Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective as of December 31, 2006.
Management's assessment of the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, has been audited by Ernst & Young LLP, an independent registered accounting firm, as stated in their attestation report on the following page.
AUDITOR'S ATTESTATION REPORT
To The Board of Directors and Shareholders of The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
We have audited management's assessment, included in the accompanying Management Report on Internal Controls Over Financial Reporting, that The Bank of New York Company, Inc. (the "Company") maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on criteria established in Internal ControlIntegrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (the COSO criteria). The Company's management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on management's assessment and an opinion on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, evaluating management's assessment, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Because management's assessment and our audit were conducted to also meet the reporting requirements of Section 112 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Improvement Act (FDICIA), management's assessment and our audit of The Bank of New York Company Inc.'s internal control over financial reporting included controls over the preparation of financial statements in accordance with the instructions for the preparation of Consolidated Financial Statements for Bank Holding Companies (Form FRY-9C). A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
In our opinion, management's assessment that The Bank of New York Company, Inc. maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, is fairly stated, in all material respects, based on the COSO criteria. Also, in our opinion, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on the COSO criteria
.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the consolidated balance sheets of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. as of December 31, 2006 and 2005, and the related consolidated statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2006 and our report dated February 21, 2007 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
New York, New York
February 21, 2007
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. Summary of Significant Accounting and Reporting Policies
The Bank of New York Company, Inc. (the "Company") provides a complete range of banking and other financial services to corporations and individuals worldwide through its business segments: Institutional Services, Private Bank and BNY Asset Management, and Corporate and Other. "Business Segment Accounting Principles", "Segment Financial Data", and "International Financial Data" are incorporated from the Business Segment Review section of Management's Discussion and Analysis of the Company's Financial Condition and Results of Operations ("MD&A"). There were no major customers from whom revenues were individually material to the Company's performance.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts in the consolidated financial statements. Amounts subject to significant estimates and assumptions are items such as the allowance for loan losses and lending-related commitments, goodwill and intangibles, pension and postretirement obligations, and the fair value of financial instruments. Actual results could differ from these estimates.
Consolidation
The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. Qualifying special-purpose entities (QSPEs) are not consolidated. A VIE is consolidated if the Company will absorb a majority of the expected losses of the VIE, receive the majority of the expected residual returns of the VIE or both. The results of operations of businesses purchased are included from the date of acquisition. Equity investments of less than a majority but at least 20% ownership are accounted for by the equity method and classified as other assets. The Company's most significant equity method investment is its 20.2% share in Wing Hang, with a carrying value of $241 million.
Fee and Net Interest Revenue
Fees and other revenue are recorded when earned based on contractual terms. Fees are accrued based on estimates, or are recognized as transactions occur or services are provided and collectibility is reasonably assured. Revenue on interest-earning assets and expense on interest-bearing liabilities is recognized based on the effective yield of the related financial instrument.
Securities
Debt and equity securities classified as available-for-sale are carried at fair value, except for those equity securities whose fair value cannot be readily determined. These securities are carried at cost. For securities carried at fair value, the after-tax effect of net unrealized gains and losses is reported as a separate component of shareholders' equity.
Securities classified as trading assets are carried at fair value, with net unrealized holding gains and losses recognized currently in income. Debt securities, which the Company has the ability and intent to hold until maturity, are classified as held-to-maturity and stated at cost, adjusted for discount accreted and premium amortized. Realized gains and losses on the sale of debt and equity securities are determined by the specific identification and average cost methods, respectively.
The Company conducts quarterly reviews to identify and evaluate investments that have indications of possible impairment. An investment in a debt or equity security is impaired if its fair value falls below its cost and the decline is considered other-than-temporary. The Company examines various factors when determining whether an impairment is other-than-temporary. Examples of factors that may indicate that an other-than-temporary impairment has occurred include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit losses is maintained at a level that, in management's judgment, is adequate to absorb probable losses associated with specifically identified loans, as well as estimated probable credit losses inherent in the remainder of the credit portfolio at the balance sheet date. Management's judgment includes the following factors, among others: risks of individual credits; past experience; the volume, composition, and growth of the credit portfolio; and economic conditions.
The Company conducts a quarterly portfolio review to determine the adequacy of its allowance for credit losses. All commercial exposures over $1 million are assigned to specific risk categories. Smaller commercial and consumer exposures are evaluated on a pooled basis and assigned to specific risk categories. Following this review, senior management of the Company analyzes the results and determines the allowance for credit losses. The Company's Board of Directors reviews the allowance at the end of each quarter.
The portion of the allowance for credit losses allocated to impaired loans (nonaccrual commercial loans over $1 million) is measured by the difference between their recorded value and fair value. Fair value is determined by one of the following: present value of the expected future cash flows from borrowers, the market value of the loan, or the fair value of the collateral. See "Asset Quality and Allowance for Credit Losses" and "Critical Accounting Policies" in the MD&A section for additional information.
Nonperforming Assets
Commercial loans are placed on nonaccrual status when collateral is insufficient and principal or interest is past due 90 days or more, or when there is reasonable doubt that interest or principal will be collected. Accrued interest is usually reversed when a loan is placed on nonaccrual status. Interest payments received on nonaccrual loans may be recognized as income or applied to principal depending upon management's judgment. Nonaccrual loans are restored to accrual status when principal and interest are current or they become fully collateralized. Consumer loans are not classified as nonperforming assets, but are charged off and interest accrued is suspended based upon an established delinquency schedule determined by product. Real estate acquired in satisfaction of loans is carried in other assets at the lower of the recorded investment in the property or fair value minus estimated costs to sell.
Leveraged Leases
Significant assumptions involving cash flows, residual values and income tax rates affect the level of revenue associated with leases. Gains and losses on residual values of leased equipment sold are included in other income. Considering the nature of these leases and the number of significant assumptions, there is risk associated with the income recognition on these leases should any of the assumptions change materially in future periods.
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
Derivative contracts, such as futures contracts, forwards, interest rate swaps, foreign currency swaps and options and similar products used in trading activities, are recorded at fair value. The Company does not recognize gains or losses at the inception of derivative transactions if the fair value is not determined based upon observable market transactions and market data. Gains and losses are included in foreign exchange and other trading activities in noninterest income. Unrealized gains and losses are reported on a gross basis in trading account assets and trading liabilities, after taking into consideration master netting agreements.
The Company enters into various derivative financial instruments for non-trading purposes primarily as part of its asset/liability management ("ALM") process. These derivatives are designated as fair value and cash flow hedges of certain assets and liabilities when the Company enters into the derivative contracts. Gains and losses associated with fair value hedges are recorded in income as well as any change in the value of the related hedged item. Gains and losses on cash flow hedges are recorded in other comprehensive income. If a derivative used in ALM does not qualify as a hedge, it is marked-to-market and the gain or loss is included in net interest income.
The Company formally documents all relationships between hedging instruments and hedged items, as well as its risk-management objectives and strategy for undertaking various hedge transactions. This process includes linking all derivatives that are designated as fair value hedges to specific assets or liabilities on the balance sheet.
The Company formally assesses, both at the hedge's inception and on an ongoing basis, whether the derivatives that are used in hedging transactions are highly effective and whether those derivatives are expected to remain highly effective in future periods. The Company evaluates ineffectiveness in terms of amounts that could impact a hedge's ability to qualify for hedge accounting and the risk that the hedge could result in more than a de minimus amount of ineffectiveness. At inception, the potential causes of ineffectiveness related to each of its hedges is assessed to determine if the Company can expect the hedge to be highly effective over the life of the transaction and to determine the method for evaluating effectiveness on an ongoing basis. Recognizing that changes in the value of derivatives used for hedging or the value of hedged items could result in significant ineffectiveness, the Company has processes in place designed to identify and evaluate such changes when they occur. Quarterly, the Company performs a quantitative effectiveness assessment and records any ineffectiveness.
The Company utilizes interest rate swap agreements to manage its exposure to interest rate fluctuations. For hedges of fixed-rate loans, asset-backed securities, deposits and long-term debt, the hedge documentation specifies the terms of the hedged items and interest rate swaps and indicates that the derivative is hedging a fixed-rate item and is a fair value hedge, that the hedge exposure is to the changes in the fair value of the hedged item due to changes in benchmark interest rates, and that the strategy is to eliminate fair value variability by converting fixed-rate interest payments to LIBOR.
The fixed rate loans hedged generally have an original maturity of 6 to 12 years and are not callable. These loans are hedged with "pay fixed rate, receive variable rate" swaps with similar notional amounts, maturities, and fixed rate coupons. The swaps are not callable. At December 31, 2006, $43 million of loans were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $43 million.
The securities hedged generally have a weighted average life of 10 years and are callable six months prior to maturity. These securities are hedged with pay fixed rate, receive variable rate swaps of like maturity, repricing and fixed rate coupon. The swaps are callable six months prior to maturity. At December 31, 2006, $228 million of securities were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $228 million.
The fixed rate deposits hedged generally have original maturities of 1 to 12 years (44% are one year deposits) and, except for three deposits, are not callable. These deposits are hedged with receive fixed rate, pay variable rate swaps of similar maturity, repricing and fixed rate coupon. The swaps are not callable except for the three that hedge the callable deposits. At December 31, 2006, $1,255 million of deposits were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $1,255 million.
 
The fixed rate long-term debt hedged generally has an original maturity of 4 to 30 years. The Company issues both callable and non-callable debt. The non-callable debt is hedged with simple interest rate swaps similar to those described for deposits. Callable debt is hedged with callable swaps where the call dates of the swaps exactly match the call dates of the debt. At December 31, 2006, $5,802 million of debt was hedged with interest rate swaps that had notional values of $5,838 million.
In addition to the fair value hedges discussed above, the Company has three cash flow hedges utilizing interest rate swaps to hedge the variability in expected future cash flows attributable to floating rates on an interest-only strip, a deposit and a long-term debt issue. The hedge documentation specifies the terms of the hedged items and interest rate swaps and indicates that the derivative is hedging future variable interest payments and is a cash flow hedge, that the hedge exposure is the variability in interest payments, and that the strategy is to eliminate variability by converting floating rate interest payments to fixed payments. For cash flow hedges the interest rate swap is marked-to-market with the changes in value recorded in other comprehensive income. The amount recognized as other comprehensive income for the cash flow hedge is reclassified to net interest income as interest is realized on the hedged item.
The Company has a $264 million interest-only strip of which $200 million is hedged with a $200 million receive fixed rate, pay variable rate interest rate swap to remove the variability in the cash flows received from the security. Payments on the interest-only strip are related to a money market fund. During the next twelve months, net gains of $3 million (pre-tax) included in other comprehensive income are expected to be reclassified to income.
The deposit hedged has a principal amount of $275 million and has a LIBOR-based floating rate and an 18 month original maturity. The deposit is hedged with a receive LIBOR, pay fixed rate swap with the same maturity and interest payment dates as the deposit to eliminate the variability in interest payment received on the deposit. During the next twelve months, net losses of less than $1 million (pre-tax) included in other comprehensive income are expected to be reclassified to income.
The long-term debt hedged has a principal amount of $400 million and has a LIBOR-based floating rate and a 2 year original maturity. The debt is hedged with a receive LIBOR, pay fixed rate swap with the same maturity and interest payment dates as the debt to eliminate the variability in interest payment received on the debt. During the next twelve months, net losses of less than $1 million (pre-tax) included in other comprehensive income are expected to be reclassified to income.
In addition, the Company enters into foreign exchange hedges. The Company uses forward foreign exchange contracts with maturities of 12 months or less to hedge its Sterling and Euro foreign exchange exposure with respect to forecasted expense transactions in non-U.S. entities which have the U.S. dollar as their functional currency. As of December 31, 2006, the hedged forecasted foreign currency transactions and linked foreign exchange forward hedges were $107 million with $4 million (pre-tax) gains recorded in other comprehensive income. These gains are expected to be reclassified to expense over the next twelve months.
Forward foreign exchange contracts are also used to hedge the value of the Company's investments in foreign subsidiaries. These forward contracts have a maturity of less than six months. The derivatives employed are designated as net investment hedges of changes in value of the Company's foreign investment due to exchange rates, such that changes in value of the forward exchange contracts offset the changes in value of the
 
foreign investments due to changes in foreign exchange rates. The change in fair market value of these contracts is deferred and reported within accumulated translation adjustments in shareholders' equity, net of tax effects. At December 31, 2006, foreign exchange contracts, with notional amounts totaling $1,744 million, were designated as hedges of corresponding amounts of net investments.
The Company discontinues hedge accounting prospectively when it determines that a derivative is no longer an effective hedge, the derivative expires or is sold, or management discontinues the derivative's hedge designation. Subsequent gains and losses on these derivatives are included in foreign exchange and other trading activities.
Ineffectiveness related to derivatives and hedging relationships was recorded in income as follows:
 
Other includes ineffectiveness recorded on foreign exchange hedges.
Tax
The Company records current tax liabilities or assets through charges or credits to the current tax provision for the estimated taxes payable or refundable for the current year. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are recorded for future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. A deferred tax valuation allowance is established if it is more likely than not that all or a portion of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Interest and penalties related to income taxes are recorded as income tax expense.
Premises, Equipment, and Internal-Use Software
Premises and equipment are carried at cost less accumulated depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the owned asset and, for leasehold improvements, over the lesser of the remaining term of the leased facility or the estimated economic life of the improvement. For owned and capitalized assets, estimated useful lives range from 3 to 50 years. Maintenance and repairs are charged to expense as incurred, while major improvements are capitalized and amortized to operating expense over their identified useful life. For internal-use computer software, the Company capitalizes qualifying costs incurred during the application development stage. The resulting asset is amortized using the straight-line method over the expected life, which is generally 5 years. All other costs incurred in connection with an internal-use software project are expensed as incurred.
Goodwill and other Intangible Assets
Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of an acquisition over the fair value of the net assets acquired. Other intangible assets represent purchased assets that also lack physical substance but can be distinguished from
 
goodwill because of contractual or other legal rights or because the asset is capable of being sold or exchanged either on its own or in combination with a related contract, asset, or liability. Goodwill is tested at least annually for impairment. All other intangible assets which have finite useful lives are amortized over those periods, which range from 3 to 18 years.
Stock Options
On January 1, 2003, the Company adopted the fair value method of accounting for its options under SFAS 123 as amended by SFAS 148, "Accounting for Stock-Based CompensationTransition and Disclosure." SFAS 148 permits three different methods of adopting fair value: (1) the prospective method, (2) the modified prospective method, and (3) the retroactive restatement method. Under the prospective method, options issued after January 1, 2003, are expensed while all options granted prior to January 1, 2003, are accounted for under Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25 ("APB 25"), "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees", using the intrinsic value method. Consistent with industry practice, the Company elected the prospective method of adopting fair value accounting. See "Stock Option Plans" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information regarding stock options.
The retroactive restatement method requires the Company's financial statements to be restated as if fair value accounting had been adopted in 1995. For 2006, there is no difference between the prospective method and the retroactive restatement method. The following table discloses the pro forma effects on the Company's net income and earnings per share for 2005 and 2004 as if the retroactive restatement method had been adopted.
 
In December 2004, the FASB issued SFAS No. 123 (revised 2004) ("SFAS 123(R)"), "Share-Based Payment", which is a revision of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation." SFAS 123(R) eliminates the ability to account for share-based compensation transactions using APB 25 and requires that such transactions be accounted for using a fair value-based method. SFAS 123(R) covers a wide range of share-based compensation arrangements including share options, restricted share plans, performance-based awards, share appreciation rights, and employee share purchase plans. The Company adopted SFAS 123(R) on January 1, 2006 using the "modified prospective" method. Under this method, compensation cost is recognized beginning with the effective date (a) based on the requirements of SFAS 123(R) for all share-based payments granted after the effective date and (b) based on the requirements of SFAS 123 for all awards granted to employees prior to the effective date of SFAS 123(R) that remain unvested on the effective date. As of January 1, 2006, the Company was amortizing all of its unvested stock option grants.
Certain of the Company's stock compensation grants vest when the employee retires. SFAS 123(R) will require the completion of expensing of new grants with this feature by the first date the employee is eligible to retire. For grants prior to January 1, 2006, the Company will continue to expense them over their stated vesting period. The adoption of SFAS 123(R) increased pre-tax expense in 2006 by $12 million, which was recorded in the second quarter of 2006.
 
Pension
At September 30, the measurement date, plan assets were determined based on fair value generally representing observable market prices. The projected benefit obligation is determined based on the present value of projected benefit distributions at an assumed discount rate. The discount rate utilized is based on the yield of high quality corporate bonds available in the marketplace. Periodic pension expense includes service costs, interest costs based on an assumed discount rate, an expected return on plan assets based on an actuarially derived market-related value and amortization of actuarial gains and losses.
Actuarial gains and losses include the impact of plan amendments and various unrecognized gains and losses which are deferred and amortized over the future service periods of active employees. The market-related value utilized to determine the expected return on plan assets is based on fair value adjusted for the difference between expected returns and actual performance of plan assets. The unrealized difference between actual experience and expected returns is included in the market-related value over a five-year period. The Company's stock price used by the ESOP is also smoothed to reduce volatility.
Any unrecognized gains or losses related to changes in the amount of the projected benefit obligation or plan assets resulting from experience different from the assumed discount rate or expected returns and from changes in assumptions are deferred. To the extent an unrecognized gain or loss, excluding the unrecognized asset gain or loss, exceeds 10 percent of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the market-related value of plan assets, the excess is recognized over the future service periods of active employees.
2. Accounting Changes and New Accounting Pronouncements
In June 2005, the FASB ratified the consensus in EITF Issue No. 04-5 ("EITF 04-5"), "Determining Whether a General Partner, or the General Partners as a Group, Controls a Limited Partnership or Similar Entity When the Limited Partners Have Certain Rights", which provides guidance in determining whether a general partner controls a limited partnership. The adoption of EITF 04-5 did not have a significant impact on the Company's financial condition or results of operations.
In November 2005, the FASB issued FASB Staff Position (FSP) FAS 115-1 and FAS 124-1 "The Meaning of Other-Than-Temporary Impairment and Its Application to Certain Investments." The FSP addresses the determination as to when an investment is considered impaired, whether that impairment is other than temporary, and the measurement of an impairment loss. The Company adopted the FSP on January 1, 2006. The adoption of the standard did not have a significant impact on its financial condition or results of operations.
In February 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 155 ("SFAS 155"), "Accounting for Certain Hybrid Financial Instruments", an amendment of SFAS 140 and SFAS 133. SFAS 155 permits the Company to elect to measure any hybrid financial instrument at fair value if the hybrid instrument contains an embedded derivative that otherwise would require bifurcation and be accounted for separately under SFAS 133. SFAS 155 clarifies which interest-only strips and principal-only strips are not subject to the requirements of SFAS 133 and that concentrations of credit risk in the form of subordination are not embedded derivatives. SFAS 155 is effective for all financial instruments acquired, issued, or subject to a remeasurement event after December 31, 2006. On January 17, 2007, the FASB issued Derivative Implementation Groups ("DIG") Issue B40 which impacts how SFAS 155 is applied. The Company does not believe that SFAS 155 and DIG Issue B40 will have a significant impact on the Company's investment activities.
 
In July 2006, the FASB issued FSP FAS 13-2, "Accounting for a Change or Projected Change in the Timing of Cash Flows Relating to Income Taxes Generated by a Leverage Lease Transaction," revising the accounting guidance under SFAS No. 13 ("SFAS 13"), "Accounting for Leases," for leveraged leases. This FSP modifies existing interpretations of SFAS 13 and associated industry practice. As a result in 2007, the Company expects to recognize a one-time after-tax charge to capital of approximately $400 million related to a change in the timing of its lease cash flows due to the LILO settlement. See "Commitments and Contingent Liabilities" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements. However, an amount approximating this one-time charge will be taken into income over the remaining term of the affected leases.
In September 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 157 ("SFAS 157"), "Fair Value Measurements." The Statement defines fair value, establishes a framework for measuring fair value in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and expands additional disclosures about fair value measurements. SFAS 157 clarifies that fair value is the amount that would be exchanged to sell an asset or transfer a liability, in an orderly transaction between market participants. SFAS 157 nullifies the consensus reached in EITF Issue No. 02-3 prohibiting the recognition of day one gain or loss on derivative contracts (and hybrid instruments measured at fair value under SFAS 133 as modified by SFAS 155) where the Company cannot verify all of the significant model inputs to observable market data and verify the model to market transactions. However, SFAS 157 requires that a fair value measurement technique include an adjustment for risks inherent in a particular valuation technique (such as a pricing model) and/or the risks inherent in the inputs to the model if market participants would also include such an adjustment. SFAS 157 will require the Company to consider the effect of its own credit standing in determining the fair value of its liabilities. In addition, SFAS 157 prohibits the recognition of "block discounts" for large holdings of unrestricted financial instruments where quoted prices are readily and regularly available in an active market. The requirements of SFAS 157 are to be applied prospectively, except for changes in fair value measurements that result from the initial application of SFAS 157 to existing derivative financial instruments measured under EITF Issue No. 02-3, existing hybrid instruments measured at fair value, and block discounts, which are to be recorded as an adjustment to opening retained earnings in the year of adoption. The Company expects to adopt SFAS 157 on January 1, 2008. The Company is currently evaluating the impact of SFAS 157.
In September 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 158, "Employers' Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plansan amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106 and 132(R)" ("SFAS 158"). SFAS 158 requires the Company to (a) recognize in its statement of financial position an asset for a plan's overfunded status or a liability for a plan's underfunded status, (b) measure a plan's assets and its obligations that determine its funded status as of the end of the fiscal year, (c) recognize changes in the funded status of a defined postretirement plan in the year in which the changes occur (reported in comprehensive income) and (d) provide additional disclosure. The requirement to recognize the funded status of a benefit plan and the disclosure requirements are effective as of the end of the fiscal year ending after December 15, 2006. The requirement to measure the plan assets and benefit obligations as of the date of the employer's fiscal year-end statement of financial position is effective for fiscal years ending after December 15, 2008. On December 31, 2006, the Company adopted the recognition and disclosure provisions of SFAS 158. The effect of adopting SFAS 158 on the Company's consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2006 has been included in the accompanying financial statements. The adoption of SFAS 158 resulted in a charge to equity of $264 million. See "Employee Benefit Plans" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion of the effect of adopting SFAS 158.
In 2007, the Company adopted FASB Interpretation No. 48, "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes." The Interpretation clarifies the accounting for uncertain tax positions in accordance with SFAS No. 109, "Accounting for Income Taxes." The Interpretation requires that a tax position meet a "more-likely-than-not threshold" for the benefit of the uncertain tax position to be recognized in the financial statements. A tax position that fails to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold will result in either reduction of current or deferred tax assets, and/or recording of current or deferred tax liabilities. The impact of adoption in 2007 is expected to be a charge to equity of approximately $25 million.
 
In February 2007, the FASB issued SFAS No. 159 ("SFAS 159"), "The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities." SFAS 159 provides companies with an option to report selected financial assets and liabilities at fair value and to provide additional information that will help investors and other users of financial statements to understand more easily the effect on earnings of the company's choice to use fair value. It also requires companies to display the fair value of those assets and liabilities for which the company has chosen to use fair value on the face of the balance sheet. The Company expects to adopt SFAS 159 along with SFAS 157 on January 1, 2008 and is currently evaluating the impact of SFAS 159.
Certain other prior year information has been reclassified to conform its presentation to the 2006 financial statements.
3. Acquisitions and Dispositions
The Company continues to be an active acquirer of securities servicing and asset management businesses. The Company frequently structures its acquisitions with both an initial payment and a later contingent payment tied to post-closing revenue or income growth. The Company records the fair value of contingent payments as an additional cost of the entity acquired in the period that the payment becomes probable.
At December 31, 2006, the Company was liable for potential contingent payments related to acquisitions in the amount of $158 million. During 2006, the Company paid or accrued $35 million for contingent payments related to acquisitions made in prior years, and $154 million of potential contingent payments lapsed.
2006
During 2006, five businesses were acquired for a total cost of $2,557 million. Potential contingent payments related to 2006 acquisitions are $145 million. Goodwill and the tax-deductible portion of goodwill related to 2006 acquisitions transactions was $1,946 million and $1,641 million, respectively. Other than the Acquired Corporate Trust Business, the pro forma effect of the 2006 acquisitions is not material to the 2006 results. See below for a discussion of the impact of the purchase of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business and the sale of the Retail Business.
On January 3, 2006, the Company acquired Alcentra Group Limited ("Alcentra"), an international asset management group focused on managing funds that invest in non-investment grade debt and other structured credit products. Alcentra's management team retained a 20 percent interest. Alcentra has operations in London and Los Angeles and at acquisition managed 15 different investment funds with over $6.2 billion of assets.
On March 2, 2006, the Company acquired Urdang Capital Management, Inc. ("Urdang"), a real estate investment management firm that at acquisition managed approximately $3.0 billion in direct investments and portfolios of REIT securities.
On June 12, 2006, the Company acquired the bond administration business of TD Banknorth, N.A. The TD Banknorth portfolio includes bond trustee, paying/fiscal agent, master trustee, transfer agent and registrar appointments. The transaction involved the purchase of approximately 350 bond trusteeships and agency appointments, representing $5.2 billion of principal debt outstanding for an estimated 230 clients.
On October 1, 2006, the Company sold its Retail Business to JPMorgan Chase for the net asset value plus a premium of $2.3 billion. JPMorgan Chase sold its corporate trust business to the Company for the net asset value plus a premium of $2.15 billion. The difference between premiums resulted in a net cash payment of $150 million to the Company. There is also a contingent payment of up to $50 million to the Company tied to customer retention. For further details, see "Discontinued Operations" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
JPMorgan Chase's corporate trust business comprised issues representing $5 trillion in total debt outstanding. It had 2,400 employees in more than 40 locations globally. Prior to the acquisition, the Company's corporate trust business comprised issues representing $3 trillion in total debt outstanding and had 1,300 employees in 25 locations globally.
The Company's retail bank consisted of 338 branches in the tri-state region, serving approximately 700,000 consumer households and small businesses with $13 billion in deposits and $9 billion in assets at September 30, 2006. The Company's regional middle market businesses provided financing, banking and treasury services for middle market clients, serving more than 2,000 clients in the tri-state region. Together, the units had 4,000 employees located in New York, New Jersey, Connecticut and Delaware.
The transaction further increases the Company's focus on the securities services and wealth management businesses that have fueled the Company's growth in recent years and that are at the core of its long-term business strategy.
The Company recorded an after-tax gain of $1,381 million on the sale of the Retail Business. The Company also expects to incur after-tax charges of $150 million related to the acquisition. The transaction is expected to be dilutive to GAAP earnings per share through 2009 (4.5 percent in 2007 to 1.5 percent in 2009), but to be accretive to cash earnings per share in 2009 when cost savings are fully phased in.
On a pro forma basis, if the acquisition of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business had occurred on January 1, 2005, the transaction would have had the following impact:
 
The pro forma results are based on adding the pre-tax historical results of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business to the Company's results and adjusting for amortization of intangibles created in the transaction and taxes. The pro forma data does not include adjustments to reflect the Company's operating costs or expected differences in the way funds generated by the Acquired Corporate Trust Business are invested. The pro forma data is intended for informational purposes and is not indicative of the future results of operations.
The Company's transaction with JPMorgan Chase altered the composition of the balance sheet. When the Acquired Corporate Trust Business is fully integrated in 2007, approximately $14 billion of U.S. dollar retail deposits will have been replaced with between $11 billion and $14 billion of institutional corporate trust deposits. Between $7 billion and $10 billion of deposits related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business have not yet transitioned to the Company. These deposits will transition to the Company as regulatory approval is received to operate in certain foreign locations and as the novation process proceeds in other foreign locations. The Company expects the transition will be substantially complete by June 30, 2007. Until the transition is complete, JPMorgan Chase will pay the Company for the net economic value of these deposits. In the fourth quarter of 2006, the Company recorded $23 million of net economic value payments in noninterest income. On the asset side of the balance sheet, approximately $8 billion of retail and middle market loans included in the sale of the Retail Business have been replaced with liquid assets and securities. Goodwill and intangibles related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business were approximately $2.3 billion.
On October 2, 2006, the Company completed the transaction resulting in the formation of BNY ConvergEx Group. BNY ConvergEx Group brought together BNY Securities Group's trade execution, commission management,
 
independent research and transition management business with Eze Castle Software, a leading provider of trade order management and related investment technologies. This transaction enabled the Company to achieve several objectives including repositioning its execution services business for faster growth and enhancing the product offering for the Company's client base, while allowing the Company to withdraw capital committed to the business.
BNY ConvergEx Group is a leading global agency brokerage and technology company offering a complete spectrum of pre-trade, trade, and post-trade solutions for traditional money managers, hedge funds, broker-dealers, corporations and plan sponsors. BNY ConvergEx Group has a global presence in New York, Boston, San Francisco, Chicago, Dallas, Stamford, London, Bermuda, Tokyo, Hong Kong, and Sydney.
The Company and GTCR Golder Rauner, LLC each hold a 35 percent stake in BNY ConvergEx Group, with the balance held by Eze Castle Software's investors and BNY ConvergEx Group's management team. BNY ConvergEx Group, with pro forma 2005 revenues of approximately $340 million, is an affiliate of The Bank of New York and is reflected on the Company's financial statements as an equity investment. After the use of the proceeds to repurchase shares, the transaction is expected to be neutral to earnings per share.
The BNY Securities Group businesses included in BNY ConvergEx Group are BNY Brokerage, Lynch, Jones & Ryan, G-Port, Westminster Research and BNY Jaywalk. In addition, The Bank of New York's B-Trade and G-Trade businesses are expected to become part of BNY ConvergEx Group in 2008, although in the interim they will continue to be owned by The Bank of New York.
On December 1, 2006, the Company sold its transfer agency software business, Rufus, to Bravura Solutions Limited ("Bravura"), a leading global supplier of wealth management applications and professional services, for approximately $38 million. Under the agreement, Bravura acquired all of the software and intellectual property comprising Rufus, and all existing employees will transfer to Bravura.
On December 3, 2006, the Company and Mellon entered into a definitive agreement to merge, creating the world's largest securities servicing and asset management firm. The new company, which will be called The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will be the world's leading asset servicer with assets under custody expected to exceed $17 trillion and the world's leading corporate trustee with assets under trusteeship expected to exceed $8 trillion. It will rank among the top 10 global asset managers with assets under management expected to exceed $1.1 trillion.
The combined company is expected to have annual revenues of more than $12 billion, with approximately 28% derived from asset servicing, 38% from issuer services, clearing services and treasury services, and 29% from asset management and private wealth management. It will be well positioned to capitalize on global growth trends, including the evolution of emerging markets, the growth of hedge funds and alternative asset classes, the increasing need for more complex financial products and services, and the increasingly global need for people to save and invest for retirement. Almost a quarter of combined revenue will be derived internationally.
Under the terms of the agreement, the Company's shareholders will receive 0.9434 shares in the new company for each share of the Company that they own and Mellon shareholders will receive one share in the new company for each Mellon share they own.
To induce Mellon to enter into the merger agreement, the Company granted Mellon an option to purchase up to 149,621,546 shares of the Company's common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $35.48 and the closing sale price of the Company's common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may Mellon acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of the Company's common stock under this stock option agreement. Mellon cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving the Company and a third party.
 
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire the Company prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, the Company may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of the Company's common stock purchased by Mellon under the option at a predetermined price, or Mellon may choose to surrender the option to the Company for a cash payment of $1.15 billion. In no event will the total profit received by Mellon with respect to this option exceed $1.3 billion.
To induce the Company to enter into the merger agreement, Mellon granted the Company an option to purchase up to 82,641,656 shares of Mellon common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $40.05 and the closing sale price of Mellon common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may the Company acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of Mellon common stock under this stock option agreement. The Company cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving Mellon and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire Mellon prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, Mellon may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of Mellon common stock purchased by the Company under the option at a predetermined price, or the Company may choose to surrender the option to Mellon for a cash payment of $725 million. In no event will the total profit received by the Company with respect to this option exceed $825 million.
On December 19, 2006, the Company acquired the remaining 50% stake in AIB/BNY Securities Services (Ireland) Ltd. (AIB/BNY) that it did not own from Allied Irish Banks, p.l.c. ("AIB"). AIB/BNY was established in 1995 as a joint venture between AIB and the Company to provide a range of services for a number of fund structures domiciled in Ireland. At acquisition, AIB/BNY had $210 billion of assets under administration and employed 600 staff between its Dublin and Cork offices.
2005
During 2005, four businesses were acquired for a total cost of $188 million. Potential contingent payments related to 2005 acquisitions were $8 million. Goodwill and the tax-deductible portion of goodwill related to 2005 acquisitions transactions was $124 million. All of the goodwill was assigned to the Company's Institutional Services segment.
In January 2005, the Company acquired certain of the assets and liabilities of Standard & Poor's Securities, Inc., the institutional brokerage subsidiary of Standard & Poor's. In March 2005, the Company acquired the execution and commission management services of Boston Institutional Services.
In July 2005, the Company acquired Lynch, Jones & Ryan, Inc., a provider of commission recapture programs. Also in July 2005, the Company acquired the bond administration business of Marshall & Ilsley Trust Company N.A., and Marshall & Ilsley Bank, where they act as bond trustee, paying/fiscal agent, master trustee, transfer agent and/or registrar.
In June 2005, the Company and Trust Company of Australia Ltd. formed a joint venture to provide securitization trustee and other agency-related services to Australian-based issuers of debt. In July 2005, The Bank of New York and BHF-BANK established BHF BNY Securities Services GmbH as a jointly held subsidiary to market Global Custody (Depotbank) services for German investment companies, and securities custody and settlement services for the national and international direct investments of institutional investors.
In August 2005, the Company and Nordea, the leading financial services provider in the Nordic region, entered into a strategic agreement to provide global custody and selected related services to Nordea's
 
institutional clients in the Nordic and Baltic Sea regions. Also in August 2005, the Company announced a strategic arrangement with IL&FS Trust Company Limited, a leading provider of trust and fiduciary services in India, to provide Indian issuers with access to the Company's global network, a comprehensive array of services to the international capital markets, and leading-edge technology capabilities.
In October 2005, the Company announced a marketing alliance with National Australia Bank ("National"), which enable the Company to offer commission recapture services to National's custody clients in Australia and New Zealand.
2004
During 2004, nine businesses were acquired for a total cost of approximately $68 million, primarily paid in cash. Potential contingent payments related to 2004 acquisitions were $66 million. Goodwill related to 2004 acquisition transactions was $46 million. The tax-deductible portion of goodwill was $46 million. All of the goodwill was assigned to the Company's Institutional Services segment.
In February 2004, the Company signed an agreement with Thomson Institutional Services Inc., a unit of Thomason Financial, to transfer its commission services client base to the Company. In March 2004, the Company acquired software and other assets of Sonic Financial Technologies LLC, a leading provider of direct access electronic trading solutions.
In May 2004, the Company made a strategic investment in London-based Netik, LLC. Late in the second quarter of 2004, the Company acquired a unit investment trust business that services approximately $20 billion in assets for over 4,200 different series of unit investment trusts.
In July 2004, the Company reached an agreement with National Australia Bank, following their strategic decision to close the National Custodian Services UK operation, to transfer its clients to the Company. In October 2004, the Company acquired Osprey Partners LLC's portfolio accounting technology to broaden its managed account services offering. In November 2004, the Company acquired the execution and commission management assets of Wilshire Associates. In December 2004, the Company acquired Continental Fund Services, a Luxembourg PSF (Professional of the Financial Sector).
4. Discontinued Operations
On October 1, 2006, the Company acquired JPMorgan Chase's corporate trust business and JPMorgan Chase acquired the Company's Retail Business. The Company adopted discontinued operations accounting for its Retail Business. Also included in the sales agreement are provisions related to transitional services that will be provided for a period of up to 8 months after closing, subject to extensions. The results from continuing operations exclude the results of the Company's Retail Business and include the operations of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business only after October 1, 2006.
Results for all the Retail Business are reported separately as discontinued operations for all periods presented. The assets and liabilities of the businesses sold are included in assets of discontinued operations held for sale and liabilities of discontinued operations held for sale on the consolidated balance sheet. Net interest income has been computed by allocating investment securities and federal funds sold and related interest income to discontinued operations to match the amount and duration of the assets sold with the amount and duration of the liabilities sold.
 
Summarized financial information for discontinued operations related to the Retail Business is as follows:
 
The following is a summary of the assets and liabilities of discontinued operations held for sale as of December 31, 2006 and 2005:
 
5. Goodwill and Intangibles
Goodwill by reporting segment for the years ended December 31, 2006 and 2005 is as follows:
 
 
The changes in goodwill during 2006 were as follows:
 
The table above does not include goodwill of $109 million that was related to the discontinued operations of the Retail Business.
The Company's business segments are tested annually for goodwill impairment. No impairment loss was recorded in 2006 and 2005.
Intangible Assets
 
The aggregate amortization expense of intangibles was $76 million, $40 million and $34 million for 2006, 2005, and 2004. Estimated amortization expense for the next five years is as follows:
 
 
6. Securities
The following table sets forth the amortized cost and the fair values of securities at the end of the last two years:
 
At December 31, 2006, almost all of the unrealized losses are attributable to changes in interest rates on investment grade securities. The portion of unrealized losses that are not attributable to interest rates is expected to be recovered. The Company has the ability and intent to hold these securities until their value recovers. The Company believes that all of its unrealized losses are temporary in nature.
 
The following tables show the aggregate related fair value of investments with a continuous unrealized loss position for less than 12 months and those that have been in a continuous unrealized loss position for greater than twelve months.
December 31, 2006
 
 
December 31, 2005
 
The amortized cost and fair values of securities at December 31, 2006, by contractual maturity, are as follows:
 
Realized gross gains on the sale of securities available-for-sale were $24 million in 2006 and $26 million in 2005. There were $98 million of realized gross losses in 2006 and $5 million of realized gross losses in 2005.
At December 31, 2006, assets amounting to $17.1 billion were pledged primarily for potential borrowing at the Federal Reserve Discount Window. The significant components of pledged assets were as follows: $13.1
 
billion were securities and $4.0 billion were loans. Included in these pledged assets was securities available-for-sale of $981 million which were pledged as collateral for actual borrowings. The lenders in these borrowings have the right to repledge or sell these securities. The Company obtains securities under resale, securities borrowed and custody agreements on terms which permit it to repledge or resell the securities to others. As of December 31, 2006, the market value of the securities received that can be sold or repledged was $12.9 billion. The Company routinely repledges or lends these securities to third parties. As of December 31, 2006, the market value of collateral repledged and sold was $198 million.
7. Loans
The Company's loan distribution and industry concentrations of credit risk at December 31, 2006 and 2005 are incorporated by reference from "Loans" in the MD&A section of this report.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its banking subsidiaries have made loans at prevailing interest rates and terms to directors and executive officers of the Company and to entities in which certain Company directors have an ownership interest or direct or indirect subsidiaries of such entities. The aggregate dollar amount of these loans was $211 million, $244 million, and $229 million at December 31, 2006, 2005, and 2004, respectively. These loans are primarily extensions of credit under revolving lines of credit established for such entities.
The composition of the Company's loan portfolio at December 31 is shown in the following table:
 
Transactions in the allowance for credit losses, which represents the allowance for loan losses plus the allowance for lending-related commitments are summarized as follows:
 
 
 
The table below sets forth information about the Company's nonperforming assets and impaired loans at December 31:
 
 
Lost Interest
 
At December 31, 2006, commitments to borrowers whose loans were classified as nonaccrual or reduced rate were not material. The Company uses the discounted cash flow method as its primary method for valuing its impaired loans.
8. Other Assets
 
9. Long-Term Debt
The following is a summary of the contractual maturity of long-term debt at December 31, 2006 and totals for 2005:
 
 
The Company has $700 million of debt maturing in 2007. At December 31, 2006, subordinated debt aggregating $1,144 million was redeemable at the option of the Company as follows: $341 million in 2007; $284 million in 2008; and $519 million after 2008. The Company has $250 million of subordinated debt that is fixed at 4.25% until 2007 when it becomes variable. The Company has the option to call this debt at that time. The Company has $400 million of subordinated debt that is fixed at 3.40% until 2008 when it becomes variable. The Company has the option to call this debt at that time.
 
Exposure to interest rate movements is reduced by interest rate swap agreements. As a result of these agreements, the effective interest rates differ from those stated.
Wholly owned subsidiaries of the Company (the "Trusts") have issued cumulative Company-Obligated Mandatory Redeemable Trust Preferred Securities of Subsidiary Trust Holding Solely Junior Subordinated Debentures ("Preferred Trust Securities"). The sole assets of each trust are junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures of the Company, whose maturities and interest rates match the Preferred Trust Securities. The Company's obligations under the agreements that relate to the Preferred Trust Securities, the Trusts and the debentures constitute a full and unconditional guarantee by the Company of the Trusts' obligations under the Preferred Trust Securities.
The following table sets forth a summary of the Junior Subordinated Debt issued by the Company as of December 31, 2006:
Preferred Trust Securities
 
The Company has the option to shorten the maturity of BNY Capital IV to 2013 or extend the maturity to 2047. All of the preferred trust securities have been swapped to floating rate.
 
10. Securitizations
The Company provides services to two QSPEs as of December 31, 2006.
Money Fund Securitization
In 2000, the Company purchased BNY Hamilton Money Fund shares with a market value of $400 million. The Company then sold the right to receive the principal value of the shares in 2021 in a securitization transaction and retained the rights to receive on-going dividends from the shares. The Company did not recognize a gain on the sale. The purpose of this securitization is to achieve a favorable after-tax risk-adjusted investment return. The Company sponsors the BNY Hamilton Money Fund and receives an administrative fee for servicing the fund. The Company hedged a portion of the interest rate risk of the transaction by entering into a $200 million interest rate swap with a third party. The retained interest is recorded in available-for-sale securities in the consolidated balance sheet.
Municipal Bond Securitizations
The Company also sponsored $43 million of municipal bond securitizations for which no gain was recognized. The municipal bonds that were transferred were weekly variable rate demand bonds that are designed to trade at par. Therefore, the book value of the bonds was equal to par and they were sold at par, resulting in no gain or loss on sale. All of the bonds in the program are credit enhanced by a third party letter of credit provider rated at least A3/BBB. The Company provides additional liquidity and credit enhancement through total rate of return swaps, letters of credit, and/or, standby bond purchase agreements. The program's purpose is to achieve a favorable after-tax risk-adjusted investment return.
Asset-Backed Commercial Paper Securitization
Since 2000, the Company sells and distributes securities for an asset-backed commercial paper securitization program. The Company services the program and receives a market-based fee of approximately five basis points that is just adequate to compensate the Company for its servicing responsibilities. As a result, there is no servicing asset or liability. At December 31, 2006, there were no assets in the program.
In 2007, the Company restructured the program to be a variable interest entity. A third party holds the first loss position, which is designed to absorb the majority of any expected losses. The Company provides additional liquidity and credit enhancement to the commercial paper securitization program through total rate of return swaps and a subordinated loan. The swaps are constructed to mature as the commercial paper matures. To the extent there is a liquidity issue impacting the paying ability of the underlying assets or if the underlying assets undergo a credit default, the swaps ensure the timely payments to the beneficial interest holders.
The authorized size of the program is $5 billion. The purpose of the securitization is to hold highly rated asset-backed securities and secured corporate obligations in a capital efficient manner.
Impact of Programs
The impact of these securitizations on the Company's fully diluted earnings per share is less than 1 cent. Furthermore, if these transactions were consolidated on the balance sheet, there would have been virtually no impact on the Company's liquidity, and the Tier 1 and Total Capital ratios at December 31, 2006 would have been two basis points lower.
 
11. Shareholders' Equity
The Company has 5 million authorized shares of Class A convertible preferred stock having a par value of $2.00 per share. At December 31, 2006 and 2005, 3,000 shares were outstanding. On January 22, 2007, the Company redeemed 300 shares of Class A convertible preferred stock at a per share redemption price of $25 plus accrued dividends of $11.03. The remaining 2,700 shares were converted into Company common stock with shareholders receiving 7.39644 shares of Company common stock for each share of Class A convertible preferred stock.
In addition to the Class A preferred stock, the Company has 5 million authorized shares of preferred stock having no par value, with no shares outstanding at December 31, 2006 and 2005, respectively.
In February 2005, the Company's Board of Directors voted unanimously to terminate the Company's Rights Plan and to impose conditions on its ability to adopt a shareholder rights plan in the future.
Each share of the Company's common stock represented one right under the Rights Plan. On March 25, 2005, the Company paid 5 cents per right to redeem them.
The Company has reserved the right of its Board, by a majority vote of its independent directors in their exercise of their fiduciary duties, to determine in light of the circumstances then existing if it would be in the best interest of the Company and its shareholders to adopt a new shareholder rights plan without prior shareholder approval. If a shareholder rights plan is adopted by the Board without prior shareholder approval, the plan must provide that it will expire within 12 months from its effective date unless ratified by the Company's shareholders.
At December 31, 2006, the Company had reserved for issuance approximately 72 million common shares pursuant to the terms of employee benefit plans.
In October 2006, the Company repurchased 10 million shares of common stock at an initial price of $35.33 from a broker-dealer counterparty who borrowed the shares, as part of an accelerated share repurchase program. The initial price is subject to a purchase price adjustment based on the price the counterparty actually pays for the shares. The program matures in October 2007 when the Company expects to issue shares to settle the purchase price adjustment. Based on the Company's stock price at December 31, 2006, the Company's obligation under the purchase price adjustment was approximately 1 million shares.
 
Basic and diluted earnings per share are calculated as follows:
 
12. Stock Option Plans
The Company's stock option plans ("the Option Plans") provide for the issuance of stock options at fair market value at the date of grant to officers and employees of the Company and its subsidiaries. At December 31, 2006, under the Option Plans, the Company may issue 26,580,929 new options. In addition, the Company may reissue any options cancelled under its 1999 and 2003 Long-Term Incentive Plans. Generally, each option granted under the Option Plans is exercisable between one and ten years from the date of grant.
The compensation cost that has been charged against income was $46 million, $49 million, and $39 million for 2006, 2005, and 2004, respectively. The total income tax benefit recognized in the income statement was $19 million, $20 million, and $16 million for 2006, 2005, and 2004, respectively.
In 2006 and 2005, the Company used a lattice-based binomial method to calculate the fair value on the date of grant. In 2004 the Company used a Black-Scholes model. The fair value of each option award is estimated on the date of grant using the following weighted-average assumptions noted in the following table.
 
For 2006 and 2005 assumptions were determined as follows:
 
 
 
 
A summary of the status of the Company's Option Plans as of December 31, 2006, 2005, and 2004, and changes during the years ended on those dates is presented below:
 
The following table summarizes information about stock options outstanding at December 31, 2006:
 
The total intrinsic value of options exercised during the years ended December 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004 was $100 million, $31 million, and $27 million.
As of December 31, 2006, there was $41 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to nonvested shares granted under the Option Plans. The unrecognized compensation cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.8 years.
 
Cash received from option exercise under the option plans for the years ended December 31, 2006, 2005, and 2004, was $217 million, $61 million, and $45 million, respectively. The actual tax benefit realized for the tax deductions from options exercised totaled $41 million, $11 million, and $9 million, respectively, for the years ended December 31, 2006, 2005, and 2004.
13. Income Taxes
Income taxes included in the consolidated statements of income consist of the following:
 
The components of income before taxes are as follows:
 
The Company's net deferred tax liability (included in accrued taxes and other expenses) at December 31 consisted of the following:
 
The Company has recorded foreign tax credit carryovers of $225 million, a portion of which will begin to expire in 2012, and general business credit carryovers of $59 million which begin to expire in 2023. The Company has federal net operating loss carryovers of $923 million (for which it has recorded a $323 million tax benefit) related to a separate filing of a group of certain leasing subsidiaries which begin to expire in 2023. The Company has not recorded a valuation allowance because it expects to realize its deferred tax assets including these carryovers.
 
As of December 31, 2006, the Company had approximately $223 million of earnings attributable to foreign subsidiaries that have been permanently reinvested abroad and for which no provision has been recorded for income tax that would occur if repatriated. The related unrecognized deferred tax liability is approximately $34 million.
The statutory federal income tax rate is reconciled to the Company's effective income tax rate below:
 
The Company's consolidated income tax returns are closed to examination through 1995. Although the Internal Revenue Services ("IRS") has completed its examination for 1996 and 1997, at this time a formal revenue agent's report has not been received. The IRS is currently examining the Company's consolidated federal income tax return for tax years 1998 through 2002. New York State and New York City return examinations have been completed through 1993. New York State and New York City are currently examining the Company's tax returns for the years 1994 through 1996.
14. Employee Benefit Plans
The Company has defined benefit and defined contribution retirement plans covering substantially all full-time and eligible part-time employees and other postretirement benefit plans providing healthcare benefits for certain retired employees.
Adoption of SFAS 158
On December 31, 2006, the Company adopted the recognition and disclosure provisions of SFAS 158. This statement required the Company to recognize the funded status of its defined benefit pension and healthcare plans in the December 31, 2006 balance sheet, with a corresponding adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income, net of tax. The adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income at adoption represents the net unrecognized actuarial losses, unrecognized prior service costs, and unrecognized transition obligation remaining from the initial adoption of SFAS No. 87 ("SFAS 87"), "Employers' Accounting for Pensions," and SFAS No. 106 ("SFAS 106"), "Employers' Accounting for Postretirement Benefits Other Than Pensions," all of which were previously netted against the plan's funded status in the Company's consolidated balance sheet pursuant to the provisions of SFAS 87 and SFAS 106. These amounts will be subsequently recognized as net periodic pension cost pursuant to the Company's historical accounting policy for amortizing such amounts. Further, actuarial gains and losses that arise in subsequent periods and are not recognized as net periodic pension cost in the same periods will be recognized as a component of other comprehensive income. Those amounts will be subsequently recognized as a component of net periodic pension cost on the same basis as the amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income at adoption of SFAS 158.
 
The following table illustrates the incremental effect of adopting the provisions of SFAS 158 on the Company's consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2006. The adoption of SFAS 158 had no impact on the Company's consolidated statement of income for the year ended December 31, 2006, or for any prior period presented, and it will not affect the Company's operating results in future periods. Had the Company not been required to adopt SFAS 158 at December 31, 2006, it would have recognized an additional minimum liability pursuant to the provisions of SFAS 87. The effect of recognizing the additional minimum liability is included in table below in the column labeled "Prior to Adoption of SFAS 158."
 
Included in accumulated other comprehensive income at December 31, 2006 are the following amounts that have not yet recognized in net periodic cost: unrecognized transition asset of $25 million ($15 million net of tax), unrecognized prior service credits of $84 million ($49 million net of tax), and unrecognized actuarial losses of $496 million ($291 million net of tax). The transition obligation, prior service credit, and actuarial loss included in accumulated other comprehensive income and expected to be recognized in net periodic pension cost during the year-ended December 31, 2007 is $4 million ($2 million net of tax), $10 million ($6 million net of tax), and $38 million ($22 million net of tax), respectively.
For 2006 and 2005, the Company used September 30 as the measurement date for plan assets and obligations. For 2008 pension expense, the Company will change the measurement date to December 31, 2007.
 
Defined Benefit Plans
The following table provides a reconciliation of the changes in the benefit obligation, fair value of plan assets, and funded status for September 30, 2006 and 2005:
 
Unrecognized actuarial gains and losses are amortized over the future service period (11 years) of active employees if they exceed a threshold amount. The Company currently has unrecognized losses, which are being amortized.
Amounts recognized in the Company's consolidated balance sheet at September 30, 2006 and 2005 consist of:
 
 
The accumulated benefit obligation for all defined benefit plans was $1,048 million at September 30, 2006 and $1,080 million at September 30, 2005.
The following table contains information for pension plans with an accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets at December 31:
 
Net Periodic Benefit Cost
Net periodic benefit cost included the following components:
 
Plan Assumptions
 
The Company's expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is based on anticipated returns for each asset class. Anticipated returns are weighted for the target allocation for each asset class. Anticipated returns are based on forecasts for prospective returns in the equity and fixed income markets, which should track the long-term historical returns for these markets. The Company also considers the growth outlook for U.S. and global economies, as well as current and prospective interest rates.
For additional information on pension assumptions see "Critical Accounting Policies" in the MD&A section.
 
Assumed Healthcare Cost Trend
Domestic Healthcare Benefits
The assumed healthcare cost trend rate used in determining benefit expense for 2006 is 9.7% decreasing to 5.0% in 2013. This projection is based on various economic models that forecast a decreasing growth rate of healthcare expenses over time. The underlying assumption is that healthcare expense growth cannot outpace gross national product ("GNP") growth indefinitely, and over time a lower equilibrium growth rate will be achieved. Further, the growth rate assumed in 2013 bears a reasonable relationship to the discount rate.
An increase in the healthcare cost trend rate of one percentage point for each year would increase the postretirement benefit obligation by $14.6 million, or 8.3%, and the sum of the service and interest costs by $0.9 million, or 8.4%. Conversely, a decrease in this rate of one percentage point for each year would decrease the benefit obligation by $12.6 million, or 7.2%, and the sum of the service and interest costs by $0.8 million, or 7.2%.
Foreign Healthcare Benefits
An increase in the healthcare cost trend rate of one percentage point for each year would increase the postretirement benefit obligation by $2.1 million, or 24%, and the sum of the service and interest costs by $0.2 million, or 26%. Conversely, a decrease in this rate of one percentage point for each year would decrease the benefit obligation by $1.7 million, or 18%, and the sum of the service and interest costs by $0.2 million, or 20%.
Investment Strategy and Asset Allocation
The Company's investment objective for its U.S. and foreign plans is to maximize total return while maintaining a broadly diversified plan. Equities are the main holding including the Company's common stock as well as private equities. The Company has committed to fund additional private equities, which, when the commitments are drawn upon, will bring the Company's actual allocation for private equities closer to its target of 8%. Alternative investments and fixed income securities provide diversification and lower the volatility of returns.
The Company's pension assets were invested as follows at September 30:
 
Included in the domestic plan assets above were 4.2 million shares of the Company's common stock with a fair value of $150 million and $125 million on September 30, 2006 and 2005, respectively, representing 11% of 2006 plan assets and 9% of 2005 plan assets. In October 2006, the Company purchased 2.1 million shares of its common stock from its main domestic pension plan. The remaining 2.1 million shares had a fair value of $84 million as of December 31, 2006. Assets of the U.S. postretirement healthcare plan are invested in an insurance contract.
 
Expected Contributions for the Fiscal Year Ending December 31, 2007
The Company estimates that the contributions it will make in 2007 to fund its pension plans will be $5.5 million for the domestic plans and $6.3 million for the foreign plans.
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
The following table shows the expected future benefit payments for the next 10 years:
 
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company has an Employee Stock Ownership Plan ("ESOP") covering certain domestic full-time employees with more than one year of service. The ESOP works in conjunction with the Company's defined benefit pension plan. Employees are entitled to the higher of their benefit under the ESOP or the defined benefit pension plan. If the benefit under the pension plan is higher, the employee's share of the ESOP is contributed to the pension plan. Contributions are made equal to required principal and interest payments on borrowings by the ESOP. At September 30, 2006 and 2005, the ESOP owned 10.5 million and 10.9 million shares of the Company's stock, respectively. The fair value of total ESOP assets were $375 million and $326 million at September 30, 2006 and 2005. Contributions were approximately $3.3 million in 2006, $2.1 million in 2005 and $0.2 million in 2004. ESOP related expense was $3 million, $2 million and $3 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004.
The Company has defined contribution plans, excluding the ESOP, for which it recognized a cost of $62 million in 2006, $58 million in 2005, and $60 million in 2004.
15. Company Financial Information
The Bank of New York, the Company's primary banking subsidiary, and its other U.S. bank subsidiaries are subject to dividend limitations under the Federal Reserve Act and state banking laws. Under these statutes, prior regulatory approval is required for dividends in any year that would exceed the Bank's net profits for such year combined with retained net profits for the prior two years. The Bank is also prohibited from paying a dividend in excess of undivided profits.
Under the first and more significant of these limitations, the Bank could declare dividends of approximately $791 million in 2007 plus net profits earned in the remainder of 2007.
The Federal Reserve Board can also prohibit a dividend if payment would constitute an unsafe or unsound banking practice. The Federal Reserve Board generally considers that a bank's dividends should not exceed earnings from continuing operations.
The Company's capital ratios and discussion of related regulatory requirements are incorporated by reference from "Capital Resources" in the MD&A section.
 
The Federal Reserve Act limits and requires collateral for extensions of credit by the Company's insured subsidiary banks to the Company and certain of its non-bank affiliates. Also, there are restrictions on the amounts of investments by such banks in stock and other securities of the Company and such affiliates, and restrictions on the acceptance of their securities as collateral for loans by such banks. Extensions of credit by the banks to each of the Company and such affiliates are limited to 10% of such bank's regulatory capital, and in the aggregate for the Company and all such affiliates to 20%, and collateral must be between 100% and 130% of the amount of the credit, depending on the type of collateral.
The insured subsidiary banks of the Company are required to maintain reserve balances with Federal Reserve Banks under the Federal Reserve Act and Regulation D. Required balances averaged $112 million and $119 million for the years 2006 and 2005.
In addition, under the National Bank Act, if the capital stock of a national bank, such as The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., is impaired by losses or otherwise, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (the "OCC"), a bureau of the U.S. Department of the Treasury, is authorized to require payment of the deficiency by assessment upon the bank's shareholders, pro rata, and to the extent necessary, if any such assessment is not paid by any shareholder after three months notice, to sell the stock of such shareholder to make good the deficiency.
The Parent company's condensed financial statements are as follows:
Balance Sheets
 
 
Statements of Income
 
 
Statements of Cash Flows
 
 
16. Other Noninterest Income and Expense
In 2006, other noninterest income included a pre-tax gain of $35 million related to the conversion of the Company's New York Stock Exchange seats into cash and shares of NYSE Group, Inc. common stock, some of which were sold. In 2006, other noninterest expense included a $22 million transition services expense related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business. In 2005, other noninterest income included a $17 million gain on the sale of Company's interest in Financial Models Companies, Inc. In 2004, other noninterest income included a pre-tax gain of $48 million from the sale of a portion of the Company's investment in Wing Hang.
Other noninterest income includes equity in earnings of unconsolidated subsidiaries of $50 million, $44 million, and $43 million in 2006, 2005, and 2004.
17. Fair Value of Financial Instruments
The carrying amounts of the Company's financial instruments (i.e., monetary assets and liabilities) are determined under different accounting methodssee "Summary of Significant Accounting and Reporting Policies" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements. The following disclosure discusses these instruments on a uniform fair value basis. However, active markets do not exist for a significant portion of these instruments, principally loans and commitments. As a result, fair value determinations require significant subjective judgments regarding future cash flows. Other judgments would result in different fair values. Among the assumptions used by the Company are discount rates ranging principally from 5% to 8% at December 31, 2006 and 4% to 7% at December 31, 2005. The fair value information supplements the basic financial statements and other traditional financial data presented throughout this report.
A summary of the practices used for determining fair value is as follows.
Interestbearing Deposits in Banks
The fair value of interestbearing deposits in banks is based on discounted cash flows.
Securities, Trading Activities, and Derivatives Used for ALM
The fair value of securities and trading assets and liabilities is based on quoted market prices, dealer quotes, or pricing models. Fair value amounts for derivative instruments, such as options, futures and forward rate contracts, commitments to purchase and sell foreign exchange, and foreign currency swaps, are similarly determined. The fair value of interest rate swaps is the amount that would be received or paid to terminate the agreement.
Loans and Commitments
For certain categories of consumer loans, fair value includes consideration of the quoted market prices for securities backed by similar loans. Discounted future cash flows and secondary market values are used to determine the fair value of other types of loans. The fair value of commitments to extend credit, standby letters of credit, and commercial letters of credit is based upon the cost to settle the commitment.
Other Financial Assets
Fair value is assumed to equal carrying value for these assets due to their short maturity.
Deposits, Borrowings, and Long-Term Debt
The fair value of noninterest-bearing deposits and payables to customers and broker-dealers is assumed to be their carrying amount. The fair value of interest-bearing deposits, borrowings, and long-term debt is based upon current rates for instruments of the same remaining maturity or quoted market prices for the same or similar issues.
 
The carrying amount and estimated fair value of the Company's financial instruments are as follows:
 
The table below summarizes the carrying amount of the hedged financial instruments and the related notional amount of the hedge and estimated fair value (unrealized gain/(loss)) of the derivatives that were linked to these items:
 
 
The following table illustrates the notional amount, remaining contracts outstanding, and weighted average rates for derivative hedging contracts:
 
The Company's financial assets and liabilities are primarily variable rate instruments except for investment securities. Fixed-rate loans and deposits are issued to satisfy customer and investor needs. Derivative financial instruments are utilized to manage exposure to the effect of interest rate changes on fixed-rate assets and liabilities, and to enhance liquidity. The Company matches the duration of derivatives to that of the assets and liabilities being hedged, so that changes in fair value resulting from changes in interest rates will be offset.
The Company uses interest rate swaps, futures contracts, and forward rate agreements to convert fixed-rate loans, deposits, and long-term debt to floating rates. Basis swaps are used to convert various variable rate borrowings to LIBOR which better matches the assets funded by the borrowings.
The Company uses forward foreign exchange contracts to protect the value of its investments in foreign subsidiaries. The after-tax effects are shown in the cumulative translation adjustment included in shareholders' equity. At December 31, 2006 and 2005, foreign exchange contracts in a net notional amount of $1,744 million and $1,636 million, with fair values of $(35) million and $24 million, hedged corresponding amounts of foreign investments. These foreign exchange contracts had a maturity of less than six months at December 31, 2006. In 2006, the Company hedged its $33 million net investment in an affiliate with a non-derivative financial instrument. In addition, at December 31, 2006, foreign exchange contracts with notional amounts of $107 million and maturities of less than one year hedged corresponding amounts of foreign currency denominated forecasted transactions; the fair value of these contracts was $ 4 million.
Deferred net gains or losses on ALM derivative financial instruments at December 31, 2006 were a credit of $12 million and a credit of $14 million at December 31, 2005.
Net interest income increased by $3 million in 2006, $95 million in 2005, and $163 million in 2004 as a result of ALM derivative financial instruments.
A discussion of the credit, market, and liquidity risks inherent in financial instruments is presented under "Liquidity", "Market Risk Management", "Trading Activities and Risk Management", and "Asset/Liability Management" in the unaudited MD&A section and in the "Trading Activities" and "Commitments and Contingent Liabilities" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
18. Trading Activities
The following table shows the fair value of the Company's financial instruments that are held for trading purposes:
 
Foreign exchange and other trading income included the following:
 
Foreign exchange includes income from purchasing and selling foreign exchange, futures, and options. Interest rate contracts reflect results from futures and forward contracts, interest rate swaps, foreign currency swaps, and options. Debt securities primarily reflect income from fixed income securities. Credit derivatives include revenue from credit default swaps. Equities include income from equity securities and equity derivatives.
The following table of total daily revenue or loss captures trading volatility and shows the number of days in which the Company's trading revenues fell within particular ranges during the past year.
Distribution of Revenues
(1)
 
 
19. Commitments and Contingent Liabilities
In the normal course of business, various commitments and contingent liabilities are outstanding which are not reflected in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Management does not expect any material losses to result from these matters.
The Company's significant trading and off-balance sheet risks are securities, foreign currency and interest rate risk management products, commercial lending commitments, letters of credit, and securities lending indemnifications. The Company assumes these risks to reduce interest rate and foreign currency risks, to provide customers with the ability to meet credit and liquidity needs, to hedge foreign currency and interest rate risks, and to trade for its own account. These items involve, to varying degrees, credit, foreign exchange, and interest rate risk not recognized in the balance sheet. The Company's off-balance sheet risks are managed and monitored in manners similar to those used for on-balance sheet risks. There are no significant industry concentrations of such risks.
A summary of the notional amount of the Company's off-balance sheet credit transactions, net of participations, at December 31, 2006 and 2005 follows:
off-balance sheet Credit Risks
 
The total potential loss on undrawn commitments, standby and commercial letters of credit, and securities lending indemnifications is equal to the total notional amount if drawn upon, which does not consider the value of any collateral. Since many of the commitments are expected to expire without being drawn upon, the amount does not necessarily represent future cash requirements. The allowance for lending-related commitments at December 31, 2006 and 2005 was $150 million and $144 million.
A securities lending transaction is a fully collateralized transaction in which the owner of a security agrees to lend the security through an agent (the Company) to a borrower, usually a broker/dealer or bank, on an open, overnight or term basis, under the terms of a prearranged contract, which generally matures in less than 90 days. The Company generally lends securities with indemnification against broker default. The Company generally requires the borrower to provide 102% cash collateral which is monitored on a daily basis, thus reducing credit risk. Security lending transactions are generally entered into only with highly-rated counterparties. At December 31, 2006 and 2005, securities lending indemnifications were secured by collateral of $405.5 billion and $317.4 billion.
Standby letters of credit principally support corporate obligations and include $1.0 billion and $0.6 billion that were collateralized with cash and securities at December 31, 2006 and 2005. At December 31, 2006, approximately $7.2 billion of the standbys will expire within one year, and the balance between one to five years.
The notional amounts for other off-balance sheet risks express the dollar volume of the transactions; however, credit risk is much smaller. The Company performs credit reviews and enters into netting agreements to minimize the credit risk of foreign currency and interest rate risk management products. The Company enters into offsetting positions to reduce exposure to foreign exchange and interest rate risk.
 
At December 31, 2006, approximately $248 billion of interest rate contracts will mature within one year, $364 billion between one and five years, and the balance after five years. At December 31, 2006, approximately $113 billion of foreign exchange contracts will mature within one year and $2 billion between one and five years, and the balance after five years. There were no derivative financial instruments on nonperforming status at year-end 2006.
Use of derivative financial instruments involves reliance on counterparties. Failure of a counterparty to honor its obligation under a derivative contract is a risk the Company assumes whenever it engages in a derivative contract.
A summary of the notional amount and credit exposure of the Company's derivative financial instruments at December 31, 2006 and 2005 follows:
 
 
Operating Leases
Net rent expense for premises and equipment was $180 million in 2006, $181 million in 2005, and $161 million in 2004.
At December 31, 2006 and 2005, the Company was obligated under various noncancelable lease agreements, some of which provide for additional rents based upon real estate taxes, insurance, and maintenance and for various renewal options. The minimum rental commitments under noncancelable operating leases for premises and equipment having a term of more than one year from December 31, 2006 and December 31, 2005 are as follows:
 
Other
The Company has provided standard representations for underwriting agreements, acquisition and divestiture agreements, sales of loans and commitments, and other similar types of arrangements and customary indemnification for claims and legal proceedings related to its provision of financial services. Insurance has been purchased to mitigate certain of these risks. The Company is a minority equity investor in, and member of, several industry clearing or settlement exchanges through which foreign exchange, securities, or other transactions settle. Certain of these industry clearing or settlement exchanges require their members to guarantee their obligations and liabilities or to provide financial support in the event other partners do not honor their obligations. It is not possible to estimate a maximum potential amount of payments that could be required with such agreements.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company makes certain investments that have tax consequences. From time to time, the IRS may question or challenge the tax position taken by the Company. The Company engaged in certain types of structured cross-border leveraged leasing investments, referred to as "LILOs", prior to mid-1999 that the IRS has challenged. In 2004, the IRS proposed adjustments to the Company's tax treatment of these transactions. On February 28, 2006, the Company settled this matter with the IRS relating to LILO transactions closed in 1996 and 1997. The settlement did not affect 2006 net income, as the impact of the settlement was fully reserved.
The Company's 1998 leveraged lease transactions are in a subsequent audit cycle and were not part of the settlement. The Company believes that a comparable settlement for 1998 may be possible, given the similarity between these leases and the settled leases. However, negotiations are ongoing and the treatment of the 1998 leases may still be litigated if an acceptable settlement cannot be reached. Under current U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, if the 1998 leases are settled on a basis comparable to the 1996 and 1997 leases, the Company would not expect the settlement of the 1998 leases to have an impact on net income, based on existing reserves.
In the fourth quarter of 2005 the Company deposited funds with the IRS in anticipation of reaching a settlement on all of its LILO investments.
 
On February 11, 2005, the IRS released Notice 2005-13, which identified certain lease investments known as "SILOs" as potentially subject to IRS challenge. The Company believes that certain of its lease investments entered into prior to 2004 may be consistent with transactions described in the notice. Although it is likely the IRS will challenge the tax benefits associated with these leases in 2007, the Company remains confident that its tax treatment of the leases complied with statutory, administrative and judicial authority existing at the time they were entered into.
In 2001 and 2002, the Company entered into various structured transactions that involved, among other things, the payment of UK corporate income taxes that were credited against the Company's U.S. corporate income tax liability. The IRS is currently reviewing these transactions and it is likely that some or all of the credits will be challenged upon completion of the review. If necessary the Company will vigorously defend its position and believes that any tax benefits associated with these transactions were consistent with the applicable statutory, judicial and administrative authority.
The Company currently believes it has adequate tax reserves to cover its LILO exposure and any other potential tax exposures, based on a probability assessment of various potential outcomes. Probabilities and outcomes are reviewed as events unfold, and adjustments to the reserves are made when appropriate.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries are routinely defendants in or parties to a number of pending and potential legal actions, including actions brought on behalf of various classes of claimants, and regulatory matters. Claims for significant monetary damages are asserted in certain of these actions and proceedings. Due to the inherent difficulty of predicting the outcome of such matters, the Company cannot ascertain what the eventual outcome of these matters will be; however, based on current knowledge and after consultation with legal counsel, the Company does not believe that judgments or settlements, if any, arising from pending or potential legal actions or regulatory matters, either individually or in the aggregate, after giving effect to applicable reserves, will have a material adverse effect on the consolidated financial position or liquidity of the Company although they could have a material effect on net income for a given period. The Company intends to defend itself vigorously against all of the claims asserted in these legal actions.
See discussion of contingent legal matters in the "Legal and Regulatory Proceedings" section.
To The Board of Directors and Shareholders of
The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2006 and 2005, and the related consolidated statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2006. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and subsidiaries at December 31, 2006 and 2005, and the consolidated results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2006, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
As discussed in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. changed its method of accounting for defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans as of December 31, 2006, in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 158,.
Employers' Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the effectiveness of The Bank of New York Company Inc.'s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on criteria established in Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated February 21, 2007 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
NEW YORK, NEW YORK
February 21, 2007

Exhibit 99.3
REPORT OF MANAGEMENT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Management of the Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting for the Corporation, as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
The Corporation's management, including its principal executive officer and principal financial officer, has assessed the effectiveness of the Corporation's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006. In making this assessment, management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in . Based upon such assessment, management believes that, as of December 31, 2006, the Corporation's internal control over financial reporting is effective based upon those criteria.
Internal Control - Integrated Framework
KPMG LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in this Annual Report under "Financial Statements and Notes," has issued a report with respect to management's assessment of the effectiveness of the Corporation's internal control over financial reporting. This report appears on page 67.
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
The Board of Directors and Shareholders of Mellon Financial Corporation:
We have audited management's assessment, included in the accompanying Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting, that Mellon Financial Corporation maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on criteria established in Internal ControlIntegrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). Mellon Financial Corporation's management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on management's assessment and an opinion on the effectiveness of the Corporation's internal control over financial reporting based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, evaluating management's assessment, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
In our opinion, management's assessment that Mellon Financial Corporation maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006 is fairly stated, in all material respects, based on criteria established in Internal ControlIntegrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). Also, in our opinion, Mellon Financial Corporation maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on criteria established in Internal ControlIntegrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the consolidated balance sheets of Mellon Financial Corporation and subsidiaries as of December 31, 2006 and 2005 and the related consolidated statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2006; and our report dated February 22, 2007 expressed an unqualified opinion on those consolidated financial statements.
/s/ KPMG LLP
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania
February 22, 2007
Mellon Financial Corporation
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENT
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CHANGES IN SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
1. Accounting policies
Basis of presentation
The accounting and financial reporting policies of Mellon Financial Corporation (Mellon), a global financial services company, conform to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) and prevailing industry practices. The preparation of financial statements requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of certain assets and liabilities, the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities, and the reported amounts of related revenue and expense. Actual results could differ from these estimates.
In addition to discontinued operations (see Note 4), other immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with current period presentation.
The consolidated financial statements of Mellon include the accounts of Mellon and its majority-owned subsidiaries. Investments in companies 20% to 50% owned are carried on the equity basis. Mellon's share of earnings of nonconsolidated equity investments are reflected in noninterest revenue as institutional trust and custody, investment management or equity investment fee revenue, as appropriate, in the period earned. Investments in companies less than 20% owned are carried at cost. Intracorporate balances and transactions are not reflected in the consolidated financial statements.
The income statement and balance sheet include results of acquired businesses, accounted for under the purchase method of accounting pursuant to SFAS No. 141 "Business Combinations," and equity investments from the dates of acquisition. We record any contingent purchase payments when the amounts are resolved and become payable.
The Parent Corporation financial statements in Note 30 of Notes to Financial Statements include the accounts of the Parent Corporation; those of a wholly owned financing subsidiary that functions as a financing entity for Mellon and its subsidiaries by issuing commercial paper and other debt guaranteed by Mellon; and MIPA, LLC, a single member company, created to hold and administer corporate owned life insurance. Financial data for the Parent Corporation, the financing subsidiary and the single member company are combined for financial reporting purposes because of the limited function of these entities and the unconditional guarantee by Mellon of their obligations.
We consider the underlying facts and circumstances of individual transactions when assessing whether or not an entity is a potential variable interest entity (VIE). Mellon's assessment focuses on its ability to influence or control the potential VIE as well as the dispersion of risk and rewards attributable to the potential VIE. When Mellon transfers financial assets in a securitization to a VIE, the VIE must represent a qualifying special purpose entity (QSPE) or we would continue to consolidate the transferred financial assets. QSPE status is achieved when all conditions specified in SFAS No. 140, "Accounting for Transfers and Servicing of Financial Assets and Extinguishments of Liabilities," are met. Those conditions focus on whether the entity is demonstrably distinct from Mellon, limited to only permitted activities, limited on what assets the QSPE may hold, and limited on sales or other dispositions of assets. We also obtain the required true-sale opinions from outside counsel on all securitizations. We have determined that all of our securitization trusts are QSPEs.
Nature of operations
Mellon is a global financial services company providing a broad range of financial products and services in domestic and selected international markets. Through our five business sectors (Mellon Asset Management, Private Wealth Management, Asset Servicing, Payment Solutions & Investor Services and Other), we serve two distinct major classes of customers  financial institutions, corporations and government bodies, and high net worth individuals. For financial institutions, corporations and government bodies, we provide the following services:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
For individuals, we provide mutual funds, separate accounts, wealth management and private banking services. Mellon's asset management businesses provide investment products in many asset classes and investment styles. Although Mellon's largest domestic subsidiaries are headquartered primarily in the Northeast and mid-Atlantic regions, most of our products and services are offered globally.
Trading account securities, securities available for sale and investment securities
Securities are classified in the trading account securities portfolio, the securities available for sale portfolio or the investment securities portfolio when they are purchased. Securities are classified as trading account securities when the intent is profit maximization through market appreciation and resale. Securities are classified as available for sale when we intend to hold the securities for an indefinite period of time or when the securities may be used for tactical asset/liability purposes and may be sold from time to time to effectively manage interest rate exposure, prepayment risk and liquidity needs. Securities are classified as investment securities when we intend to hold them until maturity.
Trading account securities are stated at fair value. Trading revenue includes both realized and unrealized gains and losses. The liability incurred on short-sale transactions, representing the obligation to deliver securities, is included in other funds borrowed at fair value.
Securities available for sale are stated at fair value. Unrealized gains or losses on assets classified as available for sale, net of tax, are recorded as an addition to or deduction from other comprehensive results. Investment securities are stated at cost, adjusted for amortization of premium and accretion of discount on a level yield basis. Gains and losses on sales of securities available for sale are reported in the income statement. The cost of securities sold is determined on a specific identification basis.
On a quarterly basis, we review our investment securities that have a fair value less than the amortized cost of the security in order to determine if the decline in fair value is other than temporary. We consider many factors and all available evidence, including the duration and extent to which the fair value has been less than cost, as well as our ability and current intent to hold the securities for a period sufficient for a recovery in value. Securities with an unrealized loss that is determined to be other than temporary are written down to fair value, with the write-down recorded as a realized loss in gains (losses) on sales of securities.
Loans
Loans are reported net of any unearned discount. Loan origination and upfront commitment fees, as well as certain direct loan origination and commitment costs, are deferred and amortized as a yield adjustment over the lives of the related loans. Deferred fees and costs are netted against outstanding loan balances. Loans held for sale are carried at the lower of aggregate cost or fair value.
Unearned revenue on direct financing leases is accreted over the lives of the leases in decreasing amounts to provide a constant rate of return on the net investment in the leases. Revenue on leveraged leases is recognized on a basis to achieve a constant yield on the outstanding investment in the lease, net of the related deferred tax liability, in the years in which the net investment is positive. Gains on sales of lease residuals are recognized in financing-related revenue.
Commercial loans, including commercial leases, generally are placed on nonaccrual status when either principal or interest is past due 90 days or more, unless the loan is well secured and in the process of collection. We also place commercial loans on nonaccrual status when the collection of principal or interest becomes doubtful. Residential mortgage loans generally are placed on nonaccrual status when, in our judgment, collection is in doubt or the loans are 180 days or more delinquent. Personal loans, other than residential mortgages, and certain secured commercial loans are charged off
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
upon reaching various stages of delinquency depending upon the loan type, or upon the death or bankruptcy of the borrower. When a loan is placed on nonaccrual status, previously accrued and uncollected interest is reversed against current period interest revenue. Interest receipts on nonaccrual and impaired loans are recognized as interest revenue or are applied to principal when we believe the ultimate collectibility of principal is in doubt. Nonaccrual loans generally are restored to an accrual basis when principal and interest payments become current or when the loan becomes well secured and is in the process of collection.
A loan is considered to be impaired, as defined by SFAS No. 114, "Accounting by Creditors for Impairment of a Loan," when it is probable that Mellon will be unable to collect all principal and interest amounts due according to the contractual terms of the loan agreement. An impairment reserve is measured on the loans which meet the definition of an impaired loan per SFAS No. 114. Personal nonaccrual loans are not tested for impairment because they are included in large groups of smaller-balance homogeneous loans that, by definition along with leases, are excluded from the scope of SFAS No. 114.
Impaired loans are required to be measured based upon the loan's market price, the present value of expected future cash flows, discounted at the loan's initial effective interest rate, or at fair value of the collateral if the loan is collateral dependent. If the loan valuation is less than the recorded value of the loan, an impairment reserve is established for the difference. The impairment reserve is established by either an allocation of the reserve for credit losses or by a provision for credit losses. Impairment reserves are not needed when the recorded investment in an impaired loan is less than the loan valuation.
Reserve for loan losses and reserve for unfunded commitments
The reserve for loan losses, shown as a valuation allowance to loans, and the liability reserve for unfunded commitments are referred to as Mellon's reserve for credit exposure. The accounting policy for the determination of the adequacy of the reserves has been identified as a "critical accounting policy" as it requires us to make numerous complex and subjective estimates and assumptions relating to amounts which are inherently uncertain.
The reserve for loan losses is maintained to absorb losses inherent in the loan portfolio as of the balance sheet date based on our judgment. The reserve determination methodology is designed to provide procedural discipline in assessing the appropriateness of the reserve. Credit losses are charged against the reserve. Recoveries are added to the reserve.
The methodology for determining the liability for unfunded commitments considers the same factors as the reserve for loan losses, as well as an estimate of the probability of drawdown.
Premises and equipment
Premises and equipment are stated at cost, less accumulated depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization are calculated over the estimated useful lives of the assets, limited in the case of leasehold improvements to the lease term, using the straight-line method.
Mellon capitalizes costs relating to acquired software and internal-use software development projects that provide new or significantly improved functionality. We capitalize projects that are expected to result in longer term operational benefits, such as replacement systems or new applications that result in significantly increased operational efficiencies or functionality.
Identified intangible assets and goodwill
Identified intangible assets with estimable lives are amortized in a pattern consistent with the assets' identifiable cash flows or using a straight-line method over their remaining estimated benefit periods if the pattern of cash flows is not estimable. Intangible assets with estimable lives are reviewed for possible impairment when events or changed circumstances may affect the underlying basis of the asset. Goodwill and intangibles with indefinite lives are not amortized, but are assessed at least annually for impairment, generally based on discounted cash flows. The accounting policy for valuing and impairment testing of identified intangible assets and goodwill has been identified as a "critical accounting policy" as it requires us to make numerous complex and subjective estimates.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Income taxes
Deferred taxes are recognized for the expected future tax consequences of existing differences between the financial reporting and tax reporting bases of assets and liabilities using enacted tax laws and rates. Mellon files a consolidated federal income tax return. A deferred tax valuation allowance is established if it is more likely than not that all or a portion of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
Foreign currency translation
Assets and liabilities denominated in foreign currencies are translated to U.S. dollars at the rate of exchange on the balance sheet date. Revenue and expense accounts are translated monthly at an average monthly exchange rate. Transaction gains and losses are included in the income statement. Translation gains and losses on investments in foreign entities with functional currencies that are not the U.S. dollar are recorded as foreign currency translation adjustments in other comprehensive results.
Fee revenue
Mellon records investment management, distribution and service, institutional trust and custody, payment solutions & investor services, foreign exchange trading and other revenue when the services are provided and earned based on contractual terms, when amounts are determinable and collectibility is reasonably assured.
Additionally, we recognize revenue from non-refundable, up-front implementation fees under outsourcing contracts using a straight-line method, commencing in the period the ongoing services are performed through the expected term of the contractual relationship. Incremental direct set-up costs of implementation, up to the related implementation fee or minimum fee revenue amount, are deferred and amortized over the same period that the related implementation fees are recognized. If a client terminates an outsourcing contract prematurely, the unamortized deferred incremental direct set-up costs and the unamortized deferred up-front implementation fees related to that contract are recognized in the period the contract is terminated.
Investment management performance fees are recognized in the period in which the performance fees are earned and become determinable. Performance fees are generally calculated as a percentage of the applicable portfolio's performance in excess of a benchmark index or a peer group's performance. For hedge fund investments, an investment management performance fee is calculated as a percentage of the applicable portfolio's positive returns. When a portfolio underperforms its benchmark or fails to generate positive performance in the instance of a hedge fund investment, subsequent years' performance must generally exceed this shortfall prior to fees being earned. Amounts billable in subsequent years and which are subject to a clawback if performance thresholds in those years are not met are not recognized since the fees are potentially uncollectible. These fees are recognized when it is determined that they will be collected. When a multiyear performance contract provides that fees earned are billed ratably over the performance period, only the portion of the fees earned that is non-refundable are recognized.
Pensions
Mellon provides pension benefits to substantially all of its salaried employees through its noncontributory, defined benefit pension plans. Employees are provided benefits that are based upon the employees' years of service and compensation. The prepaid pension benefit is reported in other assets. The unfunded pension liability is recorded in other liabilities. Net periodic expense or benefit credits are recognized in staff expense. Mellon's accounting policy regarding pensions has been identified as a "critical accounting policy" as it is regarded to be critical to the presentation of our financial statements since it requires management to make numerous complex and subjective assumptions relating to amounts which are inherently uncertain. For further discussion of our pension accounting policy, see pages 95, 96 and 97 of this report.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Severance
Mellon provides displacement benefits through the Mellon Financial Corporation Displacement Program to eligible employees displaced from their jobs for business reasons not related to individual performance. Basic displacement benefits are based on the employee's years of continuous benefited service. Extended displacement benefits are based on salary grade and are available to eligible displaced employees who have not commenced other employment prior to exhausting their basic displacement benefits pay. The extended displacement benefit will be discontinued in 2007 for current employees and was not offered to employees hired in 2006. Displacement expense is recorded when management commits to an action that will result in displacement and the amount of the liability can be reasonably estimated.
Derivative instruments used for risk management purposes
Mellon enters into derivative instruments to manage its sensitivity to interest rate, currency and credit risk. This is accomplished by using these instruments to offset the inherent price, interest rate or currency risk of specific balance sheet assets or liabilities. Qualifying instruments are designated as hedges on the trade date. All derivative instruments are recognized on the balance sheet at their fair values. The fair value of contracts in a gain position is reported on the balance sheet in other assets and the fair value of contracts in a loss position is reported in other liabilities. In cases where counterparty netting agreements exist, only the net gain or loss on all eligible contracts with such counterparties are reported on the balance sheet. A derivative designated as a hedge of changes in the fair value of an asset or liability or of a firm commitment attributable to a specified risk is considered to be a fair value hedge. A derivative designated as a hedge of a forecasted transaction or of the variability of cash flows to be received or paid related to an asset or liability is considered to be cash flow hedge.
Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is highly effective and qualifies as a fair value hedge, along with the loss or gain on the hedged asset or liability that is attributable to the hedged risk (including losses or gains on firm commitments), are recorded in current period earnings. Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is highly effective and qualifies as a cash flow hedge are recorded in other comprehensive results, and reclassified into earnings in the same period or periods as the hedged item affects earnings. Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are highly effective and qualify as foreign currency hedges are recorded in either current period earnings or other comprehensive results, depending on whether the hedge transaction meets the criteria for a fair value or a cash flow hedge. If, however, a derivative or non-derivative financial instrument that may result in foreign currency transaction gains or losses is used as a hedge of a net investment in a foreign operation, the changes in fair value of the derivative or the non-derivative financial instrument, to the extent the hedge is effective, are recorded as foreign currency translation adjustments within other comprehensive results. Changes in the fair value of derivatives that do not qualify as hedges are recorded in current period earnings.
Mellon formally documents all relationships between hedging instruments and hedged items, as well as its risk management objective and strategy for undertaking various hedge transactions. This process includes linking all derivative instruments that are designated as fair value, cash flow, or foreign currency hedges to specific assets and liabilities on the balance sheet or to specific firm commitments or forecasted transactions. A formal assessment, both at the inception of the hedge and on an ongoing quarterly basis, is performed to determine whether the derivative instruments that are used in hedging transactions have been highly effective in offsetting changes in fair values or cash flows of hedged items and whether they are expected to continue to be highly effective in future periods.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
When it is determined that a derivative instrument is not highly effective as a hedge, hedge accounting is discontinued. Hedge accounting is also discontinued when:
 
 
 
 
When hedge accounting is discontinued, the derivative instrument will be either terminated, continue to be carried on the balance sheet at fair value or redesignated as the hedging instrument in either a cash flow or fair value hedge, if the relationship meets all applicable hedging criteria. Any asset or liability that was previously recorded as a result of recognizing the value of a firm commitment will be removed from the balance sheet and recognized as a gain or loss in current period earnings. Any gains or losses that were recorded in other comprehensive results from hedging a forecasted transaction will be recognized immediately in current period earnings, if it is probable that the forecasted transaction will not occur.
For further discussion of hedging activity during 2004 through 2006, see the "Fair value hedges" and "Cash flow hedges" sections on page 48 of this report. The information in those sections is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
Derivative instruments used for trading activities
We enter into various derivative instruments to accommodate our customers and for our proprietary trading activities. Derivative instruments that are based on specific market indices are also used to manage risk in other portfolios, such as start-up mutual fund investments. In addition, we enter into credit default swaps, which allow the transfer of credit risk from one party to another for a fee.
These swaps, which do not qualify as hedges for accounting purposes, are used to hedge credit risk associated with commercial lending activities. Realized and unrealized changes in the fair value of derivative instruments used for trading activities are recognized in the income statement in foreign exchange trading or other revenue in the period in which the changes occur. The fair value of contracts used for proprietary trading activities is reported as other assets or other liabilities. In cases where counterparty netting agreements exist, only the net gain or loss on all eligible contracts with such counterparty is reported on the balance sheet.
Statement of cash flows
Mellon has defined cash and cash equivalents as cash and due from banks. Cash flows from assets and liabilities that have an original maturity date of three months or less generally are reported on a net basis and those that have an original maturity date greater than three months generally are reported on a gross basis. Cash flows from hedging activities are classified in the same category as the items hedged.
Pro forma cost of stock options
Effective Jan. 1, 2003, we adopted the fair value recognition provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (SFAS) No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," prospectively for all employee awards granted, modified, or settled after Jan. 1, 2003. On Jan. 1, 2006, we adopted the provisions of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment," using the modified prospective transition method of adoption. See Notes 2 and 23 of Notes to Financial Statements for additional disclosure.
The following table illustrates the pro forma effect on income and earnings per share as if the provisions of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004) had been applied to all awards in each period. The cost related to stock-based employee compensation included in the determination of net income for 2005 and 2004 was less than what would have been required by SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004) if it had been adopted prior to Jan. 1, 2006. Following the adoption of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004), we began to expense nonvested ShareSuccess options granted prior to 2003. These options were not expensed in 2005, or 2004, nor were any other options granted prior to 2003.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
2. Adoption of new accounting standards
SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004)
On Jan. 1, 2006, we adopted the provisions of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment," which requires an entity to recognize in the income statement the grant-date fair value of stock options over their vesting period. Mellon had previously adopted the fair value recognition provisions of SFAS No. 123, on a prospective basis, for all awards granted, modified or settled after Jan. 1, 2003. We elected to use the modified prospective transition method as permitted by SFAS 123 (Revised 2004) and therefore have not restated our financial results for prior periods. Under this method, stock-based compensation expense for 2006 includes compensation expense for all stock-based compensation awards granted prior to, but not yet vested as of, Jan. 1, 2006. As such, we began expensing our nonvested ShareSuccess stock options that were awarded prior to 2003. The total impact of expensing the ShareSuccess options was $4 million pre-tax in 2006. In addition, as discussed further in Note 23 of Notes to Financial Statements, we recorded expense of $2 million pre-tax in 2006 for restricted stock awards to retirement-eligible employees, bringing the total impact of adoption of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004) to $4 million after-tax, or $.01 per share, in 2006.
Prior to Jan. 1, 2006, we recognized forfeitures on stock options and restricted stock as they occurred. SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004) requires a company to estimate the number of awards for which it is probable that the requisite service will be rendered and record that expense over the vesting period. The adjustment required at Jan. 1, 2006 to estimate forfeitures on previously recognized compensation expense for unvested stock options and restricted stock was minimal.
In November 2005, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued FASB Staff Position No. FAS 123 (R)-3, "Transition Election Related to Accounting for Tax Effects of Share-Based Payment Awards." Mellon has elected to adopt the alternative transition method provided in the FASB Staff Position for calculating the tax effects of stock-based compensation pursuant to SFAS 123 (Revised 2004). The alternative transition method includes simplified methods to establish the beginning balance of the additional paid-in capital pool related to the tax effects of employee stock-based compensation awards that are outstanding upon the adoption of SFAS 123 (Revised 2004).
SFAS No. 158Pensions
At Dec. 31, 2006, we adopted SFAS No. 158, "Employers' Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106, and 132R." This Statement requires, among other things, companies to recognize on the balance sheet the funded or unfunded status of pension and other postretirement benefit plans and to recognize changes in the funded status, in the year the changes occur. As a result, companies now recognize on their balance sheets any previously unrecognized actuarial gains and losses, prior service costs and transition obligations that were not yet included in
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
income. At Dec. 31, 2006, we reduced our prepaid pension asset and increased our unfunded pension liability and postretirement medical liability, with the offset recorded as a decrease in accumulated other comprehensive income (a component of equity) by $245 million pre-tax, or $159 million after-tax. The effect of adopting this Statement was to reduce both our shareholders' equity to assets ratio and tangible shareholders' equity to assets ratio by approximately 40 basis points at Dec. 31, 2006.
SAB 108Quantifying Financial Statement Misstatements
In September 2006, the SEC issued Staff Accounting Bulletin (SAB) 108 "Guidance on Quantifying Financial Statement Misstatements." This SAB addresses how the effects of prior-year uncorrected misstatements should be considered when quantifying the misstatements in current-year financial statements. The SAB requires registrants to quantify misstatements using both the year-end balance sheet perspective ("iron curtain method") and current year income statement perspective ("rollover method") and to evaluate whether either approach results in quantifying the aggregate impact of prior period uncorrected misstatements as material in light of relevant quantitative and qualitative factors. SAB 108 did not have an impact on our results of operations or financial position in 2006.
3. Contingent and deferred consideration related to acquisitions
Mellon completed four acquisitions in 2006, listed below by business sector, at a total cost of $347 million paid in cash plus $110 million in shares of our common stock for the Walter Scott & Partners acquisition. Goodwill and intangibles of $534 million were recorded for these acquisitions.
Mellon Asset Management
 
 
Private Wealth Management
 
PS&IS
 
Additional consideration for prior acquisitions of $20 million was paid in 2006, including $3 million in shares of our common stock for the Arden Group, Inc. acquisition and the last of four annual deferred consideration cash payments of $12.5 million in connection with the Standish Mellon acquisition. The $47 million net present value of this obligation was recorded as additional goodwill in the fourth quarter of 2002.
We record contingent purchase payments when amounts are determinable. Amounts generally become determinable and payable when an acquisition reaches a certain level of performance. At Dec. 31, 2006, we are potentially obligated to pay contingent additional consideration which, using reasonable assumptions for the performance of the acquired companies and joint ventures, could range from approximately $170 million to $370 million over the next four years, including a possible additional payment of $20 million for DPM Mellon. None of the potential contingent additional consideration was recorded as goodwill at Dec. 31, 2006.
Mellon owns 70% of Mellon Financial Services Asset Management S.A., a Brazilian institutional asset management and asset servicing company. The minority interest owners have attempted to exercise certain put rights, which obligate our subsidiary to purchase the remaining 30% of the company. The purchase price, as defined, is based on the levels of assets under management and administration, among other things. The minority interest owners and Mellon disagree on the computation of the purchase price. This dispute is in binding arbitration. We offered $6 million for the remaining 30% of the company and the minority interest owners made an initial request of $59 million, based upon exchange rates in effect at Dec. 31, 2006.
4. Discontinued operations
In August 2006, we announced a definitive agreement to sell our insurance premium financing company, AFCO Credit Corporation, and its Canadian affiliate, CAFO Inc., to Branch Banking
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
and Trust Company. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our global asset management and securities servicing businesses. This business was formerly included in the Other sector. The sale closed on Jan. 2, 2007 resulting in a gain of $11 million after-tax, that was recorded in the first quarter of 2007. In the third quarter of 2006, we applied discontinued operations accounting to this business and the income statements for all periods have been restated. The restatement primarily resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in financing-related revenue; a reduction in operating expenses; and a slight change in continuing earnings per share for certain periods.
In December 2006, Mellon sold its ownership interest in the direct and indirect portfolios of Mellon Ventures, our venture capital business, to investment funds organized by affiliates of The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. and New MVI, L.P. This decision was based upon the determination that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our global asset management and securities servicing businesses. A substantial portion of the sale was completed in December 2006 with subsequent closings expected to occur during the first quarter of 2007, once remaining consents to the transfer are obtained. This business was formerly included in the Other sector. We applied discontinued operations accounting to this business in the fourth quarter of 2006 and the income statements for all periods have been restated. This restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of equity investment revenue; a reduction in operating expenses; an increase in net interest revenue; and a change in continuing earnings per share.
The sale of the venture capital portfolios and related costs generated an after-tax loss of $68 million, reported as a net loss on disposals. The sale of these portfolios was completed as a bulk sale transaction, as a result of Mellon's desire to complete its business exit rapidly and in one transaction. Prior to Mellon considering the sale of its venture capital portfolio, each investment in the portfolio was carried at fair value in accordance with the Investment Company Audit Guide, which does not provide for a bulk sale liquidation discount. Fair values were individually derived from the Mellon Ventures valuation process. This process included observable and unobservable data points that were subject to independent validation and senior management oversight on a quarterly basis, but did not consider a bulk sale discount within the framework of the valuation. Although the sale resulted in a loss, Mellon accepted the price to allow it to redeploy capital to its core business strategy, as well as to minimize the volatility associated with variable revenues versus the relatively fixed carrying and operating costs of the business.
This transaction was settled for cash and a $38 million receivable. The receivable amount is adjustable upward or downward under certain circumstances upon disposition of a single investment. Mellon also retained gain sharing provisions for certain other investments.
On March 16, 2005, Mellon announced the signing of a definitive agreement to sell our human resources (HR) consulting practices, benefits administration and business process outsourcing businesses, included in the former Human Resources & Investor Solutions sector, to Affiliated Computer Services, Inc. (ACS). After a thorough review, it was determined that the investments required to compete successfully in those businesses could be better utilized by building on the strong positions of our other core businesses. The sale closed on May 26, 2005. In the first quarter of 2005, we applied discontinued operations accounting to these businesses.
In the fourth quarter of 2004, we applied discontinued operations accounting to certain businesses in Australia. We sold our business providing comprehensive multi-manager defined contribution services to the intermediary market in the fourth quarter of 2004. In April 2005, we sold our Australian consulting and administration businesses to Mercer Human Resource Consulting. These businesses were formerly included primarily in the Mellon Asset Management sector.
Because the lines of business included in discontinued operations were discrete lines of business serving classes of customers no longer served by Mellon's continuing lines of business, the disposition of these businesses has no material impact on continuing operations going forward.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Revenue from discontinued operations totaled $95 million in 2006, $405 million in 2005 and $802 million in 2004. Total revenue in 2006 included $49 million for the Mellon Ventures businesses and $44 million for AFCO/CAFO.
 
All information in these Financial Statements and Notes reflects continuing operations, unless otherwise noted.
5. Cash and due from banks
Cash and due from banks includes reserve balances that Mellon's subsidiary banks are required to maintain with a Federal Reserve bank. These required reserves are based primarily on deposits outstanding and were $282 million at Dec. 31, 2006 and $280 million at Dec. 31, 2005. These balances averaged $211 million in both 2006 and 2005.
6. Securities
Gross realized gains were $3 million, $1 million and $9 million on sales of securities available for sale in 2006, 2005 and 2004. Gross realized losses on sales were less than $1 million in 2006, less than $1 million in 2005 and $1 million in 2004. After-tax net gains on the sales of securities were $2 million, $1 million and $6 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004. At Dec. 31, 2006, and Dec. 31, 2005, securities issued by the U.S. Government and its agencies and U.S. Government sponsored agencies (shown in the tables below) exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity. At Dec. 31, 2006 and Dec 31, 2005, there were no other issuers that exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
 
Note: Expected maturities may differ from contractual maturities because borrowers may have the right to call or prepay obligations with or without call or prepayment penalties. Rates are calculated on a taxable equivalent basis using a 35% federal income tax rate.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
 
Note: Expected maturities may differ from contractual maturities because borrowers may have the right to call or prepay obligations with or without call or prepayment penalties. Rates are calculated on a taxable equivalent basis using a 35% federal income tax rate.
Pledged assets
Securities available for sale, investment securities, trading account securities and loans with book values of $16.9 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 and $15.2 billion at Dec. 31, 2005 were pledged to secure public and trust deposits, repurchase agreements and for other purposes. Securities purchased under agreements to resell and securities sold under agreements to repurchase are treated as collateralized financing transactions and are recorded at the amounts at which the securities were acquired or sold plus accrued interest. The collateral received from or provided to third parties under resale or repurchase agreements can be sold or repledged by the holder of the collateral. The fair value of collateral received totaled $125 million and the fair value of collateral provided totaled $133 million, under these agreements at Dec. 31, 2006. The fair value of collateral either received from or provided to a third party is continually monitored and additional collateral is obtained from, or requested to be returned to, Mellon as deemed appropriate.
Temporarily impaired securities
The following table shows gross unrealized losses and fair values of Mellon's investments, aggregated by investment category and length of time that the individual securities have been in a continuous unrealized loss position.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The unrealized loss of $157 million at Dec. 31, 2006 related to movement in interest rates. Nearly all of the securities with unrealized losses are AAA-rated or carry government agency guarantees. Approximately 85% of the unrealized losses on these 1,031 investments have been in a continuous unrealized loss position for more than 12 months. Management believes the collection of the contractual principal and interest is probable and therefore all unrealized losses are considered to be temporary. As shown on pages 82 and 83, unrealized gains totaled $48 million in the available-for-sale and investment portfolios at Dec. 31, 2006.
7. Loans
For details of loans outstanding at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, see the 2006 and 2005 columns of the "Composition of loan portfolio at year-end" table on page 38. The information in those columns is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
For details of nonperforming and past-due loans at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, see the amounts in the 2006 and 2005 columns of the "Nonperforming assets at year-end" table on page 39 and the first sentence of the last paragraph in the "Nonperforming assets" section on page 40. The information in those columns and that sentence is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements. For details on impaired loans at Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004, see the amounts in the "Impaired loans" table on page 40. The information in that table is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements. There were no restructured loans at Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004.
Referral arrangements with Three Rivers Funding Corp. (TRFC), an asset-backed commercial paper entity
Mellon's primary banking subsidiary, Mellon Bank, has a referral relationship with, and provides administrative services to, TRFC, a special purpose entity that issues commercial paper. TRFC is owned by an independent third party and is not a subsidiary of either Mellon Bank or Mellon. Its financial results are not included in the financial statements of Mellon Bank or Mellon. TRFC was formed in 1990 and can issue up to $5 billion of commercial paper to make loans secured by, and to purchase, pools of receivables and asset backed securities. Mellon Bank operates as a referral agent and refers transactions to TRFC as well as providing administrative services. Loans or other assets are not transferred from Mellon Bank to TRFC. TRFC sold subordinated notes to an unrelated third party in 2003, and as a result of that sale, Mellon is not the
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
"primary beneficiary" of TRFC, as defined by FIN 46 Revised. At Dec. 31, 2006, TRFC's receivables totaled $3.200 billion and commercial paper outstanding totaled $3.213 billion, compared with receivables and commercial paper outstanding each totaling $1.550 billion at Dec. 31, 2005. A letter of credit provided by Mellon Bank in support of TRFC's commercial paper totaled $149 million at Dec. 31, 2006, compared with $191 million at Dec. 31, 2005. Liquidity support is provided by Mellon Bank up to the full amount of commercial paper outstanding, or $3.213 billion, at Dec. 31, 2006. However, the probability of a loss scenario is remote as there are significant structural protections built into each transaction to provide protection against uncollectible receivables. Since TRFC's formation in 1990, Mellon Bank has not been required to fund under any liquidity support or under the letter of credit. In addition, Mellon Bank has never purchased a receivable from TRFC or recorded a credit loss related to its relationship with TRFC.
8. Reserve for credit exposure
For details of the reserve for credit exposure, see the 2006, 2005 and 2004 columns of the "Reserve for unfunded commitments" table on page 41 and the "Loan loss reserve activity" table on page 42. The information in those columns is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
9. Premises and equipment
 
Rental expense was $119 million, $121 million and $110 million, net of related sublease revenue of $29 million, $32 million and $23 million, in 2006, 2005 and 2004. Depreciation and amortization expense totaled $125 million, $119 million and $117 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004. Maintenance, repairs and utilities expenses totaled $115 million, $118 million and $106 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004.
As of Dec. 31, 2006, Mellon and its subsidiaries were obligated under noncancelable leases with expiration dates through 2027. A summary of the future minimum rental payments under noncancelable leases, net of related sublease revenue totaling $130 million, is as follows: 2007$166 million; 2008$179 million; 2009$120 million; 2010$119 million; 2011$112 million; and 2012 through 2027$805 million.
10. Goodwill and intangible assets
Goodwill
The level of goodwill increased in 2006 due to acquisitions and additional consideration paid for prior acquisitions, listed below by sector, and the effect of foreign exchange rates on non-U.S. dollar denominated goodwill:
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Mellon Asset Management
 
Private Wealth Management
 
 
Payment Solutions & Investor Services
 
The assets of HBV Alternative Strategies LLC, which included goodwill of $18 million, were classified as assets of a business transferred under contractual arrangements in Other Assets. See Note 11 for a further discussion.
No charges for goodwill impairment were recognized in continuing operations in 2006 or 2005. In 2004, a goodwill impairment loss of $8 million was recorded in continuing operations in the former Treasury Services/Other Activity sector in other expense on a small non-strategic business that we exited. An impairment writedown of $37 million was recorded in discontinued operations in the first quarter of 2005 for the anticipated sale of the HR Services businesses. Also, an impairment loss of $4 million was recorded in the first quarter of 2005 and $11 million was recorded in the fourth quarter of 2004 on the discontinued businesses in Australia.
 
Acquired intangible assets
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
During 2006, the gross carrying amount of intangible assets subject to amortization increased $246 million, as acquisitions and contingent payments [Walter Scott & Partners$243 million (Mellon Asset Management); U.S. Trust$3 million (Private Wealth Management); ClearTran$2 million (PS&IS); Singer & Friedlander$1 million (Mellon Asset Management)] and the effect of foreign exchange rates, were partially offset by an $11 million impairment charge. The impairment writedown of a customer base intangible asset was recorded at DPM Mellon resulting principally from the loss of a major client that existed at the date of acquisition, due to the client's liquidation of its assets in 2006. The writedown was recorded in the Asset Servicing sector as amortization of intangible assets. Approximately $34 million of goodwill related to DPM Mellon is recorded in the Asset Servicing sector, which is defined as the business reporting unit for purposes of goodwill impairment testing. This goodwill was not considered to be impaired at Dec. 31, 2006.
In 2006, $226 million, with a weighted-average amortization period of 16 years, was assigned to the customer base intangibles, principally for the Walter Scott & Partners acquisition. In addition, $21 million with a weighted-average amortization period of 7 years, was assigned to other and $2 million with a weighted-average amortization period of 10 years, was assigned to the technology based intangible. We amortize intangible assets over their estimated useful lives. Amortization expense totaled $44 million (including the $11 million impairment charge) in 2006, $27 million in 2005 and $19 million in 2004.
Based upon the current level of intangible assets, the estimated annual amortization expense for 2007 through 2012 is as follows:
 
During 2006, intangible assets not subject to amortization increased $17 million due to the Walter Scott & Partners acquisition ($25 million) recorded as a tradename intangible, and additional consideration for a prior-year acquisition ($2 million) were partially offset by the classification of the assets of HBV Alternative Strategies, LLC ($10 million) as assets of a business transferred under contractual arrangements in Other Assets.
At Dec. 31, 2006, $922 million of goodwill and acquired intangible assets is tax deductible and $1.925 billion is non-tax deductible.
11. Other assets
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Included in Other assets in the table above are $30 million of notes and $6 million of receivables related to the divestiture of Mellon HBV Alternative Strategies LLC (HBV), which was transferred under contractual arrangements to a third party. The consideration for the business is a series of payments for up to 13 years, which are dependent on HBV's cash flow. Accounting guidelines do not permit recording this transaction as a sale for accounting purposes, because Mellon received a nominal down-payment, will be paid over a relatively long period and the payments are dependent solely on HBV's revenue. Mellon will not receive future net profit distributions and is not subject to the ongoing operating risks of the business. All future proceeds, including interest on the notes, will be recorded against the carrying value of the notes on a cost recovery basis. Concurrent with the reclassification to Other assets, a $5 million impairment charge was recorded in Other operating expense to reflect the fair value of the asset. The fair value was estimated using a discounted cash flow analysis of the future payments, as no independent market value was readily determinable. The carrying value will be evaluated quarterly and could result in additional charges.
12. Deposits
The aggregate amount of time deposits in denominations of $100,000 or greater was approximately $4.5 billion at Dec. 31, 2006, and $2.5 billion at Dec. 31, 2005. At Dec. 31, 2006, the scheduled maturities of all time deposits for the years 2007 through 2011, and 2012 and thereafter are as follows: $4.482 billion, $19 million, $18 million, $1 million, $15 million and $62 million, respectively.
13. Revolving credit agreement
The Parent Corporation has a $200 million revolving credit agreement with Mellon Bank, N.A., Mellon's primary bank subsidiary. This agreement serves as a support facility for commercial paper and for general corporate purposes, and expires in June 2007. The credit facility had several restrictions, including a minimum 6% consolidated Tier I ratio and a 1.30 maximum double leverage limitation. At Dec. 31, 2006, Mellon was in compliance with all of the restrictions. In addition, any borrowings are to be collateralized with eligible assets of our non-bank subsidiaries. No borrowings were made under this facility in 2006 or 2005. Commitment fees totaled less than $1 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004. There were no third party credit facilities issued to subsidiaries of Mellon at Dec. 31, 2006 or 2005.
14. Notes and debentures (with original maturities over one year)
 
During 2006, the Parent Corporation filed a shelf registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission that gives it the ability to issue an indeterminate amount of debt, equity and junior subordinated debentures, subject to maintaining eligibility to use the shelf registration statement. In accordance with the merger agreement with The Bank of New York, Mellon is restricted from issuing equity or equity linked securities prior to the proposed merger.
The Mellon Bank, N.A., notes are subordinated to obligations to depositors and other creditors. The medium-term senior bank notes are subordinated to domestic depositors and are on par with other unsubordinated and unsecured creditors of Mellon Bank, N.A.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The aggregate amounts of notes and debentures (including the effect of fair value hedge adjustments) that mature during the five years 2007 through 2011 for Mellon are as follows: $840 million, $249 million, $288 million, $347 million and $748 million. The aggregate amounts of notes and debentures that mature during the five years 2007 through 2011 for Mellon Financial Corporation (Parent Corporation) are as follows: $398 million, $249 million, $288 million, $347 million and $748 million.
15. Junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures held by trusts that issued guaranteed capital debt securities (junior subordinated debentures)
Mellon established three statutory business trusts, Mellon Capital I, Mellon Capital II and Mellon Capital III, of which Mellon owns all of the common capital securities. These trusts exist solely to issue guaranteed preferred beneficial interests (trust-preferred securities) in Mellon's junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures, which are reported on our consolidated balance sheet as "Junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures held by trusts that issued guaranteed capital debt securities" (junior subordinated debentures). We record interest expense on the junior subordinated debentures. We also recorded in other assets the $31 million of common capital securities issued by the trusts. Loans held by the trusts, reflected as subordinated debentures on Mellon's consolidated balance sheet, are the sole assets of the trusts.
Mellon has the right to defer payment of interest on the junior subordinated debentures at any time, or from time to time, for periods not exceeding five years for the Series A and B and a period not to exceed ten years for the Series C. If interest payments on the junior subordinated debentures are deferred, the distributions on the trust-preferred securities also are deferred. Interest on the junior subordinated debentures and distributions on the trust-preferred securities is cumulative. Mellon, through guarantees and agreements, has fully and unconditionally guaranteed all of the trusts' obligations under the trust-preferred securities. The trust-preferred securities, less the common capital securities issued by the trusts, continue to qualify as Tier I capital.
 
The Series A and Series B junior subordinated debentures were each issued for a face value of $515 million. The Series C junior subordinated debentures were issued in pound sterling at a face value of 200 million. The Series A, B and C junior subordinated debentures pay interest semiannually and are reported net of issuance costs in the table above. The debentures are unsecured and subordinate to all of Mellon's senior debt (as defined).
The Series A and Series B securities are redeemable at 103.86% and 103.9975% of the liquidation amounts, plus accrued distributions, during the 12-month periods beginning Dec. 1, 2006 and Jan. 15, 2007 (the call dates). Based on current interest rate expectations and subject to our ability to issue replacement securities prior to the proposed merger with The Bank of New York, we intend to redeem our Series A and Series B junior subordinated debentures in the second quarter of 2007. We expect to replace these securities with a combination of Tier I qualifying capital securities and senior debt securities that would reduce our future funding costs. Redemption of both securities would result in a total pre-tax charge to income of $46 million for the redemption premiums and write-off of unamortized issuance costs.
The Series C securities are redeemable at par, in whole but not in part, at Mellon's option on or after Sept. 19, 2016. The Series C debentures are also redeemable prior to that date, in whole, within 90 days following receipt of a legal opinion that, due to a change in the tax laws or an administrative or judicial decision, there is a substantial risk that the tax deductibility of the interest could be
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
disallowed ("tax event"); or Mellon's reasonable determination that, due to a change in law or administrative or judicial decision, there is a substantial risk that Tier I capital treatment could be disallowed ("capital treatment event"); or following receipt of a legal opinion that, due to a change in the tax laws or an administrative or judicial decision, there is a substantial risk that the trust is or will be considered an investment company that is required to be registered under the Investment Act of 1940 ("investment company event"); or if the trust or Mellon is required to withhold income tax on the Preferred Securities or the junior subordinated debentures ("withholding tax event").
The Series C securities will be redeemed on Sept. 19, 2036 (the scheduled maturity date) subject to the satisfaction of certain redemption conditions.
16. Preferred stock
Mellon has authorized 50 million shares of preferred stock, none of which was issued at Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 or 2004.
17. Regulatory capital requirements
A discussion about Mellon's regulatory capital requirements for 2006 and 2005 is presented in the "Regulatory capital" section on pages 34 and 35 and is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
18. Noninterest revenue
The components of noninterest revenue for 2006, 2005 and 2004 are presented in the "Noninterest revenue" table on page 8. Institutional trust and custody revenue includes equity income from Asset Servicing joint ventures of $75 million, $45 million and $32 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004. Investment management revenue includes $2 million, $- million and $3 million in 2006, 2005 and 2004 of equity income from Mellon Asset Management joint ventures. That table, including through the "Total noninterest revenue" line, is incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
19. Net interest revenue
 
20. Business sectors
For details of our business sectors, see pages 22 through 24, the tables, through "Average Tier I preferred equity" on page 25, as well as the Other section on page 31 through the paragraph discussing economic capital. The tables and information in those paragraphs are incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
21. Income taxes
 
In addition to amounts applicable to income before taxes, the following income tax (benefit) amounts were recorded in shareholders' equity.
 
The provision for income taxes was different from the amounts computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate to income before income taxes due to the items listed in the following table.
 
The tax effects of temporary differences that gave rise to significant portions of the deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities are as follows.
 
A valuation allowance of $52 million has been recorded in accordance with SFAS No. 109 relating to deferred tax assets associated with state and foreign loss carry forwards. During 2006, deferred tax assets were recognized for state and foreign purposes that had previously not been recognized. Management believes that it is more likely than not that realization of these assets will not occur.
The foreign tax credit carry forwards at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005 were $12 million and $25 million, respectively, expiring between 2010 and 2015.
Included in tax expense in 2005 is a tax benefit of $2 million related to the repatriation of earnings from foreign subsidiaries under Section 965 of the Internal Revenue Code.
As part of a restructuring of its foreign operations, Mellon transferred certain businesses to a new foreign subsidiary. Income taxes attributed to the intergroup transfer of identified intangibles related to those businesses are deferred and amortized over the anticipated life of the intangibles. Deferred taxes related to other temporary differences that reversed upon the transfer of the foreign operations and other related adjustments resulted in a deferred tax benefit of $66 million.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Mellon provides deferred U.S. income taxes on the undistributed earnings of foreign subsidiaries except to the extent that such earnings are indefinitely reinvested. As a result of the restructuring of its foreign operations, beginning with the fourth quarter of 2006, Mellon indefinitely reinvested earnings in certain foreign subsidiaries, resulting in $74 million of earnings of foreign subsidiaries that were indefinitely reinvested at Dec. 31, 2006. The deferred U.S. tax on those earnings that would be provided if those earnings were not indefinitely reinvested would be approximately $2 million. In addition, there is $178 million of tax basis differences related to foreign currency translation and other temporary differences which would reverse only upon a taxable transaction for which no deferred U.S. tax has been provided. If taxes were provided on these other basis differences, the resulting deferred tax liability would be $62 million.
Locations domiciled outside of the U.S. generated foreign pre-tax earnings of approximately $249 million in 2006, $112 million in 2005 and $10 million in 2004.
22. Comprehensive results
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Tax effects allocated to each component of comprehensive results
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
23. Employee benefits
Defined Benefit Retirement Plans
Mellon's largest subsidiary, Mellon Bank, and some of our smaller subsidiaries sponsor trusteed, noncontributory, defined benefit pension plans. Together, these plans cover substantially all salaried employees of Mellon.
The plans provide benefits that are based on the employees' years of service and compensation. In addition, several unfunded plans exist for certain employees or for purposes that are not addressed by the funded plans.
The following tables report the combined data of the funded and unfunded plans. The impact of acquisitions shown below reflects the acquisition of a pension plan previously sponsored by the Russell/Mellon joint venture. The impact of divestitures shown below relates to the sale of the HR businesses to ACS in May 2005.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
 
The accumulated benefit obligation for all funded defined benefit pension plans was $1.349 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 and $1.295 billion at Dec. 31, 2005. The accumulated benefit obligation for all unfunded defined benefit plans was $149 million at Dec. 31, 2006 and $150 million at Dec. 31, 2005.
There were no funded plans with obligations in excess of plan assets at Dec. 31, 2006 and Dec. 31, 2005.
Mellon considers its accounting policy regarding pensions to be critical to the presentation of our financial statements since it requires us to make complex and subjective estimates and assumptions relating to amounts which are inherently uncertain. This policy, including the assumed discount rate, expected return on plan assets and assumed rate of compensation increase, which was reviewed with the Audit Committee of our Board of Directors, is discussed on the following pages.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The data above are prepared in accordance with SFAS No. 87, "Employers' Accounting for Pensions." Three primary economic assumptions influence the reported values of plan liabilities and pension costs. SFAS No. 87 directs that each significant assumption used in the measurement of net periodic benefit cost (credit) must reflect Mellon's best estimate solely with respect to that individual assumption. We take the following factors into consideration when establishing each assumption.
The discount rate represents an estimate of the rate at which retirement plan benefits could be effectively settled. This assumption is sensitive to movements in market rates and, therefore, is likely to change from year to year. Mellon considers alternative reference points when setting the discount rate including current rates of return available on longer term high grade bonds. In particular, we take into account changes in yields on these longer term bonds, specifically the direction and magnitude of such changes, between the previous year end and the current year end. The primary benchmark used is the Moody's Aa Corporate Bond Index. A comparison of the duration of the projected benefit obligation for our retirement programs to that of the Moody's Aa index indicates that the index provides a reasonable basis for use in setting the discount rate. We verify the reasonableness of the discount rate by comparing the projected benefit obligation to the liability obtained by discounting expected future benefit payments using a theoretical zero-coupon spot yield curve derived from a universe of high quality bonds.
When setting the rate of compensation increase assumption, we take into consideration our recent experience with respect to average rates of compensation increase and expectations for future increases to remain competitive, based on compensation survey data relative to average compensation increases that other large corporations have awarded, and compensation increases that other large corporations expect to award over the upcoming year. This assumption is somewhat sensitive to inflation and, therefore, may change from year to year. The assumed rate of compensation increase was 3.25% at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005.
The assumed rate of return on plan assets represents an estimate of long-term returns available to investors who hold a mixture of stocks, bonds and cash equivalent securities. When setting our expected return on plan assets assumption, we consider long-term rates of return on various asset classes (both historical and expected, using data collected from various sources generally regarded as authoritative) in the context of expected long-term average asset allocations for our defined benefit pension plans. Certain asset allocation benchmarks employed by institutional investors also serve as reference points. To develop assumed rates of return, for example, we applied a benchmark asset allocation of 65% stocks, 30% bonds and 5% cash equivalent securities, to the following long-term rates of return on each asset class.
 
As the previous table indicates, Mellon intends to reduce its expected return for equities and increase its expected return for fixed-income securities for 2007 and the future, resulting in a net decrease in the expected return on assets. We believe that these individual rates of return are reasonable estimates, based on long-term historical data and third party estimates of future expected returns, of the long-term returns that may be expected from each asset class, and that a 65/30/5 assumed asset mix is a reasonable long-term benchmark for Mellon's pension plans. Asset classes actually employed in the retirement plans, as well as asset allocation, vary from time to time. This assumption is set with a long-term horizon and, therefore is not necessarily expected to change on an annual basis. The return on plan assets in 2006 for the funded plans was 13.5%. The returns for the 3, 5 and 10 year periods ending in 2006 were 11.2%, 8.4% and 8.7%.
Mellon's funded pension plans weighted-average asset allocations at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, by asset category are as follows:
 
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Each retirement plan is administered by fiduciaries who establish investment policy for that plan. Plan assets are invested with the primary objective of satisfying obligations for future benefit payments. The investment policies seek to preserve plan assets and to maximize long-term total return on them, subject to maintaining reasonable constraints on overall portfolio volatility. The investment policies are also designed to comply with applicable regulations (e.g., ERISA in the U.S.). In general, equity securities within any plan's portfolio are maintained in the range of 45% to 75% of total plan assets, fixed-income securities range from 20% to 50% of plan assets and other assets (including cash equivalents) are held in amounts ranging from 0% to 10% of plan assets. Asset allocation within the approved ranges varies from time to time based on economic conditions (both current and forecast) and the advice of professional investment advisors retained by the fiduciaries.
Mellon expects to make cash contributions to its funded defined benefit pension plans, outside the U.S., in the range of $16 million to $18 million in 2007.
The following benefit payments for Mellon's funded and unfunded defined benefit pension plans, which reflect expected future service as appropriate, are expected to be paid:
 
The following discussions regarding share based compensation plans and postretirement benefits other than pensions includes amounts in discontinued operations.
Defined Contribution Retirement Plans
Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan
The Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan covers our U.S. benefits-eligible employees. Employees' payroll deductions contributed to the plan are matched by Mellon's contribution of common stock, at the rate of $.65 on the dollar, up to 6% of the employee's eligible base salary. The contribution rate was increased to $.75 on the dollar commencing in 2007. In 2006, 2005 and 2004, we recognized $23 million, $25 million and $29 million of expense related to this plan and contributed 629,717; 810,452; and 1,001,069 shares of our common stock. All shares contributed in 2006, 2005 and 2004 were issued from treasury stock. The plan held 11,948,393; 12,296,426; and 13,562,670 shares of Mellon common stock at Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004.
Other Defined Contribution Plans
Mellon maintains a defined contribution retirement plan in the United Kingdom, which covers Newton Investment Management employees along with certain other non-U.S. employees. In 2006, 2005, and 2004, Mellon recognized $9 million, $8 million and $8 million of expense related to this plan.
Effective Sept. 30, 2006, all existing retirement plans in the United Kingdom were closed to new entrants. This included the defined contribution plan covering Newton employees as well a defined benefit plan covering employees of the Mellon Bank, N.A. London Branch, the asset servicing business and shared services. These plans remain unchanged for employees hired prior to Oct. 1, 2006. All new hires offered employment in the United Kingdom on and after Oct. 1, 2006 participate in a new defined contribution plan that provides a uniform percentage of pay benefit to all eligible employees. The new arrangement is expected to reduce total retirement program costs over time. However, costs will increase by approximately $2 million for the next few years.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Stock option expense
 
We recognize compensation expense for stock option awards on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period.
The Black-Scholes option pricing model requires the use of subjective assumptions, which can materially affect fair value estimates. The fair value of each option was estimated on the date of the grant using assumptions applicable as of that date. The average value of the assumptions used, weighted by the number of options granted on each date, are shown in the following table:
 
Mellon uses a market-based implied volatility for traded options on its stock for the corresponding expected term of the option as the expected volatility assumption input into the Black-Scholes option pricing model. The risk-free interest rate assumption is based upon the yield on the measurement date of zero-coupon Treasury Strips whose maturity period equals the option's expected term. The dividend yield assumption is based on Mellon's history and expectation of dividend payouts over the term of the option. The expected life computation was derived based on historical exercise patterns.
Change-in-Control Provisions
If the proposed merger with The Bank of New York is approved by the Mellon shareholders, certain change-in-control provisions will be triggered related to Mellon's Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan, Stock Option Plans for Outside Directors, ShareSuccess Plan and Director Equity Plan (2006), that will result in the immediate vesting and expensing of most of these benefits upon shareholder approval. At Dec. 31, 2006, there was approximately $70 million of unrecognized compensation cost related to these plans. This amount does not include unrecognized compensation cost for the vesting of benefits for certain senior officers who waived their acceleration of vesting provisions.
Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan
Mellon's Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan (2004) provides for the issuance of stock options, stock appreciation rights, performance units, deferred cash incentive awards, shares of restricted stock, deferred share awards and other stock-based awards to employees of Mellon and its subsidiaries, as approved by the Compensation and Management Succession Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of our Board of Directors. Stock options may be granted at prices not less than the fair market value of our common stock on the date of grant. Options may be exercised during fixed periods of time from one year to 10 years from the date of grant. In the event of a change in control of Mellon, as defined in the Plan, these options will become immediately exercisable, unless otherwise provided in the option agreement.
During 2006, 2005 and 2004, options for 1,483,955; 3,832,703; and 6,385,015 shares were granted and options for 4,765,562; 2,459,121; and 1,857,950 shares were exercised. Total outstanding grants as of Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004 were 25,019,575; 29,807,148; and 32,251,012 shares. The expense recorded in 2006 for these options was $32 million pre-tax, including $3 million for options held by Mellon's former chairman and CEO, pursuant to his employment agreement. The expense recorded in 2005 was $24 million pre-tax and in 2004 was $18 million pre-tax. At Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, shares available for grant were 17,352,931 and 18,441,942.
Included in the Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004 outstanding grants were options for 11,720; 44,655; and 123,026 shares, that become exercisable in full near the end of their 10-year terms, but the exercise dates may be accelerated to an earlier date by the Compensation Committee, based on the optionee's and Mellon's performance. There was no expense recorded for these options in 2006, 2005 and 2004.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Restricted stock, performance shares and deferred share awards have also been issued and are outstanding under the Plan. These awards are discussed in the "Mellon Incentive Compensation Plan, Profit Bonus Plan, Performance Shares, Restricted Stock Awards and Director Equity Plan" section on pages 102 and 103 of this report.
Stock Option Plans for Outside Directors
Mellon had two stock option plans providing for the granting of options to non-employee members of our Boards of Directors. The Stock Option Plan for Outside Directors (2001) provided for grants of stock options to the non-employee directors of Mellon and members of our Advisory Board of Directors. This plan was replaced by the Director Equity Plan (2006) in April 2006, and is discussed on page 103. The Stock Option Plan for Affiliate Boards of Directors (1999) provides for grants of stock options to the non-employee members of those boards who are not also members of Mellon's Board of Directors. No grants can be made to employees of Mellon under these plans. The timing, amounts, recipients and other terms of the option grants are determined by the terms of the directors' option plans and no person or committee has discretion over these grants. The exercise price of the options is equal to the fair market value of the common stock on the grant date. All options have a term of 10 years from the regular date of grant and become exercisable one year from the regular grant date. Directors elected during the service year are granted options on a pro-rata basis to those granted to the directors at the start of the service year. In the event of a change in control of Mellon, as defined in the directors' stock option plans, all outstanding options granted under the directors' stock option plans will become immediately exercisable. Options are also currently outstanding under the Stock Option Plan for the Mellon Financial Group West Coast Board of Directors (1998). This plan was terminated in 2003. No grants were made under this plan in 2006 and no further grants have been or will be made under it.
Total outstanding grants under these plans as of Dec. 31, 2006, 2005 and 2004, were 567,498; 690,046; and 804,506 shares of our common stock. During 2006, 2005 and 2004, options for 6,000; 48,900; and 53,649 shares of our common stock were granted and options for 128,548; 163,360; and 163,900 shares were exercised. The expense recorded in 2006, 2005 and 2004 for these options was less than $1 million pre-tax. At Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, shares available for grant were 54,827 and 382,420.
Summary
The following tables summarize stock option activity for the last three years for the Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan and the stock option plans for outside directors and the characteristics of outstanding stock options at Dec. 31, 2006. The tables below exclude options issued under Mellon's ShareSuccess Plan which is described on pages 101 and 102. Requirements for stock option shares can be met from either unissued or treasury shares. All shares issued upon exercise of options in 2006, 2005 and 2004 were from treasury shares.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The aggregate intrinsic value of stock options in the preceding table is the pre-tax value that employees and directors could realize if the options were exercised and the employees received the difference between the options' exercise prices and the $42.15 closing per share market price of Mellon's common stock at Dec. 29, the last trading day of 2006. The total intrinsic value of options exercised was $55 million for 2006.
As of Dec. 31, 2006, $27 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to stock options is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of 1.6 years.
The weighted-average fair value of options granted was estimated at $8.14 per share in 2006, $6.73 per share in 2005 and $6.43 per share in 2004 and will be expensed on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Broad-Based Employee Stock Options
In June 1999, Mellon adopted its ShareSuccess Plan, a broad-based employee stock option plan covering full- and part-time benefited employees who are not participants in the Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan discussed previously. Effective June 15, 1999, each full-time employee was granted an option to purchase 150 shares and each benefited part-time employee was granted an option to purchase 75 shares of Mellon's common stock. Additional grants, of the same number of shares, were made June 15, 2000, June 15, 2001 and June 14, 2002. (In addition, effective June 15, 2001, each non-benefited part-time employee was granted an option for 75 shares.) The exercise price was equal to the stock price on the grant date. The options become exercisable after seven years, or at any time after one year from the grant date if Mellon's common stock closing market price equals or exceeds a predetermined price for 10 consecutive trading days. In the event of a change in control of Mellon, as defined in the plan, these options become immediately exercisable, subject to certain conditions. All outstanding options expire 10 years after the grant date. On Nov. 10, 2000, the options granted on June 15, 1999, vested when our common stock closing market price met or exceeded $45 per share for 10 consecutive trading days. The options granted in 2000, 2001 and 2002 have not yet vested and will vest when Mellon's common stock closing market price meets or exceeds $50, $60 and $45 per share for 10 consecutive trading days. Upon adoption of SFAS 123 (Revised 2004) on Jan. 1, 2006, we began to recognize expense for the unvested portion of these options. An expense of $4 million pre-tax was recorded in the 2006. No expense was recorded in 2005 or 2004 for these options. The following table presents the activity in the ShareSuccess Plan during 2006, 2005 and 2004. All shares issued upon exercise of options were from treasury shares. At Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005, shares available for grant were 4,885,955 and 4,422,405. We do not anticipate additional annual broad-based grants under the ShareSuccess Plan.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The aggregate intrinsic value of stock options in the preceding table is the pre-tax value that employees could realize if the options were exercised and the employees received the difference between the options' exercise prices and the $42.15 closing market price of Mellon's common stock at Dec. 29, 2006, the last trading day in 2006. The total intrinsic value of options exercised was less than $1 million for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006. As of Dec. 31, 2006, $6 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to ShareSuccess stock options is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.2 years.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
In early 2001, we implemented an employee stock purchase plan (ESPP). All active employees of Mellon and designated subsidiaries are eligible to participate. Participants purchase common stock at 95% of its fair market value on the last trading day of each three month purchase period. No charge to earnings is required with respect to this plan. In 2006, 116,002 shares were issued at prices ranging from $34.29 to $38.22. In 2005, 161,353 shares were issued at prices ranging from $26.37 to $31.96. At Dec. 31, 2006, 7,630,053 shares were available for purchase under this plan. All shares that were issued were from treasury shares.
Pro forma cost of stock options
For a discussion of the pro forma costs of stock options, see "Pro forma cost of stock options" in Note 1 of Notes to Financial Statements.
Mellon Incentive Compensation Plan, Profit Bonus Plan, Performance Shares, Restricted Stock Awards and Director Equity Plan
Performance-based awards are made to key employees at the discretion of the Compensation Committee of our Board of Directors. The granting of these awards is based upon the performance of the key employees and on Mellon's overall performance (or particular business line performance) in achieving its objectives. At the Committee's election, awards may be paid in a lump sum or may be deferred and paid over a period of up to 15 years and can be in the form of cash, common stock, restricted stock or deferred share awards equivalent to restricted stock. Employees are generally prevented from selling or transferring restricted stock or deferred share awards for a three- year period, and generally the shares or units are forfeited if employment is terminated during that period. However, restrictions on some restricted shares will lapse upon the applicable employee's retirement at age 55 or older with at least five years of employment. No restricted stock was awarded in connection with the Profit Bonus Plan in 2006, 2005 and 2004.
During 2006, Total Shareholder Return (TSR) Performance shares were granted to senior officers under Mellon's Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan (2004). Under the terms of the TSR Performance share awards, a target award comprised of restricted shares is granted to an employee at the beginning of the three-year performance period. Mellon's actual TSR for the performance period is compared to the results of its peer group of 19 companies for the same period, with Mellon's relative position in the group determined by percentile rank. The actual award payout is determined by multiplying the target award by the performance factor percentage provided for Mellon's percentile ranking. If the actual award exceeds the target award, additional shares are then issued within 45 days of the end of the performance period. Employees who retire and are at least age 55 with five years of service receive a pro-rata award based upon the actual number of months worked during the performance period payable at the end of the period when other participants are paid. In the event of a change in control of Mellon, as defined by the plan, the participants would be eligible for a pro-rata vesting based on the number of months worked in the performance period. The value of the TSR Performance shares was determined using a Monte Carlo simulation model. The Monte Carlo value is expensed on a straight-line basis over the three-year performance period. The amount of compensation expense recognized related to TSR Performance share awards was $3 million in 2006.
In addition to the TSR Performance shares, restricted stock has been granted to senior officers and other key employees under Mellon's Long-Term Profit Incentive Plan (2004). The vesting of these shares is primarily related to service and is expected to occur over a one-to-seven year period. In the
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
event of a change in control of Mellon, as defined in the plan, the restrictions on sale or transfer will immediately terminate. Employees are generally prevented from selling or transferring restricted stock or deferred share awards for a three-year period, and generally the shares or units are forfeited if employment is terminated during that period. However, the restrictions on some restricted shares will lapse upon the applicable employee's retirement at age 55 or older with at least five years of employment. In accordance with the provisions of SFAS No. 123 (Revised 2004), we recorded $2 million pre-tax in 2006 related to employees that met the age and service requirements on the date of grant that are necessary to immediately vest in their stock upon retirement.
The total compensation expense recognized for restricted shares, including the TSR Performance shares, was $43 million in 2006, which included $11 million for Mellon's former chairman and chief executive officer, pursuant to his employment agreement. Expense of $26 million and $28 million was recognized in 2005 and 2004.
The following table summarizes our nonvested restricted stock activity for 2006:
 
As of Dec. 31, 2006, $59 million of total unrecognized compensation costs related to nonvested restricted stock is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately 3 years.
Directors Equity Plan (2006)
In April 2006, the Director Equity Plan (2006) was approved by the shareholders and replaced the Stock Option Plan for Outside Directors (2001). In contrast to the Stock Option Plan for Outside Directors (2001), which was limited to stock options, the new Plan offers a variety of types of awards which may be used to provide equity compensation to outside directors. During 2006, 27,240 Deferred Share Units, with a fair market value of $37.43 per unit, were granted to outside directors under the Director Equity Plan (2006). Each Deferred Share Unit entitles the participant to receive a share of Mellon's common stock. The Deferred Share Units vest on the date of Mellon's next annual meeting and are payable 30 days following the date the participant's service on the Board terminates. As of Dec. 31, 2006, there was less than $1 million of total unrecognized compensation costs related to nonvested Deferred Share Units which is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 4 months. At Dec. 31, 2006, shares available for grant under the plan were 768,280.
Postretirement benefits other than pensions
Mellon shares in the cost of providing managed care, Medicare supplement and/or major medical programs for former employees who retired prior to Jan. 1, 1991 and grandfathered employees who met certain age and service requirements as of Jan. 1, 1991. Former employees of Buck Consultants who retired prior to Jan. 1, 2001 and grandfathered employees who met certain age and service requirements as of Dec. 31, 2000 are eligible for both pre-65 and post-65 medical coverage based on the cost sharing arrangements under the Buck plan as in effect on Dec. 31, 2000. Employees who retire prior to age 65 with 15 years of service who are not a part of either grandfathered group are eligible for a defined dollar supplement to assist them in purchasing health insurance coverage under the same plans offered to active employees. When these non-grandfathered retirees reach age 65, they become responsible for their own Medicare supplemental coverage. The net periodic benefit cost of providing these benefits, determined in accordance with SFAS No. 106, "Employers' Accounting for Postretirement Benefits Other Than Pensions," amounted to $7 million in 2006, $5 million in 2005 and $7 million in 2004. Early retirees who do not meet the service requirement are eligible to purchase health coverage at their own
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
expense under the standard plans that are offered to active employees through Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (COBRA).
The following tables sets forth the components of the costs and liability of Mellon's postretirement health care and life insurance benefits programs for current and future retirees.
Postretirement benefits other than pensions
 
Postretirement benefits other than pensions
 
Post retirement benefits other than pensions
 
Discount rates of 5.75%, 6.00% and 6.25%, were used to calculate the 2006, 2005, and 2004 net periodic post retirement benefit costs, and rates of 6.00% and 5.75% were used to value the accumulated postretirement benefit obligations (APBO) at year-end 2006 and 2005. A health care cost trend rate was used to recognize the effect of expected changes in future health care costs due to medical inflation, utilization changes, technological changes, regulatory requirements and Medicare cost shifting. The future annual increase assumed in the cost of health care benefits was 9.25% for 2006 and was decreased gradually to 4.75% for 2013 and thereafter. The health care cost trend rate assumption may have a significant impact on the amounts reported. Increasing the assumed health care cost trend by one percentage point in each year would increase the APBO by approximately $6 million and the aggregate of the service and interest cost components of the net periodic postretirement benefit cost by less than $1 million. Decreasing the assumed health care cost trend by one percentage point each year would decrease the APBO by approximately $6 million and the aggregate of the service and interest cost components of the net periodic postretirement benefit cost by less than $1 million.
Effective May 2005, the HR sector of Mellon was sold to ACS. A curtailment gain was calculated in accordance with SFAS No. 106. In accordance with the sale agreement, special provisions were established to recognize age and future service with ACS through Dec. 31, 2005, for the purpose of determining eligibility for postretirement medical benefits under the Mellon Plan. As a result, a special termination benefit charge was also calculated in accordance with SFAS No. 106.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
In December 2003, the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement and Modernization Act of 2003 (the Act) was signed into law, which introduced a prescription drug benefit under Medicare (Medicare Part D) as well as a federal subsidy to sponsors of retiree health care benefit plans that provide a benefit that is at least actuarially equivalent to Medicare Part D. The Mellon prescription drug plan is actuarially equivalent to Medicare Part D.
The following benefit payments for Mellon's postretirement benefits other than pension plans, which reflect expected future service as appropriate, are expected to be paid:
Expected benefit payments - postretirement benefits other than pensions
 
24. Restrictions on dividends and regulatory limitations
The prior approval of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (OCC) is required if the total of all dividends declared by a national bank subsidiary in any calendar year exceeds the bank subsidiary's net profits, as defined, for that year, combined with its retained net profits for the preceding two calendar years. Additionally, such bank subsidiaries may not declare dividends in excess of net profits on hand, as defined, after deducting the amount by which the principal amount of all loans on which interest is past due for a period of six months or more exceeds the reserve for credit losses.
Under the first and currently more restrictive of the foregoing federal dividend limitations, Mellon's national bank subsidiaries can, without prior regulatory approval, declare dividends subsequent to Dec. 31, 2006, of up to approximately $85 million of their retained earnings of $1.703 billion at Dec. 31, 2006, less any dividends declared and plus or minus net profits or losses, as defined, earned between Jan. 1, 2007, and the date of any such dividend declaration.
The payment of dividends also is limited by minimum capital requirements imposed on banks. As of Dec. 31, 2006, Mellon's bank subsidiaries exceed these minimum requirements. The bank subsidiaries declared dividends of $645 million in 2006, $675 million in 2005 and $466 million in 2004. The Federal Reserve Board and the OCC have issued additional guidelines that require bank holding companies and national banks to continually evaluate the level of cash dividends in relation to their respective operating income, capital needs, asset quality and overall financial condition.
The Federal Reserve Act limits extensions of credit by Mellon's bank subsidiaries to our Parent Corporation and all other subsidiaries of our Parent Corporation, and requires such extensions to be collateralized and limits the amount of investments by our bank subsidiaries in these entities. At Dec. 31, 2006, such extensions of credit and investments were limited to $371 million to the Parent Corporation or any other subsidiaries and to $743 million in total to the Parent Corporation and all of its other subsidiaries. Outstanding extensions of credit net of collateral subject to these limits were $227 million at Dec. 31, 2006.
25. Legal proceedings
Various legal actions and proceedings are pending or are threatened against Mellon and our subsidiaries and certain former subsidiaries, some of which seek relief or damages in amounts that are substantial. These actions and proceedings arise in the ordinary course of our businesses and operations and include suits relating to our servicing, investment, mutual fund, advisory, trust, custody, shareholder services, working capital solutions, lending, collections and other activities and operations. Certain actions and proceedings relate to businesses that have been divested. From time to time, Mellon may be involved in regulatory enforcement matters in which claims for disgorgement, the imposition of penalties and/or other remedial sanctions are possible.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
As previously reported in a Current Report on Form 8-K dated Aug. 18, 2006, our bank subsidiary, Mellon Bank, entered into a settlement agreement with the United States Attorney for the Western District of Pennsylvania that relates to the April 2001 incident in Mellon's Pittsburgh IRS Processing Unit. Under the terms of the settlement, Mellon has agreed to have an independent third party monitor compliance with the terms of the agreement for a three year period. No monetary penalties or fines were imposed by the agreement, although Mellon will reimburse the federal government for $30 thousand of costs incurred by an outside vendor. If Mellon complies with the terms of the agreement, the U.S. Attorney will not prosecute Mellon. The agreement should not impair Mellon's ability to serve as a long-standing government contractor.
As previously reported in a Current Report on Form 8-K dated Sept. 30, 2005, Mellon Investor Services LLC ("MIS"), our transfer agent subsidiary, has received a "Wells Notice" from the Philadelphia District Office of the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) indicating that the staff intends to recommend that the SEC bring a civil injunctive action against MIS for violations of Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and Rule 10b-5 thereunder. A Wells Notice indicates that the SEC's staff has made a preliminary decision to recommend that the SEC authorize the staff to bring a civil action. However, a Wells Notice is not a formal allegation or proof of wrongdoing. The notice provides MIS the opportunity to respond formally to the SEC staff before the staff makes a final determination whether to recommend that the SEC initiate an action.
The SEC staff has informed MIS that its recommendation relates to MIS' disclosure practices to its transfer agency (issuer) clients during the period 2001 through late 2004 concerning the receipt of fees from a search firm that performs in-depth searches for "lost" shareholders. Fees received by MIS from this firm during this period aggregate to approximately $5 million. MIS believes that the SEC staff has been investigating related practices at other transfer agents. MIS has been cooperating fully with the SEC staff in its investigation and has made a submission explaining why it believes that its conduct was lawful.
Because of the complex nature of some of these legal actions and proceedings, it may be a number of years before such matters ultimately are resolved. After consultation with legal counsel, Mellon's management believes that the aggregate liability, if any, resulting from such pending and threatened legal actions and proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows, although there could be a material effect on results of operations for a particular period.
26. Off-balance sheet financial instruments with contract amounts that represent credit risk
Off-balance sheet risk
In the normal course of business, Mellon becomes a party to various financial transactions that are not fully recorded on its balance sheet under GAAP. Because these transactions are not funded, they are not reflected on the balance sheet and are referred to as financial instruments with off-balance sheet risk. We offer off-balance sheet financial instruments to enable our customers to meet their financing objectives and providing those instruments generates fee revenue for Mellon. These off-balance sheet instruments are subject to credit and market risk. We manage credit risk by:
 
 
Counterparty limits are monitored on an ongoing basis. Market risk arises from changes in the market value of contracts as a result of the fluctuations in interest and currency rates.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Unfunded commitments to extend credit
Mellon enters into contractual commitments to extend credit, normally with fixed expiration dates or termination provisions, at specific rates and for specific purposes. The majority of our unfunded commitments to extend credit are contingent upon customers meeting certain pre-established conditions of lending at the time of loan funding and include material adverse change clauses within the commitment contracts. These clauses allow us to deny funding a loan commitment if the borrower's financial condition deteriorates during the commitment period, such that the customer no longer meets the pre-established conditions of lending.
Mellon's maximum exposure to credit loss upon the occurrence of any event of default by the customer is represented by the contractual amount of the commitment to extend credit. Accordingly, the credit policies utilized in committing to extend credit and in the extension of loans are the same. Market risk arises on commitments to extend fixed rate loans if interest rates have moved adversely subsequent to the extension of the commitment or if required market spreads widen. We believe the market risk associated with commitments is minimal. The amount and type of collateral obtained by Mellon is based upon industry practice, as well as our credit assessment of the customer.
Of the $12 billion of contractual commitments for which we received a commitment fee or which were otherwise legally binding, approximately 33% of the commitments are scheduled to expire within one year, and approximately 97% are scheduled to expire within five years. Total unfunded commitments to extend credit increased $27 million, or less than 1%, at Dec. 31, 2006 compared to Dec. 31, 2005. Unfunded commitments to extend credit expiring over one year increased $311 million, or 4%, at Dec. 31, 2006, compared to Dec. 31, 2005, primarily resulting from a shift towards longer maturities of loan commitments. At Dec. 31, 2006, we had a $77 million reserve for credit exposure to outstanding commitments.
Letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees
There are two principal types of letters of creditstandby and commercial. The off-balance sheet credit risk involved in issuing standby and commercial letters of credit is represented by their contractual amounts and is essentially the same as the credit risk involved in unfunded commitments to extend credit. Mellon minimizes this risk by adhering to its written credit policies and by requiring security and debt covenants similar to those contained in loan agreements. We believe the market risk associated with letters of credit and foreign guarantees is minimal.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees irrevocably obligate Mellon for a stated period to disburse funds to a third-party beneficiary if our customer fails to perform under the terms of an agreement with the beneficiary. Standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees are used by the customer as a credit enhancement and typically expire without being drawn upon. The amount and type of any collateral are based on industry practices, as well as a credit assessment of the customer.
Our outstanding exposure to standby letters of credit at Dec. 31, 2006 was $1.5 billion, with approximately 85% maturing within three years. At Dec. 31, 2006, we had a $7 million reserve for credit exposure to outstanding letters of credit.
We must recognize, at the inception of standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees, a liability for the fair value of the obligation undertaken in issuing the guarantee. At Dec. 31, 2006, we had a liability of $8 million related to letters of credit issued or modified since Dec. 31, 2002. As required by FASB Interpretation No. 45, "Guarantor's Accounting and Disclosure Requirements for Guarantees, Including Indirect Guarantees of Indebtedness of Others," the fair value of the liability, which was recorded with a corresponding asset in other assets, was estimated as the present value of contractual customer fees.
A commercial letter of credit is normally a short-term instrument used to finance a commercial contract for the shipment of goods from a seller to a buyer. This type of letter of credit ensures prompt payment to the seller in accordance with the terms of the contract. Although the commercial letter of credit is contingent upon the satisfaction of specified conditions, it represents a credit exposure if the buyer defaults on the underlying transaction. Normally, reimbursement from the buyer is coincidental with payment to the seller under commercial letter of credit drawings. As a result, the total contractual amounts do not necessarily represent future cash requirements.
Securities lending
A securities lending transaction is a fully collateralized transaction in which the owner of a security agrees to lend the security through an agent (Mellon) to a borrower, usually a broker/dealer or bank, on an open, overnight or term basis, under the terms of a prearranged contract, which generally matures in less than 90 days. The borrower will collateralize the loan at all times, generally with cash, or to a lesser degree securities, exceeding 100% of the market value of the loan, plus any accrued interest on debt obligations. Cash collateral is generally reinvested in commercial paper, repurchase agreements, money market funds and floating rate instruments.
Mellon currently enters into two types of agency securities lending arrangementslending with and without indemnification. In securities lending transactions without indemnification, we bear no contractual risk of loss other than due to negligence. For transactions in which we provide an indemnification, Mellon generally only indemnifies the owner of the securities against borrower default. If the borrower defaults on returning the securities, our risk of loss occurs if the collateral, when received, is insufficient to purchase and replace securities from these defaulted loans. There were no counterparty default losses on security lending transactions in 2006, 2005 and 2004. Additional market risk associated with securities lending transactions arises from interest rate movements that affect the spread between the rate paid to the securities borrower on the borrower's collateral and the rate we earn on that collateral. This risk is controlled through policies that limit the level of such risk that can be undertaken.
Other guarantees and indemnities
In the normal course of business, Mellon offers guarantees in support of certain joint ventures and subsidiaries, and certain other guarantees and indemnities.
Mellon Bank, N.A. and ABN AMRO Bank N.V. (ABN AMRO) entered into a joint venture to provide global securities services, with operations commencing in January 2003. Each of the two partners signed a statutory declaration under Dutch law to be jointly and severally liable with the joint venture to parties that have a provable contractual debt or damage claim. The benefit of this declaration is potentially available to all creditors
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
and customers of the joint venture with valid legal claims if the joint venture defaults. The guarantee totaled approximately $78 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 compared with $43 billion at Dec. 31, 2005, primarily related to securities lending activity. Agency securities lending represented $72 billion of this guarantee at Dec. 31, 2006, primarily related to the indemnification of the owner of the securities against broker default. These securities lending transactions were collateralized primarily with cash and OECD government securities totaling $70 billion. The joint venture also indemnifies $483 million of cash collateral reinvested in repurchase agreements for risk of market or credit loss. The potential exposure of this guarantee assumes that there is no capital or assets of the joint venture to satisfy such claims, and that there is no level of contribution by ABN AMRO, which has an S&P 500 long-term credit rating of AA- and a Moody's senior debt rating of Aa3.
Mellon provides liquidity support and a letter of credit in support of TRFC's commercial paper. For a discussion of these arrangements, see Note 7 of Notes to Financial Statements.
Mellon has also provided customary representations for underwriting agreements, acquisition and divestiture agreements, sales of loans and commitments, and other similar types of arrangements and customary indemnification for claims and legal proceedings related to providing of financial services. We have purchased insurance to mitigate certain of these risks. Mellon is a minority equity investor in, and member of, several industry clearing or settlement exchanges through which foreign exchange, securities or other transactions settle. Certain of these industry clearing or settlement exchanges require their members to guarantee their obligations and liabilities or to provide financial support in the event other partners do not honor their obligations. It is not possible to estimate a maximum potential amount of payments that could be required with respect to such agreements.
27. Derivative instruments used for trading and interest rate risk management purposes
 
Following is a brief discussion of the instruments listed in the above table. The amount of credit risk associated with these instruments results from mark-to-market gains and interest receivables and is calculated after considering master netting agreements, which are generally applicable to derivative instruments used for both trading activities and interest rate risk management purposes. The credit risk for these instruments is reported in other assets on Mellon's balance sheet. Market risk associated with these instruments arises from changes in the market value of contractual positions caused by actual or anticipated movements in currency or interest rates and, for equity options, movements in the equity markets. We limit our exposure to market risk by generally entering into matching or offsetting positions and by establishing and monitoring limits on unmatched positions. There were no counterparty default losses on these instruments in 2006, 2005 or 2004.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Commitments to purchase and sell foreign currency contracts
Commitments to purchase and sell foreign currency facilitate the management of market risk by ensuring that, at some future date, Mellon, or a customer, will have a specified currency at a specified rate. We enter into foreign currency contracts to assist customers in managing their currency risk and as part of our trading activities. The notional amount does not represent the actual market or credit risk associated with this product. We manage credit risk by dealing only with approved counterparties under specific credit limits and by monitoring outstanding contracts by customer and in the aggregate against such limits. The future cash requirements, if any, related to foreign currency contracts are represented by the net contractual settlement between Mellon and its counterparties.
Foreign currency option contracts
Foreign currency option contracts grant the contract purchaser the right, but not the obligation, to purchase or sell a specified amount of a foreign currency during a specified period at a predetermined exchange rate to a second currency. Mellon acts as both a purchaser and seller of foreign currency option contracts. Credit risk and future cash requirements are similar to those of foreign currency contracts.
Interest rate swaps
Interest rate swaps obligate two parties to exchange one or more payments generally calculated with reference to fixed or periodically reset rates of interest applied to a specified notional principal amount. Notional principal is the amount upon which interest rates are applied to determine the payment streams under interest rate swaps. Such notional principal amounts often are used to express the volume of these transactions but are not typically exchanged between the counterparties.
Mellon has entered into interest rate swaps to assist customers in managing their interest rate risk. We also use interest rate swaps as part of our interest rate risk management strategy primarily to alter the interest rate sensitivity of our long-term debt and certificate of deposit liabilities.
Credit risk is managed through credit approval procedures that establish specific lines for individual counterparties and limit credit exposure to various portfolio segments. Counterparty and portfolio outstandings are monitored against such limits on an ongoing basis. Mellon has entered into collateral agreements with certain counterparties to interest rate swaps to further secure amounts due. The collateral is generally cash, U.S. government securities or mortgage pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA). The future cash requirements of interest rate swaps are limited to the net amounts payable under these swaps. At Dec. 31, 2006, 67% of the notional principal amount of interest rate swaps used for trading purposes were scheduled to mature in less than five years.
Options, caps and floors
An interest rate option is a contract that grants the purchaser the right, but not the obligation, to either purchase or sell a financial instrument at a specified price within a specified period of time. An interest rate cap is a contract that protects the holder from a rise in interest rates beyond a certain point. An interest rate floor is a contract that protects the holder against a decline in interest rates below a certain point.
Futures and forward contracts
Futures and forward contracts on loans, securities or money market instruments represent future commitments to purchase or sell a specified instrument at a specified price and date. Futures contracts are standardized and are traded on organized exchanges, while forward contracts are traded in over-the-counter markets and generally do not have standardized terms.
For instruments that are traded on an organized exchange, the exchange assumes the credit risk that a counterparty will not settle and generally requires a margin deposit of cash or securities as collateral to minimize potential credit risk. Mellon has established policies governing which exchanges and
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
exchange members can be used to conduct these activities, as well as the number of contracts permitted with each member and the total dollar amount of outstanding contracts. Credit risk related to futures contracts is substantially mitigated by daily cash settlements with the exchanges for the net change in the value of the futures contract. The future cash requirements, if any, related to futures and forward contracts are represented by the net contractual settlement between Mellon and its counterparties.
Equity options
Equity option contracts grant the contract purchaser the right, but not the obligation, to purchase or sell a specified amount of equities during a specified period at a predetermined price. We enter into equity options to assist customers in managing market risk associated with equity positions that they hold.
Credit default swaps
Credit default swaps allow the transfer of credit risk from one party to another for a fee. These swaps are used to mitigate credit risk associated with commercial lending activities. Credit risk is managed by setting specific credit limits and by monitoring outstandings by counterparty and in the aggregate against such limits.
Total return swaps
A total return swap is a derivative contract under which the total return (dividend/interest payments and any capital gains or losses) from a specified instrument or index is exchanged for a specified fixed or floating cash flow that is not related to the creditworthiness of the referenced asset. We enter into total return swaps to minimize the risk related to investments in start-up mutual funds that are based on specific market indexes.
28. Concentrations of credit risk
For a discussion of credit risk and the credit risk management process employed by Mellon, see the first five paragraphs of "Credit risk" on page 37. These paragraphs are incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
The maximum risk of accounting loss from on- and off-balance sheet financial instruments with counterparties is represented by their respective balance sheet amounts and the contractual or replacement cost of the off-balance sheet financial instruments. Significant credit concentrations for Mellon at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005 were:
 
 
29. Fair value of financial instruments
A financial instrument is defined by SFAS No. 107, "Disclosures about Fair Value of Financial Instruments," as cash, evidence of an ownership interest in an entity, or a contract that creates a contractual obligation or right to deliver to or receive cash or another financial instrument from a second entity on potentially favorable terms.
Fair value estimates are made at a point in time, based on relevant market data and information about the financial instrument. SFAS No. 107 specifies that fair values should be calculated based on the value of one trading unit without regard to any premium or discount that may result from concentrations of ownership of a financial instrument, possible tax ramifications, estimated transaction costs that may result from bulk sales or the relationship between various financial instruments. Because no readily available market exists for a significant portion of our financial instruments, fair value estimates for these instruments are based on judgments regarding
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
current economic conditions, currency and interest rate risk characteristics, loss experience and other factors. Many of these estimates involve uncertainties and matters of significant judgment and cannot be determined with precision. Therefore, the calculated fair value estimates cannot always be substantiated by comparison to independent markets and, in many cases, may not be realizable in a current sale of the instrument. Changes in assumptions could significantly affect the estimates.
Fair value estimates do not include anticipated future business or the value of assets, liabilities and customer relationships that are not considered financial instruments. For example, our fee-generating businesses are not incorporated into the fair value estimates. Other significant assets and liabilities that are not considered financial instruments include lease finance assets, deferred tax assets, lease contracts, premises and equipment, and intangible assets.
We used the following methods and assumptions in estimating the fair value of our financial instruments at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005.
Short-term financial instruments
The carrying amounts reported on our balance sheet generally approximate fair value for financial instruments that reprice or mature in 90 days or less, with no significant change in credit risk. The carrying amounts approximate fair value for:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Trading account securities, securities available for sale and investment securities
Trading account securities and securities available for sale are recorded at market value on our balance sheet. Market values of trading account securities, securities available for sale and investment securities in many instances are based on quoted market prices or dealer quotes, if available. If a quoted market price is not available, market value is estimated using quoted market prices for securities with similar credit, maturity and interest rate characteristics. The tables in Note 6 of Notes to Financial Statements present in greater detail the carrying value and market value of securities available for sale and investment securities at Dec. 31, 2006 and 2005.
Loans
The estimated fair value of commercial loans and certain personal loans that reprice or mature in 90 days or less approximates their respective carrying amounts. The estimated fair value of loans that reprice or mature in more than 90 days is estimated using discounted cash flow analyses, adjusting where appropriate for prepayment estimates, using interest rates currently being offered for loans with similar terms to borrowers of similar credit quality and for similar maturities.
Deposit liabilities
SFAS No. 107 defines the estimated fair value of deposits with no stated maturity, which includes demand deposits and money market and other savings accounts, to be the amount payable on demand. Although market premiums paid for depository institutions reflect an additional value for these low-cost deposits, SFAS No. 107 prohibits adjusting fair value for any value expected to be derived from retaining those deposits for a future period of time or from the benefit that results from the ability to fund interest-earning assets with these deposit liabilities. The fair value of fixed-maturity deposits which reprice or mature in more than 90 days is estimated using current rates.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Notes and debentures, and junior subordinated debentures
The fair value of our notes and debentures, and junior subordinated debentures is estimated using quoted market yields for the same or similar issues or the current yields offered by Mellon for debt with the same remaining maturities.
Unfunded commitments to extend credit and standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees
These financial instruments generally are not sold or traded, and estimated fair values are not readily available. However, the fair value of commitments to extend credit is represented by the remaining contractual fees receivable over the term of the commitments. The fair values of standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees is represented by the amount of the receivable on the balance sheet. Unfunded commitments to extend credit, and standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees are discussed further in Note 26 of Notes to Financial Statements.
Derivative instruments used for trading and interest rate risk management purposes
Receivables and payables related to derivative instruments are determined by using quoted market prices or valuation models that incorporate current market data.
Summary
The following table includes financial instruments, as defined by SFAS No. 107, whose estimated fair value is not represented by the carrying value as reported on our balance sheet except for receivables and payables related to derivative instruments, which are presented in the table for supplementary information. The carrying amount and estimated fair values of unfunded commitments to extend credit and standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees are not significant. We have made estimates of fair value discount rates that we believe to be reasonable considering expected prepayment rates, credit risk and liquidity risk. However, because there is no active market for many of these financial instruments, we have no basis to verify whether the resulting fair value estimates would be indicative of the value negotiated in an actual sale.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
30. Proposed merger with The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
On Dec. 3, 2006, Mellon entered into an agreement to merge with The Bank of New York Company, Inc., which would create an asset servicer with, on a pro forma basis, more than $17 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $8 trillion in assets under corporate trusteeship and over $1.1 trillion in assets under management at Dec. 31, 2006. The Bank of New York is headquartered in New York City and employs approximately 23,000.
Under the terms of the merger agreement, a new company will be formed, to be called The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, in which Mellon shareholders will receive one share of common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date and The Bank of New York shareholders will receive .9434 shares of common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date. The parties anticipate that the new company will record a restructuring charge of approximately $1.3 billion, pre-tax, a portion of which will be capitalized at the close of the transaction, with the remaining incurred over a 3 year period.
Mellon has entered into a stock option agreement with The Bank of New York, in which Mellon has granted The Bank of New York an option to purchase up to 82,641,656 shares of Mellon common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $40.05 or the closing sale price of Mellon common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may The Bank of New York acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of Mellon common stock under this stock option agreement. The Bank of New York cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving Mellon and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire Mellon prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, Mellon may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of Mellon common stock purchased by The Bank of New York under the option at a predetermined price, or The Bank of New York may choose to surrender the option to Mellon for a cash payment of $725 million. In no event will the total profit received by The Bank of New York with respect to this option exceed $825 million.
Mellon has entered into a stock option agreement with The Bank of New York, in which The Bank of New York has granted Mellon an option to purchase up to 149,621,546 shares of The Bank of New York's common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $35.48 or the closing sale price of The Bank of New York's common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may Mellon acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of The Bank of New York's common stock under this stock option agreement. Mellon cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving The Bank of New York and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire The Bank of New York prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, The Bank of New York may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of The Bank of New York's common stock purchased by Mellon under the option at a predetermined price, or Mellon may choose to surrender the option to The Bank of New York for a cash payment of $1.15 billion. In no event will the total profit received by Mellon with respect to this option exceed $1.3 billion.
The board of directors of both companies have unanimously approved the merger agreement and adopted a resolution recommending the adoption of the merger agreement by its respective shareholders. Each party has agreed to put these matters before their respective shareholders for consideration. Subject to satisfaction of various conditions of closing, the merger is currently expected to close early in the third quarter of 2007.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
31. Mellon Financial Corporation (Parent Corporation)
 
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
32. Supplemental information to the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
Noncash investing and financing transactions that, appropriately, are not reflected in the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows are listed below.
 
33. International operations
Foreign activity includes asset management and asset servicing fee revenue generating businesses, foreign exchange trading activity, loans and other revenue producing assets and transactions in which the customer is domiciled outside of the United States and/or the foreign activity is resident at a foreign entity. We have approximately 2,800 employees at non-U.S. locations (excluding joint ventures), principally in the United Kingdom and other European countries. Due to the nature of our foreign and domestic activities, it is not possible to precisely set apart the foreign and domestically domiciled customers. As a result, it is necessary to make certain subjective assumptions such as:
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
International assets, revenue, continuing income from international operations before income taxes and continuing income from international operations are shown in the following table.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
The Board of Directors and Shareholders of
Mellon Financial Corporation:
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Mellon Financial Corporation and subsidiaries as of December 31, 2006 and 2005 and the related consolidated statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2006. These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Corporation's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Mellon Financial Corporation and subsidiaries at December 31, 2006 and 2005 and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2006 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
As discussed in note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the Corporation changed its method of accounting for employer defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans effective December 31, 2006, in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 158.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the effectiveness of Mellon Financial Corporation's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2006, based on criteria established in Internal ControlIntegrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO), and our report dated February 22, 2007 expressed an unqualified opinion on management's assessment of, and the effective operation of, internal control over financial reporting.
/s/ KPMG LLP
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania
February 22, 2007
 
Mellon Financial Corporation

Exhibit 99.4
 
 
 
Comprehensive income for the three months ended March 31, 2007 and 2006 was $414 and $367. See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
1. General
The accounting and reporting policies of The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a financial holding company, and its consolidated subsidiaries (the "Company") conform with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and general practice within the banking industry. Such policies are consistent with those applied in the preparation of the Company's annual financial statements.
The Company provides a complete range of banking and other financial services to corporations and individuals worldwide through its business segments: Asset and Wealth Management, Institutional Services, and Other. "Business Segment Accounting Principles" and "Segment Financial Data" are incorporated from the Business Segment Review section of Management's Discussion and Analysis of the Company's Financial Condition and Results of Operations ("MD&A"). There were no major customers from whom revenues were individually material to the Company's performance.
The accompanying consolidated financial statements are unaudited. In the opinion of management, all adjustments necessary for a fair presentation of financial position, results of operations and cash flows for the interim periods have been made. Certain other reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with current period presentation.
2.
Accounting Changes and New Accounting Pronouncements
The Company adopted Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 123 ("SFAS 123"), "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," in 1995. At that time, as permitted by the standard, the Company elected to continue to apply the provisions of Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25 ("APB 25"), "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees," and accounted for the options granted to employees using the intrinsic value method, under which no expense is recognized for stock options because they were granted at the stock price on the grant date and therefore have no intrinsic value.
On January 1, 2003, the Company adopted the fair value method of accounting for its options under SFAS 123 as amended by SFAS No. 148 ("SFAS 148"), "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation-Transition and Disclosure." SFAS 148 permitted three different methods of adopting fair value: (1) the prospective method, (2) the modified prospective method, and (3) the retroactive restatement method. Under the prospective method, options issued after January 1, 2003 are expensed while all options granted prior to January 1, 2003 are accounted for under APB 25 using the intrinsic value method. Consistent with industry practice, the Company elected the prospective method of adopting fair value accounting.
During the three months ended March 31, 2007, approximately 5.6 million options were granted. In the first quarters of 2007 and 2006, the Company recorded $14 million and $10 million of stock option expense.
The fair value of options granted in 2007 and 2006 were estimated at the grant date using the following weighted average assumptions:
 
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued SFAS No. 123 (revised 2004) ("SFAS 123(R)"), "Share-Based Payment," which is a
revision of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation." SFAS 123(R) eliminates the ability to account for share-based compensation transactions using APB 25 and requires that such transactions be accounted for using a fair value-based method. SFAS 123(R) covers a wide range of share-based compensation arrangements including share options, restricted share plans, performance-based awards, share appreciation rights, and employee share purchase plans. The Company adopted SFAS 123(R) on January 1, 2006 using the "modified prospective" method. Under this method, compensation cost is recognized beginning with the effective date (a) based on the requirements of SFAS 123(R) for all share-based payments granted after the effective date and (b) based on the requirements of SFAS 123 for all awards granted to employees prior to the effective date of SFAS 123(R) that remain unvested on the effective date. As of January 1, 2006, the Company was amortizing all of its unvested stock option grants.
Certain of the Company's stock compensation grants vest when the employee retires. SFAS 123(R) requires the completion of expensing of new grants with this feature by the first date the employee is eligible to retire. For grants prior to January 1, 2006, the Company will continue to expense them over their stated vesting period. The adoption of SFAS 123(R) increased pre-tax expense in 2006 by $12 million.
In February 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 155 ("SFAS 155"), "Accounting for Certain Hybrid Financial Instruments", an amendment of SFAS 140 and SFAS 133. SFAS 155 permits the Company to elect to measure any hybrid financial instrument at fair value if the hybrid instrument contains an embedded derivative that otherwise would require bifurcation and be accounted for separately under SFAS 133. SFAS 155 clarifies which interest-only strips and principal-only strips are not subject to the requirements of SFAS 133 and that concentrations of credit risk in the form of subordination are not embedded derivatives. SFAS 155 is effective for all financial instruments acquired, issued, or subject to a remeasurement event after December 31, 2006. On January 17, 2007, the FASB issued Derivative Implementation Groups ("DIG") Issue B40 which impacts how SFAS 155 is applied. The adoption of SFAS 155 and DIG Issue B40 did not have a significant impact on the Company's investment activities.
In July 2006, the FASB issued FASB Staff Position ("FSP") FAS 13-2, "Accounting for a Change or Projected Change in the Timing of Cash Flows Relating to Income Taxes Generated by a Leverage Lease Transaction," revising the accounting guidance under SFAS No. 13 ("SFAS 13"), "Accounting for Leases," for leveraged leases. This FSP modifies existing interpretations of SFAS 13 and associated industry practice. As a result in 2007, the Company recognized a one-time after-tax charge to equity of $389 million related to a change in the timing of its lease cash flows due to the LILO settlement. See "Commitments and Contingent Liabilities" in Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. However, an amount approximating this one-time charge will be taken into income over the remaining term of the affected leases. In the first quarter of 2007, the Company recognized an after-tax income of $2 million. Since the Company has not yet reached a settlement with the IRS related to LILOs originated in 1998, the charge to equity was estimated assuming a December 31, 2007 settlement date. The portion of the one-time charge related to 1998 LILOs will be taken into income between the settlement date and the end of the lease term.
In September 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 157 ("SFAS 157"), "Fair Value Measurements." SFAS 157 defines fair value, establishes a framework for measuring fair value in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and expands additional disclosures about fair value measurements. SFAS 157 clarifies that fair value is the amount that would be exchanged to sell an asset or transfer a liability, in an orderly transaction between market participants. SFAS 157 nullifies the consensus reached in EITF Issue No. 02-3 prohibiting the recognition of day one gain or loss on derivative contracts (and hybrid instruments measured at fair value under SFAS 133 as modified by SFAS 155) where the Company cannot verify all of the significant model inputs to observable market data and verify the model to market transactions. However, SFAS 157 requires that a fair value measurement technique include an adjustment for risks inherent in a particular valuation technique (such as a pricing
model) and/or the risks inherent in the inputs to the model if market participants would also include such an adjustment. SFAS 157 will require the Company to consider the effect of its own credit standing in determining the fair value of its liabilities. In addition, SFAS 157 prohibits the recognition of "block discounts" for large holdings of unrestricted financial instruments where quoted prices are readily and regularly available in an active market. The requirements of SFAS 157 are to be applied prospectively, except for changes in fair value measurements that result from the initial application of SFAS 157 to existing derivative financial instruments measured under EITF Issue No. 02-3, existing hybrid instruments measured at fair value, and block discounts, which are to be recorded as an adjustment to opening retained earnings in the year of adoption. The Company expects to adopt SFAS 157 on January 1, 2008. The Company is currently evaluating the impact of SFAS 157.
In September 2006, the FASB issued SFAS No. 158, "Employers' Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plansan amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106 and 132(R)" ("SFAS 158"). SFAS 158 requires the Company to (a) recognize in its statement of financial position an asset for a plan's overfunded status or a liability for a plan's underfunded status, (b) measure a plan's assets and its obligations that determine its funded status as of the end of the fiscal year, (c) recognize changes in the funded status of a defined postretirement plan in the year in which the changes occur (reported in comprehensive income) and (d) provide additional disclosure. The requirement to recognize the funded status of a benefit plan and the disclosure requirements are effective as of the end of the fiscal year ending after December 15, 2006. The requirement to measure the plan assets and benefit obligations as of the date of the employer's fiscal year-end statement of financial position is effective for fiscal years ending after December 15, 2008. On December 31, 2006, the Company adopted the recognition and disclosure provisions of SFAS 158. The adoption of SFAS 158 resulted in a charge to equity of $264 million.
In 2007, the Company adopted FASB Interpretation No. 48, "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes" ("FIN 48"). FIN 48 clarifies the accounting for uncertain tax positions in accordance with SFAS No. 109, "Accounting for Income Taxes." FIN 48 requires that a tax position meet a "more-likely-than-not threshold" for the benefit of the uncertain tax position to be recognized in the financial statements. A tax position that fails to meet a more-likely-than-not recognition threshold will result in either reduction of current or deferred tax assets, and/or recording of current or deferred tax liabilities. The impact of adoption in 2007 was a charge to equity of $27 million. See "Income Taxes" in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion related to FIN 48.
In February 2007, the FASB issued SFAS No. 159 ("SFAS 159"), "The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities." SFAS 159 provides companies with an option to report selected financial assets and liabilities at fair value and to provide additional information that will help investors and other users of financial statements to understand more easily the effect on earnings of the company's choice to use fair value. It also requires companies to display the fair value of those assets and liabilities for which the company has chosen to use fair value on the face of the balance sheet. The Company expects to adopt SFAS 159 along with SFAS 157 on January 1, 2008 and is currently evaluating the impact of SFAS 159.
Certain other prior year information has been reclassified to conform its presentation with the 2007 financial statements.
3. Acquisitions and Dispositions
The Company continues to be a selective acquirer of securities servicing and asset management businesses.
In the first quarter of 2007, the Company acquired certain clearing and custody relationships rights for cash. The Company frequently structures its acquisitions with both an initial payment and a later contingent payment tied to post-closing revenue or income growth. The Company records the fair value of contingent payments as an additional cost of the entity acquired in the period that the payment becomes probable.
Goodwill and tax-deductible portion of goodwill related to completed acquisitions in the first quarter of 2007 was zero. At March 31, 2007, the Company was liable for potential contingent payments related to acquisitions in the amount of $130 million. Cash paid or accrued for acquisitions and contingent payments was $89 million in the first quarter of 2007.
2007
In January 2007, certain clearing and custody relationships rights were acquired by the Company's Pershing subsidiary. The transaction involved 46 organizations, comprised of 30 registered investment advisor firms and 16 introducing broker-dealer firms.
In March 2007, the Company sold its 49 percent stake in joint venture BNY Mortgage Co. to EverBank Financial Corp. The transaction is consistent with the Company's recent strategic moves to focus on asset management and securities servicing.
In April 2007, the Company agreed to sell its 30% equity investment in RBS International Securities Services (Holdings) Limited to BNP Paribas Securities Services.
2006
On October 1, 2006, the Company sold its Retail Business to JPMorgan Chase for the net asset value plus a premium of $2.3 billion. JPMorgan Chase sold its corporate trust business to the Company for the net asset value plus a premium of $2.15 billion. The difference between premiums resulted in a net cash payment of $150 million to the Company. There is also a contingent payment of up to $50 million to the Company tied to customer retention. For further details, see "Discontinued Operations" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
JPMorgan Chase's corporate trust business comprised issues representing $5 trillion in total debt outstanding. It had 2,400 employees in more than 40 locations globally. Prior to the acquisition, the Company's corporate trust business comprised issues representing $3 trillion in total debt outstanding and had 1,300 employees in 25 locations globally.
The Company's retail bank consisted of 338 branches in the Tri-State region, serving approximately 700,000 consumer households and small businesses with $13 billion in deposits and $9 billion in assets at September 30, 2006. The Company's regional middle market businesses provided financing, banking and treasury services for middle market clients, serving more than 2,000 clients in the Tri-State region. Together, the units had 4,000 employees located in New York, New Jersey, Connecticut and Delaware.
The transaction further increases the Company's focus on the securities services and wealth management businesses that have fueled the Company's growth in recent years and that are at the core of its long-term business strategy.
The Company recorded an after-tax gain of $1,381 million on the sale of the Retail Business. The Company also expects to incur after-tax charges of $150 million related to the acquisition. The transaction is expected to be dilutive to GAAP earnings per share through 2009 (4.5 percent in 2007 to 1.5 percent in 2009), but to be accretive to cash earnings per share in 2009 when cost savings are fully phased in.
On a pro forma basis, if the acquisition of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business had occurred on January 1, 2006, the transaction would have had the following impact:
 
The pro forma results are based on adding the pre-tax historical results of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business to the Company's results and adjusting for amortization of intangibles created in the transaction and taxes. The pro forma data does not include adjustments to reflect the Company's operating costs or expected differences in the way funds generated by the Acquired Corporate Trust Business are invested. The pro forma data is intended for informational purposes and is not indicative of the future results of operations.
The Company's transaction with JPMorgan Chase altered the composition of the balance sheet. When the Acquired Corporate Trust Business is fully integrated in 2007, approximately $14 billion of U.S. dollar retail deposits will have been replaced with between $11 billion and $14 billion of institutional corporate trust deposits. Between $7 billion and $10 billion of deposits related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business have not yet transitioned to the Company. These deposits will transition to the Company as regulatory approval is received to operate in certain foreign locations and as the novation process proceeds in other foreign locations. The Company expects the transition will be substantially complete by June 30, 2007. Until the transition is complete, JPMorgan Chase will pay the Company for the net economic value of these deposits. In the first quarter of 2007, the Company recorded $25 million of net economic value payments in noninterest income, compared with $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2006. On the asset side of the balance sheet, approximately $8 billion of retail and middle market loans included in the sale of the Retail Business have been replaced with liquid assets and securities. Goodwill and intangibles related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business were approximately $2.3 billion.
On October 2, 2006, the Company completed the transaction resulting in the formation of BNY ConvergEx Group. BNY ConvergEx Group brought together BNY Securities Group's trade execution, commission management, independent research and transition management business with Eze Castle Software, a leading provider of trade order management and related investment technologies. This transaction enabled the Company to achieve several objectives including repositioning its execution services business for faster growth and enhancing the product offering for the Company's client base, while allowing the Company to withdraw capital committed to the business.
BNY ConvergEx Group is a leading global agency brokerage and technology company offering a complete spectrum of pre-trade, trade, and post-trade solutions for traditional money managers, hedge funds, broker-dealers, corporations and plan sponsors. BNY ConvergEx Group has a global presence in New York, Boston, San Francisco, Chicago, Dallas, Stamford, London, Bermuda, Tokyo, Hong Kong, and Sydney.
The Company and GTCR Golder Rauner, LLC each hold a 35 percent stake in BNY ConvergEx Group, with the balance held by Eze Castle Software's investors and BNY ConvergEx Group's management team. BNY ConvergEx Group, with pro forma 2005 revenues of approximately $340 million, is an affiliate of The Bank of New York and is reflected on the Company's financial statements as an equity investment. After the use of the proceeds to repurchase shares, the transaction is expected to be neutral to earnings per share.
The BNY Securities Group businesses included in BNY ConvergEx Group are BNY Brokerage, Lynch, Jones & Ryan, G-Port, Westminster Research and BNY Jaywalk. In addition, The Bank of New York's B-Trade and G-Trade businesses are expected to become part of BNY ConvergEx Group in 2008, although in the interim they will continue to be owned by The Bank of New York.
On December 1, 2006, the Company sold its transfer agency software business, Rufus, to Bravura Solutions Limited ("Bravura"), a leading global supplier of wealth management applications and professional services, for approximately $38 million. Under the agreement, Bravura acquired all of the software and intellectual property comprising Rufus, and all existing employees will transfer to Bravura.
On December 3, 2006, the Company and Mellon entered into a definitive agreement to merge, creating the world's largest securities servicing and asset management firm. The new company, which will be called The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will be the world's leading asset servicer with Assets under Custody and Administration expected to exceed $18 trillion and the world's leading corporate trustee with assets under trusteeship expected to exceed $8 trillion. It will rank among the top 10 global asset managers with assets under management expected to exceed $1.1 trillion.
The combined company is expected to have annual revenues of more than $12 billion, with approximately 28% derived from asset servicing, 38% from issuer services, clearing and execution services and treasury services, and 29% from asset and wealth management. By the end of 2008, the Company is expected to generate over $1 billion tangible capital per quarter. It will be well positioned to capitalize on global growth trends, including the evolution of emerging markets, the growth of hedge funds and alternative asset classes, the increasing need for more complex financial products and services, and the increasingly global need for people to save and invest for retirement. Almost a quarter of combined revenue will be derived internationally.
Under the terms of the agreement, the Company's shareholders will receive 0.9434 shares in the new company for each share of the Company that they own and Mellon shareholders will receive one share in the new company for each Mellon share they own.
To induce Mellon to enter into the merger agreement, the Company granted Mellon an option to purchase up to 149,621,546 shares of the Company's common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $35.48 and the closing sale price of the Company's common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may Mellon acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of the Company's common stock under this stock option agreement. Mellon cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving the Company and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire the Company prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, the Company may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of the Company's common stock purchased by Mellon under the option at a predetermined price, or Mellon may choose to surrender the option to the Company for a cash payment of $1.15 billion. In no event will the total profit received by Mellon with respect to this option exceed $1.3 billion.
To induce the Company to enter into the merger agreement, Mellon granted the Company an option to purchase up to 82,641,656 shares of Mellon common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $40.05 and the closing sale price of Mellon common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may the Company acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of Mellon common stock under this stock option agreement. The Company cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving Mellon and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire Mellon prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, Mellon may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of Mellon common stock purchased by the Company under the option at a predetermined price, or the Company may choose to surrender the option to Mellon for a cash payment of $725 million. In no event will the total profit received by the Company with respect to this option exceed $825 million.
On December 19, 2006, the Company acquired the remaining 50% stake in AIB/BNY Securities Services (Ireland) Ltd. (AIB/BNY) that it did not own from Allied Irish Banks, p.l.c. ("AIB"). AIB/BNY was established in 1995 as a joint venture between AIB and the Company to provide a range of services for a number of fund structures domiciled in Ireland. At acquisition, AIB/BNY had $210 billion assets under administration and employed 600 staff in its Dublin and Cork offices.
4. Discontinued Operations
On October 1, 2006, the Company acquired JPMorgan Chase's corporate trust business and JPMorgan Chase acquired the Company's Retail Business. The Company adopted discontinued operations accounting for its Retail Business. Also included in the sales agreement are provisions related to transitional services that will be provided for a period of up to 8 months after closing, subject to extensions. The results from continuing operations exclude the results of the Company's Retail Business and include the operations of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business only after October 1, 2006.
Results for all the Retail Business are reported separately as discontinued operations for all periods presented. The assets and liabilities of the businesses sold are included in assets of discontinued operations held for sale and liabilities of discontinued operations held for sale on the consolidated balance sheet. Net interest income has been computed by allocating investment securities and federal funds sold and related interest income to discontinued operations to match the amount and duration of the assets sold with the amount and duration of the liabilities sold.
Summarized financial information for discontinued operations related to the Retail Business is as follows:
 
Assets and liabilities of discontinued operations held for sale as of March 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006 were not significant.
5. Goodwill and Intangibles
Goodwill by reportable segment is as follows:
 
The changes in goodwill during the first quarter of 2007 were as follows:
 
 
Intangible Assets
 
The aggregate amortization expense of intangibles was $28 million and $13 million for the quarters ended March 31, 2007 and 2006, respectively. Estimated amortization expense for current intangibles for the next five years is as follows:
 
6. Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit losses is maintained at a level that, in management's judgment, is adequate to absorb probable losses associated with specifically identified loans, as well as estimated probable credit losses inherent in the remainder of the credit portfolio at the balance sheet date. Management's judgment includes the following factors, among others: risks of individual credits; past experience; the volume, composition, and growth of the credit portfolio; and economic conditions.
The Company conducts a quarterly portfolio review to determine the adequacy of its allowance for credit losses. All commercial loans over $1 million are assigned to specific risk categories. Smaller commercial and consumer exposures are evaluated on a pooled basis and assigned to specific risk categories. Following this review, senior management of the Company analyzes the results and determines the allowance for credit losses. The Company's Board of Directors reviews the allowance at the end of each quarter.
The portion of the allowance for credit losses allocated to impaired loans (nonaccrual commercial loans over $1 million) is measured by the difference between their recorded value and fair value. Fair value is determined by one of the following: present value of the expected future cash flows from borrowers, the market value of the loan, or the fair value of the collateral. See "Critical Accounting Policies" and "Allowance" in the MD&A section for additional information.
Commercial loans are placed on nonaccrual status when collateral is insufficient and principal or interest is past due 90 days or more, or when there is reasonable doubt that interest or principal will be collected. Accrued interest is usually reversed when a loan is placed on nonaccrual status. Interest payments received on nonaccrual loans may be recognized as income or applied to principal depending upon management's judgment. Nonaccrual loans are restored to accrual status when principal and interest are current or they become fully collateralized. Consumer loans are not classified as nonperforming assets, but are charged off and interest accrued is suspended based upon an established delinquency schedule determined by product. Real estate acquired in satisfaction of loans is carried in other assets at the lower of the recorded investment in the property or fair value minus estimated costs to sell.
Transactions in the allowance for credit losses are summarized as follows:
 
7. Other Assets
 
8. Net Interest Income
 
9. Capital Transactions
The Company has 5 million authorized shares of Class A convertible preferred stock having a par value of $2.00 per share. At December 31, 2006, 3,000 shares were outstanding. On January 22, 2007, the Company redeemed 300 shares of Class A convertible preferred stock at a per share redemption price of $25 plus accrued dividends of $11.03. The remaining 2,700 shares were converted into Company common stock with shareholders receiving 7.39644 shares of Company common stock for each share of Class A convertible preferred stock.
In addition to the Class A preferred stock, the Company has 5 million authorized shares of preferred stock having no par value, with no shares outstanding at March 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006, respectively.
On April 10, 2007, the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of 22 cents per share payable May 4, 2007 to shareholders of record on April 25, 2007.
The Company repurchased 363,080 shares of the Company's common stock in the first quarter of 2007.
10. Earnings Per Share
The following table illustrates the computations of basic and diluted earnings per share:
 
11. Employee Benefit Plans
The components of net periodic benefit cost are as follows:
 
12. Income Taxes
The statutory federal income tax rate is reconciled to the Company's effective income tax rate below:
 
The Company adopted the provisions of FASB Interpretation No. 48 ("FIN 48"), "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxesan interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109," on January 1, 2007. As a result of the implementation of FIN 48, the Company recognized a $27 million increase in its liability for uncertain tax benefits ("Tax Reserves"), which reduced the January 1, 2007, retained earnings balance. The Company's total Tax Reserves as of the date of adoption were $250 million. If these Tax Reserves were unnecessary, $174 million would affect the effective tax rate in future periods and $76 million would impact deferred taxes. Included in the above Tax Reserves is accrued interest and penalties, where applicable, of $31 million. The Company recognizes accrued interest and penalties, if applicable, related to income taxes in income tax expense.
The Company's federal consolidated income tax returns are closed to examination through 1995. Although the IRS has completed its examination for 1996 and 1997, at this time a formal revenue agent's report has not been received. The Company believes it is unlikely that there will be any changes to those years that would affect the Tax Reserves. The IRS is currently examining the Company's
consolidated income tax returns for tax years 1998 through 2002. The Company's New York State and New York City return examinations have been completed through 1993. New York State and New York City are currently examining the Company's tax returns for the years 1994 through 1996. The Company's United Kingdom income tax returns are closed through 1999.
The Company has Tax Reserves related to transactions occurring in the years 1998 through 2002 that are currently under examination by the IRS. The outcome of such examination is not yet determinable. Additionally, the Company has Tax Reserves for uncertain tax benefits associated with certain tax credits. The Company does not expect that the resolution of these and other issues over the next twelve months will have a material impact on its financial statements.
13. Derivatives and Hedging Relationships
Derivative contracts, such as futures contracts, forwards, interest rate swaps, foreign currency swaps and options and similar products used in trading activities, are recorded at fair value. The Company does not recognize gains or losses at the inception of derivative transactions if the fair value is not determined based upon observable market transactions and market data. Gains and losses are included in foreign exchange and other trading activities in noninterest income. Unrealized gains and losses are reported on a gross basis in trading account assets and trading liabilities, after taking into consideration master netting agreements.
The Company enters into various derivative financial instruments for non-trading purposes primarily as part of its asset/liability management ("ALM") process. These derivatives are designated as fair value and cash flow hedges of certain assets and liabilities when the Company enters into the derivative contracts. Gains and losses associated with fair value hedges are recorded in income as well as any change in the value of the related hedged item. Gains and losses on cash flow hedges are recorded in other comprehensive income. If a derivative used in ALM does not qualify as a hedge it is marked to market and the gain or loss is included in net interest income.
The Company formally documents all relationships between hedging instruments and hedged items, as well as its risk-management objectives and strategy for undertaking various hedge transactions. This process includes linking all derivatives that are designated as fair value hedges to specific assets or liabilities on the balance sheet.
The Company formally assesses both at the hedge's inception and on an ongoing basis whether the derivatives that are used in hedging transactions are highly effective and whether those derivatives are expected to remain highly effective in future periods. The Company evaluates ineffectiveness in terms of amounts that could impact a hedge's ability to qualify for hedge accounting and the risk that the hedge could result in more than a de minimus amount of ineffectiveness. At inception, the potential causes of ineffectiveness related to each of its hedges is assessed to determine if the Company can expect the hedge to be highly effective over the life of the transaction and to determine the method for evaluating effectiveness on an ongoing basis. Recognizing that changes in the value of derivatives used for hedging or the value of hedged items could result in significant ineffectiveness, the Company has processes in place designed to identify and evaluate such changes when they occur. Quarterly, the Company performs a quantitative effectiveness assessment and records any ineffectiveness.
The Company utilizes interest rate swap agreements to manage its exposure to interest rate fluctuations. For hedges of fixed-rate loans, asset-backed securities, deposits and long-term debt, the hedge documentation specifies the terms of the hedged items and interest rate swaps and indicates that the derivative is hedging a fixed rate item and is a fair value hedge, that the hedge exposure is to the changes in the fair value of the hedged item due to changes in benchmark interest rates, and that the strategy is to eliminate fair value variability by converting fixed rate interest payments to LIBOR.
The fixed-rate loans hedged generally have a maturity of 9 to 12 years and are not callable. These loans are hedged with "pay fixed rate, receive variable rate" swaps with similar notional amounts, maturities, and fixed rate coupons. The swaps are not callable. At March 31, 2007, $42 million of loans were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $42 million.
The securities hedged generally have a weighted average life of 10 years or less and are callable six months prior to maturity. These securities are hedged with pay fixed rate, receive variable rate swaps of like maturity, repricing and fixed-rate coupon. The swaps are callable six months prior to maturity. At March 31, 2007, $227 million of securities were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $227 million.
The fixed-rate deposits hedged generally have original maturities of 1 to 12 years (21% are one year deposits) and, except for three deposits, are not callable. These deposits are hedged with receive fixed rate, pay variable rate swaps of similar maturity, repricing and fixed rate coupon. The swaps are not callable except for the three that hedge the callable deposits. At March 31, 2007, $880 million of deposits were hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $880 million.
The fixed-rate long-term debt hedged generally has an original maturity of 4 to 30 years. The Company issues both callable and non- callable debt. The non-callable debt is hedged with simple interest rate swaps similar to those described for deposits. Callable debt is hedged with callable swaps where the call dates of the swaps exactly match the call dates of the debt. At March 31, 2007, $6,212 million of debt was hedged with interest rate swaps which had notional values of $6,237 million.
In addition to the fair value hedges discussed above, the Company has two cash flow hedges utilizing interest rate swaps to hedge the variability in expected future cash flows attributable to floating rates on an a deposit and a long-term debt issue. The hedge documentation specifies the terms of the hedged items and interest rate swaps and indicates that the derivative is hedging future variable interest payments and is a cash flow hedge, that the hedge exposure is the variability in interest payments, and that the strategy is to eliminate variability by converting floating rate interest payments to fixed payments. For cash flow hedges the interest rate swap is marked to market with the changes in value recorded in other comprehensive income. The amount recognized as other comprehensive income for the cash flow hedge is reclassified to net interest income as interest is realized on the hedged item.
The deposit hedged has a principal amount of $275 million and has a LIBOR based floating rate and an 18 month original maturity. The deposit is hedged with a receive LIBOR, pay fixed rate swap with the same maturity and interest payment dates as the deposit to eliminate the variability in interest payments on the deposit. During the next twelve months, net losses of less than $1 million (pre-tax) included in other comprehensive income are expected to be reclassified to income.
The long-term debt hedged has a principal amount of $400 million and has a LIBOR based floating rate and a 2 year original maturity. The debt is hedged with a receive LIBOR, pay fixed rate swap with the same maturity and interest payment dates as the debt to eliminate the variability in interest payments on the debt. During the next twelve months, net losses of less than $2 million (pre-tax) included in other comprehensive income are expected to be reclassified to income.
In addition, the Company enters into foreign exchange hedges. The Company uses forward foreign exchange contracts with maturities of 12 months or less to hedge its Sterling and Euro foreign exchange exposure with respect to forecasted expense transactions in non-U.S. entities which have the U.S. dollar as their functional currency. As of March 31, 2007, the hedged forecasted foreign currency transactions and linked foreign exchange forward hedges were $93 million with $3 million (pre-tax) gains recorded in other comprehensive income. These gains are expected to be reclassified to expense over the next nine months.
Forward foreign exchange contracts are also used to hedge the value of the Company's investments in foreign subsidiaries. These forward contracts have a maturity of less than six months. The derivatives employed are designated as net investment hedges of changes in value of the Company's foreign investment due to exchange rates, such that changes in value of the forward exchange contracts offset the changes in value of the foreign investments due to changes in foreign exchange rates. The change in fair market value of these contracts is deferred and reported within accumulated translation adjustments in shareholders' equity, net of tax effects. At March 31, 2007, foreign exchange contracts, with notional amounts totaling $1,894 million, were designated as hedges of corresponding amounts of net investments.
The Company discontinues hedge accounting prospectively when it determines that a derivative is no longer an effective hedge, the derivative expires or is sold, or management discontinues the derivative's hedge designation.
Ineffectiveness related to derivatives and hedging relationships was recorded in income as follows:
 
Other includes ineffectiveness recorded on foreign exchange hedges.
14. Commitments and Contingent Liabilities
In the normal course of business, various commitments and contingent liabilities are outstanding which are not reflected in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Management does not expect any material losses to result from these matters.
The Company's significant trading and off-balance sheet risks are securities, foreign currency and interest rate risk management products, commercial lending commitments, letters of credit, and securities lending indemnifications. The Company assumes these risks to reduce interest rate and foreign currency risks, to provide customers with the ability to meet credit and liquidity needs, to hedge foreign currency and interest rate risks, and to trade for its own account. These items involve, to varying degrees, credit, foreign exchange, and interest rate risk not recognized in the balance sheet. The Company's off-balance sheet risks are managed and monitored in manners similar to those used for on-balance sheet risks. There are no significant industry concentrations of such risks.
A summary of the notional amount of the Company's off-balance sheet credit transactions, net of participations, at March 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006 follows:
 
The total potential loss on undrawn commitments, standby and commercial letters of credit, and securities lending indemnifications is equal to the total notional amount if drawn upon, which does not consider the value of any collateral. Since many of the commitments are expected to expire without being drawn upon, the total amount does not necessarily represent future cash requirements. The allowance for lending-related commitments at March 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006 was $135 million and $150 million.
A securities lending transaction is a fully collateralized transaction in which the owner of a security agrees to lend the security through an agent (the Company) to a borrower, usually a broker/dealer or bank, on an open, overnight or term basis, under the terms of a prearranged contract, which generally matures in less than 90 days. The Company generally lends securities with indemnification against broker default. The Company generally requires the borrower to provide 102% cash collateral which is monitored on a daily basis, thus reducing credit risk. Security lending transactions are generally entered into only with highly-rated counterparties. At March 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006, securities lending indemnifications were secured by collateral of $407.3 billion and $405.5 billion, respectively.
Standby letters of credit principally support corporate obligations and include $1.1 billion that were collateralized with cash and securities on March 31, 2007 and $1.0 billion on December 31, 2006. At March 31, 2007, approximately $6.8 billion of the standby letters of credit will expire within one year, and the remaining balance will expire between one to five years.
The notional amounts for other off-balance sheet risks (See "Trading Activities" in the MD&A section) express the dollar volume of the transactions; however, credit risk is much smaller. The Company performs credit reviews and enters into netting agreements to minimize the credit risk of foreign currency and interest rate risk management products. The Company enters into offsetting positions to reduce exposure to foreign exchange and interest rate risk.
Other
The Company has provided standard representations for underwriting agreements, acquisition and divestiture agreements, sales of loans and commitments, and other similar types of arrangements and customary indemnification for claims and legal proceedings related to its provision of financial services. Insurance has been purchased to mitigate certain of these risks. The Company is a minority equity investor in, and member of, several industry clearing or settlement exchanges through which foreign exchange, securities, or other transactions settle. Certain of these industry clearing or settlement exchanges require their members to guarantee their obligations and liabilities or to provide financial support in the event other partners do not honor their obligations. It is not possible to estimate a maximum potential amount of payments that could be required with such agreements.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company makes certain investments that have tax consequences. From time to time, the IRS may question or challenge the tax position taken by the Company. The Company engaged in certain types of structured cross-border leveraged leasing investments, referred to as "LILOs", prior to mid-1999 that the IRS has challenged. In 2004, the IRS proposed adjustments to the Company's tax treatment of these transactions. On February 28, 2006, the Company settled this matter with the IRS relating to LILO transactions closed in 1996 and 1997. The settlement did not affect 2006 net income, as the impact of the settlement was fully reserved.
The Company's 1998 leveraged lease transactions are in a subsequent audit cycle and were not part of the settlement. The Company believes that a comparable settlement for 1998 may be possible, given the similarity between these leases and the settled leases. However, negotiations are ongoing and the treatment of the 1998 leases may still be litigated if an acceptable settlement cannot be reached. Under current U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, if the 1998 leases are settled on a basis comparable to the 1996 and 1997 leases, the Company would not expect the settlement of the 1998 leases to have an impact on net income, based on existing reserves.
In the fourth quarter of 2005 the Company deposited funds with the IRS in anticipation of reaching a settlement on all of its LILO investments.
On February 11, 2005, the IRS released Notice 2005-13, which identified certain lease investments known as "SILOs" as potentially subject to IRS challenge. The Company believes that certain of its lease investments entered into prior to 2004 may be consistent with transactions described in the notice. Although it is likely the IRS will challenge the tax benefits associated with these leases in 2007, the Company remains confident that its tax treatment of the leases complied with statutory, administrative and judicial authority existing at the time they were entered into.
In 2001 and 2002, the Company entered into various structured transactions that involved, among other things, the payment of U.K. corporate income taxes that were credited against the Company's U.S. corporate income tax liability. The IRS is currently reviewing these transactions and it is likely that some or all of the credits will be challenged upon completion of the review. If necessary the Company will vigorously defend its position and believes that any tax benefits associated with these transactions were consistent with the applicable statutory, judicial and administrative authority.
The Company currently believes it has adequate tax reserves to cover its LILO exposure and any other potential tax exposures, based on a probability assessment of various potential outcomes. Probabilities and outcomes are reviewed as events unfold, and adjustments to the reserves are made when appropriate.
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries are routinely defendants in or parties to a number of pending and potential legal actions, including actions brought on behalf of various classes of claimants, and regulatory matters. Claims for significant monetary damages are asserted in certain of these actions and proceedings. Due to the inherent difficulty of predicting the outcome of such matters, the Company cannot ascertain what the eventual outcome of these matters will be; however, based on current knowledge and after consultation with legal counsel, the Company does not believe that judgments or settlements, if any, arising from pending or potential legal actions or regulatory matters, either individually or in the aggregate, after giving effect to applicable reserves, will have a material adverse effect on the consolidated financial position or liquidity of the Company although they could have a material effect on net income for a given period. The Company intends to defend itself vigorously against all of the claims asserted in these legal actions.
See discussion of contingent legal matters in the "Legal and Regulatory Proceedings" section.

Exhibit 99.5
PART IFINANCIAL INFORMATION
Item 1. Financial Statements.
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENT (unaudited)
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
2    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET (unaudited)
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    3
Table of Contents
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS (unaudited)
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
4    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CHANGES IN SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY (unaudited)
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    5
Table of Contents
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 1  Basis of presentation and informational disclosures
Basis of presentation
The unaudited consolidated financial statements of Mellon Financial Corporation and its subsidiaries are prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for interim financial information and with the instructions to Form 10-Q and Rule 10-01 of Regulation S-X. These financial statements should be read in conjunction with Mellon's 2006 Annual Report on Form 10-K. In the opinion of management, all normal recurring adjustments necessary for a fair presentation of the financial position and results of operations for the periods covered have been included. In addition to reclassifications related to discontinued operations and reclassifications in connection with the realignment of business sectors described below, other reclassifications are occasionally made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
For details of guarantees, see "Other guarantees and indemnities" in the table on page 37, and the paragraphs under the subheading "Other guarantees and indemnities" on pages 37 and 38. The information in the table and those paragraphs are incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
As part of the planning process for the integration of Mellon and The Bank of New York after the closing of the proposed merger, during the first quarter of 2007 we realigned our business sectors, creating the Issuer Services and Treasury Services sectors and eliminating the Payment Solutions & Investor Services (PS&IS) sector. The Issuer Services sector consists of Mellon Investor Services (stock transfer), which was previously included in the PS&IS sector. The Treasury Services sector consists of Working Capital Solutions (global cash management) and Mellon Financial Markets (capital markets), both previously included in the PS&IS sector, as well as Mellon Institutional Banking (large corporate banking), which was previously included in the Other sector. All prior periods have been reclassified for these changes. In addition, we renamed the Mellon Asset Management sector to Asset Management and the Private Wealth Management sector to Wealth Management. There were no changes to the Asset Servicing sector. These changes did not affect the operations of these business lines or net income.
In addition, several new line items have been created and/or renamed on the income statement and balance sheet:
Income statement:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
6    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Balance sheet:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations or net income.
Pension and other postretirement benefits
SFAS No. 132 (revised 2003), "Employers' Disclosures about Pensions and other Postretirement Benefits, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88 and 106" requires interim period disclosures of the components of net periodic benefit cost.
Mellon expects to make cash contributions to its funded defined benefit pension plans, principally outside the U.S., of approximately $13 million for the remainder of 2007. Cash contributions totaled $4 million in the first quarter of 2007.
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    7
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 2  Contingent and deferred consideration related to acquisitions
There were no acquisitions completed during the first quarter of 2007. Additional consideration of $22 million for prior acquisitions was paid in the first quarter of 2007, including $20 million for DPM Mellon.
We record contingent purchase payments when amounts are determinable. Amounts generally become determinable and payable when an acquisition reaches a certain level of performance. At March 31, 2007, we are potentially obligated to pay contingent additional consideration which, using reasonable assumptions for the performance of the acquired companies and joint ventures, could range from approximately $145 million to $350 million over the next three years. None of the potential contingent additional consideration was recorded as goodwill at March 31, 2007.
Mellon owns 70% of Mellon Financial Services Asset Management S.A., a Brazilian institutional asset management and asset servicing company. The minority interest owners have attempted to exercise certain put rights, which obligate our subsidiary to purchase the remaining 30% of the company. The purchase price, as defined, is based on the levels of assets under management and administration, among other things. The minority interest owners and Mellon disagree on the computation of the purchase price. This dispute is in binding arbitration. We offered $6 million for the remaining 30% of the company and the minority interest owners made an initial request of $61 million, based upon exchange rates at March 31, 2007.
Note 3  Adoption of new accounting interpretation and staff position
FIN No. 48-Taxes
Effective Jan. 1, 2007, we adopted FASB Interpretation (FIN) No. 48, "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes"an Interpretation of SFAS No. 109, "Accounting for Income Taxes." FASB defines the threshold for recognizing the benefits of tax return positions in the financial statements as "more-likely-than-not" to be sustained by a taxing authority. The term "more-likely-than-not" means a likelihood of more than 50%. The impact of adopting FIN No. 48 was a direct increase to the beginning balance of our retained earnings of approximately $11 million and reported as a change in accounting principle. Pursuant to FIN No. 48, we will continue to record interest and penalties on income tax assessments as income tax expense. As of the date of adoption, we have approximately $18 million of interest accrued for potential income tax exposures and $37 million of unrecognized tax benefits that, if recognized, would affect the effective tax rate. Over the next 12 months, Mellon estimates it may increase state tax reserves by approximately $10 million for various state tax positions expected to be taken in the current year and may decrease federal tax reserves by approximately $3 million for issues that may no longer warrant a tax reserve following a settlement with the IRS for the years 1994 to 2003. Years subject to examination include Federal income taxes from 2004 to present, California from 2000 to present, Massachusetts from 2001 to present, New York state from 2002 to present and the United Kingdom from 2001 to present.
FSP 13-2 Taxes
Effective Jan. 1, 2007, we adopted FASB Staff Position (FSP) 13-2, "Accounting for a Change or Projected Change in the Timing of Cash Flows Relating to Income Taxes Generated by a Leveraged Lease Transaction." FSP 13-2 amends SFAS No. 13, "Accounting for Leases," by requiring lessors to recalculate the rate of return and periodic income allocation for leveraged lease transactions when there is a change or projected change in the timing of income tax cash flows related to leases. The Staff Position requires lessors to reassess projected income tax cash flows using a FIN No. 48 model for recognition and measurement. The impact of adopting FSP 13-2 was a direct reduction to the beginning balance of our retained earnings of approximately $17 million and reported as a change in accounting principle.
 
8    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 4  Discontinued operations
In the first quarter of 2007, a $9 million after-tax net gain on disposals was recorded, resulting primarily from the sale of our insurance premium financing company, AFCO Credit Corporation, and its Canadian affiliate, CAFO, Inc.
In August 2006, we announced a definitive agreement to sell AFCO and CAFO. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and asset servicing businesses. The sale closed on Jan. 2, 2007 resulting in a $12 million after-tax net gain in the first quarter of 2007. In the third quarter of 2006, we applied discontinued operations accounting to this business and the income statements for all periods were restated. The restatement primarily resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in financing-related fee revenue; a reduction in noninterest expenses; and a slight change in continuing earnings per share for certain periods.
In December 2006, Mellon sold its ownership interest in the direct and indirect portfolios of Mellon Ventures, our venture capital business. This decision was based upon the determination that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and asset servicing businesses. A substantial portion of the sale was completed in December 2006 with subsequent closings during the first quarter of 2007. An additional $5 million after-tax loss on the sale of this business was recorded in the first quarter of 2007, resulting primarily from an adjustment to the carrying value of a receivable recorded as part of the settlement of the transaction. We applied discontinued operations accounting to this business in the fourth quarter of 2006 and the income statements for all periods were restated. This restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of asset/investment income; a reduction in noninterest expenses; an increase in net interest revenue; and a change in continuing earnings per share.
 
In accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP), the results of the businesses discussed above are reflected as discontinued operations in all income statements presented. Because the lines of business included in discontinued operations were discrete lines of business serving classes of customers no longer served by Mellon's continuing lines of business, the disposition of these businesses is not expected to have a material impact on continuing operations going forward.
All information in these Financial Statements and Notes reflects continuing operations, unless otherwise noted.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    9
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 5  Securities
 
Note: There were no gross realized gains or gross realized losses on sales of securities available for sale in the first quarter of 2007. At March 31, 2007 and Dec. 31, 2006, securities issued by the U.S. Government and its agencies and U.S. Government sponsored agencies (shown in the table above) exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity. At March 31, 2007 and Dec. 31, 2006, there were no other issuers that exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity.
 
10    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Mellon's portfolio of mortgage-backed securities is 100% AAA- rated.
Temporarily impaired securities
The unrealized loss of $122 million at March 31, 2007 is related to the movement in interest rates. Nearly all of the securities with unrealized losses are AAA-rated or carry government agency guarantees. Approximately 93% of the unrealized losses on these 1,028 investments have been in a continuous unrealized loss position for more than 12 months. Management believes the collection of the contractual principal and interest is probable and therefore all unrealized losses are considered to be temporary. As shown in the table on the previous page, unrealized gains totaled $57 million in the available-for-sale and investment portfolios at March 31, 2007.
Note 6  Goodwill and intangible assets
Goodwill
The following table shows the changes to goodwill, by business sector, for the first quarter of 2007.
 
Acquired intangible assets
 
We amortize intangible assets over their estimated useful lives. During the first three months of 2007, the net carrying amount of acquired intangible assets decreased $10 million as amortization expense of $12 million was partially offset by the effect of foreign exchange rates on non-U.S. dollar denominated intangible assets.
Based upon the current level of intangible assets, the estimated annual amortization expense for the years 2007 through 2012 is as follows:
 
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    11
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
At March 31, 2007, $929 million of goodwill and acquired intangible assets is tax deductible and $1.943 billion is non-tax deductible.
Note 7  Other assets
 
Note 8  Long-term debt
At March 31, 2007 and Dec. 31, 2006, Long-term debt included notes and debentures (with original maturities over one year) of $3.648 billion and $3.641 billion, respectively, and junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures held by trusts that issued guaranteed capital debt securities of $1.414 billion and $1.412 billion, respectively.
Note 9  Net interest revenue
 
Note 10  Business sectors
For details of our business sectors, see the paragraphs under "Business sectors" on page 26, the tables and paragraphs on page 27 and the paragraphs on page 28, as well as the "Other sector" section on page 34 through the paragraph discussing economic capital. The tables and information in those paragraphs are incorporated by reference into these Notes to Financial Statements.
 
12    Mellon Financial Corporation
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 11  Supplemental information to the consolidated statement of cash flows
 
Note 12  Legal proceedings
A discussion of legal actions and proceedings against Mellon and our subsidiaries and certain former subsidiaries is presented in Part II, Item 1, of this Form 10-Q.
Note 13  Proposed merger with The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
On Dec. 3, 2006, Mellon entered into an agreement to merge with The Bank of New York Company, Inc., which would create a securities servicing and asset management company with, on a pro forma basis, as of March 31, 2007, more than $18 trillion in assets under custody and administration and over $1.2 trillion in assets under management. The Bank of New York is headquartered in New York City and employs approximately 23,000.
Under the terms of the merger agreement, which was amended and restated on Feb. 23, 2007 and again on March 30, 2007, Mellon and The Bank of New York will each merge into a new company called The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, in which Mellon shareholders will receive one share of common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date and The Bank of New York shareholders will receive .9434 shares of common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date. The parties anticipate incurring merger and integration related costs of approximately $1.3 billion over a three year period, of which $19 million was incurred by Mellon in the fourth quarter of 2006 and the first quarter of 2007. A portion of these costs will be recorded as goodwill at the close of the transaction.
Mellon has entered into a stock option agreement with The Bank of New York, in which Mellon has granted The Bank of New York an option to purchase up to 82,641,656 shares of Mellon common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $40.05 or the closing sale price of Mellon common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may The Bank of New York acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of Mellon common stock under this stock option agreement. The Bank of New York cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving Mellon and a third party.
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire Mellon prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, Mellon may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of Mellon common stock purchased by The Bank of New York under the option at a predetermined price, or The Bank of New York may choose to surrender the option to Mellon for a cash payment of $725 million. In no event will the total profit received by The Bank of New York with respect to this option exceed $825 million.
Mellon has entered into a stock option agreement with The Bank of New York, in which The Bank of New York has granted Mellon an option to purchase up to 149,621,546 shares of The Bank of New York's common stock at a price per share equal to the lesser of $35.48 or the closing sale price of The Bank of New York's common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the exercise date; but in no case may Mellon acquire more than 19.9% of the outstanding shares of The Bank of New York's
common stock under this stock option agreement. Mellon cannot exercise the option unless specified triggering events occur. These events generally relate to business combinations or acquisition transactions involving The Bank of New York and a third party.
 
Mellon Financial Corporation    13
Table of Contents
(continued)
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The option could have the effect of discouraging a third party from trying to acquire The Bank of New York prior to completion of the transaction or termination of the merger agreement. Upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, The Bank of New York may be required to repurchase the option and/or any shares of The Bank of New York's common stock purchased by Mellon under the option at a predetermined price, or Mellon may choose to surrender the option to The Bank of New York for a cash payment of $1.15 billion. In no event will the total profit received by Mellon with respect to this option exceed $1.3 billion.
The board of directors of both companies have unanimously approved the merger agreement and adopted a resolution recommending the adoption of the merger agreement by its respective shareholders. Each party has agreed to put these matters before their respective shareholders for consideration. Subject to satisfaction of various conditions of closing, the merger is currently expected to close early in the third quarter of 2007.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation filed a registration statement containing a joint proxy statement/prospectus regarding the proposed merger with the SEC in late February and filed amendments to the joint proxy statement/prospectus with the SEC in April. The SEC declared the registration statement effective on April 17, 2007. Mellon and The Bank of New York commenced mailing the joint proxy statement/prospectus to their respective shareholders on April 19, 2007. Mellon and The Bank of New York will hold separate special shareholder meetings on May 24, 2007 to approve the merger and related matters. April 12, 2007 is the record date for shareholders entitled to vote at the special shareholders meetings.
 
14    Mellon Financial Corporation

Exhibit 99.6
The following Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Balance Sheet combines the respective historical Consolidated Balance Sheets of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon Financial") giving effect to the transaction as if it had been completed on March 31, 2007. The pro forma balance sheet assumes that the proposed transaction is accounted for as a purchase of Mellon Financial by Bank of New York and, accordingly, includes adjustments to record assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial at their estimated fair values, which are subject to further adjustment as additional information becomes available and additional analyses are performed. The related pro forma adjustments are described in the accompanying Notes to the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
The following Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Statements of Income for the three months ended March 31, 2007 and year ended December 31, 2006 combine the respective historical Consolidated Statements of Income of Bank of New York and Mellon Financial giving effect to the proposed transaction as if it had become effective at January 1, 2006 as an acquisition by Bank of New York of Mellon Financial using the purchase method of accounting and giving effect to the related pro forma adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
We anticipate that the proposed transaction will provide The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("Newco") with financial benefits that include reduced operating expenses. The pro forma information does not reflect the benefits of expected cost savings, opportunities to earn additional revenue, the impact of restructuring and transaction-related costs and, accordingly, does not attempt to predict or suggest future results. It also does not necessarily reflect what the historical results of Newco would have been had the proposed transaction been completed during these periods.
The unaudited pro forma combined consolidated financial information and notes are presented for illustrative purposes only. They include various estimates, which are subject to material change, and may not necessarily be indicative of the financial position or results of operations that would have occurred if the proposed transaction had been consummated as of the applicable date or which may be attained in the future. This pro forma financial information and notes should be read in conjunction with, and are qualified in their entirety by, the historical financial statements, including the notes thereto, of Bank of New York and Mellon Financial.
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 1: PURCHASE BUSINESS COMBINATION
The transaction will be accounted for as an acquisition of Mellon Financial by Bank of New York using the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, the assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial will be recorded at their respective fair values on the date the transaction is completed. The transaction will be effected by the issuance of Newco common stock, $0.01 par value, to Bank of New York shareholders and Mellon Financial shareholders. Each share of Bank of New York common stock will be exchanged for 0.9434 shares of Newco common stock, and each share of Mellon Financial common stock will be exchanged for one share of Newco common stock. The shares of Newco common stock issued to effect the transaction will be recorded at $39.86 per share. This amount was determined by averaging the closing price of Bank of New York common stock for the two trading days before the December 4, 2006 announcement of the transaction and the two trading days after the announcement of the transaction (which includes the day of the announcement), and dividing by the Bank of New York exchange ratio.
If a Bank of New York shareholder would otherwise be entitled to a fractional share of Newco common stock, cash will be issued instead of such fractional share of Newco common stock; the pro forma financial statements do not present an estimate of such cash, which is not expected to be material and will be funded by cash on hand.
The pro forma financial information includes estimated adjustments to record certain assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial at their respective fair values. Bank of New York and Mellon Financial are in the process of reviewing their accounting and reporting policies and, as a result of this review, it may be necessary to further reclassify the company's financial statements to conform to those classifications that are determined by the combined company to be most appropriate (see Notes 8 and 9). While some reclassifications of prior periods have been included in the unaudited pro forma combined consolidated financial information, further reclassifications may be necessary upon the completion of this review. Material intercompany transactions have been eliminated from the unaudited pro forma combined consolidated financial information. The pro forma adjustments are subject to updates as additional information becomes available and as additional analyses are performed.
We expect to realize increased revenue and reduced operating expenses following the transaction which are not reflected in this pro forma financial information. No assurance can be given with respect to any level of such increased revenue and reduced operating expenses.
The final allocation of the purchase price will be determined after the transaction is completed and after thorough analyses to determine the fair values of Mellon Financial's tangible and identifiable intangible assets and liabilities as of the date the transaction is completed. Any change in the fair value of the net assets of Mellon Financial will change the amount of the purchase price allocable to goodwill. Additionally, changes to Mellon Financial's equity, including dividends and net income from April 1, 2007 through the date the transaction is completed, will also change the amount of goodwill recorded. The final adjustments may be materially different from the unaudited pro forma adjustments presented herein.
The goodwill recorded in connection with the transaction is not subject to amortization and none is deductible for tax purposes. The customer relationships, customer contract-based and core deposit intangibles will be amortized over their estimated economic lives based on the pattern of usage or consumption, if determinable. Any additional intangibles that are identified in connection with the transaction will be amortized in accordance with the provisions of SFAS No. 142, such that any with an indefinite life will not be subject to amortization, and any with a finite economic life will be amortized over the estimated useful life.
Bank of New York and Mellon Financial are in the process of determining the appropriate methodology to allocate the goodwill, customer relationships, deposit base and other indefinite-lived intangibles to reportable segments and expect to finalize the analysis after the completion of the transaction.
NOTE 2: PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION
The pro forma financial information for the transaction is included as of March 31, 2007 and for the three months ended March 31, 2007 and the year ended December 31, 2006. The pro forma adjustments in the pro forma financial statements reflect the right of each Mellon Financial shareholder to receive one share of Newco common stock for each share of Mellon Financial common stock held by such holder of record, based on the number of shares of Mellon Financial common stock that were outstanding on March 31, 2007. The unaudited pro forma financial information presented in the pro forma financial statements is not necessarily indicative of the results of operations in future periods or the future financial position of Newco.
The pro forma balance sheet adjustments reflect the issuance of 1.132 billion shares of Newco common stock with an aggregate par value of $11 million; an increase in paid-in capital of $15.2 billion as shown in Note 4; goodwill of $11.5 billion as shown in Note 3; and customer relationships and customer contract-based, core deposit and other indefinite-lived intangibles of $2.2 billion, $0.2 billion and $2.2 billion, respectively. Also included in the pro forma balance sheet adjustments is an increase in other liabilities, which includes estimated exit costs of $200 million, transaction costs of $45 million, other purchase accounting accruals and an increase of $1.7 billion in deferred income taxes.
When the transaction is completed, Bank of New York options will be exchanged for stock options in Newco and the option price per share will be adjusted for the 0.9434 exchange ratio.
Mellon Financial options will be exchanged for stock options in Newco and the option price per share will not be adjusted as the exchange ratio is one Mellon Financial share for one Newco share. All unvested Mellon Financial options granted prior to December 4, 2006 will be accelerated upon approval of the transaction, except for those for which waivers to acceleration were elected. Vested stock options issued by Newco in exchange for options held by employees and directors of Mellon Financial are considered part of the purchase price. Accordingly, the purchase price includes an estimated fair value of stock options of $344 million.
The fair value of Newco options that will be issued in exchange for Mellon Financial options was estimated by using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with market assumptions. Option pricing models require the use of highly subjective market assumptions, including expected stock price volatility, which if changed can materially affect fair value estimates. The more significant assumptions used in estimating the fair value include volatility of 22 percent, a dividend yield of 2.36 percent, an expected life of 50-75 percent of the remaining contractual terms and a risk-free interest rate for U.S. government bonds having a remaining life equal to the respective options' expected lives.
The estimated exit cost liabilities assumed in the transaction consist principally of personnel-related costs, which include involuntary termination benefits for Mellon Financial employees to be severed in connection with the transaction, relocation costs for continuing Mellon Financial employees and costs to cancel contracts of Mellon Financial that will provide no future benefit to Newco. The estimated $200 million of exit cost liabilities include only those costs associated with Mellon Financial. Bank of New York estimated transaction costs of $45 million are included in goodwill.
During the three months ended March 31, 2007 and year ended December 31, 2006, Bank of New York and Mellon Financial acquired businesses or portions of businesses which are included herein only from the date of completion. Additional information, including selected pro forma information, related to acquisitions of Bank of New York may be found in Note 3, Acquisitions and Dispositions, to its consolidated financial statements included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
NOTE 3: PURCHASE PRICE AND GOODWILL
The computation of the purchase price, the allocation of the purchase price to the net assets of Mellon Financial based on fair values estimated at March 31, 2007, the estimated intangibles and the resulting amount of goodwill follows:
 
See Note 5 for footnote explanations.
 
NOTE 4: PRO FORMA CONSOLIDATED SHAREHOLDERS' EQUITY
The pro forma adjustments related to shareholders' equity on the pro forma combined consolidated balance sheet at March 31, 2007, are presented below.
 
NOTE 5: PRO FORMA ADJUSTMENTS TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(A) Adjustment to write off historical Mellon Financial goodwill and intangibles from prior acquisitions.
(B) Adjustment to fair value Mellon Financial's held-to-maturity investment securities. The adjustment will be recognized over the respective remaining terms of the securities, which have a weighted average life of 3.7 years. The impact of the adjustment to pro forma interest income would have been less than $1 million for the year ended December 31, 2006 and the three months ended March 31, 2007.
(C) Adjustment to fair value Mellon Financial's loan and lease portfolios. The adjustment to loans will be recognized over the respective remaining terms of the loans, which have a weighted average life of 1 year. The adjustment to lease finance assets in accordance with FASB Interpretation No. 21 ( ) adjusts the lease finance assets carrying value to the present value of after-tax cash flows using current yields, as well as reverses the deferred tax liability that had previously been recorded on these lease finance assets by Mellon Financial. The adjustment to lease finance assets will be recognized over the respective remaining terms of the leases, which have a weighted average remaining life of 8 years. The estimated impact of the adjustment of loans and leases, assuming the transaction had been completed on January 1, 2006, would be an increase in interest income of $12 million, $13 million, $13 million, $14 million and $14 million for the years 2006 through 2010, respectively, and an increase of $3 million for the three months ended March 31, 2007. Based on current information regarding Mellon Financial's loan portfolio, there are no material estimated differences between the contractual cash flows and the cash flows expected to be collected attributable to credit quality; accordingly, no such adjustment was applied. The pro forma adjustment reduces the reserve for losses on lease finance assets by $10 million to reflect the base credit reserve that would be recorded on the adjusted carrying value of the lease finance assets.
Accounting for Leases in a Business Combination
(D) Adjustment to fair value Mellon Financial premises and equipment. The impact of the adjustment to pro forma net occupancy expense and furniture and equipment expense would have been less than $1 million for the year ended December 31, 2006 and three months ended March 31, 2007.
(E) Adjustment to record goodwill and identifiable intangible assets resulting from the transaction based on estimated fair values as summarized in Note 3. The adjustments reflected in this prospectus supplement are based on current assumptions, valuations and estimated lives, which are subject to change. Material changes to these estimates are possible when the analysis is completed. For purposes of the pro forma adjustments shown here, management has estimated $4.6 billion of identifiable intangibles. The pro forma amortization expense of the estimated customer relationship, customer contract-based and core deposit intangible assets with estimable lives are estimated based on a pattern consistent with the assets' identifiable cash flows, and the amortization expense of non-compete agreements is estimated using a straight-line method. The initial estimates of the fair values, amortization expense and lives are as follows:
 
 
(F) Adjustment of $663 million to fair value Mellon Financial's investments in four strategic joint ventures, recorded in Other assets.
(G) Adjustment of $116 million to record in Other assets the favorable impact of operating leases compared to current market rates for the remainder of the lease terms. The estimated impact of the adjustment to current market rates, assuming the transaction had been completed on January 1, 2006, would be an increase in net occupancy expense of approximately $17 million in 2006, $18 million for each of the years from 2007-2010 and $5 million for the three months ended March 31, 2007.
(H) Adjustment to fair value Mellon Financial's term deposit liabilities based on current interest rates for similar instruments. The adjustment will be recognized over the weighted average estimated remaining term of the related deposit liabilities of 0.3 years. This adjustment increases pro forma interest expense by $1 million for the year ended December 31, 2006 and less than $1 million for the three months ended March 31, 2007.
(I) Adjustment to fair value Mellon Financial's notes, debentures and junior subordinated debentures, all of which are included as Long-term debt in the Combined Consolidated Balance Sheet. The adjustment will be recognized over the respective remaining lives of the instruments, which have a weighted average life of 9.8 years. The estimated impact of the $95 million pro forma adjustment of long-term debt, assuming the transaction had been completed on January 1, 2006, would be decreases in interest expense of $18 million, $13 million, $12 million, $7 million and $5 million for the years 2006 through 2010, respectively, and a decrease of $3 million for the three months ended March 31, 2007. These were estimated using a straight-line basis over the respective remaining maturities of the long-term debt instruments. These pro forma adjustments do not reflect any impact from the effect of the debt to be issued under this prospectus supplement or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(J) Adjustment to reverse $89 million of accrued liabilities related to Mellon Financial's operating leases with either free rent periods or "step-up" annual lease payments that were recorded under SFAS No. 13 (Accounting for Leases). Under SFAS No. 13, the expense related to operating leases with lease payments increasing subsequent to the date of the completion of the transaction will be recorded on a straight-line basis over the respective leases' remaining terms. The accrual increased $20 million from January 1, 2006 to March 31, 2007; accordingly, no pro forma adjustment to reduce rental expense is presumed to have occurred for the three months ended March 31, 2007 or the year ended December 31, 2006.
(K) Adjustment to increase the fair value of Mellon Financial's pension liability by $9 million for the effect of a pre-existing change of control provision for certain employees in Mellon Financial's pension plan. The $56 million decrease to pro forma staff expense for the year ended December 31, 2006 includes (1) a decrease of $58 million for the amortization of prior service cost and recognized net actuarial loss on pensions and amortization of transition obligation on postretirement benefits other than pensions recognized by Mellon Financial in 2006 and (2) a pro forma increase of $2 million for the service and interest components of expense that would have been recorded in 2006 for the effect of the pre-existing change of control provision for certain employees. The pro forma adjustments for the three months ended March 31, 2007 was estimated at approximately one fourth of the annual estimate. Additional analyses and actuarial valuations will be performed by the combined company's actuaries after the transaction, and these estimates may be subject to material change. The adjustments reflected herein do not reflect any effects from restructuring the combined company workforce.
(L) Adjustment to record the tax effects of the pro forma adjustments in the Balance Sheet, except the adjustment to lease finance assets (as described in Note C above), using a combined federal, state and foreign tax rate of 38 percent.
(M) Adjustment to record as liabilities the estimated exit costs related to Mellon Financial and transaction costs incurred by Bank of New York, both of which are included in the estimated $1.3 billion of merger and
 
integration costs, discussed further in Note 6. The estimated exit costs will include severance (including the effect of change in control provisions in Mellon Financial's displacement program) and relocation costs of continuing Mellon Financial employees, costs to cancel contracts of Mellon Financial that will provide no future benefit to Newco, and other costs. Also included in the pro forma adjustment is $45 million for Bank of New York's investment banking, attorney and independent accountant fees, and other transaction-related costs.
(N) Adjustment to record the fair value of Mellon Financial's employees' stock options and directors' stock options and deferred share units. The fair value of Mellon Financial's options to be exchanged for Newco options was estimated using a Black-Scholes pricing model. Option pricing models require the use of highly subjective assumptions including expected stock price and volatility that, when changed, can materially affect fair value estimates. The more significant assumptions used in estimating the fair value include volatility of 22 percent, a dividend yield of 2.36 percent, an expected life of 50 to 75 percent of the remaining contractual terms and a risk-free interest rate for U.S. government bonds having a remaining life equal to the respective options' expected lives.
(O) Adjustment to increase staff expense resulting from the revaluation of Mellon Financial's unvested awards, primarily for those individuals who elected to waive acceleration of vesting. The original valuations of these awards were determined by Mellon Financial at the original grant dates. Upon completion of the transaction, these awards will be revalued using current market assumptions. The unrecognized compensation expense for these stock-based awards and those issued in the three months ended March 31, 2007 was $114 million at March 31, 2007. Annual compensation expense related to these awards is expected to be greater than historic compensation expense due to the increase in the value of the awards upon remeasurement. For unvested stock options, the average remaining vesting period is 4.5 years and the average remaining contractual life is 9.7 years. For unvested restricted stock awards, the average remaining vesting period is 2.4 years. Pursuant to FAS 123(R), unvested awards are not considered a component of purchase price and are solely recognized in compensation expense in future periods.
(P) Adjustment to eliminate intercompany assets and liabilities. These include: (i) $11 million of Mellon Financial junior subordinated debentures, included in long-term debt, which were included in securities available for sale by Bank of New York, (ii) $3 million of Mellon Financial trading liability recorded as a trading asset receivable by Bank of New York, (iii) $3 million of Mellon Financial cash and due from banks and held in deposits by Bank of New York, and (iv) $6 million of miscellaneous receivables/payables in other assets and other liabilities. The amount of interest earned on the junior subordinated debentures for the period held in 2006 and 2007 as an investment was less than $1 million, and the revenue and expense related to the other items described above was de minimis.
(Q) Weighted average shares of Newco were calculated using the historical weighted average shares outstanding for the year ended December 31, 2006 of Bank of New York shares adjusted using the exchange ratio of 0.9434 and Mellon Financial shares using the 1:1 exchange ratio. Earnings per share data have been computed based on the combined historical income from continuing operations of Bank of New York and Mellon Financial and the impact of pro forma purchase accounting adjustments.
(R) Adjustment to eliminate merger and integration expenses recorded by Mellon Financial and Bank of New York related to the transaction.
(S) Adjustment to reverse amortization expense of intangible assets recorded in Mellon Financial's historical financial statements.
(T) Adjustment to eliminate intercompany revenue and expenses for Clearing services and Asset servicing paid by Mellon Financial to Bank of New York.
 
(U) The adjustment included in the pro forma tax provision related to lease finance assets includes the taxes that would be recorded for these assets based on the new carrying value as described in Note C above, rather than the 38% statutory provision for combined federal, state and foreign taxes used for all other pro forma adjustments.
NOTE 6: MERGER AND INTEGRATION EXPENSE
In connection with the transaction, Bank of New York and Mellon Financial have begun to develop their preliminary plans for post-merger integration of their operations. Over the next several months, the specific details of these plans will be refined. Bank of New York and Mellon Financial are currently in the process of assessing the two companies' personnel, benefit plans, premises, equipment, computer systems and service contracts to determine where they may take advantage of redundancies or where it will be beneficial or necessary to convert to one system.
Certain decisions arising from these assessments may involve involuntary termination of employees, vacating leased premises, canceling contracts with certain service providers and selling or otherwise disposing of certain premises or equipment. To the extent these decisions relate to Mellon Financial employees, assets or contracts, the costs associated with such decisions as permitted will be recorded as purchase accounting adjustments, which have the effect of increasing the amount of the purchase price allocable to goodwill. It is expected that all such costs will be identified and recorded within one year of completion of the transaction and all such actions required to effect these decisions would be taken within one year after finalization of these plans. The Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Balance Sheet includes a preliminary estimate of such liabilities of $200 million. See Notes 2, 3 and 5 for additional disclosures.
To the extent these decisions relate to Bank of New York employees, assets or contracts, these exit and disposal costs would be recorded in accordance with FASB Statement Nos. 146 and 112 in the results of operations of Newco in the period incurred.
Newco also expects to incur transaction-related expenses in the process of combining the operations of the two companies. These transaction-related expenses may include system conversion costs, employee retention arrangements and costs of incremental communications to customers and others. It is expected that the exit and disposal costs along with the transaction-related costs will be incurred over a three-year period after completion of the transaction. These expenses are not included in the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Income Statement because these costs will be recorded in the combined results of operations as they are incurred after completion of the transaction and are not indicative of what the historical results of Newco would have been had Bank of New York and Mellon Financial actually been combined during the periods presented.
Preliminarily, we estimate that the total of Mellon Financial's exit costs, Bank of New York's transaction and restructuring costs and Newco's integration costs will be approximately $1.3 billion.
NOTE 7: DIVIDENDS
Following the completion of the transaction, it is anticipated that Newco will initially pay a quarterly cash dividend of $0.235 per share. Prior to the completion of the transaction, Bank of New York intends to maintain its $0.22 per share regular quarterly dividend. Prior to the completion of the transaction, Mellon Financial intends to maintain regular quarterly dividends at a rate not to exceed $0.22 per share.
NOTE 8: RECLASSIFICATIONS TO BANK OF NEW YORK INCOME STATEMENT FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2006
 
 
Reclassification adjustments to conform Bank of New York categories with the Newco Income Statement presentation:
 
NOTE 9: RECLASSIFICATIONS TO MELLON FINANCIAL INCOME STATEMENT FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2006
 
 
Reclassification adjustments to conform Mellon Financial categories with the Newco Income Statement presentation:
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070705170944.txt.gz
TIME:20070705170944
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
On July 2, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant") filed a Certificate of Designations for its Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series A, $100,000 liquidation preference per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock"). The Preferred Stock was authorized in connection with the June 19, 2007 issuance in a public offering by Mellon Capital IV (the "Trust"), at that time a subsidiary of Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon"), of 500,000 of its 6.244% Fixed-to-Floating Rate Normal Preferred Capital Securities ("Normal PCS"), having a stated amount of $1,000 per Normal PCS, for aggregate proceeds before expenses and underwriting commissions of $500,000,000. Each Normal PCS corresponded to (i) $1,000 principal amount of Remarketable 6.044% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2043 (the "Junior Subordinated Notes") issued by Mellon and owned by the Trust and (ii) a 1/100
th
interest in a Stock Purchase Contract under which the Trust is obligated to purchase, and Mellon was obligated to sell, on the Stock Purchase Date determined pursuant to the Stock Purchase Contract, one share of Mellon 's Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series L, $100,000 liquidation preference per share (the "Mellon Preferred Stock"). The Normal PCS were fully and unconditionally guaranteed, to the extent described in Mellon's and the Trust's prospectus supplement dated June 12, 2007, by Mellon. On July 1, 2007 (the "Effective Date"), each of Mellon and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY") merged with and into the Registrant, with the Registrant as the surviving corporation in each case (collectively, the "Merger"). In the Merger, by operation of law, the Registrant assumed all prior debts, liabilities and duties of Mellon and BNY as if those debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by it. As a result, the Registrant filed the Certificate of Designations for the Series A Preferred Stock, which will be issued in connection with the settlement of the Stock Purchase Contracts rather than Mellon Preferred Stock. Upon the issuance of the Series A Preferred Stock, the ability of the Registrant to declare or pay dividends on, or purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, shares of its common stock or preferred stock will be subject to certain restrictions. These restrictions are set forth in the Certificate of Designations establishing the terms of the Preferred Stock.
 
The following exhibits are filed with this report on Form 8-K:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION, a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "Corporation"), in accordance with the provisions of Sections 103 and 151 thereof, does hereby certify that:
The Board of Directors of the Corporation (the "Board of Directors"), in accordance with the resolutions of the Board of Directors of Mellon Financial Corporation, one of the predecessors of the Corporation, dated December 19, 2006, and resolutions of the Pricing Committee of such Board of Directors, dated June 12, 2007, the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws of the Corporation and applicable law, by unanimous written consent dated June 15, 2007, adopted the following resolution creating a series of 5,001 shares of preferred stock of the Corporation designated as "Series A Noncumulative Preferred Stock".
that pursuant to the Delaware General Corporation Law and the Certificate of Incorporation of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation"), the Board of Directors hereby establishes the first series of Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation (the "Series A Noncumulative Preferred Stock") and fixes and determines the designation, voting rights, preferences, redemption rights, qualifications, privileges, limitations, restrictions and special or relative rights thereof as follows:
RESOLVED,
. The series will be designated the "Series A Noncumulative Preferred Stock" (hereinafter called the "Series A") and will initially consist of 5,001 shares. The number of shares constituting this Series may be increased from time to time in accordance with law up to the maximum number of shares of Preferred Stock authorized to be issued under the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, less all shares at the time authorized of any other series of Preferred Stock. Shares of this Series will be dated the date of issue. Shares of the Series A that are redeemed, purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation, or converted into another series of Preferred Stock, shall, after such redemption, purchase or acquisition, have the status of authorized but unissued shares of preferred stock of the Corporation, without designation as to series until such shares are once more designated as part of a particular series by the Board of Directors.
Section 1. Designation and Number, Issue Date
. As used herein with respect to the Series A:
Section 2. Definitions
(a) "Board of Directors" means the board of directors of the Corporation.
(b) "Bylaws" means the Bylaws of the Corporation, as may be amended from time to time.
(c) "Business Day" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or any other day on which banking institutions and trust companies in New York, New York, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania or Wilmington, Delaware are permitted or required by any applicable law to close.
(d) "Calculation Agent" means, at any time, the person or entity appointed by the Corporation and serving as such agent at such time. The Corporation may terminate any such appointment and may appoint a successor agent at any time and from time to time, that the Corporation shall use its best efforts to ensure that there is, at all relevant times when the Series A is outstanding, a person or entity appointed and serving as such agent. The Calculation Agent may be a person or entity affiliated with the Corporation.
provided
(e) "Certificate of Designations" means this Certificate of Designations relating to the Series A, as it may be amended from time to time.
(f) "Certificate of Incorporation" means the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as may be amended from time to time, and shall include this Certificate of Designations.
(g) "Common Stock" means the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation.
(h) "Junior Stock" means the Common Stock and any other class or series of stock of the Corporation (other than the Series A) that ranks junior to the Series A either or both as to the payment of dividends and/or as to the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
(i) "London Banking Day" means any day on which commercial banks are open for general business (including dealings in deposits in U.S. dollars) in London, England.
(j) "Parity Stock" means any class or series of stock of the Corporation (other than the Series A) that ranks equally with the Series A both in the payment of dividends and in the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
(k) "Preferred Stock" means any and all series of Preferred Stock, having a par value of $0.01 per share, of the Corporation, including the Series A.
(l) "Reuters Screen LIBOR01" means the display designated on the Reuters 3000 Xtra (or such other page as may replace that page on that service or such other service as may be nominated by the British Bankers' Association for the purpose of displaying London interbank offered rates for U.S. dollar deposits).
(m) "Three-month LIBOR," with respect to any Dividend Period, means the offered rate expressed as a percentage per annum for deposits in U.S. dollars for a three-month period commencing on the first day of such Dividend Period, as that rate appears on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 as of 11:00 A.M., London time, on the second London Banking Day immediately preceding the first day of such Dividend Period.
If Three-month LIBOR does not appear on Reuters Screen LIBOR01, Three-month LIBOR shall be determined on the basis of the rates at which deposits in U.S. dollars for a three-month period, beginning on the first day of such Dividend Period, and in a principal amount of not less than $1,000,000 are offered to prime banks in the London interbank market by four major banks in that market selected by the Calculation Agent at approximately 11:00 A.M., London time, on the second London Banking Day immediately preceding the first day of such Dividend Period. The Calculation Agent shall request the principal London office of each of these banks to provide a quotation of its rate. If at least two quotations are provided, Three-month LIBOR for such Dividend Period shall be the arithmetic mean of such quotations (rounded upward if necessary to the nearest 0.00001 of 1%) of such quotations.
 
If fewer than two quotations are provided as described in the preceding paragraph, Three-month LIBOR for such Dividend Period shall be the arithmetic mean (rounded upward if necessary to the nearest 0.00001 of 1%) of the rates quoted by three major banks in New York City selected by the Calculation Agent at approximately 11:00 A.M., New York City time, on the first day of such Dividend Period for loans in U.S. dollars to leading European banks for a three-month period, beginning on the first day of such Dividend Period, and in a principal amount of not less than $1,000,000.
If fewer than three banks selected by the Calculation Agent to provide quotations are quoting as described in the preceding paragraph, Three-month LIBOR for such Dividend Period shall be the Three-month LIBOR in effect for the prior Dividend Period or in the case of the first Dividend Period, the most recent Three-month LIBOR that could have been determined had the Preferred Stock been outstanding.
(n) "Voting Preferred Stock" means, with regard to any election or removal of a Preferred Stock Director (as defined in Section 6(b) below) or any other matter as to which the holders of Series A are entitled to vote as specified in Section 6 of this Certificate of Designations, any and all series of Preferred Stock (other than the Series A) that rank equally with the Series A as to the payment of dividends, whether bearing dividends on a non-cumulative or cumulative basis, and having voting rights equivalent to those described in Section 6(b).
.
Section 3. Dividends
. Holders of the Series A shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) out of funds legally available therefor, non-cumulative cash dividends at the rate determined as set forth below in this Section 3 applied to the liquidation preference amount of $100,000 per share of Series A. Such dividends shall be payable in arrears (as provided below in this Section 3(a)), but only when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors), (a) if the shares of Series A are issued prior to June 20, 2012, on June 20 and December 20 of each year until June 20, 2012, and (b) thereafter, on March 20, June 20, September 20 and December 20 of each year (each a "Dividend Payment Date"); that if any such Dividend Payment Date on or after June 20, 2012 would otherwise occur on a day that is not a Business Day, such Dividend Payment Date shall instead be (and any dividend payable on the Series A on such Dividend Payment Date shall instead be payable on) the immediately succeeding Business Day. If a Dividend Payment Date prior to June 20, 2012 is not a Business Day, the applicable dividend shall be paid on the first Business Day following that day without adjustment. Dividends on the Series A shall not be cumulative; holders of Series A shall not be entitled to receive any dividends not declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) and no interest, or sum of money in lieu of interest, shall be payable in respect of any dividend not so declared.
(a) Rate
provided
Dividends that are payable on the Series A on any Dividend Payment Date will be payable to holders of record of the Series A as they appear on the stock register of the Corporation on the applicable record date, which shall be the 15th calendar day before such Dividend Payment Date or such other record date fixed by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) that is not more than 60 nor less than 10 days prior to such Dividend Payment Date (each, a "Dividend Record Date"). Any such day that is a Dividend Record Date shall be a Dividend Record Date whether or not such day is a Business Day.
 
Each dividend period (a "Dividend Period") shall commence on and include a Dividend Payment Date (other than the initial Dividend Period, which shall commence on and include the date of original issue of the Series A) and shall end on and include the calendar day preceding the next Dividend Payment Date. Dividends payable on the Series A in respect of a Dividend Period shall be computed by the Calculation Agent (i) if shares of Series A are issued prior to June 20, 2012, on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve-30 day months until the Dividend Payment Date in June 2012 and (ii) thereafter, by multiplying the per annum dividend rate in effect for that Dividend Period by a fraction, the numerator of which will be the actual number of days in that Dividend Period and the denominator of which will be 360, and multiplying the rate obtained by $100,000. Dividends payable in respect of a Dividend Period shall be payable in arrearsi.e., on the first Dividend Payment Date after such Dividend Period.
The dividend rate on the Series A, for each Dividend Period, shall be (a) if the shares of Series A are issued prior to June 20, 2012, a rate per annum equal to 6.244% until the Dividend Payment date in June 2012, and (b) thereafter, a rate per annum that will be reset quarterly and shall be equal to the greater of (i) Three-month LIBOR for such Dividend Period plus 0.565% and (ii) 4.000% each applied to the $100,000 liquidation preference per share.
The Calculation Agent's determination of any dividend rate, and its calculation of the amount of dividends for any Dividend Period, will be maintained on file at the Corporation's principal offices and will be available to any stockholder upon request and will be final and binding in the absence of manifest error.
Holders of the Series A shall not be entitled to any dividends, whether payable in cash, securities or other property, other than dividends (if any) declared and payable on the Series A as specified in this Section 4 (subject to the other provisions of this Certificate of Designations).
. So long as any share of Series A remains outstanding, no dividend shall be declared or paid on the Common Stock or any other shares of Junior Stock (other than a dividend payable solely in Junior Stock), unless (i) full dividends for the then current Dividend Period on all outstanding shares of Series A have been declared and paid (or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof has been set aside) and (ii) the Corporation is not in default on its obligation to redeem any shares of Series A that have been called for redemption. The Corporation and its subsidiaries shall not purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, for consideration any shares of Common Stock or other Junior Stock (other than as a result of a reclassification of Junior Stock for or into other Junior Stock, or the exchange or conversion of one share of Junior Stock for or into another share of Junior Stock and other than through the use of the proceeds of a substantially contemporaneous sale of other shares of Junior Stock) nor shall the Corporation pay or make available any monies for a sinking fund for the redemption of any shares of Common Stock or any other shares of Junior Stock during a Dividend Period, unless the full dividends for the most recently-completed Dividend Period on all outstanding shares of Series A have been declared and paid (or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof has been set aside). The foregoing provision shall not restrict the ability of the Corporation or any other affiliate of the Corporation to engage in any market-making transactions in Junior Stock in the ordinary course of business.
(b) Priority of Dividends
On any Dividend Payment Date for which full dividends are not paid, or declared and funds set aside therefor, upon the Preferred Stock and other equity securities designated as ranking on a parity with the Series A as to payment of dividends ("Dividend Parity Stock"), all dividends paid or declared for payment on that Dividend Payment Date with respect to the Series
 
A and the Dividend Parity Stock shall be shared (1) first ratably by the holders of any such shares who have the right to receive dividends with respect to Dividend Periods prior to the then-current Dividend Period for which such dividends were not declared and paid, in proportion to the respective amounts of the undeclared and unpaid dividends relating to prior Dividend Periods, and thereafter (2) by the holders of these shares on a basis.
pro rata
Subject to the foregoing, such dividends (payable in cash, securities or other property) as may be determined by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) may be declared and paid on any securities, including Common Stock and other Junior Stock, from time to time out of any funds legally available for such payment, and the Series A shall not be entitled to participate in any such dividends.
Any class or series of preferred stock issued at any time by the Corporation that is entitled to receive dividends when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) shall have, for any period when any shares of Series A is outstanding, the same dividend payment dates as the Dividend Payment Dates of the Series A.
Section 4. Liquidation Rights.
. In the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the affairs of the Corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary, holders of Series A shall be entitled to receive, out of the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof (whether capital or surplus) available for distribution to stockholders of the Corporation, and after satisfaction of all liabilities and obligations to creditors of the Corporation, before any distribution of such assets or proceeds is made to or set aside for the holders of Common Stock and any other stock of the Corporation ranking junior to the Series A as to such distribution, in full an amount equal to $100,000 per share (the "Series A Liquidation Amount"), together with an amount equal to all dividends (if any) that have been declared but not paid prior to the date of payment of such distribution (but without any amount in respect of dividends that have not been declared prior to such payment date). After payment of the full amount of such liquidation distribution, the holders of Series A shall not be entitled to any further participation in any distribution of assets of the Corporation.
(a) Voluntary or Involuntary Liquidation
. If in any distribution described in Section 4(a) above the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof are not sufficient to pay the Liquidation Preferences (as defined below) in full to all holders of Series A and all holders of any stock of the Corporation ranking equally with the Series A as to such distribution, the amounts paid to the holders of Series A and to the holders of all such other stock shall be paid in accordance with the respective aggregate Liquidation Preferences of the holders of Series A and the holders of all such other stock. In any such distribution, the "Liquidation Preference" of any holder of stock of the Corporation shall mean the amount otherwise payable to such holder in such distribution (assuming no limitation on the assets of the Corporation available for such distribution), including an amount equal to any declared but unpaid dividends (and, in the case of any holder of stock other than the Series A and on which dividends accrue on a cumulative basis, an amount equal to any unpaid, accrued, cumulative dividends, whether or not declared, as applicable).
(b) Partial Payment
pro rata
. If the Liquidation Preference has been paid in full to all holders of Series A, the holders of other stock of the Corporation shall be entitled to receive all remaining assets of the Corporation (or proceeds thereof) according to their respective rights and preferences.
(c) Residual Distributions
 
. For purposes of this Section 4, the merger or consolidation of the Corporation with any other corporation or other entity, including a merger or consolidation in which the holders of Series A receive cash, securities or other property for their shares, or the sale, lease or exchange (for cash, securities or other property) of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation, shall not constitute a liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
(d) Merger, Consolidation and Sale of Assets Not Liquidation
Section 5. Redemption.
. The Series A may not be redeemed by the Corporation prior to the later of June 20, 2012 and the date of original issue of the Series A. On or after that date, the Corporation, at its option, may redeem, in whole at any time or in part from time to time, the shares of Series A at the time outstanding, upon notice given as provided in Section 5(c) below, at a cash redemption price equal to $100,000 per share, together (except as otherwise provided herein) with an amount equal to any dividends that have been declared but not paid prior to the redemption date (but with no amount in respect of any dividends that have not been declared prior to such date). The redemption price for any shares of Series A shall be payable on the redemption date to the holder of such shares against surrender of the certificate(s) evidencing such shares to the Corporation or its agent. Any declared but unpaid dividends payable on a redemption date that occurs subsequent to the Dividend Record Date for a Dividend Period shall not be paid to the holder entitled to receive the redemption price on the redemption date, but rather shall be paid to the holder of record of the redeemed shares on such Dividend Record Date relating to the Dividend Payment Date as provided in Section 3 above.
(a) Optional Redemption
. The Series A will not be subject to any mandatory redemption, sinking fund or other similar provisions. Holders of Series A will have no right to require redemption of any shares of Series A.
(b) No Sinking Fund
. Notice of every redemption of shares of Series A shall be given by first class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the holders of record of the shares to be redeemed at their respective last addresses appearing on the books of the Corporation. Such mailing shall be at least 30 days and not more than 60 days before the date fixed for redemption. Any notice mailed as provided in this Subsection shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given, whether or not the holder receives such notice, but failure duly to give such notice by mail, or any defect in such notice or in the mailing thereof, to any holder of shares of Series A designated for redemption shall not affect the validity of the proceedings for the redemption of any other shares of Series A. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Series A or any depositary shares representing interests in the Series A are issued in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Company or any other similar facility, notice of redemption may be given to the holders of Series A at such time and in any manner permitted by such facility. Each such notice given to a holder shall state: (1) the redemption date; (2) the number of shares of Series A to be redeemed and, if less than all the shares held by such holder are to be redeemed, the number of such shares to be redeemed from such holder; (3) the redemption price; and (4) the place or places where certificates for such shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price.
(c) Notice of Redemption
 
. In case of any redemption of only part of the shares of Series A at the time outstanding, the shares to be redeemed shall be selected either or in such other manner as the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) may determine to be fair and equitable. Subject to the provisions hereof, the Corporation shall have full power and authority to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which shares of Series A shall be redeemed from time to time. If fewer than all the shares represented by any certificate are redeemed, a new certificate shall be issued representing the unredeemed shares without charge to the holder thereof.
(d) Partial Redemption
pro rata
. If notice of redemption has been duly given and if on or before the redemption date specified in the notice all funds necessary for the redemption have been set aside by the Corporation, separate and apart from its other funds, in trust for the benefit of the holders of the shares called for redemption, so as to be and continue to be available therefor, then, notwithstanding that any certificate for any share so called for redemption has not been surrendered for cancellation, on and after the redemption date dividends shall cease to accrue on all shares so called for redemption, all shares so called for redemption shall no longer be deemed outstanding and all rights with respect to such shares shall forthwith on such redemption date cease and terminate, except only the right of the holders thereof to receive the amount payable on such redemption, without interest. Any funds unclaimed at the end of two years from the redemption date, to the extent permitted by law, shall be released to the Corporation, after which time the holders of the shares so called for redemption shall look only to the Corporation for payment of the redemption price of such shares.
(e) Effectiveness of Redemption
pro rata
Section 6. Voting Rights.
. The holders of Series A shall not have any voting rights except as set forth below or as otherwise from time to time required by applicable law.
(a) General
. If and whenever the dividends on the Series A and any other class or series of Voting Preferred Stock have not been declared and paid in an aggregate amount (i) in the case of the Series A and any other class or series of Voting Preferred Stock bearing non-cumulative dividends, equal to at least six quarterly dividends (whether or not consecutive) or (ii) in the case of any class or series of Voting Preferred Stock bearing cumulative dividends, in an aggregate amount equal to full dividends for at least six quarterly dividend periods or their equivalent (whether or not consecutive) (a "Nonpayment Event"), the number of directors then constituting the Board of Directors shall automatically be increased by two and the holders of Series A, together with the holders of any outstanding shares of Voting Preferred Stock, voting together as a single class, shall be entitled to elect the two additional directors (the "Preferred Stock Directors"), that it shall be a qualification for election for any such Preferred Stock Director that the election of such director shall not cause the Corporation to violate the corporate governance requirement of the New York Stock Exchange (or any other securities exchange or other trading facility on which securities of the Corporation may then be listed or traded) that listed or traded companies must have a majority of independent directors and that the Board of Directors shall at no time include more than two Preferred Stock Directors (including, for purposes of this limitation, all directors that the holders of any series of Voting Preferred Stock are entitled to elect pursuant to like voting rights).
(b) Right To Elect Two Directors Upon Nonpayment Events
provided
provided further
In the event that the holders of Series A and such other holders of Voting Preferred Stock shall be entitled to vote for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors following a Nonpayment
 
Event, such directors shall be initially elected following such Nonpayment Event only at a special meeting called at the request of the holders of record of at least 20% of the Series A and each other series of Voting Preferred Stock then outstanding (unless such request for a special meeting is received less than 90 days before the date fixed for the next annual or special meeting of the stockholders of the Corporation, in which event such election shall be held only at such next annual or special meeting of stockholders), and at each subsequent annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. Such request to call a special meeting for the initial election of the Preferred Stock Directors after a Nonpayment Event shall be made by written notice, signed by the requisite holders of Series A or Voting Preferred Stock, and delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation in such manner as provided for in Section 8 below, or as may otherwise be required by applicable law. If the Secretary of the Corporation fails to call a special meeting for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors within 20 days of receiving proper notice, any holder of Series A may call such a meeting at the Corporation's expense solely for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors, and for this purpose only such Series A holder shall have access to the Corporation's stock ledger.
When dividends have been paid in full on the Series A and any and all series of non-cumulative Voting Preferred Stock (other than the Series A) for Dividend Periods, whether or not consecutive, equivalent to at least one year after a Nonpayment Event and all dividends on any cumulative Voting Preferred Stock have been paid in full, then the right of the holders of Series A to elect the Preferred Stock Directors shall cease (but subject always to revesting of such voting rights in the case of any future Nonpayment Event), and, if and when any rights of holders of Series A and Voting Preferred Stock to elect the Preferred Stock Directors shall have ceased, the terms of office of all the Preferred Stock Directors shall forthwith terminate and the number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall automatically be reduced accordingly.
Any Preferred Stock Director may be removed at any time without cause by the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of Series A and Voting Preferred Stock, when they have the voting rights described above (voting together as a single class). The Preferred Stock Directors elected at any such special meeting shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the stockholders if such office shall not have previously terminated as below provided. In case any vacancy shall occur among the Preferred Stock Directors, a successor shall be elected by the Board of Directors to serve until the next annual meeting of the stockholders upon the nomination of the then remaining Preferred Stock Director or, if no Preferred Stock Director remains in office, by the vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of Series A and such Voting Preferred Stock for which dividends have not been paid, voting as a single class. The Preferred Stock Directors shall each be entitled to one vote per director on any matter that shall come before the Board of Directors for a vote.
. So long as any shares of Series A are outstanding, in addition to any other vote or consent of stockholders required by law or by the Certificate of Incorporation, the vote or consent of the holders of at least a majority of the shares of Series A at the time outstanding and entitled to vote thereon, voting separately as a single class, given in person or by proxy, either in writing without a meeting or by vote at any meeting called for the purpose, shall be necessary for effecting or validating:
(c) Other Voting Rights
. Any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws to authorize or create, or increase the
(i) Authorization of Senior Stock
 
authorized amount of, any shares of any class or series of capital stock of the Corporation ranking senior to the Series A with respect to either the payment of dividends or the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation;
. Any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws so as to adversely affect the special rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers of the Series A; , , that any amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation to authorize or create or to increase the authorized amount of any Junior Stock or any class or series or any securities convertible into shares of any class or series of Dividend Parity Stock or other series of Preferred Stock ranking equally with the Series A with respect to the distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation will not be deemed to adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers of the Series A; or
(ii) Amendment of Series A
provided
however
. Any consummation of a binding share exchange or reclassification involving the Series A, or of a merger or consolidation of the Corporation with another corporation or other entity, or any merger or consolidation of the Corporation with or into any entity other than a corporation unless in each case (x) the shares of Series A remain outstanding or, in the case of any such merger or consolidation with respect to which the Corporation is not the surviving or resulting corporation, are converted into or exchanged for preference securities of the surviving or resulting corporation or a corporation controlling such corporation, and (y) such shares remaining outstanding or such preference securities, as the case may be, have such rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof as would not require a vote of the holders of the Preferred Stock pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii) above if such change were effected by an amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation.
(iii) Share Exchanges, Reclassifications, Mergers and Consolidations
If any amendment, alteration, repeal, share exchange, reclassification, merger or consolidation specified in this Section 6(c) would adversely affect the Series A and one or more but not all other series of Preferred Stock, then only the Series A and such series of Preferred Stock as are adversely affected by and entitled to vote on the matter shall vote on the matter together as a single class (in lieu of all other series of Preferred Stock).
. Without the consent of the holders of Series A, so long as such action does not adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof, of the Series A, the Corporation may amend, alter, supplement or repeal any terms of the Series A:
(d) Changes for Clarification
(i) to cure any ambiguity, or to cure, correct or supplement any provision contained in this Certificate of Designations that may be defective or inconsistent; or
(ii) to make any provision with respect to matters or questions arising with respect to the Series A that is not inconsistent with the provisions of this Certificate of Designations.
. No vote or consent of the holders of Series A shall be required pursuant to Section 6(b) or (c) above if, at or prior to the time when any such vote or consent would otherwise be required pursuant to such Section, all outstanding shares of Series A shall have been redeemed, or shall have been called for redemption upon proper notice and sufficient funds shall have been set aside for such redemption, in each case pursuant to Section 5 above.
(e) Changes after Provision for Redemption
 
. The rules and procedures for calling and conducting any meeting of the holders of Series A (including, without limitation, the fixing of a record date in connection therewith), the solicitation and use of proxies at such a meeting, the obtaining of written consents and any other aspect or matter with regard to such a meeting or such consents shall be governed by any rules the Board of Directors, in its discretion, may adopt from time to time, which rules and procedures shall conform to the requirements of the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws, applicable law and any national securities exchange or other trading facility on which the Series A is listed or traded at the time. Whether the vote or consent of the holders of a plurality, majority or other portion of the shares of Series A and any Voting Preferred Stock has been cast or given on any matter on which the holders of shares of Series A are entitled to vote shall be determined by the Corporation by reference to the specified liquidation amounts of the shares voted or covered by the consent.
(f) Procedures for Voting and Consents
For purposes of determining the voting rights of the holders of Series A under this Section 6, each holder will be entitled to one vote for each $100,000 of liquidation preference to which his or her shares are entitled. Holders of shares of Series A will be entitled to one vote for each such share of Series A held by them.
. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Corporation and the transfer agent for the Series A may deem and treat the record holder of any share of Series A as the true and lawful owner thereof for all purposes, and neither the Corporation nor such transfer agent shall be affected by any notice to the contrary.
Section 7. Record Holders
. All notices or communications in respect of the Series A shall be sufficiently given if given in writing and delivered in person or by first class mail, postage prepaid, or if given in such other manner as may be permitted in this Certificate of Designations, in the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws or by applicable law.
Section 8. Notices
. No share of Series A shall have any rights of preemption whatsoever as to any securities of the Corporation, or any warrants, rights or options issued or granted with respect thereto, regardless of how such securities, or such warrants, rights or options, may be designated, issued or granted.
Section 9. No Preemptive Rights
. The shares of Series A shall not have any voting powers, preferences or relative, participating, optional or other special rights, or qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, other than as set forth herein or in the Certificate of Incorporation or as provided by applicable law.
Section 10. Other Rights
. The Corporation may at its option issue shares of Series A without certificates.
Section 11. Certificates
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned Corporation has caused this Certificate to be signed by a duly authorized officer this 15
th
day of June, 2007.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070706133950.txt.gz
TIME:20070706133950
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On July 5, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that Mellon Bank, N.A. has agreed to purchase ABN AMRO's 50% share in ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V. The transaction, which is subject to certain conditions including regulatory and other approvals, is expected to close in the third quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
Tim Steele, Head of PR & Media Relations, ABN AMRO Mellon
(t) +44 (0) 20 7163 5850 // (m) +44 (0) 7921 231 837
tim.steele@abnamromellon.com
Piers Townsend, Head of PR, Corporate & Institutional, ABN AMRO
(t) +44 (0) 20 7678 8244 // (m) +44 (0) 7876 131 276
piers.townsend@uk.abnamro.com
London, July 5, 2007
For Immediate Release
Mellon Bank N.A. has agreed to purchase ABN AMRO's 50% share in ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V., the joint venture company established by the shareholders in 2003 to provide global custody and related services to institutions outside North America.
The transaction  which is subject to certain conditions including regulatory and other approvals  is expected to close during Q3 2007, whereupon ABN AMRO Mellon will become a part of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the new company created by the merger of The Bank of New York Company and Mellon Financial Corporation. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
Nadine Chakar, CEO of ABN AMRO Mellon, said: "This is a landmark day for ABN AMRO Mellon, which since its inception has continually raised the bar  and clients' expectations  when it comes to delivering service excellence and product innovation. As part of The Bank of New York Mellon Corp. we will continue to provide our clients and staff with exciting new opportunities within the asset servicing sphere.
"Following its decision to merge with The Bank of New York, Mellon was keen to explore the possibility of taking full ownership of ABN AMRO Mellon. Both shareholders are in agreement that such a change of ownership is in the best interests of the JV and its clients. ABN AMRO remains one of our most important clients  we will continue to be ABN AMRO's preferred provider."
Chakar will retain her responsibilities as CEO of ABN AMRO Mellon in tandem with her new role within The Bank of New York Mellon, where she will be Head of EMEA for the BNY Mellon Asset Servicing group. The ABN AMRO Mellon Managing Board will likewise remain in place.
She added: "From the outset the JV was structured to avoid disruption in the event of any change of ownership. Accordingly, ABN AMRO Mellon's focus on our clients will not waver, and we will maintain the highest degree of operational continuity as we take our business to the next level. Relationships with existing clients will not change, with client-facing staff retaining their current roles supporting the same clients."
// ENDS
Notes to the Editor:
is the 50-50 joint venture established by ABN AMRO Bank N.V. and Mellon Financial Corporation in 2003. It provides global custody and related services to institutions around the world outside North America. The company combines ABN AMRO's worldwide servicing presence with Mellon's advanced technology and product capabilities. Value-added products and services include compliance monitoring, investment accounting, performance measurement and analytics.
ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V.
Netherlands-based is a leading international bank with total assets of EUR 1,054.60 billion (as at 31 March 2007). It has more than 4,500 branches in 53 countries, and has a staff of more than 107,000 full-time equivalents worldwide. ABN AMRO is listed on Euronext and the New York Stock Exchange.
ABN AMRO
[NYSE: BK] is a global financial services company focused on helping clients move and manage their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high net worth individuals, providing superior asset and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $18 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1 trillion in assets under management and $8 trillion in assets under trusteeship. Additional information is available at .
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
www.bnymellon.com

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
Contacts:
Tim Steele, Head of PR & Media Relations, ABN AMRO Mellon
(t) +44 (0) 20 7163 5850            (m) +44 (0) 7921 231 837
tim.steele@abnamromellon.com
Piers Townsend, Head of PR, Corporate & Institutional, ABN AMRO
(t) +44 (0) 20 7678 8244            (m) +44 (0) 7876 131 276
piers.townsend@uk.abnamro.com
 
LONDON, July 5, 2007  Mellon Bank N.A. has agreed to purchase ABN AMRO's 50% share in ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V., the joint venture company established by the shareholders in 2003 to provide global custody and related services to institutions outside North America.
The transaction  which is subject to certain conditions including regulatory and other approvals  is expected to close during the third quarter of 2007, whereupon ABN AMRO Mellon will become a part of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the new company created by the merger of The Bank of New York Company and Mellon Financial Corporation. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
"This is a landmark day for ABN AMRO Mellon, which since its inception has continually raised the bar  and clients' expectations  when it comes to delivering service excellence and product innovation. As part of The Bank of New York Mellon, we will continue to provide our clients and staff with exciting new opportunities within the asset servicing sphere," said Nadine Chakar, CEO of ABN AMRO Mellon. "Following its decision to merge with The Bank of New York, Mellon was keen to explore the possibility of taking full ownership of ABN AMRO Mellon. Both shareholders are in agreement that such a change of ownership is in the best interests of the JV and its clients. ABN AMRO remains one of our most important clients  we will continue to be ABN AMRO's preferred provider."
Chakar will retain her responsibilities as CEO of ABN AMRO Mellon in tandem with her new role within The Bank of New York Mellon, where she will be head of EMEA (Europe-Middle East-Africa) for the BNY Mellon Asset Servicing group. The ABN AMRO Mellon Managing Board also will remain in place.
"From the outset, the JV was structured to avoid disruption in the event of any change of ownership. Accordingly, ABN AMRO Mellon's focus on our clients will not waver, and we will maintain the highest degree of operational continuity as we take our business to the next level," Chakar added. "Relationships with existing clients will not change, with client-facing staff retaining their current roles supporting the same clients."
ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V. is the 50-50 joint venture established by ABN AMRO Bank N.V. and Mellon Financial Corporation in 2003. It provides global custody and related services to institutions around the world outside North America. The company combines ABN AMRO's worldwide servicing presence with Mellon's advanced technology and product capabilities. Value-added products and services include compliance monitoring, investment accounting, performance measurement and analytics.
Netherlands-based ABN AMRO is a leading international bank with total assets of EUR 1,054.60 billion (as at 31 March 2007). It has more than 4,500 branches in 53 countries, and has a staff of more than 107,000 full-time equivalents worldwide. ABN AMRO is listed on Euronext and the New York Stock Exchange.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation [NYSE: BK] is a global financial services company focused on helping clients move and manage their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high net worth individuals, providing superior asset and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $18 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1 trillion in assets under management, and it services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070713163527.txt.gz
TIME:20070713163527
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On July 9, 2007, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee (the "HRC Committee") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") approved grants to certain executive officers of the Corporation (each an "Executive"), to be made effective on July 23, 2007. The grants include (1) team equity incentive awards, in the form of restricted stock and restricted share units, to several Executives; (2) a special stock option award to one of the Executives; and (3) replacement equity awards, in the form of restricted share units and stock options, to several Executives. The exercise price of all the stock options will be the closing price of the Corporation's common stock on the New York Stock Exchange on July 23, 2007, the date of the grants.
The Corporation and its predecessor companies had previously disclosed their intention to make the team equity incentive awards and the special stock option grant. They reflect recommendations made by The Bank of New York, Inc. ("BNY") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("MFC") for adoption by the HRC Committee at its first meeting after the closing of the merger (the "Merger") of BNY and MFC with and into the Corporation, as described in the joint proxy statement/prospectus dated April 17, 2007 (the "joint proxy statement") that was mailed to BNY and MFC shareholders in connection with the special meetings held on May 24, 2007 to approve the Merger. The amounts of the team equity incentive award and the special stock option award are consistent with the proposed amounts as described in the joint proxy statement.
MFC and BNY agreed to recommend to the HRC Committee the team equity incentive awards and the special stock option award to retain key executives and create incentives for them to collaborate to increase the value of the Corporation. MFC and BNY recommended the team equity incentive awards and the special stock option award in connection with the provisions of the merger agreement that authorized the creation of severance and other compensation and benefit arrangements for members of the Corporation's executive management team. In addition, as discussed in the joint proxy statement, MFC agreed to recommend the team equity incentive awards and special stock option award at the time the Executives who were formerly executive officers of MFC entered into amendments to their change in control severance agreements and employment letters or agreements, waiving certain rights. The amendments to the change in control severance agreements and employment letters or agreements and the agreements by MFC in connection with such amendments were also described in the Current Reports on Form 8-K dated December 29, 2006 and January 30, 2007 filed by MFC with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Certain other former executive officers of MFC and BNY who are executive officers of the Corporation but are not named in this Current Report on Form 8-K were also awarded team equity incentive awards, as recommended by MFC and BNY and as described in the joint proxy statement.
The replacement equity awards replace certain long-term incentive grants previously awarded to the Executives by BNY and MFC, which were either terminated in accordance with their original terms due to the Merger or which could not be earned pursuant to their original terms due to the truncation of performance periods for the individual corporations as a result of the Merger. Certain other executive officers of the Corporation not named in this Current Report on Form 8-K were also awarded replacement equity awards for the reasons cited above.
Team Equity Incentive Awards
Consistent with the recommendations of BNY and MFC described above, the Corporation has agreed to grant team equity incentive awards to Thomas P. Gibbons, Senior Executive Vice President; Bruce W. Van Saun, Vice Chairman and Chief Financial Officer; Donald R. Monks, Vice Chairman; Brian G. Rogan, Senior Executive Vice President; David F. Lamere, Vice Chairman; and Ronald P. O'Hanley, Vice Chairman. The team equity incentive awards, which are in the form of restricted stock and restricted share units, will be effective July 23, 2007 and will vest on the third anniversary of the closing of the Merger (July 1, 2010) or, if earlier, upon an Executive's termination of employment by reason of death, disability, resignation for good reason or termination other than for cause. The team equity incentive awards are also subject to conditions relating to non-solicitation of employees and customers following a termination of employment and require advance notice to the Corporation of any voluntary termination of employment that would occur within a specified period surrounding July 1, 2010, and any failure to comply with such conditions would require repayment of the award to the Corporation.
 
Team equity incentive awards in the form of restricted share units will be granted to Messrs. Gibbons, Van Saun, Monks, and Rogan in the amount of $3,750,000; $4,250,000; $4,000,000; and $3,750,000, respectively. The restrictions on the awards to Messrs. Gibbons, Van Saun, Monks and Rogan will lapse upon a change in control and, in the case of Messrs. Gibbons and Van Saun, the restrictions will also lapse on a pro-rata basis if they exercise certain special termination rights under their Transition Agreements with BNY, which were assumed by the Corporation as a result of the Merger. Team equity incentive awards in the form of restricted stock will be granted to Messrs. Lamere and O'Hanley in the amount of $3,750,000 and $7,575,000, respectively. The restrictions on restricted stock will lapse on a pro-rata basis if they remain employed until July 1, 2008 and have attained at least age 55 upon termination. The actual number of shares of restricted stock or restricted share units, as the case may be, will be determined based upon the fair market value of the Corporation's stock on July 23, 2007. As noted above, the amounts of the team equity incentive awards are consistent with the proposed amounts as described in the joint proxy statement.
Special Stock Option Award
Consistent with the recommendation of MFC described above, the Corporation has also agreed to grant a special stock option award to Steven G. Elliott,Senior Vice Chairman, on 470,000 shares of the Corporation's common stock, to be granted on July 23, 2007 with an exercise price equal to the closing price of the Corporation's common stock on the New York Stock Exchange on that date. This special stock option award will vest ratably over three years from the date of grant, subject to earlier vesting in the event of a termination of Mr. Elliott's employment by the Corporation without cause, by constructive discharge or upon his retirement with the consent of Corporation, and will be exercisable for a ten year term. As noted above, the amount of the special stock option award is consistent with the proposed amount as described in the joint proxy statement.
Replacement Equity Awards
The Corporation has also agreed to grant replacement equity awards, in the form of restricted share units and stock options, to the following Executives effective July 23, 2007: Robert P. Kelly, Chief Executive Officer; Thomas A. Renyi, Executive Chairman; Gerald L. Hassell, President; and Messrs. Elliott, Lamere, O'Hanley, Van Saun, Gibbons, Monks and Rogan. These replacement equity awards replace certain long-term incentive grants previously awarded to these Executives by MFC and BNY, which were either terminated in accordance with their original terms due to the Merger or which could not be earned pursuant to their original terms due to the truncation of performance periods for the individual corporations as a result of the Merger.
Replacement equity awards will be made to Messrs. Kelly, Elliott, Lamere and O'Hanley in the form of 19,167; 9,424; 4,359; and 5,399 restricted share units, respectively, and in the form of stock options representing 76,668; 37,696; 17,436; and 21,596 shares, respectively. Messrs. Kelly, Elliott and Lamere and O'Hanley were formerly executive officers of MFC. The replacement awards for these Executives will vest on December 31, 2008, contingent upon continued employment, subject to earlier vesting if the Executive's employment is terminated without cause within three years following a change in control that occurs after the date of grant. The replacement restricted share unit awards for these Executives will also vest if the Executive's employment terminates before December 31, 2008 (i) due to death, disability, or displacement, (ii) retirement, at age 55 with five years of service in the case of Messrs. Kelly, Lamere and O'Hanley, (iii) retirement with consent of the Corporation in the case of Mr. Elliott, (iv) a sale of the business unit by which the Executive is employed, or (v) in the case of Mr. Elliott, a constructive discharge or termination by the Corporation without cause. The term of each replacement stock option granted to these Executives is ten years. The exercise price of the replacement stock options granted to these Executives will be the fair market value of the Corporation's common stock on the grant date, July 23, 2007.
Replacement equity awards will be made to Messrs. Renyi, Hassell, Van Saun, Gibbons, Monks and Rogan in four tranches. Messrs. Renyi, Hassell, Van Saun, Gibbons, Monks and Rogan were formerly executive officers of BNY. The first two tranches are based upon performance of BNY through June 30, 2007 for the performance cycle that was originally to end on December 31, 2007 and for the earned half of the performance cycle that was originally to end on December 31, 2008. The first tranche is estimated to be an award of 85,472; 53,208; 41,604; 24,340; 33,962; and 22,359 restricted share units, respectively, that vest on March 31, 2008, contingent upon continued employment, vesting earlier if the employment of any of these Executives is terminated without cause or for good reason or due to death or disability. The second tranche is estimated to be an award of 39,340; 24,481; 19,245; 11,179; 15,708; and 10,330 restricted share units, respectively, that vest on March 31, 2009, contingent upon continued employment, vesting earlier if the employment of any of these Executives is terminated without cause or for good reason or due to death or disability. The last two tranches are to replace the unearned half of the performance cycle that was originally to end on December 31, 2008. The third tranche is estimated to be an award of 14,363; 8,974; 7,005; 4,080; 5,743; and 3,774 restricted share units, respectively, that vest on March 31, 2009, contingent upon continued employment, vesting earlier if the employment of any of these Executives is terminated without cause or for good reason or due to death or disability. The fourth tranche is an award of stock options estimated to represent 57,452; 35,896; 28,020; 16,320; 22,972; and 15,096 shares, respectively, that vest on March 31, 2009, contingent upon continued employment, subject to earlier pro-rata vesting if the employment of any of these Executives is terminated without cause or for good reason or due to death or disability. Final replacement award numbers for the first two tranches will be determined based on actual performance of BNY through June 30, 2007.
The term of each replacement stock option granted to Messrs. Renyi, Hassell, Van Saun, Gibbons, Monks and Rogan is ten years. The exercise price of the replacement stock options granted to these Executives will be the fair market value of the Corporation's stock on the grant date, July 23, 2007. All of the replacement stock options granted to these Executives will vest, and the restrictions applicable to replacement restricted share units awarded to these Executives will lapse, upon the occurrence of a change in control. If any of these Executives retires, their replacement stock options will also vest and the restrictions on their replacement restricted share units will lapse, either on a pro-rata basis or in full, depending upon the Executive's attainment of certain specified ages. In addition, in the case of Messrs. Van Saun and Gibbons, their replacement stock option awards will fully vest if they exercise certain special termination rights under their Transition Agreements.
 
On July 10, 2007, the Board of Directors of the Corporation amended and restated the By-Laws of the Corporation to reflect two changes: (1) Section 7 of Article Three and Section 5 of Article Five of the By-Laws were amended to reflect the change of the name of the committee of the Board formerly called the "Corporate Responsibility Committee" to the "Corporate Social Responsibility Committee"; and (2) Section 2 of Article Four of the By-Laws was amended to reflect that the Chief Compliance Officer of the Corporation does not report to the Chairman. A copy of the amended provisions of the By-Laws, marked to show the changes described above, is attached as Exhibit 3.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 7. COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, a Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Committee.
CORPORATE RESPONSIBILITY
CORPORATE SOCIAL RESPONSIBILITY
Corporate Responsibility
Corporate Social Responsibility
Corporate Responsibility
Corporate Social Responsibility
Corporate Responsibility
Corporate Social Responsibility
Section 2. CHAIRMAN. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint one of its members to be Chairman. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date (as such terms are defined in Article Five), the Chairman shall be designated "Executive Chairman", shall be an officer of the Corporation, and the Chief Auditor (for administrative purposes only) shall report to the Executive Chairman. . . .
and the Chief Compliance Officer of the Corporation
Section 5. COMPOSITION OF COMMITTEES. During the Specified Period, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing Mellon Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing BNY Directors on the Committee, and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, each of the Executive Committee, Audit and Examining Committee, Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee and Risk Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing BNY Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing Mellon Directors on the Committee and a Continuing BNY Director shall be the chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, the Corporate Responsibility Committee shall be comprised of at least four members, of whom two shall be Continuing BNY Directors and two shall be Continuing Mellon Directors.
Social


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070720161232.txt.gz
TIME:20070720161232
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On July 19, 2007 the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2007 for The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("MFC"). BNY and MFC merged with the Registrant on July 1, 2007, with the Registrant being the surviving entity. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
NEW YORK, N.Y., July 19, 2007 -- ., which on July 1, 2007 merged with Mellon Financial Corporation creating The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, reported second quarter income from continuing operations of $448 million and diluted earnings per share of 59 cents. The second quarter of 2007 included merger and integration expenses ($47 million) that amounted to approximately four cents per share. Excluding this amount, earnings per share from continuing operations in the second quarter of 2007 was 63 cents per share, an increase of 21% compared with income from continuing operations of $391 million, or 52 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2006. Income from continuing operations was $437 million, or 57 cents per share, in the first quarter of 2007, and excluding merger and integration expenses ($15 million) was 59 cents per share.
The Bank of New York Company, Inc
Since the fourth quarter of 2006, The Bank of New York's results have included the results of the corporate trust business acquired in a swap for The Bank of New York's retail and middle market banking businesses. This swap transaction closed on Oct. 1, 2006. The results for prior periods include the retail and middle market banking businesses in discontinued operations.
"The Bank of New York's second quarter results reflect continued revenue momentum in asset management and securities servicing," said Thomas A. Renyi, executive chairman of The Bank of New York Mellon. "The results in these businesses demonstrate our success in maintaining focus on our clients while successfully closing the merger with Mellon. We are now executing the disciplined, thoughtful integration plan that will support our goals for new business development and merger synergies."
reported income from continuing operations of $281 million, or 67 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2007. Mellon's results for the second quarter of 2007 include the impact of pre-tax charges associated with merger and integration expenses ($116 million), early redemption of junior subordinated debentures ($46 million), exit costs associated with excess office space ($30 million), and a litigation reserve charge ($5 million), as well as the net benefit of a tax settlement and other discrete tax items ($122 million). Together, these amounts reduced earnings per share for the second quarter of 2007 by approximately two cents. Excluding these amounts, earnings per share from continuing operations in the second quarter of 2007 was 69 cents and increased 28% compared to income from continuing operations of $223 million, or 54 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2006. Income from continuing operations was $243 million, or 58 cents per share, in the first quarter of 2007.
Mellon Financial Corporation
 
1
 
"Mellon enjoyed an excellent quarter with strong momentum in both revenue and earnings, including substantial operating leverage. Together with our colleagues from The Bank of New York, we have created a global financial services growth company whose future prospects are outstanding," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon. "It was encouraging to note strong and continuing business momentum in both companies, a key goal going forward."
On July 10, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 3, 2007, to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 25, 2007.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and move their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration and more than $1 trillion in assets under management, and it services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
This release includes the second quarter results for The Bank of New York and Mellon. A summary of second quarter highlights is presented for The Bank of New York, followed by Mellon. Other summary highlights and the financial statements for each company follow the second quarter highlights. A series of notes to the financials of the two companies begins on page 15 and includes a summary of reclassifications from prior periods.
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted, and all calculations are based on unrounded numbers. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on a fully taxable equivalent (FTE) basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period to period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for supplemental combined financial information of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, including 5-quarter trends of fee and other revenue, net interest revenue, noninterest expense as well as combined business sector trends. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is available at bnymellon.com (Investor Relations - financial releases).
Conference Call Data
Thomas A. Renyi, executive chairman, and Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8 a.m. EDT on Thursday, July 19, 2007. This combined conference call and audio webcast will discuss the separate results of The Bank of New York and Mellon, as well as pro forma combined results of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. This conference call will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-2456 (U.S.) and (517) 623-4161 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The earnings release together with the quarterly earnings summary will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on July 19. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 19 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT until Thursday, Aug. 2, 2007 by dialing (800) 262-5024 (U.S.) or (402) 220-9713 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
2
 
(comparisons are with the second quarter of 2006, unless noted otherwise):
Second Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
 
The results for the first and second quarters of 2007 included the corporate trust business the Company acquired from JPMorgan Chase in October 2006 ("Acquired Corporate Trust Business") and the December 2006 conversion of AIB/BNY Securities Services (Ireland) Ltd. ("AIB/BNY") to a wholly-owned subsidiary; partially offset by businesses contributed in the BNY ConvergEx transaction in October 2006.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
(comparisons are with the second quarter of 2006, unless noted otherwise):
Second Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Company, Inc., continued
 
The majority of the increase from both prior periods reflects new business and higher client volumes. In addition, net interest revenue benefited by approximately $11 million from the May 21 conversion of the European operations of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business, which added approximately $10 billion in non-U.S. deposits. The company received net economic value payments on these deposits, which are recorded in Other Revenue, of $13 million for the second quarter and $25 million in the first quarter of 2007. On a pro forma basis, including these deposits for the full quarter and the associated net economic value payments, the net interest margin would have been approximately 1.95%.
Average deposits in the second quarter of 2007 amounted to $68.9 billion compared to $53.9 billion in the second quarter of 2006 and $58.8 billion in the first quarter of 2007. This increase compared with the prior periods reflects the impact of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business, together with new business and higher client volumes.
 
 
The merger and integration expenses of $47 million include $35 million related to the merger with Mellon and $12 million related to the Acquired Corporate Trust Business. The merger and integration expenses associated with Mellon include amounts for personnel-related ($17 million), integration/conversion ($15 million), and one-time costs ($3 million).
 
 
 
 
 
4
 
(comparisons are with the second quarter of 2006, unless noted otherwise):
Second Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Company, Inc., continued
 
 
 
 
5
 
(comparisons are with the second quarter of 2006, unless noted otherwise)
Second Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations for Mellon Financial Corporation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The net interest margin (FTE) for the second quarter of 2007 was 1.79% compared to 1.70% for the second quarter of 2006.
 
 
6
 
(comparisons are with the second quarter of 2006, unless noted otherwise)
Second Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations for Mellon Financial Corporation, continued
 
The early redemption of the two series of junior subordinated debentures impacted other expense ($46 million). The exit costs associated with excess real estate impacted occupancy ($30 million). The litigation charge impacted professional and legal ($5 million).
The merger and integration expenses of $116 million principally included amounts for personnel-related ($62 million), transaction costs ($39 million) and integration/conversion ($14 million).
 
 
 
 
 
 
7
 
 
(a)   Earnings per share are not presented in post-merger share count terms. See page 14 for additional information.
(b)   Calculated excluding merger and integration expenses. The pre-tax operating margin for all periods presented also excludes intangible amortization.
(c)   Prior periods calculated on a continuing operations basis.
(d)   Amounts have been reclassified. See discussion on page 15.
(e)   Includes discontinued operations.
(f)   Preliminary.
 
8
 
 
(a)   Earnings per share are not presented in post-merger share count terms. See page 14 for additional information.
(b)   Amounts do not foot due to rounding.
 
9
 
 
(a)   Par values and share information have not been adjusted to the post-merger terms. See page 14 for additional information.
Note:  The balance sheet at Dec. 31, 2006 has been derived from the audited financial statements as of that date.
 
10
 
 
 
11
 
 
 
12
 
 
Note: The balance sheet at Dec. 31, 2006 has been derived from audited financial statements as of that date.
 
13
 
Nonperforming Assets
Nonperforming assets were $27 million at June 30, 2007, down from $32 million at June 30, 2006 and $29 million at March 31, 2007. The sequential-quarter decline reflects paydowns of a foreign commercial loan.
The Bank of New York:
Nonperforming assets totaled $3 million at June 30, 2007, down from $14 million at June 30, 2006 and unchanged from March 31, 2007. The decrease compared with June 30, 2006 was due to the payment of a regional airline lease receivable.
Mellon:
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $445 million, or 58 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2007, compared with $448 million, or 59 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2006, and $434 million, or 57 cents per share, in the first quarter of 2007.
The Bank of New York:
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $275 million, or 66 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2007, compared with $232 million, or 56 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2006, and $252 million, or 60 cents per share, in the first quarter of 2007.
Mellon:
The Bank of New York Historical Earnings Per Share
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon Financial Corp. shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon Financial Corp. common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are not presented in post-merger share count terms in this Earnings Release and the Quarterly Earnings Summary. Earnings per share for The Bank of New York will be presented reflecting the conversion ratio in the second quarter 2007 Form 10-Q as shown in the table below.
 
(a) Excluding merger and integration expenses.
Note:  Certain amounts do not foot due to rounding.
In addition, all authorized, issued, treasury stock and loan to ESOP share amounts will be adjusted, in the second quarter 2007 Form 10-Q, for the conversion ratio of .9434 described above.
 
14
 
Notes on Financial Disclosures to Conform Presentation of Financial Statements
Assets under management/Securities lending cash collateral assets
Effective with the current disclosure, The Bank of New York and Mellon disclose total securities lending cash collateral assets separately. In previous disclosures, a portion of securities lending cash collateral assets was included in total assets under management for both The Bank of New York and Mellon. The table below provides a reconciliation of assets under management as originally reported to the current disclosure format.
 
(a)   Does not include securities lending assets of the ABN AMRO Mellon J.V.
(b)   Reflects portion of securities lending assets previously reported as assets under management.
 
A new disclosure detailing total securities lending cash collateral assets has been added to both the Earnings Release and Quarterly Earnings Summary. See pages 8 and 11 of this Earnings Release and pages 7 and 11 of the Quarterly Earnings Summary for the new disclosure.
Assets under custody and administration
Effective with the current disclosure, assets that The Bank of New York Mellon manages serves also as the custodian are included in both the assets under management and assets under custody/administration totals. In previous disclosures Mellon excluded, from total assets under custody and administration, assets that Mellon manages serves as the custodian. These assets were previously only included in the assets under management. The impact of this change is to increase pro forma combined assets under custody/administration by $364 billion at June 30, 2006, $376 billion at Sept. 30, 2006, $393 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 and $398 billion at March 31, 2007.
and
and
Clearing and execution services revenue
During the second quarter of 2007, certain of The Bank of New York's and Mellon's clearing and execution services revenue was reclassified from other revenue. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of clearing services revenue for the combined company (The Bank of New York Mellon). The impact of the reclassification for Mellon decreased other revenue and increased clearing services revenue by $3 million in the 2Q06, $2 million in each of the 3Q06, 4Q06 and 1Q07 and $5 million in the first six months of 2006. The impact of the reclassification for The Bank of New York decreased other revenue and increased clearing and execution services revenue by $4 million in each of the 4Q06 and 1Q07 quarters, with no changes in 2Q06 or 3Q06. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
 
15
 
Treasury services
previously named Global payment services
There have not been any changes to the fee revenue associated with this line item.
Distribution and service fees
During the second quarter of 2007, certain fees of Mellon's European asset management operations were reclassified to asset and wealth management fee revenue from distribution and servicing fee revenue. This reclassification was done to better characterize these fees due to the nature of their contracts. The impact of the reclassification decreased distribution and services fees and increased asset and wealth management fee revenue by $41 million in the 2Q06, $36 million in the 3Q06, $24 million in the 4Q06, $41 million in the 1Q07 and $77 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Investment income
previously named Asset/investment income
During the second quarter of 2007, Mellon's equity investment revenue was reclassified to other revenue from investment income. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of equity investment income for the combined company. The impact of the reclassification decreased investment income and increased other revenue by $5 million in the 2Q06, $2 million in the 3Q06, $7 million in the 4Q06, $3 million in the 1Q07 and $8 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Investment income - return on seed capital investments
We often invest in our asset management products during the start-up phase of the investments. These investments provide sufficient capital for new products to achieve their stated investment objectives. During the second quarter, The Bank of New York and Mellon's seed capital gains (losses) previously recorded in foreign exchange and other trading revenue were reclassified to investment income. This classification better characterizes the revenue relative to the nature of the investments. The impact of the reclassification from foreign exchange and other trading revenue to investment income on Mellon was a decrease of $6 million in the 2Q06 and increases of $3 million in the 3Q06, $14 million in the 4Q06, $5 million in the 1Q07 and $4 million for the first six months of 2006. The impact of the reclassification to investment income on The Bank of New York resulted in no change in the 2Q06, and increases of $1 million in the 3Q06, $2 million in the 4Q06, $1 million in the 1Q07 and $2 million for the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Merger and integration expense
Effective with the current disclosure, Mellon's merger and integration charges are reported as a separate line item. In previous disclosures, Mellon reported merger and integration charges in various noninterest expense categories. The impact of the change was to reduce previously reported staff and professional, legal and other purchased services expense for Mellon. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
 
16
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release, may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to future financial goals, the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon, including expectations with respect to the merged companies, integration and operations after the merger, future growth and prospect. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). The following risks, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from the anticipated results or other expectations expressed in the forward-looking statements: the businesses of The Bank of New York and Mellon may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time it expects, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; revenues following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; changes in political and economic conditions; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; geographic sources of income; and levels of tax-free income. Additional factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and The Bank of New York Company, Inc.'s and Mellon Financial Corporation's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of July 19, 2007, and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
17


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070725162527.txt.gz
TIME:20070725162527
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On July 19, 2007, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for second quarter 2007 for The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("MFC"). BNY and MFC merged with the Registrant on July 1, 2007, with the Registrant being the surviving entity. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on July 19, 2007, a Quarterly Earnings Summary. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report, is "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K, is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the second quarter of 2006 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
This Quarterly Earnings Summary has been designed to facilitate the understanding of the impact of the merger between The Bank of New York and Mellon which closed subsequent to the end of the second quarter on July 1, 2007. Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain measures, which are noted, exclude certain items. We believe these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management monitors financial performance. Supplemental combined financial results for The Bank of New York Mellon exclude the impact of historical intangible amortization and the pro forma impact of incremental purchase accounting intangibles resulting from the merger.
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to your questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Corporation's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, seasonality factors, the use of excess capital, new business wins, lower levels of incentives associated with performance fees; and pipelines for new business in Asset Management, Asset Servicing and Issuer Services; as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; revenues following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; changes in political and economic conditions; changes in the relevant benchmark to measure changes in investment management fees; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; changes in the mix of assets under management; changes in the mix of deposits; the effects of the adoption of new accounting standards; corporate and personal customers' bankruptcies; operational risk; inflation; levels of tax-free income; technological change; success in the timely development of new products and services; competitive product and pricing pressures within the Corporation's markets; consumer spending and savings habits; interest rate fluctuations; geographic sources of income; monetary fluctuations; acquisitions and integrations of acquired businesses; changes in law; changes in fiscal, monetary, regulatory, trade and tax policies and laws; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; the effects of terrorist acts and the results of the war on terrorism; as well as other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in the filings of the Corporation with the SEC and in The Bank of New York's and Mellon's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of July 19, 2007, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The combined results in this report reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but does not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. The business sector combined results for all periods reflect actions taken in the second quarter of 2007 to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
SECOND QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
THE BANK OF NEW YORK
(vs. second quarter 2006)
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
SECOND QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
MELLON FINANCIAL
(vs. second quarter 2006)
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON
SUPPLEMENTAL
COMBINED
SECOND QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. second quarter 2006)
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
Merger Update - Integration Milestones *
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
 
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
 
bp - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
N/A - Not applicable.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
 
 
Changes in market value of assets under management from March 31, 2007 to June 30, 2007 - by business sector
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
BUSINESS SECTORS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(provides investment management, wealth management and banking services to high-net-worth individuals, families and charitable gift programs, foundations and endowments)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to global financial institutions, corporate and public retirement funds and foundations and endowments)
ASSET SERVICING
 
 
 
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and share owner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for introducing broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING AND EXECUTION SERVICES
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(provides global payment services, working capital solutions, global markets and institutional banking services)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
(primarily includes business exits and Corporate Treasury activities, merger and integration charges, and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SECTOR
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
THE BANK OF NEW YORK HISTORICAL EARNINGS PER SHARE
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon Financial Corp. shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon Financial Corp. common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are not presented in post-merger share count terms in this Quarterly Earnings Summary and the Earnings Release. Earnings per share for The Bank of New York will be presented reflecting the conversion ratio in the second quarter 2007 Form 10-Q as shown in the table below.
 
 
Note: Certain amounts do not foot due to rounding.
In addition, all authorized, issued, treasury stock and loan to ESOP share amounts will be adjusted, in the second quarter 2007 Form 10-Q, for the conversion ratio of .9434 described above.
NOTES ON FINANCIAL DISCLOSURES TO CONFORM PRESENTATION OF FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Assets under management/Securities lending cash collateral assets
Effective with the current disclosure, The Bank of New York and Mellon disclose total securities lending cash collateral assets separately. In previous disclosures, a portion of securities lending cash collateral assets was included in total assets under management for both The Bank of New York and Mellon. The table below provides a reconciliation of assets under management as originally reported to the current disclosure format.
 
 
 
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
A new disclosure detailing total securities lending cash collateral assets has been added to both the Earnings Release and Quarterly Earnings Summary. See pages 7 and 11 of this Earnings Summary and pages 8 and 11 of the Quarterly Earnings Release for the new disclosure.
Assets under custody and administration
Effective with the current disclosure, assets that The Bank of New York Mellon manages serves also as the custodian are included in both the assets under management and assets under custody/administration totals. In previous disclosures Mellon excluded, from total assets under custody and administration, assets that Mellon manages serves as the custodian. These assets were previously only included in the assets under management. The impact of this change is to increase pro forma combined assets under custody/administration by $364 billion at June 30, 2006, $376 billion at Sept. 30, 2006, $393 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 and $398 billion at March 31, 2007.
and
and
Clearing and execution services revenue
During the second quarter of 2007, certain of The Bank of New York's and Mellon's clearing and execution services revenue was reclassified from other revenue. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of clearing services revenue for the combined company (The Bank of New York Mellon). The impact of the reclassification for Mellon decreased other revenue and increased clearing services revenue by $3 million in the 2Q06, $2 million in each of the 3Q06, 4Q06 and 1Q07 and $5 million in the first six months of 2006. The impact of the reclassification for The Bank of New York decreased other revenue and increased clearing and execution services revenue by $4 million in each of the 4Q06 and 1Q07 quarters, with no changes in 2Q06 or 3Q06. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Treasury services
previously named Global payment services
There have not been any changes to the fee revenue associated with this line item.
Distribution and service fees
During the second quarter of 2007, certain fees of Mellon's European asset management operations were reclassified to asset and wealth management fee revenue from distribution and servicing fee revenue. This reclassification was done to better characterize these fees due to the nature of their contracts. The impact of the reclassification decreased distribution and services fees and increased asset and wealth management fee revenue by $41 million in the 2Q06, $36 million in the 3Q06, $24 million in the 4Q06, $41 million in the 1Q07 and $77 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Investment income
previously named Asset/investment income
During the second quarter of 2007, Mellon's equity investment revenue was reclassified to other revenue from investment income. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of equity investment income for the combined company. The impact of the reclassification decreased investment income and increased other revenue by $5 million in the 2Q06, $2 million in the 3Q06, $7 million in the 4Q06, $3 million in the 1Q07 and $8 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
 
2Q07 Quarterly Earnings Summary
The Bank of New York Mellon
Combined
Investment income - return on seed capital investments
We often invest in our asset management products during the start-up phase of the investments. These investments provide sufficient capital for new products to achieve their stated investment objectives. During the second quarter, The Bank of New York and Mellon's seed capital gains (losses) previously recorded in foreign exchange and other trading activities revenue were reclassified to investment income. This classification better characterizes the revenue relative to the nature of the investments. The impact of the reclassification from foreign exchange and other trading revenue to investment income on Mellon was a decrease of $6 million in the 2Q06 and increases of $3 million in the 3Q06, $14 million in the 4Q06, $5 million in the 1Q07 and $4 million for the first six months of 2006. The impact of the reclassification to investment income on The Bank of New York resulted in no change in the 2Q06, and increases of $1 million in the 3Q06, $2 million in the 4Q06, $1 million in the 1Q07 and $2 million for the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Merger and integration expense
Effective with the current disclosure, Mellon's merger and integration charges are reported as a separate line item. In previous disclosures, Mellon reported merger and integration charges in various noninterest expense categories. The impact of the change was to reduce previously reported staff and professional, legal and other purchased services expense for Mellon. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20070808151815.txt.gz
TIME:20070808151815
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
On July 2, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation filed a Current Report on Form 8-K announcing that on July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and Mellon Financial Corporation merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. This Amendment No. 1 to Form 8-K is being filed to provide additional financial information, as permitted by Item 9.01(a)(4) and Item 9.01(b)(2) of such report.
Some statements in the Exhibits to this Current Report on Form 8-K/A are forward-looking. These include all statements about the future results and operations of the Company, as well as the following: the acquisition of the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture; the probability of losses relating to Three Rivers Funding Corporation, a special purpose entity that issues commercial paper and is described in Note 1 of Notes to Financial Statements; expected cash contributions to funded defined benefit pension plans for the remainder of 2007; the amount of contingent additional consideration the Company is obligated to pay; expected increases in state tax reserves; collectibility of contractual principal and interest on temporarily-impaired securities; reduction in funding costs; results of pending and threatened litigation and regulatory proceedings and settlements; expectations with respect to revenues and operating expenses following the merger; identification and recording of certain costs within one year after completion of the merger; implementation of certain decisions relating to the merger within one year after finalization of plans; and incurrence of transaction-related expenses, including exit and disposal costs, over a period of three years after the merger.
Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, as well as other uncertainties affecting future results and the value of the Company's stock and factors which represent risks associated with the business and operations of the Company, can be found in the "Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements" and the "Risk Factors" sections included in the registration statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-140863) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") on April 17, 2007 and containing a definitive joint proxy statement/prospectus that was mailed to the shareholders of each of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and Mellon Financial
Corporation; the "Risk Factors" section of the registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-144261) filed with the Commission on July 2, 2007; the "Forward Looking Statements and Risk Factors" section in The Bank of New York Company, Inc.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007; the "Cautionary Statement" section included in Mellon Financial Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006 and in Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 and any subsequent reports filed with the Commission prior to the merger; and any subsequent reports filed by the Company pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
All forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which such statements are made, and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which such forward-looking statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
The unaudited consolidated balance sheet as of June 30, 2007, and related unaudited consolidated income statement and statement of cash flows for the six month periods ended June 30, 2007 and 2006, and unaudited consolidated statement of changes in shareholders' equity for the six month period ended June 30, 2007, of Mellon Financial Corporation and subsidiaries, are included as Exhibit 99.2 and incorporated herein by reference in response to Item 9.01(a).
An unaudited pro forma combined consolidated balance sheet as of June 30, 2007, and unaudited pro forma combined consolidated income statements for the six month period ended June 30, 2007 and the year ended Dec. 31, 2006 are included as Exhibit 99.3 and incorporated herein by reference in response to Item 9.01(b).
The exhibits listed in the index to exhibits are included as exhibits to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
 
(and its subsidiaries)
Mellon Financial Corporation
See accompanying Notes to Financial Statements.
Note: In 2006, Mellon included the impact of adopting SFAS No. 158 "Employers' Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106 and 132R" in total comprehensive income for 2006. The $159 million after-tax impact of adopting SFAS No. 158 should have been recorded as a change in accounting principal with a direct adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income. As a result, total comprehensive income in 2006 was reported as $836 million but should have been $995 million.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 1  Basis of presentation and informational disclosures
Basis of presentation
On July 1, 2007, Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") and The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity. The merger was accounted for as a purchase of Mellon for accounting and financial reporting purposes. In this document, references to "our," "we," "us," the "Company" and similar terms for periods prior to July 1, 2007 refer to Mellon, and references to "our," "we," "us," the "Company" and similar terms for periods on and after July 1, 2007 refer to BNY Mellon.
The unaudited consolidated financial statements of Mellon and its subsidiaries are prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for interim financial information and with Rule 10-01 of Regulation S-X. These financial statements should be read in conjunction with Mellon's 2006 Annual Report on Form 10-K. In the opinion of management, all normal recurring adjustments necessary for a fair presentation of the financial position and results of operations for the periods covered have been included. In addition to reclassifications related to discontinued operations and reclassifications in connection with the realignment of business sectors and revisions to income statement/balance sheet line items described on page 7, other reclassifications are occasionally made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
Other guarantees and indemnities
As a result of the merger of Mellon and The Bank of New York into BNY Mellon on July 1, 2007, by operation of law BNY Mellon assumed all liabilities under the guarantees and indemnities of Mellon described below.
In the normal course of business, Mellon offers guarantees in support of certain joint ventures and subsidiaries, and certain other guarantees and indemnities.
 
Standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees irrevocably obligate Mellon for a stated period to disburse funds to a third-party beneficiary if our customer fails to perform under the terms of an agreement with the beneficiary. We must recognize, at the inception of standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees, a liability for the fair value of the obligation undertaken in issuing the guarantee. At June 30, 2007, we had a liability of $7 million related to letters of credit.
A securities lending transaction is a fully collateralized transaction in which the owner of a security agrees to lend the security through an agent (Mellon) to a borrower, usually a broker/dealer or bank, on an open, overnight or term basis, under the terms of a prearranged contract, which generally matures in less than 90 days. Securities are lent with and without indemnification against broker default. Custodian securities lent with indemnification against broker default of return of securities totaled $159 billion at June 30, 2007 and were primarily collateralized by cash, or to a lesser degree securities.
For additional information on standby letters of credit and foreign and other guarantees, and custodian securities lent with indemnification against broker default of return of securities, see pages 49, 50, 107 and 108 of Mellon's 2006 Annual Report.
Mellon's primary banking subsidiary, Mellon Bank, N.A. (Mellon Bank), and ABN AMRO Bank N.V. (ABN AMRO) entered into a joint venture to provide global securities services, with operations commencing in January 2003. Each of the two partners signed a statutory declaration under Dutch law to be jointly and severally liable with the joint venture to parties that have a provable contractual debt or damage claim. The benefit of this
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
declaration is potentially available to all creditors and customers of the joint venture with valid legal claims if the joint venture defaults. The guarantee totaled $110 billion at June 30, 2007 primarily relating to securities lending activity. Agency securities lending represented $104 billion of this guarantee at June 30, 2007, primarily related to the indemnification of the owner of the securities against broker default. These securities lending transactions were collateralized primarily with cash and Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development government securities totaling $102 billion. The joint venture also indemnifies $101 million of cash collateral reinvested in repurchase agreements for risk of market or credit loss. The potential exposure of this guarantee assumes that there is no capital or assets of the joint venture to satisfy such claims, and that there is no level of contribution by ABN AMRO, which has an S&P 500 long-term credit rating of AA- and a Moody's senior debt rating of Aa2. On July 5, 2007, BNY Mellon and ABN AMRO announced that Mellon Bank and ABN AMRO had entered into an agreement for Mellon Bank's purchase of ABN AMRO's interest in the joint venture. The transaction, which is subject to certain conditions including regulatory and other approvals, is expected to close during late third quarter or early fourth quarter of 2007. It is anticipated that as a result of the purchase, Mellon Bank will on a going-forward basis be jointly and severally liable with the joint venture under the above-described guarantee, without any contribution by ABN AMRO.
Mellon Bank has a referral relationship with, and provides administrative services to, Three Rivers Funding Corp. (TRFC), a special purpose entity that issues commercial paper. TRFC is owned by an independent third party and is not a subsidiary of either Mellon Bank or Mellon. TRFC's financial results are not included in the financial statements of Mellon Bank or Mellon. Fee revenue of $2 million was received from TRFC in the second quarter of 2007 and $1 million in the second quarter of 2006. At June 30, 2007, TRFC's receivables totaled $4.037 billion and commercial paper outstanding totaled $4.051 billion. A letter of credit provided by Mellon Bank in support of TRFC's commercial paper totaled $171 million at June 30, 2007. Mellon's maximum loss exposure related to TRFC is the full amount of the liquidity facility provided to TRFC as
referred to in the table on page 6, or $4.051 billion, at June 30, 2007. However, the probability of this loss scenario is remote as it would mean that all of TRFC's receivables were wholly uncollectible. In addition, there are significant structural protections built into each transaction to provide protection against uncollectible receivables. The facilities that provide liquidity and credit support to TRFC are included in the table of Other guarantees and indemnities on page 6. The estimated liability for losses related to these arrangements, if any, is included in the reserve for unfunded commitments. For a further discussion of our relationship with TRFC, see Note 7 of Mellon's 2006 Annual Report.
Mellon has also provided customary representations for underwriting agreements, acquisition and divestiture agreements, sales of loans and commitments, and other similar types of arrangements and customary indemnification for claims and legal proceedings related to providing financial services. We have purchased insurance to mitigate certain of these risks. Mellon is a minority equity investor in, and member of, several industry clearing or settlement exchanges through which foreign exchange, securities or other transactions settle. Certain of these industry clearing or settlement exchanges require their members to guarantee their obligations and liabilities or to provide financial support in the event other partners do not honor their obligations. It is not possible to estimate a maximum potential amount of payments that could be required with respect to such agreements.
Revision to business sectors and income statement/balance sheet line items
As part of the planning process for the integration of Mellon and The Bank of New York after the closing of the merger, during the first quarter of 2007 we realigned our business sectors, creating the Issuer Services and Treasury Services sectors and eliminating the Payment Solutions & Investor Services (PS&IS) sector. The Issuer Services sector consists of Mellon Investor Services (stock transfer), which was previously included in the PS&IS sector. The Treasury Services sector consists of Working Capital Solutions (global cash management) and Mellon Financial Markets (capital markets), both previously included in the PS&IS sector, as well as Mellon Institutional Banking (large corporate
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
banking), which was previously included in the Other Segment. All prior periods have been reclassified for these changes. In addition, we changed the name of the Mellon Asset Management sector to Asset Management and the Private Wealth Management sector to Wealth Management. There were no changes to the Asset Servicing sector. During the second quarter of 2007, we initiated actions to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon. These changes did not affect the operations of these business lines.
In addition, several new line items were created and/or renamed on the income statement and balance sheet during the first quarter of 2007:
Income statement:
Balance sheet:
Additionally, the following reclassifications were made during the second quarter of 2007 to further conform the presentation of Mellon and The Bank of New York's Financial Statements:
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Assets under management/Securities lending cash collateral assets
Effective with the disclosure of its second quarter 2007 earnings on July 19, 2007, Mellon discloses total securities lending cash collateral assets separately. In previous disclosures, a portion of securities lending cash collateral assets was included in total assets under management. The table below provides a reconciliation of assets under management as originally reported to the current disclosure format.
 
Assets under custody and administration
Effective with the disclosure of its second quarter 2007 earnings on July 19, 2007, assets that Mellon manages also serves as the custodian for are included in both the assets under management and assets under custody/administration totals. In previous disclosures Mellon excluded, from total assets under custody and administration, assets that Mellon both managed served as the custodian for. These assets were previously only included in the assets under management. The impact of this change is to increase Mellon's assets under custody/administration by $364 billion at June 30, 2006, $376 billion at Sept. 30, 2006, $393 billion at Dec. 31, 2006 and $398 billion at March 31, 2007.
and
and
Clearing and execution services revenue
During the second quarter of 2007, certain of Mellon's clearing and execution services revenue was reclassified from Other revenue. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of clearing and execution services revenue for the combined company (BNY Mellon) after the merger. The impact of the reclassification for Mellon
decreased other revenue and increased clearing and execution services revenue by $3 million in the second quarter of 2006, $2 million in each of the third quarter of 2006, fourth quarter of 2006 and first quarter of 2007 and $5 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Distribution and service fees
During the second quarter of 2007, certain fees of Mellon's European asset management operations were reclassified to asset and wealth management fee revenue from distribution and servicing fee revenue. This reclassification was done to better characterize these fees due to the nature of their contracts. The impact of the reclassification decreased distribution and services fees and increased asset and wealth management fee revenue by $41 million in the second quarter of 2006, $36 million in the third quarter of 2006, $24 million in the fourth quarter of 2006, $41 million in the first quarter of 2007 and $77 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
(
Investment income
previously named Asset/investment income)
During the second quarter of 2007, Mellon's equity investment revenue was reclassified to Other revenue from investment income. This reclassification was done for reporting consistency of equity investment income for the combined company after the merger. The impact of the reclassification decreased investment income and increased other revenue by $5 million in the second quarter of 2006, $2 million in the third quarter of 2006, $7 million in the fourth quarter of 2006, $3 million in the first quarter of 2007 and $8 million in the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Investment income - return on seed capital investments
We often invest in our asset management products during the start-up phase of the investments. These investments provide sufficient capital for new
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
products to achieve their stated investment objectives. During the second quarter of 2007, Mellon's seed capital gains (losses) previously recorded in foreign exchange and other trading revenue were reclassified to investment income. This classification better characterizes the revenue relative to the nature of the investments. The impact of the reclassification from foreign exchange and other trading revenue to investment income for Mellon was a decrease of $6 million in the second quarter of 2006 and increases of $3 million in the third quarter of 2006, $14 million in the fourth quarter of 2006, $5 million in the first quarter of 2007 and $4 million for the first six months of 2006. All prior period amounts have been reclassified and did not affect the results of operations.
Merger and integration expense
Effective with the disclosure of its second quarter 2007 earnings on July 19, 2007, Mellon's merger and integration charges are reported as a separate line item. These expenses principally included amounts for personnel-related, transaction costs and integration/conversion. In previous disclosures, Mellon reported merger and integration charges in various noninterest expense categories.
The impact of the change was to reduce previously reported staff and professional, legal and other purchased services expense for Mellon. All prior periods have been reclassified and the reclassifications did not affect the results of operations or net income.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Pension and other postretirement benefits
SFAS No. 132 (revised 2003), "Employers' Disclosures about Pensions and other Postretirement Benefits, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88 and 106," requires interim period disclosures of the components of net periodic benefit cost.
 
BNY Mellon expects to make cash contributions to its funded defined benefit pension plans, principally outside the U.S., of approximately $8 million for the remainder of 2007. Cash contributions totaled $29 million in the first half of 2007.
 
 
Note 2 -- Merger with The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
On July 1, 2007, Mellon merged along with The Bank of New York into BNY Mellon. In the transaction, each share of Mellon $.50 par value common stock was converted into one share of BNY Mellon $.01 par value common stock and each share of The Bank of New York $7.50 par value common stock was converted into .9434 shares of BNY Mellon $.01 par value common stock. The merger was accounted for as a purchase of Mellon for accounting and financial reporting purposes.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and move their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and servicing more than 100 markets. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1 trillion in assets under management and it services $10 trillion in outstanding debt. The combined company has annual revenues of more than $13 billion, with approximately 30% derived from asset servicing, 40% from issuer services, clearing and execution services and treasury services, and 30% from asset and wealth
management. By the end of 2008, we expect to be well positioned to capitalize on global growth trends, including the evolution of emerging markets, the increasing need for more complex financial products and services, and the increasingly global need for people to save and invest for retirement. Almost a third of combined revenue is derived internationally.
Note 3 -- Contingent and deferred consideration related to acquisitions
Mellon acquired an additional 20% interest in Mellon Financial Services Asset Management S.A., a Brazilian institutional asset management and asset servicing company, in the second quarter of 2007 for a total cost of $30 million paid in cash, bringing its total ownership to 90%. Goodwill of $29 million was recorded for this acquisition. Additional consideration of $35 million for prior acquisitions was paid in the first six months of 2007, including $20 million for DPM Mellon.
We record contingent purchase payments when amounts are determinable. Amounts generally become determinable and payable when an
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
acquisition reaches a certain level of performance. At June 30, 2007, we are potentially obligated to pay contingent additional consideration which, using reasonable assumptions for the performance of the acquired companies and joint ventures, could range from approximately $155 million to $375 million over the next three years. None of the potential contingent additional consideration was recorded as goodwill at June 30, 2007.
Note 4 -- Adoption of new accounting interpretation and staff position/IRS audit settlement
FIN No. 48-Taxes
Effective Jan. 1, 2007, we adopted FASB Interpretation (FIN) No. 48, "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes"an Interpretation of SFAS No. 109, "Accounting for Income Taxes." FASB defines the threshold for recognizing the benefits of tax return positions in the financial statements as "more-likely-than-not" to be sustained by a taxing authority. The term "more-likely-than-not" means a likelihood of more than 50%. The impact of adopting FIN No. 48 was a direct increase to the beginning balance of our retained earnings of approximately $11 million and reported as a change in accounting principle. Pursuant to FIN No. 48, we will continue to record interest and penalties on income tax assessments as income tax expense. As of the date of adoption, we had $18 million of interest accrued for potential income tax exposures and $37 million of unrecognized tax benefits that, if recognized, would affect the effective tax rate.
Over the next 12 months, Mellon estimates it may increase state tax reserves by approximately $13 million for various state tax positions. Years subject to examination include Federal income taxes from 2004 to present, California from 2000 to present, Massachusetts from 2001 to present, New York state from 2002 to present and the United Kingdom from 2001 to present.
FSP 13-2--Taxes
Effective Jan. 1, 2007, we adopted FASB Staff Position (FSP) 13-2, "Accounting for a Change or Projected Change in the Timing of Cash Flows Relating to Income Taxes Generated by a Leveraged Lease Transaction." FSP 13-2 amends SFAS No. 13, "Accounting for Leases," by requiring lessors to recalculate the rate of return and periodic income allocation for leveraged lease transactions when there is a change or projected change in the timing of income tax cash flows related to leases. The Staff Position requires lessors to reassess projected income tax cash flows using a FIN No. 48 model for recognition and measurement. The impact of adopting FSP 13-2 was a direct reduction to the beginning balance of our retained earnings of approximately $17 million and reported as a change in accounting principle.
 
IRS Audit Settlement
We reached a settlement with the Internal Revenue Service during the second quarter of 2007. The settlement included the resolution of tax issues relating to the taxation of settlement proceeds from a 1993 lawsuit and lease-in-lease-out transactions. As a result of the settlement, we recorded a decrease to tax expense from continuing operations of approximately $126 million and an increase to tax expense from discontinued operations of approximately $6 million in the second quarter of 2007. The amounts included the interest on our refund which was recorded as a reduction of tax expense pursuant to FIN No. 48.
Note 5  Discontinued operations
In the first six months of 2007, $3 million after-tax of income from discontinued operations was recorded, resulting primarily from the sale of our insurance premium financing company, AFCO Credit Corporation (AFCO), and its Canadian affiliate, CAFO, Inc. (CAFO), partially offset by the tax expense discussed above which is included in the HR businesses and a loss from the sale of Mellon Venture's portfolios discussed below.
In August 2006, we announced a definitive agreement to sell AFCO and CAFO. It was determined that this business no longer fit the strategic focus on our asset management and asset servicing businesses. The sale closed on Jan. 2, 2007 resulting in a $12 million after-tax net gain in the first quarter of 2007. In the third quarter of 2006, we applied discontinued operations accounting to this business and the income statements for all periods were restated. The restatement primarily resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in financing-related fee revenue; a reduction in noninterest expenses; and a slight change in continuing earnings per share for certain periods.
In December 2006, Mellon sold its ownership interest in the direct and indirect portfolios of Mellon Ventures, our venture capital business. This decision was based upon the determination that this business no longer fit the strategic focus on our asset management and asset servicing businesses. A substantial portion of the sale was completed in December 2006 with subsequent closings during the first quarter of 2007. An additional $5 million after-tax loss on the sale of this business was recorded in the first quarter of 2007, resulting primarily from an adjustment to the carrying value of a receivable recorded as part of the settlement of the transaction. We applied discontinued operations accounting to this business in the fourth quarter of 2006 and the income statements for all periods were restated. This restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of investment income; a reduction in noninterest expenses; an increase in net interest revenue; and a change in continuing earnings per share.
 
In accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the results of the businesses discussed above are reflected as discontinued operations in all income statements presented. Because the lines of business included in discontinued operations were discrete lines of business serving classes of customers no longer
served by Mellon's continuing lines of business, the disposition of these businesses is not expected to have a material impact on continuing operations going forward.
All information in these Financial Statements and Notes reflects continuing operations, unless otherwise noted.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 6 -- Securities
 
Note: There were $3 million of gross realized gains and no gross realized losses on sales of securities in the first six months of 2007. At June 30, 2007, securities issued by the U.S. Government and its agencies and U.S. Government sponsored agencies (shown in the table above) exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity. At June 30, 2007, there were no other issuers that exceeded 10% of shareholders' equity.
 
At June 30, 2007, Mellon's portfolio of mortgage-backed securities was 100% AAA- rated.
Temporarily impaired securities
The unrealized loss of $190 million at June 30, 2007, as shown in the table above, is related to the movement in interest rates. All of the securities with unrealized losses are AAA-rated or carry government agency guarantees. Approximately 83% of the unrealized losses on these 964 investments have been in a continuous unrealized loss position for more than 12 months. Management believes the collection of the contractual principal and interest is probable and therefore all unrealized losses are considered to be temporary. As shown in the table above, unrealized gains totaled $33 million in the available-for-sale portfolio at June 30, 2007.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 7 -- Goodwill and intangible assets
Goodwill
The following table shows the changes to goodwill, by business sector, for the first six months of 2007.
 
 
Acquired intangible assets
 
We amortize intangible assets over their estimated useful lives. During the first six months of 2007, the net carrying amount of acquired intangible assets decreased $16 million as amortization expense of $23 million was partially offset by the effect of foreign exchange rates on non-U.S. dollar denominated intangible assets.
Based upon the current level of intangible assets, the estimated annual amortization expense for the years 2007 through 2012 is as follows:
At June 30, 2007, $941 million of goodwill and acquired intangible assets is tax deductible and $1.984 billion is non-tax deductible.
Note 8 -- Other assets
 
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Note 9 -- Long-term debt
At June 30, 2007, long-term debt included notes and debentures (with original maturities over one year) of $3.407 billion and junior subordinated deferrable interest debentures held by trusts that issued guaranteed capital debt securities of $892 million.
In the second quarter of 2007, we redeemed our Series A and Series B junior subordinated debentures, each issued for a face value of $515 million. This resulted in a total pre-tax charge to income of $46 million for the redemption premiums and write-off of unamortized issuance costs. These debentures were replaced by the following securities issued in the second quarter of 2007, which will reduce our future funding costs. In May 2007, we issued $250 million of 5.20% senior notes and $250 million of floating rate senior notes maturing in May 2014. In June 2007, we issued $500 million of 6.244% fixed-to-floating rate perpetual preferred capital securities.
Note 10 -- Net interest revenue
 
Note 11  Business segments
Mellon's business segments reflect our management structure, the characteristics of our products and services, and the classes of customers to which those
products and services are delivered. Our lines of business serve two distinct major classes of clients:
Lines of business that offer similar or related products and services to common or similar client decision makers have been combined into three segments with the Asset and Wealth Management Segment and Institutional Services Segment being further divided into sector groupings. These segments are shown below:
 
As also discussed in Note 1, in the first quarter of 2007, as part of the planning process for the integration of Mellon and The Bank of New York after the closing of the merger, we realigned our business sectors. Following are the changes to Mellon's business sectors:
 
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
 
Additionally, in the second quarter of 2007, Mellon made the following changes in order to report sector results in a consistent manner with The Bank of New York:
 
This realignment and these changes did not affect the operation of these business lines. All prior periods have been reclassified.
 
Note: Prior periods sector data may reflect immaterial reclassifications as a result of minor changes made to be consistent with current period presentations.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
The results of our business segments are presented and analyzed on an internal management reporting basis. Revenue amounts reflect fee revenue generated directly by each sector, as well as fee revenue transferred between sectors under revenue transfer agreements. Net interest revenue is generated directly by each sector or allocated to the segments from Corporate Treasury under a transfer pricing system. The accounting policies of the business segments are the same as those described in Note 1 of Mellon's 2006 Annual Report except: other fee revenue and net interest revenue differ from the amounts shown in the Consolidated Income Statement because amounts presented in Business Segments are on a fully taxable equivalent basis (FTE); credit quality expense (revenue) for the sectors with loans is presented on a net charge-off (recovery) basis; and charges for litigation settlements are generally allocated when the related matters are settled and payment is made.
The operations of acquired businesses are integrated with the existing business segments soon after most acquisitions are completed. As a result of the integration of staff support functions, management of customer relationships, operating processes and the financial impact of funding the acquisitions, we cannot precisely determine the impact of acquisitions on income before taxes and therefore do not report it.
The business segment information is reported on a continuing operations basis for all periods presented. See Note 5 of this report for a discussion of discontinued operations.
See pages 24 through 29 of Mellon's 2006 Annual Report for a discussion of the products and services offered, the distribution channels for the products and services and the factors that drive the performance of the Asset Management, Wealth Management and Asset Servicing sectors. The Issuer Services and Treasury Services sector and Other Segment are discussed below.
Issuer Services sector
The Issuer Services sector provides a diverse array of products and services to corporations and shareholders, including stock transfer and recordkeeping services, investment plan services, demutualizations, corporate actions, unclaimed
property services and employee stock-based compensation plans. Revenue is driven by the volume of transactions processed and types of services provided.
Treasury Services sector
The Treasury Services sector includes working capital solutions (formerly Global Cash Management); Mellon Financial Markets (capital markets business); and Mellon Institutional Banking (large corporate banking). Working Capital Solutions revenue is driven by the volume of transactions processed, types of service provided and net interest revenue earned from deposit balances generated by activity across the business operations. Mellon Financial Markets' revenue is driven by the volume and size of our fixed income securities transactions in both the primary and secondary markets, the volume of money market fund balances distributed by Mellon Financial Markets, as well as the underwriting of transactions for clients in the public finance, asset-backed finance and debt capital markets groups. Mellon Institutional Banking's revenue is primarily driven by loan levels.
Other Segment
 
The Other Segment includes:
 
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Revenue in the Other Segment primarily reflects:
 
Noninterest expense includes:
 
Average economic capital represents capital in excess of amounts of economic capital allocated to the business sectors, as well as economic capital required to support business exits and corporate treasury.
 
Note 12 -- Supplemental information to the consolidated statement of cash flows
 
Note 13 -- Legal proceedings
Various legal actions and proceedings are pending or are threatened against the Company and its subsidiaries and certain former subsidiaries, some of which seek relief or damages in amounts that are substantial. These actions and proceedings arise in the ordinary course of our businesses and operations and include suits relating to our servicing, investment, mutual fund, advisory, trust, custody, shareholder services, working capital solutions, lending, collections and other activities and operations. Certain actions and proceedings relate to businesses that have been divested. From time to time, the Company and its subsidiaries may be involved in regulatory enforcement matters in which claims for disgorgement, the imposition of penalties and/or other remedial sanctions are possible.
As previously reported in a Current Report on Form 8-K dated Aug. 18, 2006, our bank subsidiary, Mellon Bank, entered into a settlement agreement with the United States Attorney for the Western District of Pennsylvania that relates to the April 2001 incident in Mellon's Pittsburgh IRS Processing Unit. Under the terms of the settlement, we have agreed to have an independent third party monitor compliance with the terms of the agreement for a three year period. No monetary penalties or fines were imposed by the agreement, although we have reimbursed the federal government for $30 thousand of costs incurred by an outside vendor. If we comply with the terms of the agreement, the U.S.
 
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
Attorney will not prosecute us. The agreement should not impair our ability to serve as a long-standing government contractor. Mellon and the Department of Justice have entered into a settlement agreement regarding possible claims under the False Claims Act arising from the April 2001 incident in Mellon's Pittsburgh IRS Processing Unit. Pursuant to the settlement agreement, Mellon has paid $16.5 million in exchange for the settlement and release of all claims.
As previously reported in a Current Report on Form 8-K dated Sept. 30, 2005, Mellon Investor Services LLC (MIS), our transfer agent subsidiary, has received a "Wells Notice" from the Philadelphia District Office of the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) indicating that the staff intends to recommend that the SEC bring a civil injunctive action against MIS for violations of Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and Rule 10b-5 thereunder. A Wells Notice indicates that the SEC's staff has made a preliminary decision to recommend that the SEC authorize the staff to bring a civil action. However, a Wells Notice is not a formal allegation or proof of wrongdoing. The notice provides MIS the opportunity to respond formally to the SEC staff before the staff makes a final determination whether to recommend that the SEC initiate an action.
The SEC staff has informed MIS that its recommendation relates to MIS' disclosure practices to its transfer agency (issuer) clients during the period 2001 through late 2004 concerning the receipt of fees from a search firm that performs in-depth searches for "lost" shareholders. Fees received by MIS from this firm during this period aggregate to approximately $5 million. MIS believes that the SEC staff has been investigating related practices at other transfer agents. MIS has been cooperating fully with the SEC staff in its investigation and has made a submission explaining why it believes that its conduct was lawful.
Because of the complex nature of some of these legal actions and proceedings, it may be a number of years before such matters ultimately are resolved. After consultation with legal counsel, Mellon's management believes that the aggregate liability, if any, resulting from such pending and threatened legal actions and proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition,
results of operations and cash flows, although there could be a material effect on results of operations for a particular period.
 

Exhibit 99.3
 
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon Financial") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon"). The following Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Balance Sheet combines the respective historical Consolidated Balance Sheets of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial giving effect to the merger as if it had been completed on June 30, 2007. The pro forma balance sheet reflects that the merger was accounted for as a purchase of Mellon Financial by The Bank of New York and, accordingly, includes adjustments to record assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial at their estimated fair values, which are subject to further adjustment as additional information becomes available and additional analyses are performed. The related pro forma adjustments are described in the accompanying Notes to the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
The following Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Statements of Income for the six months ended June 30, 2007 and year ended Dec. 31, 2006 combine the respective historical Consolidated Statements of Income of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial giving effect to the merger as if it had become effective at Jan. 1, 2006 as an acquisition by The Bank of New York of Mellon Financial using the purchase method of accounting and giving effect to the related pro forma adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
We anticipate that the merger will provide The Bank of New York Mellon with financial benefits that include reduced operating expenses. The pro forma information does not reflect the benefits of expected cost savings, opportunities to earn additional revenue, the impact of restructuring and transaction-related costs and, accordingly, does not attempt to predict or suggest future results. It also does not necessarily reflect what the historical results of The
Bank of New York Mellon would have been had the merger been completed during these periods.
The unaudited pro forma combined consolidated financial information and notes are presented for illustrative purposes only. They include various estimates, which are subject to material change, and may not necessarily be indicative of the financial position or results of operations that would have occurred if the transaction had been consummated as of the applicable date or which may be attained in the future.
 
 
See accompanying Notes to Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information
 
 
 
 
See accompanying Notes to Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
 
 
 
 
See accompanying Notes to Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Financial Information.
 
 
Note 1  Purchase business combination
The transaction was accounted for as an acquisition of Mellon Financial by The Bank of New York using the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, the assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial were recorded at their respective fair values on the date the transaction was completed. The transaction was effected by the issuance of The Bank of New York Mellon's common stock, $0.01 par value per share, to The Bank of New York shareholders and Mellon Financial shareholders. Each share of The Bank of New York common stock was exchanged for 0.9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock, and each share of Mellon Financial common stock was exchanged for one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock. The shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock issued to effect the transaction were recorded at $39.86 per share. This amount was determined by averaging the closing price of The Bank of New York common stock for the two trading days before the Dec. 4, 2006 announcement of the transaction and the two trading days after the announcement of the transaction (which includes the day of the announcement), and dividing by The Bank of New York exchange ratio.
If a shareholder of The Bank of New York was otherwise entitled to a fractional share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock, cash was issued instead of such fraction share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock. The pro forma financial statements do not present an estimate of such cash, which was not material and was funded by cash on hand.
The allocation of the transaction's purchase price included in the unaudited pro forma combined financial information is expected to be completed in the third quarter of 2007 after thorough analyses to determine the fair values of Mellon Financial's tangible and identifiable intangible assets and liabilities as of July 1, 2007. The pro forma financial information presented includes adjustments to record certain tangible and identifiable intangible assets and liabilities of Mellon Financial at their respective estimated fair values. The pro forma adjustments included in this pro forma financial information are subject to updates as additional information becomes available and as additional
analyses are performed and may be recorded for up to one year from the merger date. Any change in the estimated fair value of the net assets of Mellon Financial may change the amount of the purchase price allocable to goodwill. Material intercompany transactions have been eliminated from the unaudited pro forma combined consolidated financial information.
The goodwill recorded in connection with the merger is not subject to amortization and none is deductible for tax purposes. The customer relationships, customer contract-based, core deposit and noncompete intangibles will be amortized over their estimated economic lives based on the pattern of usage or consumption, if determinable. Mutual fund advisory contract and trade name intangibles with indefinite lives will not be subject to amortization in accordance with the provisions of SFAS No. 142.
The Bank of New York Mellon is in the process of finalizing the allocation method of the goodwill and intangibles to reportable segments and expects to complete the allocation in the third quarter of 2007.
Note 2  Pro forma financial information
Pro forma financial information for the transaction is included as of June 30, 2007 and for the six months ended June 30, 2007 and for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006. The pro forma adjustments in the pro forma financial statements reflect the right of each Mellon Financial shareholder to receive one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon Financial held by such holder of record, based on the number of shares of Mellon Financial that were outstanding on June 30, 2007. The unaudited pro forma financial information presented in the pro forma financial statements is not necessarily indicative of the results of operations in future periods or the future financial position of The Bank of New York Mellon.
The pro forma balance sheet adjustments reflect the issuance of 1.135 billion shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock with an aggregate par value of $11 million and an increase in paid-in capital of $15.2 billion as shown in Note 4; goodwill of $10.8 billion as shown in Note 3; and amortizing and indefinite-lived intangibles of $2.7 billion and
 
 
$2.4 billion, respectively, as shown in Note 5. Also included in the pro forma balance sheet adjustments is an increase in other liabilities, which includes estimated exit and transaction costs of $138 million, other asset and liability fair value adjustments, and an increase of $1.7 billion in deferred income taxes.
Upon completion of the merger, The Bank of New York stock options were exchanged for stock options in The Bank of New York Mellon and the exercise price per share was adjusted for the 0.9434 exchange ratio.
Mellon Financial stock options were exchanged for stock options in The Bank of New York Mellon and the option price per share was not adjusted as the exchange ratio is one Mellon Financial share for one The Bank of New York Mellon share. All unvested Mellon Financial options granted prior to Dec. 4, 2006 were accelerated upon approval of the transaction by Mellon Financial's shareholders on May 24, 2007, except for those for which waivers to acceleration were obtained. Vested stock options issued by The Bank of New York Mellon in exchange for options held by employees and directors of Mellon Financial were considered part of the purchase price. Accordingly, the purchase price includes an estimated fair value of stock options of $302 million.
The fair value of The Bank of New York Mellon stock options that were issued in exchange for Mellon Financial stock options was estimated by using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with market assumptions. Option pricing models require the use of highly subjective market assumptions, including expected stock price volatility, which if changed can materially affect fair value estimates. The more significant assumptions used in estimating the fair value included volatility of 25 percent, a dividend yield of 2.20 percent, an expected life of 50-75 percent of the remaining contractual terms and a risk-free interest rate for U.S. government bonds having a remaining life equal to the respective options' expected lives.
The estimated exit cost liabilities incurred in the transaction consisted principally of personnel-related costs, which included involuntary termination benefits for Mellon Financial employees to be severed in connection with the transaction, relocation costs for continuing Mellon Financial
employees and costs to cancel contracts of Mellon Financial that will provide no future benefit to The Bank of New York Mellon. The estimated $76 million of exit cost liabilities include only those costs associated with Mellon Financial. The estimated transaction costs of $62 million are included in goodwill.
During the six months ended June 30, 2007 and year ended Dec. 31, 2006, The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial acquired businesses or portions of businesses which are included herein only from the date of completion.
 
 
Note 3  Purchase price and goodwill
The computation of the purchase price, the allocation of the purchase price to the net assets of Mellon Financial based on fair values estimated at June 30, 2007, the estimated intangibles and the resulting amount of goodwill follows:
 
See Note 5 for footnote explanations.
 
Note 4  Pro forma consolidated shareholders' equity
The pro forma adjustments related to shareholders' equity on the pro forma combined consolidated balance sheet at June 30, 2007, are presented below.
 
 
 
Note 5 -- Pro forma adjustments to financial statements
 
 
 
N/ANot applicable.
 
 
 
completed on Jan. 1, 2006, would be a decrease in net periodic pension and other post-retirement benefit costs of approximately $59 million in 2006, $59 million in 2007, $42 million in 2008, $31 million in 2009, $24 million in 2010 and $29 million for the six months ended June 30, 2007. The pro forma estimated decrease in net periodic pension and other post-retirement benefit cost for 2006 was assumed to be the estimated 2007 decrease as the impacts on net periodic pension and other post retirement benefit costs were remeasured at the July 1, 2007 merger date. The estimated decrease in net periodic pension and other post-retirement benefit costs is primarily attributable to the elimination of amortization amounts for outstanding balances of transition obligations, prior service costs and net actuarial gains or losses as of the transaction date which, in absence of the merger, would have been reflected in future years as adjustments to accumulated other comprehensive income.
 
 
 
continuing operations of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial and the impact of pro forma purchase accounting adjustments.
Note 6 -- Merger and integration expense
In connection with the merger, The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial have developed plans for post-merger integration of their operations. Over the next several months, the specific details of these plans will be refined. The Bank of New York Mellon is currently in the process of assessing the personnel, benefit plans, premises, equipment, computer systems and service contracts to determine where we may take advantage of redundancies or where it will be beneficial or necessary to convert to one system.
Certain decisions arising from these assessments may involve involuntary termination of employees, vacating leased premises, canceling contracts with certain service providers and selling or otherwise disposing of certain premises, furniture or equipment. To the extent these decisions relate to Mellon Financial employees, assets or contracts, the costs associated with such decisions as permitted will be recorded as purchase accounting adjustments, which have the effect of increasing the amount of the purchase price allocable to goodwill. It is expected that all such costs will be identified and recorded within one year of completion of the merger and all such actions required to effect these decisions would be taken within one year after finalization of these plans. The Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Balance Sheet includes a preliminary estimate of such liabilities of $76 million. See Notes 2, 3 and 5 for additional disclosures.
To the extent these decisions relate to The Bank of New York employees, assets or contracts, these exit and disposal costs would be recorded in accordance with FASB Statement Nos. 146 and 112 in the results of operations of The Bank of New York Mellon in the period incurred.
The Bank of New York Mellon also expects to incur merger-related expenses in the process of combining the operations of the two companies. These merger-related expenses may include system conversion
 
 
costs, employee retention arrangements and costs of incremental communications to customers and others. It is expected that the exit and disposal costs along with the merger-related costs will be incurred over a three-year period after completion of the merger. These expenses are not included in the Unaudited Pro Forma Combined Consolidated Income Statement because these costs will be recorded in the combined results of operations as they are incurred after completion of the transaction and are not indicative of what the historical results of The Bank of New York Mellon would
have been had The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial actually been combined during the periods presented.
Note 7 -- Dividends
The Bank of New York Mellon declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.24 per share on July 10, 2007, payable on Aug. 3, 2007 to shareholders of record on July 25, 2007.
 
 
Note 8 -- Reclassifications to The Bank of New York Income Statement for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006
 
 
 
Reclassification adjustments to conform The Bank of New York categories with The Bank of New York Mellon Income Statement presentation:
 
Note 9 -- Reclassifications to Mellon Financial Income Statement for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006
 
 
 
Reclassification adjustments to conform Mellon Financial categories with The Bank of New York Mellon Income Statement presentation:
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20071019150106.txt.gz
TIME:20071019150106
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
On October 18, 2007 the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2007 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Number
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
-- The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) reported third quarter income from continuing operations of $642 million and diluted earnings per share of 56 cents which compares to 41 cents a year ago and 62 cents sequentially. The merger of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. with Mellon Financial Corporation was completed July 1, 2007.
NEW YORK, N.Y., October 18, 2007
 
 
Income from continuing operations was $448 million in the second quarter of 2007, and $298 million in the third quarter of 2006.
"We are off to a tremendous start as a new company," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon. "During a volatile market environment, we delivered strong double-digit increases in revenue and profit reflecting a combination of impressive organic growth and the positive impact of market volatility on our securities servicing businesses. While the asset management environment during the quarter was challenging, we capitalized on our strength in money market funds and won a landmark mandate in China. Our pipelines are in great shape, credit quality remains strong, we launched our new brand and the integration is proceeding well."
The results for the third quarter of 2007 include the net pre-tax benefit of $27 million from a settlement received for early termination of a contract that occurred in 2005 associated with the clearing business, as well as the pre-tax write-offs of the value of the remaining interest in a hedge fund manager that was sold in 2006 ($32 million) and internally developed software ($6 million). In addition, the impact of the merger in the third quarter on the state marginal tax rate required a recalculation of the yield on the leverage lease portfolio. The effect was a $22 million reduction in net interest revenue, together with a $45 million tax benefit recorded as a reduction to taxes. The net impact of these items increased earnings per share by approximately 1 cent.
 
1
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2007. This is followed by commentary that compares the current period to pro forma combined results of the third quarter of 2006 unless otherwise noted. The appendix to this release provides the pro forma combined results, without purchase accounting adjustments and assumes that the merger had occurred at the beginning of the third quarter of 2006. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary Report for detailed business sector information.)
Third Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
Third Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon, continued
 
 
The increase from both prior periods reflects a higher level of average interest-earning assets driven principally by the growth in client deposits. The net margin increased 22 basis points compared to the prior year and 7 basis points sequentially, principally reflecting the benefit of wider spreads on investment securities. Sequentially, the margin benefited from the impact of market volatility on short-term spreads as well as higher deposit levels, lower bond premium amortization due to slowing prepayments, partially offset by the negative impact of the required recalculation of the yield on the leverage lease portfolio under FAS 13 ($22 million).
 
Excluding merger and integration expense ($218 million) and intangible amortization ($131 million), noninterest expense on a pro forma combined basis increased 16% compared to the third quarter of 2006 and declined 3% (unannualized) sequentially. The results reflect $79 million in expense synergies ($62 million net of open positions eliminated) associated with the merger (detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary Report).
On a pro forma combined basis, excluding merger and integration expense, intangible amortization expense and the non-operating items in the third quarter of 2007 detailed on page 1 and the second quarter of 2007 detailed on page 11, we generated 1,100 bps of positive operating leverage compared to the prior year and 400 bps sequentially.
 
 
The following comparisons are to legacy The Bank of New York only.
 
 
 
3
 
 
On Oct. 9, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 2, 2007, to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 24, 2007.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 37 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Earnings Release Format
The third quarter 2007 results in this release reflect The Bank of New York and Mellon on a consolidated basis. The results for the nine months ended Sept. 30, 2007 in this release include nine months of The Bank of New York and three months for Mellon which reflect all related purchase accounting adjustments. All prior period financial results are for The Bank of New York only, unless labeled pro forma.
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on a fully taxable equivalent (FTE) basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period to period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for supplemental financial information of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, including 5-quarter trends of fee and other revenue, net interest revenue, noninterest expense as well as business sector trends. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is available at (Investor Relations - financial releases).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Bruce W. Van Saun, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8 a.m. EDT on Thursday, Oct. 18, 2007. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-2456 (U.S.) and (517) 623-4161 (International) Pass code: Earnings, or by logging on to . The earnings release together with the quarterly earnings summary will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on Oct. 18. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Oct. 18 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Thursday, Nov. 1, 2007 by dialing (800) 810-4036 (U.S.) or (402) 280-1623 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
5
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
7
Nonperforming Assets
Nonperforming assets were $37 million at Sept. 30, 2007, down from $38 million at Sept. 30, 2006 and up from $27 million at June 30, 2007. Nonperforming asset balances remain at historically low levels.
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $640 million, or 56 cents per share, in the third quarter of 2007, compared with $352 million, or 49 cents per share, in the third quarter of 2006, and $445 million, or 62 cents per share, in the second quarter of 2007.
Supplemental information - Earnings Per Share Presented on a GAAP and Non-GAAP basis
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received ..9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon Financial Corp. shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon Financial Corp. common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are presented in post-merger share count terms in this Earnings Release and the Quarterly Earnings Summary. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms for periods prior to July 1, 2007.
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
8
Revision of Prior Period Financial Statements
Our Company's fourth quarter 2006 acquisition of the Acquired Corporate Trust Business and sale of our Retail Business to JPMorgan Chase included a "Like Kind Exchange" (the "LKE") of finite lived intangible assets, principally core deposit intangibles, under Internal Revenue Code section ("Section") 1031. The LKE deferred taxes of $164 million were treated as a liability acquired in the business combination with an offsetting increase to goodwill.
We reviewed the transaction and now believe that $164 million of deferred tax expense should have been recognized on the gain related to the Retail Business intangibles included in the LKE with JPMorgan Chase. Accordingly, we have corrected the fourth quarter 2006 financial statements with a non-cash charge to discontinued operations  income taxes and a reduction in goodwill of $164 million. This revision does not impact income from continuing operations or our tangible common equity.
As shown in the financial information included in this release, we have revised our prior years' financial statements to reflect these taxes in discontinued operations. Because the revision was not material to any prior year financial statements, the revisions to prior periods will be presented in future filings, pursuant to SEC Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 108, "Considering the Effects of Prior Year Misstatements when Quantifying Misstatements in Current Year Financial Statements." Financial statements for the year ended Dec. 31, 2006 will be revised in the Dec. 31, 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The table below presents the effect of the correction on our previously reported consolidated statements of income for the fiscal year ended Dec. 31, 2006 and for the three-month period ended Dec. 31, 2006.
 
The effect of the correction on the Dec. 31, 2006 consolidated balance sheet is as follows:
 
 
9
The effect of the correction on the 2006 consolidated statement of cash flows is as follows:
 
 
10
APPENDIX
 
 
 
11
APPENDIX
 
 
 
12
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release, may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to future financial goals, the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon, including expectations with respect to the merged companies, integration and operations after the merger, achievement of milestones, future growth and prospects. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). The following risks, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from the anticipated results or other expectations expressed in the forward-looking statements: the businesses of The Bank of New York and Mellon may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time it expects, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; revenue following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; market volatility; operational risk; changes in political and economic conditions; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; geographic sources of income; the price of oil; and levels of tax-free income. Additional factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and The Bank of New York Company, Inc.'s and Mellon Financial Corporation's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Oct. 18, 2007, and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20071023135430.txt.gz
TIME:20071023135430
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the third quarter of 2006 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
This Quarterly Earnings Summary has been designed to facilitate the understanding of the impact of the merger between The Bank of New York and Mellon, which closed on July 1, 2007. Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain measures, which are noted, exclude certain items. We believe these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management monitors financial performance. Pro-forma combined financial results for The Bank of New York Mellon prior to the consummation of the merger exclude the impact of intangible amortization and the pro forma impact of incremental purchase accounting intangibles resulting from the merger.
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Corporation's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, new business wins, and pipelines for new business and statements with respect to the merger integration; including revenue synergies, expense synergy targets, estimated merger and integration charges, completion date for the bank consolidation, integration completion date and sources of revenue enhancements; as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; service quality metrics in Asset Servicing may not be attained; revenue following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; changes in political and economic conditions; changes in the relevant benchmark to measure changes in investment management fees; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; changes in the mix of assets under management; changes in the mix of deposits; the price of oil; the effects of the adoption of new accounting standards; corporate and personal customers' bankruptcies; market volatility; operational risk; inflation; levels of tax-free income; technological change; success in the timely development of new products and services; competitive product and pricing pressures within the Corporation's markets; consumer spending and savings habits; interest rate fluctuations; geographic sources of income; monetary fluctuations; acquisitions and integrations of acquired businesses; changes in law; changes in fiscal, monetary, regulatory, trade and tax policies and laws; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; the effects of terrorist acts and the results of the war on terrorism; as well as other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in the filings of the Corporation with the SEC and in The Bank of New York's and Mellon's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of Oct. 18, 2007, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The results prior to the consummation of the merger on July 1, 2007, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. The business sector combined results for all periods reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon. As a result of actions taken in the third quarter of 2007, the business sector results for 2006 have been changed from the second quarter of 2007 Combined Quarterly Earnings Summary to reflect consistent reporting.
 
 
THIRD QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. third quarter 2006)
 
 
KEY POINTS Pro forma Combined Basis
(a)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bp - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Merger Update - Integration Milestones *
 
 
2) Merger & Integration Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon)
 
3) Service Quality Goals for 2010 - Asset Servicing
4) Other
 
*Note: Integration expected to be completed in 2009.
 
 
 
 
 
 
BUSINESS SECTORS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth management and banking services to high-net-worth individuals, families and charitable gift programs, foundations and endowments)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to global financial institutions, corporate and public retirement funds and foundations and endowments)
ASSET SERVICING
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
On a linked quarter basis, Issuer services fees increased 5% (unannualized) reflecting growth in Depositary receipts as well as global products in Corporate Trust, while Shareowner services fees were relatively flat reflecting seasonality. Positive operating leverage was 400 bps.
 
 
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for introducing broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING AND EXECUTION SERVICES
 
 
(d)    3Q07 excludes the $27 million impact of the settlement received for the early termination of a contract detailed in the table
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides global payment services, working capital solutions, global markets and institutional banking services, including lending)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
(primarily includes business exits and Corporate Treasury activities, merger and integration charges, and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
SUMMARY OF NON-OPERATING ITEMS
 
 
Supplemental information - Earnings Per Share Presented on a GAAP and Non-GAAP basis
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon Financial Corp. common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are presented in post-merger share count terms in this Quarterly Earnings Summary and the Earnings Release. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms, for periods prior to July 1, 2007.
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance in accordance with GAAP because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20071113170240.txt.gz
TIME:20071113170240
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated November 13, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that it has agreed to acquire ARX Capital Management, an independent asset management business headquartered in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. The acquisition is expected to close in the first quarter of 2008. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
LONDON, NEW YORK AND RIO DE JANEIRO, November 13, 2007The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has announced it has agreed to acquire ARX Capital Management, a leading independent asset management business headquartered in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. ARX Capital Management specializes in Brazilian multi-strategy, long/short and long only investment strategies and has more than $2.6 billion in assets under management.
The acquisition is expected to close in the first quarter of 2008 and to be accretive to cash earnings per share in year one. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed. ARX Capital Management will be integrated with BNY Mellon Asset Management Brasil, and the combined business will become one of the leading asset managers in the country.
"The acquisition of ARX Capital Management is a key development in our global growth and will enable us to offer clients access to expanding investment opportunities and expertise in the Brazilian marketplace," said Ronald P. O'Hanley, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Asset Management. "In addition to meeting our strategic objective of broadening our capabilities in the world's most important emerging markets, the acquisition of ARX Capital Management is financially compelling, and exceeds our internal return hurdles."
Founded in 2001, ARX Capital Management has capitalized on the significant growth in the region by building a strong local investor base. The company manages 20 equity and hedge funds, in domestic and offshore versions. BNY Mellon DTVM Brasil is the administrator for the majority of the funds.
"ARX Capital Management and BNY Mellon Asset Management Brasil have highly complementary businesses and we already have a strong working partnership. Together we will accelerate our success in expanding the depth and breadth of our client base, enhancing our product offering and increasing our focus on attracting and retaining talent," said Jos Alberto Tovar, CEO of ARX Capital Management. "This combination positions both organizations well in a region that is growing rapidly."
BNY Mellon Brasil recently celebrated its 10-year anniversary in the region, a tenure supported by strong growth with assets under management and administration now at more than $26 billion. Its asset management arm focuses on Brazilian fixed income, hedge funds and long-only equity funds. Jos Alberto Tovar, currently CEO of ARX Capital Management, will become the head of the asset management business in Brazil, reporting to Zeca Oliveira, who will lead the integrated group, BNY Mellon Brasil.
"Brazil is among the fastest developing economies in the world and continues to benefit from the high prices of commodities, thanks to its wealth of natural resources. This, coupled with the continued maturation of the capital markets in Brazil, has intensified the spotlight on the country," said Jon Little, vice chairman of BNY Mellon Asset Management. "Our integrated business will complement our focus in the institutional marketplace with the addition of high net worth individuals and family office, and also provide access to new products for our global client base. ARX Capital Management, with its strong leadership, excellent products and strong historic and future growth potential, will significantly enhance our global product offering."
The Brazilian asset management industry is the 10th largest in the world*, and over the last five years has grown on average at 27% per annum. The industry focus is moving from traditional fixed income strategies to equity and more alternative products including hedge funds and currency-based strategies.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
This press release contains statements relating to future results of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the expected closing date, the transaction being accretive to earnings and plans for, implications of and the financial impact of the announced transaction. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; equity, fixed-income and FX market fluctuations; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; client retention rates; integrations of acquired businesses; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of November 13, 2007, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after November 13, 2007 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
LONDON, NEW YORK AND RIO DE JANEIRO, 13 November 2007The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has announced it has agreed to acquire ARX Capital Management, a leading independent asset management business headquartered in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. ARX Capital Management specialises in Brazilian multi-strategy, long/short and long only investment strategies and has more than US$2.6bn in assets under management.
The acquisition is expected to close in the first quarter of 2008 and to be accretive to cash earnings per share in year one. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed. ARX Capital Management will be integrated with BNY Mellon Asset Management Brasil and the combined business will become one of the leading asset managers in the country.
Ronald P. O'Hanley, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Asset Management, said: "The acquisition of ARX Capital Management is a key development in our global growth and will enable us to offer clients access to expanding investment opportunities and expertise in the Brazilian marketplace. In addition to meeting our strategic objective of broadening our capabilities in the world's most important emerging markets, the acquisition of ARX Capital Management is financially compelling, and exceeds our internal return hurdles."
Founded in 2001, ARX Capital Management has capitalised on the significant growth in the region by building a strong local investor base. The company manages 20 equity and hedge funds, in domestic and offshore versions. BNY Mellon DTVM Brasil is the administrator for the majority of the funds.
Jos Alberto Tovar, CEO of ARX Capital Management, said: "ARX Capital Management and BNY Mellon Asset Management Brasil have highly complementary businesses and we already have a strong working partnership. Together we will accelerate our success in expanding the depth and breadth of our client base, enhancing our product offering and increasing our focus on attracting and retaining talent. This combination positions both organisations well in a region that is growing rapidly."
BNY Mellon Brasil recently celebrated its 10-year anniversary in the region, a tenure supported by strong growth with assets under management and administration now more than US$26bn. Its asset management arm focuses on Brazilian fixed income, hedge funds and long-only equity funds. Jos Alberto Tovar, currently CEO of ARX Capital Management, will become the head of the asset management business in Brazil, reporting to Zeca Oliveira, who will lead the integrated group, BNY Mellon Brasil.
Jon Little, vice chairman of BNY Mellon Asset Management, concluded: "Brazil is among the fastest developing economies in the world and continues to benefit from the high prices of commodities, thanks to its wealth of natural resources. This, coupled with the continued maturation of the capital markets in Brazil, has intensified the spotlight on the country. Our integrated business will complement our focus in the institutional marketplace with the addition of high net worth individuals and family office, and also provide access to new products for our global client base. ARX Capital Management, with its strong leadership, excellent products and strong historic and future growth potential, will significantly enhance our global product offering."
The Brazilian asset management industry is the 10th largest in the world*, and over the last five years has grown on average at 27% per annum. The industry focus is moving from traditional fixed income strategies to equity and more alternative products including hedge funds and currency-based strategies.
Notes to editors:
is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
This press release contains statements relating to future results of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the expected closing date, the transaction being accretive to earnings and plans for, implications of and the financial impact of the announced transaction. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; equity, fixed-income and FX market fluctuations; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; client retention rates; integrations of acquired businesses; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of November 13, 2007, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after November 13, 2007 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20071126161718.txt.gz
TIME:20071126161718
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated November 21, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that it has signed an agreement with Western Securities to establish a joint venture fund management company in China. The new company, which will be called BNY Mellon Western Fund Management and owned 51 percent by Western Securities and 49 percent by The Bank of New York Mellon, will be headquartered in Shanghai and is expected to launch in 2008, subject to regulatory approvals.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
LONDON, NEW YORK AND SHANGHAI, November 21, 2007  The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation and Western Securities have signed an agreement to establish a joint venture fund management company in China. The new company, which will be called BNY Mellon Western Fund Management and owned 51 percent by Western Securities and 49 percent by The Bank of New York Mellon, will be headquartered in Shanghai and is expected to launch in 2008, subject to regulatory approvals.
The joint venture will initially manage domestic Chinese securities in a range of local retail fund products. Over time it is hoped that the venture will develop further products using the scale and expertise of The Bank of New York Mellon group. BNY Mellon Western Fund Management will aim to leverage distribution within the Chinese banking and securities sectors, building awareness of the new company in the region.
"Accelerating the already significant growth of The Bank of New York Mellon's business outside of the US is our key strategic priority. China offers our company and our clients huge growth potential and we are delighted to further our presence there with the formation of this joint venture. This is an exciting opportunity for our company in such an important region," Ronald P. O'Hanley, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Asset Management.
Founded in 2001 with registered capital of RMB 1bn, Western Securities is based in Xi'an and has 34 Securities Branches and 20 Securities Services offices throughout China. It has RMB 14bn in total assets under management.
"As the Chinese financial environment continues to expand and evolve, so the opportunities to develop international partnerships significantly increase. We are delighted to join forces with The Bank of New York Mellon, which has considerable experience in the international asset management industry, and believe we will together over time be able to offer tailored asset management solutions to Chinese investors," said Dr. Liu Jianwu, chairman of Western Securities.
The Bank of New York Mellon recently announced that its asset management unit, BNY Mellon Asset Management, had been appointed to provide sub-advisory services in relation to China Southern's QDII fund. China Southern's QDII fund launched at a capped $4 billion having received $6.5 billion in subscriptions from Chinese investors. In addition, BNY Mellon Asset Servicing, a global leader in securities servicing, was appointed by the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Limited (ICBC) as Overseas Custodian for the China Southern QDII fund.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
This press release contains statements relating to future events that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the expected launch date for the new joint venture and plans for the joint venture. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of November 21, 2007, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after November 21, 2007 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
LONDON, NEW YORK AND SHANGHAI, 21 November 2007  The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation and Western Securities have signed an agreement to establish a joint venture fund management company in China. The new company, which will be called BNY Mellon Western Fund Management and owned 51% by Western Securities and 49% by The Bank of New York Mellon, will be headquartered in Shanghai and is expected to launch in 2008, subject to regulatory approvals.
The joint venture will initially manage domestic Chinese securities in a range of local retail fund products. Over time it is hoped that the venture will develop further products using the scale and expertise of The Bank of New York Mellon group. BNY Mellon Western Fund Management will aim to leverage distribution within the Chinese banking and securities sectors, building awareness of the new company in the region.
Ronald P. O'Hanley, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Asset Management, said: "Accelerating the already significant growth of The Bank of New York Mellon's business outside of the US is our key strategic priority. China offers our company and our clients huge growth potential and we are delighted to further our presence there with the formation of this joint venture. This is an exciting opportunity for our company in such an important region."
Founded in 2001 with registered capital of RMB 1bn, Western Securities is based in Xi'an and has 34 Securities Branches and 20 Securities Services offices throughout China. It has RMB 14bn in total assets under management.
Dr Liu Jianwu, Chairman of Western Securities, said: "As the Chinese financial environment continues to expand and evolve, so the opportunities to develop international partnerships significantly increase. We are delighted to join forces with The Bank of New York Mellon, which has considerable experience in the international asset management industry, and believe we will together over time be able to offer tailored asset management solutions to Chinese investors."
The Bank of New York Mellon recently announced that its asset management unit, BNY Mellon Asset Management, had been appointed to provide sub-advisory services in relation to China Southern's QDII fund. China Southern's QDII fund launched at a capped US$4 billion having received US$6.5 billion in subscriptions from Chinese investors. In addition, BNY Mellon Asset Servicing, a global leader in securities servicing, was appointed by the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Limited (ICBC) as Overseas Custodian for the China Southern QDII fund.
Notes to editors:
is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
This press release contains statements relating to future events that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the expected launch date for the new joint venture and plans for the joint venture. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of November 21, 2007, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after November 21, 2007 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20071227105408.txt.gz
TIME:20071227105408
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated December 20, 2007, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that it has completed its acquisition of ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
LONDON, December 20, 2007  The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a global leader in asset management and securities servicing, has completed its acquisition of ABN AMRO Mellon Global Securities Services B.V. following regulatory approval from the Dutch regulator, (DNB).
De Nederlandsche Bank
ABN AMRO Mellon, the 50-50 joint venture company established by Mellon Bank N.A. and ABN AMRO in 2003 to provide global custody and related services to institutions outside North America, will now be known as BNY Mellon Asset Servicing B.V. and becomes a part of the asset servicing division of The Bank of New York Mellon. Terms of the deal have not been disclosed.
The bank continues to be headquartered in Amsterdam and regulated by DNB. Existing ABN AMRO Mellon clients will remain contracted to BNY Mellon Asset Servicing B.V., as will ABN AMRO Mellon staff at the company's operational centres around the world.
ABN AMRO Mellon CEO Nadine Chakar takes up a new position as Chair of the Supervisory Board of BNY Mellon Asset Servicing B.V. She continues in her role as Head of Europe, Middle East & Africa (EMEA) for BNY Mellon's asset servicing business, which she has held since the completion of the merger between The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial Corporation in July 2007.
The role of CEO of BNY Mellon Asset Servicing B.V. is taken up by Pim Nederpel. Nederpel has been ABN AMRO Mellon's Chief Financial Officer since October 2005, with responsibility for the finance, business technology services and legal, risk & compliance departments within the bank. Prior to joining ABN AMRO Mellon, Nederpel held the roles of Executive Director of Euronext Amsterdam and Deputy CEO of Clearnet among other positions.
The bank's existing Managing Board structure will remain in place.
Nadine Chakar said: "The success that ABN AMRO Mellon has enjoyed over the past five years is driven by the creativity, team spirit and unwavering passion for results displayed by our employees, who have turned even our most challenging business goals and ambitions into reality. Like our clients, they will now benefit from the many new opportunities afforded by being a part of a larger global organisation.
 
"From the outset the ABN AMRO Mellon JV was structured to avoid disruption in the event of any change of ownership. I want to stress that continuity  of people, products, technology and service levels  remains our priority as we become part of the world's largest asset servicing provider.
"This deal is about evolution, not revolution. It is about moving the company to the next level, and there is a clear and logical fit between ABN AMRO Mellon's activities and the capabilities of the BNY Mellon Asset Servicing line of business."
Jim Palermo, Co-CEO of BNY Mellon Asset Servicing and former Co-Chair of the ABN AMRO Mellon Supervisory Board, said: "On behalf of the Supervisory Board, I would like to thank Nadine and her team for their sterling work in building a world class organisation that leads the way in service excellence. By bringing ABN AMRO Mellon into the BNY Mellon Asset Servicing line of business we are combining two excellent organisations committed to high quality service, innovation and flexibility for the benefit of our respective clients."
Notes to editors
BNY Mellon Asset Servicing offers clients worldwide a broad spectrum of specialised asset servicing capabilities, including custody and fund services, securities lending, performance and analytics, and execution services. BNY Mellon Asset Servicing provides services through The Bank of New York, Mellon Bank, N.A. and other related companies.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080118111530.txt.gz
TIME:20080118111530
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) reported fourth quarter income from continuing operations, before extraordinary items, of $700 million and diluted earnings per share of 61 cents, which compares to 60 cents a year ago and 56 cents sequentially. Income from continuing operations was $642 million in the third quarter of 2007, and $427 million in the fourth quarter of 2006.
NEW YORK, January 17, 2008 
Adjusting for the impact of merger and integration expense ($124 million pre-tax), diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2007 were 67 cents, which compares to 61 cents a year ago and 67 cents sequentially. The results of continuing operations for the fourth quarter of 2007 include 10 cents per share for the CDO write-down.
"I am pleased with our accomplishments in 2007. We began to successfully merge our two legacy companies and posted terrific fourth quarter results with 17% revenue and 26% earnings per share growth, excluding the CDO write-down. We are fully delivering on our commitments to clients, shareholders, and employees and business momentum remains strong. Our fourth quarter results also include the relative impact of recent market volatility on a small portion of our investment securities portfolio as well as our proactive decision to consolidate a bank-sponsored conduit. These actions are consistent with our strategy of aggressively reducing risk and complexity while exiting those businesses that do not support our global growth opportunities in asset management and securities servicing," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
Net income totaled $520 million, or 45 cents per share, in the fourth quarter of 2007, compared with $1.625 billion or $2.27 per share in the fourth quarter of 2006. The fourth quarter of 2007 included an extraordinary charge of $180 million, net of tax, associated with management's decision to restructure and consolidate the assets of the bank-sponsored conduit, Three Rivers Funding Corporation (TRFC). This decision was based on the ongoing disruption in the capital markets impacting the funding costs of conduits which is in sharp contrast to the current level of our own funding costs, together with our continuing efforts to exit non-core activities. The extraordinary loss reflects the impact of a negative mark to market associated with spread widening on the assets consolidated. The securities within this portfolio have strong investment grade ratings and there were no downgrades of TRFC's assets during the fourth quarter. We expect to earn back the mark to market loss over the remaining lives of the assets (which average approximately 4-5 years), based on the credit quality of the assets. Further discussion of the assets consolidated and the related financial impact is provided on page 9.
 
1
Income from continuing operations, before extraordinary loss, for the full-year 2007 totaled $2.227 billion, or $2.38 per share, compared with $1.476 billion, or $2.04 per share, in 2006. Adjusting for the impact of merger and integration expense ($404 million pre-tax), and non-operating items detailed on page 11, diluted earnings per share for full-year 2007 were $2.62, compared with $2.14 for full-year 2006. Adjusting for the impact of merger and integration expenses ($404 million pre-tax), intangible amortization ($319 million pre-tax) and non-operating items, diluted earnings per share for full-year 2007 were $2.83 which compares with $2.22 for full-year 2006. Net income for the full-year 2007 totaled $2.039 billion, or $2.18 per share, compared with $2.847 billion, or $3.94 per share, for full-year 2006. Discontinued operations for the fourth quarter and full-year 2006 included a net after-tax gain of $1.217 billion from the sale of our Retail Business.
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2007. This is followed by commentary that compares the current period to pro forma combined results of the fourth quarter of 2006 unless otherwise noted. The appendix to this release provides the pro forma combined results, without purchase accounting adjustments and assumes that the merger had occurred at the beginning of the third quarter of 2006. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary Report for detailed business sector information.)
Fourth Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
Fourth Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon, continued
 
 
 
 
 
Excluding merger and integration expense, intangible amortization, and non-operating items in the fourth quarter of 2006, detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary Report, noninterest expense on a pro forma combined basis increased 7% compared to the fourth quarter of 2006. The results reflect $96 million in expense synergies associated with the merger detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary Report.
On a pro forma combined basis, excluding merger and integration expense, intangible amortization expense, the CDO write-down, and non-operating items in the fourth quarter of 2006 and third quarter of 2007 (detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary), we generated 1,050 bps of positive operating leverage compared to the prior year and 350 bps sequentially.
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
Fourth Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon, continued
 
 
 
On Jan. 8, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 1, 2008, to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 23, 2008. On Dec. 18, 2007, the Board of Directors of BNY Mellon authorized the repurchase of up to 35 million shares of common stock. This authorization is in addition to the authority to repurchase up to 6.5 million shares previously approved by the Executive Committee of the Board, of which 5.1 million shares remain at Dec. 31, 2007.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Earnings Release Format
Results for the fourth and third quarters of 2007 reflect The Bank of New York and Mellon on a consolidated basis. The results for the 12 months ended December 31, 2007 in this release include 12 months of The Bank of New York and six months for Mellon, which reflect all related purchase accounting adjustments. All periods prior to July 1, 2007 reflect financial results for The Bank of New York only, unless labeled pro forma.
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, before extraordinary (loss), unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on a fully taxable equivalent (FTE) basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for supplemental financial information of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, including 5-quarter trends of fee and other revenue, net interest revenue, noninterest expense as well as business sector trends. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is available at (Investor Relations - financial releases).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Bruce W. Van Saun, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8 a.m. EST on Thursday, Jan. 17, 2008. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The earnings release together with the quarterly earnings summary will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EST on Jan. 17. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 17 at approximately 2 p.m. EST through Thursday, Jan. 31, 2008 by dialing (866) 487-6444 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1643 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
Note: The balance sheet at Dec. 31, 2006 has been derived from the audited financial statements as of that date, as revised.
 
7
Securities Available for Sale
At Dec. 31, 2007, investment securities totaled $48.7 billion. As of that date, our mortgage and asset-backed securities portfolio of $41.6 billion (excluding TRFC securities) were rated 96% AAA, 3% AA and 1% A. Included in this portfolio were $379 million of collateralized debt obligations (CDO), at par, that contained subprime exposure. Based on deteriorating conditions in the U.S. housing market, we recognized a pre-tax loss of $200 million ($118 million after-tax) for other than temporary impairment related to these securities. The $179 million carrying value of the CDOs at Dec. 31, 2007 was 47% of par.
In the third quarter of 2007, we acquired $375 million of asset-backed securities in a structured investment vehicle (SIV) from a portfolio advised by one of our asset managers. During the fourth quarter of 2007, $75 million of these securities matured and we sold $174 million of these securities,resulting in a pre-tax loss of $8 million. We applied a similar discount to the $126 million of remaining securities resulting in a write-down of $6 million. In the fourth quarter of 2007, we acquired additional SIV securities with a fair market value of $45 million from affiliated funds. The $165 million carrying amount of remaining SIV securities at Dec. 31, 2007 was 88% of par.
 
During the fourth quarter of 2007, we sold other investment securities available for sale, recognizing a pre-tax gain of $23 million.
As of Dec. 31, 2007, within our investment securities portfolio, our mortgage-backed securities with subprime exposure were $1.5 billion (excluding TRFC securities) and asset-backed collateralized debt obligations as described above were $179 million. Ratings on these securities are below:
 
The unrealized net of tax loss on our securities available for sale was $339 million as of Dec. 31, 2007, compared with $250 million at Sept. 30, 2007. At Dec. 31, 2006, the gains and losses on securities available for sale netted to zero.
Nonperforming Loans
Nonperforming loans were $186 million at Dec. 31, 2007, up from $37 million at Dec. 31, 2006 and up from $35 million at Sept. 30, 2007. The increase relates principally to liquidity facilities to two SIVs ($81 million), a related party loan provided to support an investment management product that is currently being unwound and various smaller loans. The SIV exposure added to nonperforming loans represents all of the SIV exposure within our loan portfolio.
Provision and Reserve for Credit Exposure
The provision for credit losses totaled $20 million in the fourth quarter of 2007 compared with a credit of $15 million in the fourth quarter of 2006 and no provision in the third quarter of 2007. In the third quarter of 2007, there was no net provision which was made possible in part by a $15 million release of reserves from the sale of leases. The reserve for loan losses was $327 million at Dec 31, 2007, $332 million at Sept. 30, 2007 and $287 million at Dec. 31, 2006. The reserve for unfunded commitments was $167 million at Dec. 31, 2007, $178 million at Sept. 30, 2007 and $150 million at Dec. 31, 2006.
 
8
Consolidation of Three Rivers Funding Corporation (TRFC)
On Dec. 31, 2007 we called the first loss notes of TRFC, making us the primary beneficiary and triggering the consolidation of TRFC. If we had not called the first loss notes, TRFC would not have been consolidated under FIN46R. The consolidation resulted in the recognition of an extraordinary loss (non-cash accounting charge) of $180 million after-tax, or 16 cents per share, representing the current mark to market discount from par associated with spread widening for the assets in TRFC.
Strategically TRFC is not core to our focus on high growth global opportunities in Asset Management and Securities Servicing; it had an immaterial impact on our consolidated financial results, generating only $1 million in fee revenue in the third quarter of 2007. Furthermore, the continuing disruption in the capital markets negatively impacted TRFC funding costs and related returns, which was in sharp contrast to our funding costs and balance sheet strength. This consolidation improves the profitability of this portfolio and eliminates a management distraction.
In addition to the extraordinary loss, the size of the 2007 year-end balance sheet increased by the full amount of third party funding, approximately $4.0 billion. At Dec 31, 2007, we held the remaining funding of $136 million. Our primary capital ratios were affected as follows by the consolidation:
 
Prospectively, based on our excess liquidity, the third party funding for TRFC will be eliminated over the course of the first quarter of 2008, resulting in an expected improvement in our adjusted tangible common equity ratio of approximately 10 bps during the first quarter of 2008.
Also prospectively, the $180 million after-tax mark to market on the TRFC assets is expected to be accreted into income over the remaining lives of the assets, which are projected to average approximately 4-5 years, based on the credit quality of the assets.
The fair value of TRFC's asset-backed securities portfolio totaled approximately $3.5 billion at Dec. 31, 2007. In addition to these securities, TRFC has approximately $400 million of securitizations of client receivables that are structured to meet a credit rating of A. Below are TRFC's asset and mortgage-backed securities by credit rating.
 
We will integrate these securities into our investment securities portfolio in the first quarter of 2008.
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $520 million, or 45 cents per share, in the fourth quarter of 2007, compared with $1.625 billion, or $2.27 per share, in the fourth quarter of 2006, and $640 million, or 56 cents per share, in the third quarter of 2007. Discontinued operations in the fourth quarter of 2006 included a net after-tax gain of $1.217 billion from the sale of our Retail Business.
 
9
Supplemental InformationReconciliation of Earnings Per Share  GAAP to Non-GAAP
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
10
Supplemental Information  Trend of Earnings Per Share on a GAAP and Non-GAAP basis
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are presented in post-merger share count terms in this Earnings Release and the Quarterly Earnings Summary. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms for periods prior to July 1, 2007. See page 10 for a discussion of use of supplemental non-GAAP information.
 
Revision of Prior Period Financial Statements
As previously reported, net income for 2006 and retained earnings at Dec. 31, 2006 reflect a non-cash charge to discontinued operations income taxes and a reduction to goodwill of $164 million, correcting the information originally reported.
Summary of Non-Operating Items
 
 
11
APPENDIX
 
 
 
12
APPENDIX
 
 
 
13
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to future financial goals, the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon, and matters relating to the consolidation of TRFC, including future earnings generated by its assets, funding costs, impact on adjusted tangible common equity ratio and impact on income. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). The following risks, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from the anticipated results or other expectations expressed in the forward-looking statements: the businesses of The Bank of New York and Mellon may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time it expects, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; revenue following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; market volatility; operational risk; changes in political and economic conditions; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; geographic sources of income; the price of oil; and levels of tax-free income. Additional factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and The Bank of New York Company, Inc.'s and Mellon Financial Corporation's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of January 17, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080123140816.txt.gz
TIME:20080123140816
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated 22 January 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that it has completed the acquisition of ARX Capital Management, an independent asset management business headquartered in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. Terms of the transaction, which was first announced on 13 November 2007, were not disclosed.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
LONDON, NEW YORK AND RIO DE JANEIRO, 22 January 2008The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has completed the acquisition of ARX Capital Management, a leading independent asset management business headquartered in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. ARX Capital Management specialises in Brazilian multi-strategy, long/short and long only investment strategies and has more than US$2.8bn in assets under management.
Terms of the transaction, which was first announced on 13 November 2007, were not disclosed. ARX Capital Management will be integrated with BNY Mellon Asset Management Brasil with the combined business becoming one of the leading asset managers in the country.
Jonathan Little, vice-chairman of BNY Mellon Asset Management, said: "The acquisition of ARX Capital Management significantly enhances our capabilities in the region and will add a strong product offering to help drive the development of our business internationally. Moreover, it fits with our strategic objective of growing our footprint in developing markets. The business is continuing to exceed our expectations with close to 100% client retention during the period since we announced the acquisition. "
Zeca Oliveira, country head of BNY Mellon Brasil, added: "Our integrated business will complement our focus in the institutional marketplace with the addition of high net worth individuals and family office, accelerating our success in expanding the depth and breadth of our client base, and increasing our focus on attracting and retaining talent."
Founded in 2001, ARX Capital Management has capitalised on the significant growth in the region by building a strong local investor base. The company manages 20 equity and hedge funds, in domestic and offshore versions. BNY Mellon DTVM Brasil is the administrator for the majority of the funds. Jos Alberto Tovar, CEO of ARX Capital Management, will become the head of the integrated asset management business in Brazil, reporting to Zeca Oliveira.
Jos Alberto Tovar said: "We are already seeing new business as a result of the acquisition which is testament to our teams working successfully during integration. This combination enhances our product and service offering and we are excited about our future growth prospects."
Notes to editors:
is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $20 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080124132919.txt.gz
TIME:20080124132919
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.    RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION.
On January 17, 2008, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for full year 2007 and fourth quarter 2007 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on January 17, 2008, a Quarterly Earnings Summary. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report, is "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K, is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
ITEM 9.01.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from the Registrant's segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance in accordance with GAAP because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the fourth quarter of 2006 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain measures, which are noted, exclude certain items, including the impact of the extraordinary item in 4Q07. We believe these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance in accordance with GAAP because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Pro forma combined financial results for The Bank of New York Mellon prior to the consummation of the merger exclude the pro forma impact of incremental purchase accounting including intangible amortization resulting from the merger.
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Corporation's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, new business wins, and pipelines for new business; matters relating to the consolidation of TRFC, including future earnings generated by its assets, funding costs, impact on adjusted tangible common equity ratio and impact on income; statements with respect to the merger integration, including revenue synergies and targeted run rates, expense synergy targets, estimated merger and integration charges, anticipated completion date for the bank consolidation; credit strategy; and the expected closing date of the ARX Capital Management acquisition, as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; service quality metrics in Asset Servicing may not be attained; revenue following the transaction may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the transaction, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; changes in political and economic conditions; changes in the relevant benchmark to measure changes in investment management fees; equity, fixed-income and foreign exchange market fluctuations; changes in the mix of assets under management; changes in the mix of deposits; the price of oil; the effects of the adoption of new accounting standards; corporate and personal customers' bankruptcies; market volatility; operational risk; inflation; levels of tax-free income; technological change; success in the timely development of new products and services; competitive product and pricing pressures within the Corporation's markets; consumer spending and savings habits; interest rate fluctuations; geographic sources of income; monetary fluctuations; acquisitions and integrations of acquired businesses; changes in law; changes in fiscal, monetary, regulatory, trade and tax policies and laws; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; the effects of terrorist acts and the results of the war on terrorism; as well as other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in the filings of the Corporation with the SEC and in The Bank of New York's and Mellon's historical reports (such as Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K) filed with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of Jan. 17, 2008 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The results prior to the consummation of the merger on July 1, 2007, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. The business sector combined results for all periods reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon. As a result of actions taken in the fourth quarter of 2007, the business sector results for the first, second and third quarters of 2007 reflect revisions from results reported in the third quarter of 2007 Combined Quarterly Earnings Summary to reflect consistent reporting. We have completed the harmonization process for the business sectors.
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2007 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. fourth quarter 2006)
 
KEY POINTS Pro forma Combined Basis
(a)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Changes in market value of assets under management from Sept. 30, 2007 to Dec. 31, 2007 - by business sector
 
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
 
bp - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECURITIES AVAILABLE FOR SALE
At Dec. 31, 2007, investment securities totaled $48.7 billion. As of that date, our mortgage and asset-backed securities portfolio of $41.6 billion (excluding TRFC securities) were rated 96% AAA, 3% AA, and 1% A. Included in this portfolio were $379 million of collateralized debt obligations (CDO), at par, that contained subprime exposure. Based on deteriorating conditions in the U.S. housing market, we recognized a pre-tax loss of $200 million ($118 million after-tax) for other than temporary impairment related to these securities. The $179 million carrying value of the CDOs at Dec. 31, 2007 was 47% of par.
In the third quarter of 2007, we acquired $375 million of asset-backed securities in a structured investment vehicle (SIV) from a portfolio advised by one of our asset managers. During the fourth quarter of 2007, $75 million of these securities matured and we sold $174 million of these securities, resulting in a pre-tax loss of $8 million. We applied a similar discount to the $126 million of remaining securities which resulted in a write-down of $6 million. In the fourth quarter of 2007, we acquired additional SIV securities with a fair market value of $45 million from affiliated funds. The $165 million carrying amount of remaining SIV securities at Dec. 31, 2007 was 88% of par.
During the fourth quarter of 2007, we sold other investment securities available for sale, recognizing a pre-tax gain of $23 million.
As of Dec. 31, 2007, within our investment securities portfolio, our mortgage-backed securities with subprime exposure were $1.5 billion (excluding TRFC securities) and asset-backed collateralized debt obligations as described above were $179 million. Ratings on these securities are below:
 
The unrealized net of tax loss on our securities available for sale was $339 million at Dec. 31, 2007, compared with $250 million at Sept. 30, 2007. At Dec. 31, 2006, the unrealized gains and losses on securities available for sale netted to zero.
 
 
CONSOLIDATION OF THREE RIVERS FUNDING CORPORATION (TRFC)
On Dec. 31, 2007 we called the first loss notes of TRFC, making us the primary beneficiary and triggering the consolidation of TRFC. If we had not called the first loss notes, TRFC would not have been consolidated under FIN46R. The consolidation resulted in the recognition of an extraordinary loss (non-cash accounting charge) of $180 million after-tax, or 16 cents per share, representing the current mark to market discount from par associated with spread widening for the assets in TRFC.
Strategically TRFC is not core to our focus on high growth global opportunities in Asset Management and Securities Servicing; it had an immaterial impact on our consolidated financial results, generating only $1 million in fee revenue in the third quarter of 2007. Furthermore, the continuing disruption in the capital markets negatively impacted TRFC funding costs and related returns, which was in sharp contrast to our funding costs and balance sheet strength. This consolidation improves the profitability of this portfolio and eliminates a management distraction.
In addition to the extraordinary loss, the size of the 2007 year-end balance sheet increased by the full amount of third party funding, approximately $4.0 billion. At Dec. 31, 2007, we held the remaining funding of $136 million. Our primary capital ratios were affected as follows by the consolidation:
 
Prospectively, based on our excess liquidity, the third party funding for TRFC will be eliminated over the course of the first quarter of 2008 resulting in an expected improvement in our adjusted tangible common equity ratio of approximately 10 bps during the first quarter of 2008.
Also prospectively, the $180 million after-tax mark to market on the TRFC assets is expected to be accreted into income over the remaining lives of the assets, which are projected to average approximately 4-5 years, based on the credit quality of the assets.
The fair value of TRFC's asset-backed securities portfolio totaled approximately $3.5 billion at Dec. 31, 2007. In addition to these securities, TRFC has approximately $400 million of securitizations of client receivables that are structured to meet a credit rating of A. Below are TRFC's asset and mortgage-backed securities by credit rating.
 
We will integrate these securities into our investment securities portfolio in the first quarter of 2008.
 
 
NONPERFORMING LOANS
Nonperforming loans were $186 million at Dec. 31, 2007, up from $37 million at Dec. 31, 2006 and up from $35 million at Sept. 30, 2007. The increase relates principally to liquidity facilities to two SIVs ($81 million), a related party loan provided to support an investment management product that is currently being unwound and various smaller loans. The SIV exposure added to nonperforming loans represents all of the SIV exposure within our loan portfolio.
PROVISION AND RESERVE FOR CREDIT EXPOSURE
The provision for credit losses totaled $20 million in the fourth quarter of 2007 compared with a credit of $15 million in the fourth quarter of 2006 and no provision in the third quarter of 2007. In the third quarter of 2007, there was no net provision which was made possible in part by a $15 million release of reserves from the sale of leases. The reserve for loan losses was $327 million at Dec. 31, 2007, $332 million at Sept. 30, 2007 and $287 million at Dec. 31, 2006. The reserve for unfunded commitments was $167 million at Dec. 31, 2007, $178 million at Sept. 30, 2007 and $150 million at Dec. 31, 2006.
INSTITUTIONAL CREDIT STRATEGY
 
 
 
Merger Update - Integration Milestones
 
 
 
 
4) Service Quality Goals for 2010-Asset Servicing
- Global Custodian Survey  BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group (released January 2008)
5) Consolidation of Banks - anticipate completion by early 3Q08
 
 
 
BUSINESS SECTORS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth management and banking services to high-net-worth individuals, families and charitable gift programs, foundations and endowments)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to global financial institutions, corporate and public retirement funds and foundations and endowments)
ASSET SERVICING
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for introducing broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING AND EXECUTION SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(provides global payment services, working capital solutions, global markets and institutional banking services, including lending)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
(primarily includes business exits and Corporate Treasury activities, merger and integration charges, and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SEGMENT
 
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Further Note
As a result of actions taken in the fourth quarter of 2007, the business sector results for the first, second and third quarters of 2007 reflect revisions from results reported in the third quarter of 2007 Combined Quarterly Earnings Summary to reflect consistent reporting. We have completed the harmonization process for the business sectors.
 
 
SUMMARY OF NON-OPERATING ITEMS
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION -RECONCILIATION OF EARNINGS PER SHARE  GAAP TO NON-GAAP
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
Revision of Prior Period Financial Statements
As previously reported, net income for 2006 and retained earnings at Dec. 31, 2006 reflect a non-cash charge to discontinued operations income taxes and a reduction to goodwill of $164 million, correcting the information originally reported.
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  TREND OF EARNINGS PER SHARE ON A GAAP AND NON-GAAP BASIS
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon shareholders received one share of The Bank of New York Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Historical earnings per share for The Bank of New York are presented in post-merger share count terms in this Quarterly Earnings Summary and the Earnings Release. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms, for periods prior to July 1, 2007. See page 21 for a discussion of use of supplemental non-GAAP information.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080227162821.txt.gz
TIME:20080227162821
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e) Effective February 21, 2008, the Registrant amended the 2003 Long-Term Incentive Plan of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. (the "Plan") to permit the limitation of automatic vesting and/or payment of awards upon the occurrence of a change in control (as defined in the Plan), for future awards under the Plan. Accordingly, future awards may include a so-called "double trigger", under which the vesting and/or payment is also conditioned upon the participant's termination of employment following a change in control. A copy of the amendment is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Section 11 of the Plan is hereby amended to add the phrase "Unless and to the extent limited in an Award Agreement" to the beginning of the first paragraph thereof, so that, as amended, such paragraph shall read as follows (with new language shown in ):
bold italic
s
in the event of a Change in Control, as hereinafter defined, (i) the restrictions applicable to all shares of restricted stock and restricted share units shall lapse and such shares and share units shall be deemed fully vested, (ii) all restricted stock granted in the form of share units shall be paid in cash, (iii) 200% of all performance shares granted in the form of shares of Common Stock or share units shall be deemed to be earned in full and fully vested, (iv) 200% of all performance shares granted in the form of share units shall be paid in cash, and (v) each Participant who holds a stock option that is not exercisable in full shall be entitled to receive at the discretion of the Committee, either a cash payment or shares of Common Stock as provided below with respect to the portion of the stock option which is not then exercisable. The amount of any cash payment in respect of a restricted share unit or performance share unit shall be equal to: (A) in the event the Change in Control is the result of a tender offer or exchange offer for Common Stock, the higher of the final offer price per share paid for the Common Stock or the highest Fair Market Value of the Common Stock during the 90-day period ending on the date of the Change in Control or (B) in the event the Change in Control is the result of any other occurrence, the highest Fair Market Value of the Common Stock during the 90-day period ending on the date of the Change in Control. The amount to be paid in respect of the portion of any stock option which is not exercisable shall be equal to the result of multiplying the number of shares of Common Stock covered by such portion of the stock option by the difference between (x) the per share value of Common Stock determined pursuant to the preceding sentence, or such lower price as the Committee may determine with respect to any incentive stock option to preserve its incentive stock option status, and (y) the per share exercise price of such stock option.
Unless and to the extent limited in an Award Agreement,


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080307093607.txt.gz
TIME:20080307093607
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080401161914.txt.gz
TIME:20080401161914
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated March 28, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced that it has reached an agreement to sell Mellon 1
st
Business Bank to U.S. Bank, lead bank of U.S. Bancorp. The transaction, terms of which have not been announced, is subject to regulatory approvals and is expected to close during the second quarter of 2008.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEW YORK and LOS ANGELES, March 28, 2008  The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK) today announced that it has reached an agreement to sell Mellon 1
st
Business Bank to U.S. Bank, lead bank of Minneapolis-based U.S. Bancorp (NYSE: USB). As a result of this transaction, U.S. Bank will acquire $3.4 billion in assets, $1.1 billion in loans and $2.7 billion in deposits. The transaction, terms of which have not been announced, is subject to regulatory approvals and is expected to close during the second quarter of 2008.
"This transaction sharpens our strategic focus on bringing excellent wealth management and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families," said David F. Lamere, chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Wealth Management. "In addition, being part of an organization with U.S. Bank's size, strength and emphasis in commercial banking will benefit Mellon 1
st
Business Bank's customers and employees. Until this transaction closes, we will be working with U.S. Bank to make sure the transition is completely smooth and with no interruptions in the extraordinarily high level of service our Mellon 1
st
Business Bank customers have come to expect."
Following the sale of Los Angeles-based Mellon 1
st
Business Bank, BNY Mellon will continue to employ more than 1,100 people in California. In addition to Wealth Management, other BNY Mellon businesses with a significant presence in California include Asset Servicing, Asset Management, Corporate Trust and Shareowner and Treasury Services.
"We've enjoyed excellent growth in California and throughout the West, with particular momentum from last summer's merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial," said David Holst, head of BNY Mellon West. "We consider this region key to our growth strategy and we will continue to expand our presence on the West Coast."
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
This press release contains statements relating to future events that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the expected closing date for the transaction and plans following the closing of the transaction. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of March 28, 2008, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after March 28, 2008 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080407100152.txt.gz
TIME:20080407100152
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 7, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation issued a press release providing an update regarding the case brought in Russia on behalf of the Russian Federal Customs Service. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
- The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK) today provided an update regarding the case brought against The Bank of New York in Russian court by Florida trial lawyers representing the Russian Federal Customs Service. The Company has raised concerns to the court about the handling of the case and is fully prepared for any adverse decision in the future. The Company said it was confident that any adverse judgment would be unenforceable since the claims lack merit and the Company is protected by substantial, well-established legal and financial safeguards around the world. In a hearing today in Moscow, the court postponed the case until May 13.
April 7, 2008, New York, NY
The Bank of New York Mellon noted that:
 
 
 
 
 
Background on the Russian Court Case
The underlying facts of this case involve a series of unauthorized fund transfers coming from Russia
through The Bank of New York nearly ten years ago that were conducted by a former, self-admitted "rogue" employee of the company without the knowledge of the Bank. Investigations of these transfers in the late 1990s by the U.S. government, working in concert with U.K. and Russian authorities, were concluded and resolved by agreements between the Bank and regulatory and legal authorities.
The Bank of New York was never charged with any wrongdoing nor was it accused of the crimes upon which the Russian claims are purportedly based. As part of a non-prosecution agreement with the U.S. Department of Justice, the Company acknowledged a failure to properly monitor and supervise wire transfer activity and paid a fine of $14 million. The former employee and her husband pled guilty in February 2000 to conducting unauthorized banking activities and operating an illegal money transmitting business. The Company took swift disciplinary action against the employee and took corrective action to help prevent such activity from occurring in the future.
The meritless claims in the Russian case, which were devised by trial lawyers from Miami, Florida, center on customs duties that were allegedly owed to Russia on the funds transferred out of the country in the 1990s. Customs duties  if owed by anyone in this matter  should have been paid by certain Russian companies and Russian banks at that time. The Company does not owe Russia any customs duties. The trial lawyers previously attempted to use the same legal theories to bring similar claims for customs duties against U.S. tobacco companies on behalf of Venezuela, Belize, Ecuador, and Honduras, and those cases were summarily dismissed by U.S. courts.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
This document contains statements relating to future events that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the potential outcomes and impact of the claim made by the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation on The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. These forward-looking statements are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond the control of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the risk factors and other uncertainties detailed in the annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission and other reports filed with the Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements in this document speak only as of April 7, 2008, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after April 7, 2008 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080414163509.txt.gz
TIME:20080414163509
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080418131000.txt.gz
TIME:20080418131000
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 17, 2008 the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2008 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, /, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported income from continuing operations of $749 million, or $0.65 per share, in the first quarter of 2008. This compares to income from continuing operations of $437 million, or $0.61 per share, in the first quarter of 2007 and $700 million, or $0.61 per share, in the fourth quarter of 2007.
NEW YORK, April 17, 2008 
Adjusting for the impact of merger and integration expenses ($126 million pre-tax), diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2008 were $0.72, which compares to $0.62 a year ago (an increase of 16%) and $0.67 sequentially (an unannualized increase of 7%).
Adjusting for the impact of merger and integration expenses ($126 million pre-tax) and intangible amortization ($122 million pre-tax), diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2008 were $0.78, which compares to $0.65 a year ago (an increase of 20%) and $0.74 sequentially (an unannualized increase of 5%). See the table on page 10 for a reconciliation of net income and earnings per share.
"Our businesses are performing well in a tough environment. We generated 14% revenue growth compared to the first quarter of 2007, significant positive operating leverage and 16% EPS growth. Market volumes and volatility, together with new business wins, continued to favor our asset servicing and clearing businesses, while lower market values impacted our asset management business. Our progress on the merger and integration continues to be excellent," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
The results for first quarter of 2008 included net pre-tax costs associated with the write down of certain investments in the securities portfolio ($74 million), the write-down of seed capital investments related to a formerly affiliated hedge fund manager ($25 million), and an expense associated with capital support agreements ($12 million). The results for the first quarter also included the pre-tax benefit of $42 million associated with the initial public offering for VISA. The net impact of these items decreased earnings per share by approximately $0.04.
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the first quarter of 2008. This is followed by commentary that compares the current period to pro forma combined results of the first quarter of 2007 unless otherwise noted. The appendix to this release provides the pro forma combined results, without purchase accounting adjustments resulting from the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for detailed business sector information.)
First Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
First Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations - continued
 
 
 
 
Excluding merger and integration expense, intangible amortization expense, and non-operating items in the first quarter of 2007, detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary, noninterest expense on a pro forma combined basis increased 6% compared with the first quarter of 2007 and declined 5% compared to the fourth quarter of 2007. The results reflect $118 million of expense synergies in the first quarter of 2008 associated with the merger as detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary.
On a pro forma combined basis, excluding merger and integration expense, intangible amortization expense, and non-operating items in the first quarter of 2007, detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Summary, we generated approximately 750 bps of positive operating leverage compared to the first quarter of 2007 and approximately 350 bps compared to the fourth quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
First Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations - continued
 
 
On April 8, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on May 2, 2008 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 23, 2008.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $12 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, before extraordinary (loss), unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on a fully taxable equivalent (FTE) basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for supplemental financial information of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, including 5-quarter trends of fee and other revenue, net interest revenue, noninterest expense as well as business segment trends. The Quarterly Earnings Summary is available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations - financial reports).
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Bruce W. Van Saun, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8 a.m. EDT on Thursday, April 17, 2008. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (international) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The earnings release together with the quarterly earnings summary will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 17. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 17 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Thursday, May 1, 2008 by dialing (866) 356-4359 (U.S.) or (203) 369-0105 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Investment Portfolio
At March 31, 2008, investment securities totaled $45.5 billion, which consists of our core portfolio of $42.6 billion and Three Rivers Funding Corp.'s ("TRFC") portfolio of $2.9 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities available for sale portfolio was $1.789 billion at March 31, 2008, which was comprised of $1.523 billion in our core portfolio and $266 million in our TRFC portfolio. The unrealized net of tax loss at Dec. 31, 2007 was $342 million and related entirely to our core portfolio. The increase in the unrealized loss in the first quarter of 2008 compared with the fourth quarter of 2007 was due to spread widening in the fixed income and asset-backed securities markets.
At March 31, 2008, the unrealized loss on our securities available for sale portfolio decreased our adjusted tangible common equity ratio by 90 basis points. Significant dislocation continued in the credit markets, particularly late in the first quarter of 2008. Spreads continued to widen appreciably as there were forced liquidations in the asset and mortgage-backed securities markets. That said, our core asset and mortgage-backed securities portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 95% of our securities rated AAA, and few downgrades. We continue to have the ability and intent to hold these securities until any temporary impairment is recovered, or until maturity.
Below are the securities in our core portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
Below are the securities in TRFC's portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
We routinely test our investment portfolio securities for other-than-temporary impairment ("OTTI"). In the first quarter of 2008, we recorded a $74 million pre-tax securities loss associated with OTTI comprised of the following
:
 
 
 
 
Capital Support Agreements
During the first quarter of 2008, we executed a capital support agreement for a commingled short-term NAV fund ("CNAV Fund"), which is managed by securities lending in the Asset Servicing segment, of $55.5 million covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC ("Whistle Jacket"). Subsequently, we executed another capital support agreement for the same CNAV Fund of $30 million covering securities related to Thornburg Mortgage Capital Resources ("Thornburg"). Under these agreements, we will provide capital in specified circumstances to the CNAV Fund until June 30, 2008 in support of Whistle Jacket securities and April 2009 in support of Thornburg securities. Included in other expense during the first quarter of 2008 was $12 million associated with the current estimated fair value of the support agreements. We continue to monitor exposure to SIV senior note investments in the CNAV Funds we manage. On a case-by-case basis, depending on future circumstances, we could enter into further capital support agreements with the funds.
Nonperforming Loans
 
 
Reserve for Credit Exposure, Provision and Net Charge-offs
 
 
The unallocated reserve was 23% at March 31, 2008 compared with 23% at Dec. 31, 2007 and 27% at March 31, 2007.
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $746 million, or $0.65 per share, in the first quarter of 2008, compared with $520 million, or $0.45 per share, in the fourth quarter of 2007 and $434 million, or $0.60 per share, in the first quarter of 2007.
 
Supplemental Information - Reconciliation of Earnings Per Share  GAAP to Non-GAAP
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
Supplemental Information  Trend of Earnings Per Share on a GAAP and Non-GAAP basis
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of BNY Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon shareholders received one share of BNY Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms for periods prior to July 1, 2007.
 
 
 
APPENDIX
 
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to future financial goals, the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon, ability and intention to hold certain securities, and possible future activities relating to further capital support agreements. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of April 17, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080423142256.txt.gz
TIME:20080423142256
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the first quarter of 2007 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain measures, which are noted, exclude certain items, including the impact of the extraordinary item in 4Q07. We believe these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and they reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Pro forma combined financial results for The Bank of New York Mellon prior to the consummation of the merger exclude the pro forma impact of incremental purchase accounting including intangible amortization resulting from the merger.
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Corporation's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, new business wins, and pipelines for new business; ability and intention to hold certain securities; possible future activities relating to further capital support agreements; statements with respect to the merger integration, including revenue synergies and targeted run rates, expense synergy targets and estimated merger and integration charges; anticipated completion date for the bank consolidation; and impact and anticipated closing date of sale of Mellon 1
st
Business Bank; as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; service quality metrics in Asset Servicing may not be attained; revenue following the merger may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the merger, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; as well as the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of April 17, 2008 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The results prior to the consummation of the merger on July 1, 2007, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. The business segment combined results for all periods reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
FIRST QUARTER 2008 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. first quarter 2007)
 
 
 
KEY POINTS Pro forma Combined Basis
(a)
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bp - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
INVESTMENT PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2008, investment securities totaled $45.5 billion, which consists of our core portfolio of $42.6 billion and Three Rivers Funding Corp.'s ("TRFC") portfolio of $2.9 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities available for sale portfolio was $1.789 billion at March 31, 2008, which was comprised of $1.523 billion in our core portfolio and $266 million in our TRFC portfolio. The unrealized net of tax loss at Dec. 31, 2007 was $342 million and related entirely to our core portfolio. The increase in the unrealized loss in the first quarter of 2008 compared with the fourth quarter of 2007 was due to spread widening in the fixed income and asset-backed securities markets.
At March 31, 2008, the unrealized loss on our securities available for sale portfolio decreased our adjusted tangible common equity ratio by 90 basis points. Significant dislocation continued in the credit markets, particularly late in the first quarter of 2008. Spreads continued to widen appreciably as there were forced liquidations in the asset and mortgage-backed securities markets. That said, our core asset and mortgage-backed securities portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 95% of our securities rated AAA, and few downgrades. We continue to have the ability and intent to hold these securities until any temporary impairment is recovered, or until maturity.
Below are the securities in our core portfolio, at fair value, which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
 
Below are the securities in TRFC's portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
We routinely test our investment portfolio securities for other-than-temporary impairment ("OTTI"). In the first quarter of 2008, we recorded a $74 million pre-tax securities loss associated with OTTI comprised of the following:
 
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
CAPITAL SUPPORT AGREEMENTS
During the first quarter of 2008, we executed a capital support agreement for a commingled short-term NAV fund ("CNAV Fund"), which is managed by securities lending in the Asset Servicing segment, of $55.5 million covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC ("Whistle Jacket"). Subsequently, we executed another capital support agreement for the same CNAV Fund of $30 million covering securities related to Thornburg Mortgage Capital Resources ("Thornburg"). Under these agreements, we will provide capital in specified circumstances to the CNAV Fund until June 30, 2008 in support of Whistle Jacket securities and April 2009 in support of Thornburg securities. Included in other expense during the first quarter of 2008 was $12 million associated with the current estimated fair value of the support agreements. We continue to monitor exposure to SIV senior note investments in the CNAV Funds we manage. On a case-by-case basis, depending on future circumstances, we could enter into further capital support agreements with the funds.
NONPERFORMING LOANS
 
 
RESERVE FOR CREDIT EXPOSURE, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The unallocated reserve was 23% at March 31, 2008 compared with 23% at Dec. 31, 2007 and 27% at March 31, 2007.
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
 
- Revenue enhancements (best practices)
- Within line of business
- Across lines of business
 
 
3) Merger & Integration Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon)
 
4) Service Quality Goals for 2010 - Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> R&M Global Custody Survey (March 2008)
> Global Custodian Survey (January 2008)
5) Consolidation of Banks  on track for completion by early 3Q08
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth management and banking services to high-net-worth individuals, families and charitable gift programs, foundations and endowments)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to global financial institutions, corporate and public retirement funds and foundations and endowments)
ASSET SERVICING
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for introducing broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING AND EXECUTION SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides global payment services, working capital solutions, global markets and institutional banking services, including lending)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, business exits, Corporate Treasury activities, merger and integration charges and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
SUMMARY OF NON-OPERATING ITEMS
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon 1Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - RECONCILIATION OF EARNINGS PER SHARE  GAAP TO NON-GAAP
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  TREND OF EARNINGS PER SHARE ON A GAAP AND NON-GAAP BASIS
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon, The Bank of New York shareholders received .9434 shares of BNY Mellon common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon shareholders received one share of BNY Mellon common stock for each share of Mellon common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. The table below converts earnings per share for The Bank of New York into post-merger share count terms for periods prior to July 1, 2007.
 
 
 
Page 20


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080527101638.txt.gz
TIME:20080527101638
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080612161025.txt.gz
TIME:20080612161025
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) Thomas A. Renyi, Executive Chairman of the registrant, and the registrant have mutually agreed that Mr. Renyi will retire as Executive Chairman and as a director of the registrant, effective July 31, 2008.
In light of Mr. Renyi's services to the registrant since the merger of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY Co.") and Mellon Financial Corporation into the registrant on July 1, 2007, the registrant has agreed to provide to Mr. Renyi the benefits which under Section 4(b) of Mr. Renyi's Service Agreement dated June 25, 2007 (filed as Exhibit 10.1 to BNY Co.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 29, 2007 and incorporated herein by reference) would have been payable if Mr. Renyi's service with the registrant had continued until January 1, 2009. This will include payment of a full annual cash bonus for the year 2008, based upon actual performance for the year. In addition, the registrant has agreed to provide for an additional five months of vesting, until January 1, 2009, under Mr. Renyi's April 2, 2007 restricted share unit and stock option agreements.
Pursuant to the registrant's By-Laws, upon Mr. Renyi's retirement, Robert P. Kelly, Chief Executive Officer of the registrant, will become Chairman of the Board of Directors. Steven G. Elliott, Senior Vice Chairman of the registrant, has notified the registrant that, in accordance with provisions of the registrant's By-Laws requiring that upon Mr. Renyi's retirement the registrant's Board of Directors be reduced in number from eighteen to sixteen members, Mr. Elliott will resign as a director of the registrant effective upon Mr. Renyi's retirement. Mr. Elliott will remain as Senior Vice Chairman of the registrant.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080717161409.txt.gz
TIME:20080717161409
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080718160722.txt.gz
TIME:20080718160722
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 17, 2008 the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2008 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, /, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported income from continuing operations of $302 million, or $0.26 per share, in the second quarter of 2008. This compares to income from continuing operations of $448 million, or $0.62 per share, in the second quarter of 2007 and $749 million, or $0.65 per share, in the first quarter of 2008.
NEW YORK, July 17, 2008 
"In a very challenging environment for financial institutions, we were pleased to generate 12% revenue growth excluding a tax-related SILO charge and investment securities writedowns. During the second quarter we benefited from $13 billion of net flows in asset and wealth management and continued new business wins in securities servicing businesses. Our capital position remains strong and capital ratios strengthened materially versus the first quarter. Continuing EPS, excluding SILO and M&I expenses, increased modestly over the prior year. We continue to stay focused on executing on our growth strategies and integration activities," said Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
 
In the second quarter of 2008 the Company recorded a $380 million after-tax charge related to sale-in, lease-out (SILO) transactions. The charge reduced net interest revenue by $377 million in the second quarter. For additional information, see page 9.
The results for the second quarter of 2008 also included net pre-tax costs associated with the writedown of certain investment securities ($152 million), and a pre-tax charge of $22 million for credit monitoring related to lost tapes in our Issuer and Treasury Services segments. The net impact of these items decreased earnings per share by approximately nine cents.
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2008. This is followed by commentary that compares the current period to pro forma combined results of the second quarter of 2007 unless otherwise noted. The appendix to this release provides the pro forma combined results, without purchase accounting adjustments, resulting from the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for detailed business segment information.)
Second Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Second Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations  continued
 
 
 
 
 
Excluding merger and integration expenses and intangible amortization expense, noninterest expense on a pro forma combined basis increased 2% compared with the second quarter of 2007 and 5% (unannualized) compared with the first quarter of 2008. The increases from both periods reflect business growth, the impact of the merit increase ($25 million) in the second quarter of 2008, and the $22 million expense for credit monitoring related to lost tapes. The sequential increase was also impacted by higher incentives, benefits and professional, legal and other purchased services.
On a pro forma combined basis, excluding the SILO charge, merger and integration expenses and intangible amortization expense, we generated more than 500 basis points of positive operating leverage compared to the second quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
 
Second Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations  continued
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 8, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 1, 2008 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 23, 2008.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Summary and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through June 30, 2008 and are available at (Investor Relationsfinancial reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 9 a.m. EDT on Thursday, July 17, 2008. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The earnings release, together with the quarterly earnings summary, will be available at beginning at approximately 7 a.m. EDT on July 17, 2008. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 17, 2008 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Thursday, July 31, 2008 by dialing (866) 356-4359 (U.S.) or (203) 369-0105 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Investment Portfolio
At June 30, 2008, investment securities totaled $44.3 billion, which consists of our core portfolio of $41.5 billion and Three Rivers Funding Corp.'s ("TRFC") portfolio of $2.8 billion. TRFC was consolidated in the fourth quarter of 2007. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities available for sale portfolio was $1.818 billion at June 30, 2008, which was comprised of $1.480 billion in our core portfolio and $338 million in our TRFC portfolio. The unrealized net of tax loss at March 31, 2008 was $1.789 billion, which was comprised of $1.523 billion in our core portfolio and $266 million in our TRFC portfolio. The increase in the unrealized net of tax loss in the second quarter of 2008 compared with the first quarter of 2008 resulted from higher interest rates partially offset by narrower credit spreads.
At June 30, 2008, the unrealized net of tax loss on our securities available for sale portfolio decreased our adjusted tangible common equity to assets ratio by 93 basis points. We continue to have the ability and intent to hold our investment securities until any temporary impairment is recovered, or until maturity. The securities in our core asset and mortgage-backed securities portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 93% rated AAA.
Below are the securities in our core portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
Below are the securities in the TRFC portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
We routinely test our investment securities for other than temporary impairment ("OTTI"). In the second quarter of 2008, we assumed an additional 17% decline in national home prices over the next two years and estimated the impact it would have on the cash flows underlying individual securities. As a result, we impaired certain securities and wrote them down to current market value and recorded a $152 million pre-tax securities loss associated with OTTI comprising the following:
 
 
 
 
Our Alt-A portfolio is 99% AAA-rated and 1% AA-rated. At origination, the portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 716 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is 13%.
The HELOC securities in the TRFC portfolio are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade.
At June 30, 2008, the combined fair value of the core and TRFC subprime mortgage securities portfolios was $1.3 billion with 85% of the portfolios rated AA or higher. The core portfolio is primarily comprised of vintages from 2005 or earlier. The TRFC portfolio is primarily comprised of vintages originated in 2006 and 2007. The weighted-average current credit enhancement on these portfolios was 35% at June 30, 2008.
SILO Transactions
In the second quarter of 2008 we recorded a $380 million charge related to sale-in, lease-out (SILO) transactions. This charge includes $237 million, in accordance with FAS 13-2, related to revising the cash flows associated with the Company's SILO transactions, as well as $143 million for establishing interest reserves on associated tax benefits. The charge was prompted by recent federal court decisions in and , where the tax benefits from certain SILO and lease-in, lease-out (LILO) transactions were denied. In the third quarter of 2008, we expect to deposit funds with the IRS to offset the accrual of interest on the disputed SILO transactions. The cost of the deposit, as well as the recalculation of the cash flows associated with the SILO transactions will result in a decrease in earnings per share of approximately $0.02 per share in both the second half of 2008 and full year 2009. We continue to believe our tax treatment of the SILO transactions was proper under the tax law as it existed at the time the tax benefits were reported. We are currently in discussions with the IRS.
BB&T Corp. v. United States
AWG Leasing Trust v. United States
Capital Support Agreements
During the second quarter of 2008, we executed the following capital support agreements: $28.6 million and $18 million covering securities in two short-term short-term net asset value ("NAV") funds, both in the Asset Management segment. These agreements are in addition to the capital support agreement for the commingled short-term NAV fund ("CNAV fund") of $55.5 million covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC, in the Asset Servicing segment. Under these agreements, we could provide capital in specified circumstances in varying maturities through June 2009. A previously disclosed capital support agreement for the CNAV Fund covering securities related to Thornburg Mortgage Capital Resources was canceled during the second quarter of 2008 resulting in a $12 million credit recorded in Other expense, which was partially offset by $8 million of expense related to the current estimated fair value of the remaining capital support agreements. We continue to monitor exposure to NAV and money market funds that we manage. On a case-by-case basis, depending on future circumstances, we could enter into further capital support agreements with the funds.
 
Capital Ratios
 
 
Nonperforming Assets
 
Allowance for Credit Loss, Provision and Net Charge-offs
 
 
The unallocated allowance was 22% at June 30, 2008 compared with 23% at March 31, 2008 and 28% at June 30, 2007.
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $309 million, or $0.27 per share, in the second quarter of 2008, compared with $746 million, or $0.65 per share, in the first quarter of 2008 and $445 million, or $0.62 per share, in the second quarter of 2007.
 
Supplemental Information  GAAP to Non-GAAP Reconciliations
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe this information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
 
Supplemental Information  Converted Earnings Per Share
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial, The Bank of New York shareholders received 0.9434 shares of the Company's common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon Financial shareholders received one share of the Company's common stock for each share of Mellon Financial common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger.
Converting The Bank of New York Company's common stock into post-merger share count terms for the second quarter of 2007 increased diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per share excluding merger and integration expense by $0.03 and increased diluted earnings per share excluding merger and integration expense and intangible amortization by $0.04.
 
APPENDIX
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to future financial goals, growth in asset management and securities servicing businesses, ability to achieve plans for revenue and expense synergies and the merger of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial, ability and intention to hold certain securities, expectations and other matters relating to SILO transactions, and possible future activities relating to further capital support agreements. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of July 17, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080723164138.txt.gz
TIME:20080723164138
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the second quarter of 2007 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain measures, which are noted, exclude certain items. We believe these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and they reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Pro forma combined financial results for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation prior to the consummation of the merger exclude the pro forma impact of incremental purchase accounting including intangible amortization resulting from the merger.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, new business wins, and pipelines for new business; ability and intention to hold certain securities; expectations and other matters relating to SILO transactions; ability to achieve plans for revenue and expense synergies and growth in asset management and securities servicing businesses; possible future activities related to further entry into future capital support agreements; statements with respect to the merger integration, including revenue synergies and targeted run rates, expense synergy targets and estimated merger and integration charges; as well as the Company's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon Financial and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; service quality metrics in Asset Servicing may not be attained; revenue following the merger may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the merger, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; as well as the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of July 17, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The results prior to the consummation of the merger on July 1, 2007, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. The business segment combined results, for periods prior to the merger, reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
)
SECOND QUARTER 2008 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. second quarter 2007
 
 
 
KEY POINTS Pro Forma Combined Basis
(b)
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
INVESTMENT PORTFOLIO
At June 30, 2008, investment securities totaled $44.3 billion, which consists of our core portfolio of $41.5 billion and Three Rivers Funding Corp.'s ("TRFC") portfolio of $2.8 billion. TRFC was consolidated in the fourth quarter of 2007. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities available for sale portfolio was $1.818 billion at June 30 2008, which was comprised of $1.480 billion in our core portfolio and $338 million in our TRFC portfolio. The unrealized net of tax loss at March 31, 2008 was $1.789 billion, which was comprised of $1.523 billion in our core portfolio and $266 million in our TRFC portfolio. The increase in the unrealized net of tax loss in the second quarter of 2008 compared with the first quarter of 2008 resulted from higher interest rates partially offset by narrower credit spreads.
At June 30, 2008, the unrealized net of tax loss on our securities available for sale portfolio decreased our adjusted tangible common equity to assets ratio by 93 basis points. We continue to have the ability and intent to hold our investment securities until any temporary impairment is recovered, or until maturity. The securities in our core asset and mortgage-backed securities portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 93% rated AAA.
Below are the securities in our core portfolio, at fair value, which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
Below are the securities in the TRFC portfolio, at fair value which incorporates our unrealized loss, by credit rating.
 
We routinely test our investment securities for other than temporary impairment ("OTTI"). In the second quarter of 2008, we assumed an additional 17% decline in national home prices over the next two years and estimated the impact it would have on the cash flows underlying the individual securities. As a result, we impaired certain securities and wrote them down to current market value and recorded a $152 million pre-tax securities loss associated with OTTI comprising the following:
 
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
Our Alt-A portfolio is 99% AAA-rated and 1% AA-rated. At origination, the portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 716 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is 13%.
The HELOC securities in the TRFC portfolio are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade.
At June 30, 2008, the combined fair value of the core and TRFC subprime mortgage securities portfolios was $1.3 billion with 85% of the portfolios rated AA or higher. The core portfolio is primarily comprised of vintages from 2005 or earlier. The TRFC portfolio is primarily comprised of vintages originated in 2006 and 2007. The weighted-average current credit enhancement on these portfolios was 35% at June 30, 2008.
SILO TRANSACTIONS
In the second quarter of 2008 we recorded a $380 million charge related to sale-in, lease-out (SILO) transactions. This charge includes $237 million, in accordance with FAS 13-2, related to revising the cash flows associated with the Company's SILO transactions, as well as $143 million for establishing interest reserves on associated tax benefits. The charge was prompted by recent federal court decisions in and , where the tax benefits from certain SILO and lease-in, lease-out (LILO) transactions were denied. In the third quarter of 2008, we expect to deposit funds with the IRS to offset the accrual of interest on the disputed SILO transactions. The cost of the deposit, as well as the recalculation of the cash flows associated with the SILO transactions will result in a decrease in earnings per share of approximately $0.02 per share in both the second half of 2008 and full year 2009. We continue to believe our tax treatment of the SILO transactions was proper under the tax law as it existed at the time the tax benefits were reported. We are currently in discussions with the IRS.
BB&T Corp. v. United States
AWG Leasing Trust v. United States
CAPITAL SUPPORT AGREEMENTS
During the second quarter of 2008, we executed the following capital support agreements: $28.6 million and $18 million covering securities in two short-term net asset value ("NAV") funds, both in the Asset Management segment. These agreements are in addition to the capital support agreement for the commingled short-term NAV fund ("CNAV fund") of $55.5 million covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC, in the Asset Servicing segment. Under these agreements, we could provide capital in specified circumstances in varying maturities through June 2009. A previously disclosed capital support agreement for the CNAV Fund covering securities related to Thornburg Mortgage Capital Resources was canceled during the second quarter of 2008 resulting in a $12 million credit recorded in Other expense, which was partially offset by $8 million of expense related to the current estimated fair value of the remaining capital support agreements. We continue to monitor exposure to NAV and money market funds that we manage. On a case-by-case basis, depending on future circumstances, we could enter into further capital support agreements with the funds.
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
CAPITAL RATIOS
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSS, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The unallocated allowance was 22% at June 30, 2008 compared with 23% at March 31, 2008 and 28% at June 30, 2007.
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
1) Revenue Synergies
 
2) Expense Synergies
 
 
3) Merger & Integration Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation)
 
4) Service Quality Goals for 2010 - Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> Global Investor Survey (May 2008)
> R&M Global Custody Survey (March 2008)
> Global Custodian Survey (December 2007)
5) Reorganization of Banks  Completed July 1, 2008.
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
During the second quarter of 2008 we moved the financial results of Mellon 1
St
Business Bank, National Association and Mellon United National Bank to the Other segment from the Wealth Management segment. This change reflects the sale of Mellon 1
st
Business Bank in June 2008, as well as our focus on reducing non-core activities. Historical segment results for Wealth Management and Other have been restated to reflect these changes.
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth management and banking services to high-net-worth individuals, families and charitable gift programs, foundations and endowments)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to global financial institutions, corporate and public retirement funds and foundations and endowments)
ASSET SERVICING
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for introducing broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides global payment services, working capital solutions, global markets and institutional banking services, including lending)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, business exits, Corporate Treasury activities, merger and integration charges and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - GAAP TO NON-GAAP RECONCILIATIONS
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe this information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  CONVERTED EARNINGS PER SHARE
In the merger transaction between The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial, The Bank of New York shareholders received 0.9434 shares of the Company's common stock for each share of The Bank of New York common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger. Mellon Financial shareholders received one share of the Company's common stock for each share of Mellon Financial common stock outstanding on the closing date of the merger.
Converting The Bank of New York Company's common stock into post-merger share count terms for the second quarter of 2007 increased diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per share excluding merger and integration expense by $0.03 and increased diluted earnings per share excluding merger and integration expense and intangible amortization by $0.04.
 
 
Page 21

Exhibit 99.2
 
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity.
The results prior to the consummation of the merger, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q06 - 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following transactions have impacted the reporting of our results:
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). The financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
During the first quarter of 2008, we sold the B-Trade and G-Trade execution businesses to BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. We maintain a 35% equity interest in BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. The historical results of the B-Trade and G-Trade businesses are included in the Clearing Services segment.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 2, 2006, Mellon Financial Corporation completed the acquisition of Walter Scott & Partners. The financial results are included in the Asset Management segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired JPMorgan Chase's Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
Discontinued Operations Accounting -
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets -
Where average deposits in a business segment are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin -
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION                                                 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The second quarter of 2008 includes a charge ($380 million after tax) related to SILO transactions which reduced net interest revenue by $377 million.
 
 
 
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080818161505.txt.gz
TIME:20080818161505
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20080924110655.txt.gz
TIME:20080924110655
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated September 24, 2008, the Registrant announced that as a result of recent market events, it will provide support to clients invested in money market funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers bankruptcy filing. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
 
NEW YORK, September 24, 2008  The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK) said today that as a result of recent market events, it will provide support to clients invested in money market mutual funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers bankruptcy filing.
In this action taken on behalf of its clients, the Company will be issuing support agreements related to five commingled cash funds used primarily for overnight custody cash sweeps and one fund used for the reinvestment of cash collateral within the Company's securities lending business. In addition, the Company issued support agreements for four Dreyfus money market mutual funds that were previously disclosed on September 17, 2008. The support agreements are designed to enable these funds with Lehman holdings to continue to operate at a stable share price of $1.00.
The Company expects to incur an after-tax charge of approximately $425 million in the third quarter. This charge includes additional costs associated with previously disclosed capital support agreements that were outstanding at the end of the second quarter.
"These actions will provide support to our clients and, given our size and industry leadership, will hopefully contribute to greater stability in the overall market," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer. "We have helped clients navigate through all market conditions for more than 200 years, and we have the financial strength to support them now in the face of unprecedented market turmoil. While we are disappointed that the cost of these actions will impact our quarterly results, we feel this is an important investment in our client relationships. We expect to remain profitable in the third quarter and are well-positioned to continue serving our clients and aggressively growing our global franchise."
Support is being provided to investors in the following funds:
 
 
 
During the recent period of market turmoil, the Company's balance sheet has seen a significant increase in client deposits, reflecting a flight to quality. This has increased the Company's percentage of liquid assets to total assets to above 50 percent. The Company expects to end the quarter with a Tier 1 capital ratio of approximately 9 percent and an average tangible capital ratio in excess of 4 percent.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $12 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to the Company's expectations relating to the after-tax charge, profitability, expected capital ratios and positioning with respect to continued growth and service to its clients in the third quarter of 2008. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this press release speak only as of September 24, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081006172605.txt.gz
TIME:20081006172605
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) Reference is made to the registrant's press release dated September 24, 2008, filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the registrant's Form 8-K filed September 24, 2008, in which the registrant announced that as a result of recent market events, it would provide support to clients invested in money market mutual funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers bankruptcy. The information in this Form 8-K does not alter the statements in the registrant's press release dated September 24, 2008 regarding the registrant's expectations with respect to incurring an after-tax charge of approximately $425 million in the third quarter in connection with the support it is providing to clients invested in money market mutual funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers bankruptcy filing, including additional costs associated with previously disclosed support agreements that were outstanding at the end of the second quarter.
On September 30, 2008, the registrant became liable for obligations arising out of off-balance sheet arrangements, as follows. The registrant entered into agreements with four liquidating accounts established by certain commingled cash funds trusteed by an affiliate of the registrant (as identified below) holding designated debt securities issued by Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. or affiliates (the "Designated Securities"). Under these agreements, the registrant agreed to pay certain amounts to the liquidating account in question, upon the occurrence of any of the following events with respect to the Designated Securities held by such liquidating account: (i) the final sale or other final liquidation of the Designated Securities for cash consideration; (ii) the receipt of final payment on the Designated Securities in cash; (iii) the liquidation and winding up without further distribution of the obligor under the Designated Securities; (iv) a court discharge of the obligor under the Designated Securities from liability in respect of the Designated Securities; (v) the rescission, cancellation or similar extinguishment of the obligations of the obligor under the Designated Securities; and (vi) the good faith determination by the registrant and the applicable liquidating account that the Designated Securities have zero value.
Upon the occurrence of any of these events, the registrant is obligated to pay to the applicable liquidating account the difference between the face amount of the Designated Securities (or in some cases, a specified amount of accrued interest on the Designated Securities) held by such liquidating account and the amount realized by the applicable liquidating account with respect to the principal amount of the Designated Securities (or in some cases, with respect to a specified amount of accrued interest on the Designated Securities) held by such liquidating account.
These agreements were entered into with: DF Temporary Investment Fund  Lehman (Liquidating Fund); EB SMAM Short Term Investment Fund  Lehman (Liquidating Fund); EB Temporary Investment Fund  Lehman (Liquidating Fund); and Pooled Employee Daily Liquidity Fund  Lehman (Liquidating Fund). The maximum aggregate amount which the registrant may potentially be called upon to pay under all of these agreements is approximately $235,000,000.
In addition, as of September 25, 2008 the registrant entered into capital support agreements with EB Daily Liquidity Money Market Fund, a commingled cash fund trusteed by an affiliate of the registrant. These agreements obligate the registrant to pay amounts to the fund upon the occurrence of any of the following events with respect to designated debt securities issued by Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. or affiliates (the "Designated Securities") held by the fund: (i) the final sale or other final liquidation by the fund of the Designated Securities; (ii) the receipt by the fund of final payment on the Designated Securities; or (iii) a court discharge of the obligor on the Designated Securities from liability in respect of the Designated Securities. Upon the occurrence of such an event, the registrant is required to contribute capital to the fund that is equal to the least of the following amounts: (i) the amount by which the amortized cost of the Designated Securities exceeds the amount received by the fund in
respect of the Designated Securities; (ii) the amount necessary to restore the net asset value per share of the fund to a specified threshold amount; or (iii) the remaining amount of the aggregate capital contribution limit, taking into account all prior contributions. The registrant will not receive any consideration from the fund for the contributed capital, if any, under the agreements. The maximum aggregate amount which the registrant may potentially be called upon to pay under these agreements is approximately $4,380,000.
The registrant also anticipates entering into arrangements with various securities lending customers relating to losses anticipated with respect to designated debt securities issued by Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. or affiliates held by certain funds used for the reinvestment of cash collateral trusteed by an affiliate of the registrant or held in the accounts of customers used for the reinvestment of cash collateral, under which the registrant would provide partial support for any losses incurred. These arrangements would include arrangements with customers holding interests in the BNY Mellon Institutional Cash Reserve Fund.
In addition, as previously disclosed, on September 15, 2008 and September 17, 2008, the registrant entered into capital support agreements with Dreyfus Liquid Assets Inc., Dreyfus BASIC Money Market Fund Inc., Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Money Market Fund, Inc. and Dreyfus Cash Management Plus, Inc. These agreements, as subsequently amended, obligate the registrant to pay amounts to the applicable fund upon the occurrence of any of the following events with respect to designated debt securities issued by Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. or affiliates (the "Designated Securities") held by the fund: (i) the final sale or other final liquidation by the fund of the Designated Securities; (ii) the receipt by the fund of final payment on the Designated Securities; or (iii) a court discharge of the obligor under the Designated Securities from liability in respect of the Designated Securities. Upon the occurrence of such an event, the registrant is required to contribute capital to the applicable fund that is equal to the least of the following amounts: (i) the amount by which the amortized cost of the Designated Securities exceeds the amount received by the fund in respect of the Designated Securities; (ii) the amount necessary to restore the net asset value per share of the fund to a specified threshold amount; or (iii) the remaining amount of the aggregate capital contribution limit, taking into account all prior contributions. The registrant will not receive any consideration from the applicable fund for the contributed capital, if any, under the agreement. The maximum aggregate amount which the registrant may potentially be called upon to pay under all of these agreements is approximately $238,000,000.
The information presented in this Form 8-K contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to the maximum aggregate amount the Company may be required to pay in connection with the arrangements described herein, expectations with respect to the after-tax charge and additional support arrangements. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Form 8-K speak only as of October 6, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081014161831.txt.gz
TIME:20081014161831
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 14, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation issued a press release announcing that it will be part of the initial group of nine financial institutions to participate in the U.S. government program designed to restore confidence and stability in the world's financial markets. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
 
NEW YORK, October 14, 2008  The U.S. government announced that it is investing $250 billion in a broad range of financial institutions in an effort designed to restore confidence and stability in the world's financial markets. As the world's leading securities servicing and asset management firm, The Bank of New York Mellon will be part of the initial group of nine institutions in which the U.S. government is purchasing an equity stake.
The Treasury will invest $3 billion in preferred stock and warrants in The Bank of New York Mellon as part of its broader actions to infuse equity in healthy firms that form the backbone of the U.S. financial system. It is likely that additional announcements over the coming days will highlight further investments in smaller banks and financial institutions by the U.S. government.
"These investments are a sign of the U.S. government's determination to work in partnership with other governments to create an environment of confidence," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon. "Our company continues to be a leader in tumultuous times. We are supportive of the Treasury's efforts. It is time to get the markets working again for borrowers and investors."
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is the seventh largest U.S. financial institution based on market capitalization, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has more than $23 trillion in assets under custody and administration, more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services $12 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at bnymellon.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081017160500.txt.gz
TIME:20081017160500
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION.
On October 16, 2008, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2008 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported income from continuing operations of $305 million, or $0.26 per share, in the third quarter of 2008. This compares to income from continuing operations of $642 million, or $0.56 per share, in the third quarter of 2007 and $302 million, or $0.26 per share, in the second quarter of 2008.
NEW YORK, October 16, 2008 
"In the face of unprecedented market volatility our operating performance exceeded expectations, driven by the strength and diversity of our securities servicing and asset management businesses. We supported our clients in these extraordinarily turbulent markets and I am very proud of the tireless dedication and focus of our employees," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
"We recently announced our participation in the U.S. Treasury's program to invest capital in nine leading U.S. financial institutions. In addition, we are honored to have been selected by the Treasury as the sole provider of a broad range of custodial and trustee services for the government's Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP)."
 
In the third quarter of 2008, the Company recorded an after-tax charge of $0.06 per share associated with merger and integration ("M&I") expenses and $0.03 per share related to the settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions ("SILO/LILO"), as well as the settlement of several audit cycles. Additionally, in the third quarter of 2008, the Company recorded an after-tax charge of $0.37 per share, or $433 million, associated with various support agreements.
The operating results for the third quarter of 2008 also included pre-tax costs associated with the write-down of certain investment securities ($162 million). For additional information, see page 8.
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2008 and are compared to the third quarter of 2007). Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Summary for detailed business segment information.
Third Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
was $3.626 billion, comprised of $2.923 billion of fee and other revenue including the write-down of certain investment securities ($162 million) and $703 million of net interest revenue including a pre-tax charge for the SILO/LILO tax settlement ($112 million).
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Third Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations  continued
 
was $3.332 billion. This compares to noninterest expense of $2.706 billion in the third quarter of 2007 and $2.754 billion in the second quarter of 2008.
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was a negative 15.5%. The negative tax rate reflects the absolute level of charges associated with the support agreements, securities losses and the final SILO/LILO settlement, as well as the settlement of prior tax audit cycles. Excluding these items, as well as M&I expenses, the effective tax rate was 32.4% in the third quarter of 2008.
effective tax rate for the third quarter of 2008
The for the third quarter of 2008 reflect the record level of client deposits generated subsequent to the market turmoil that began in mid-September. Noninterest-bearing deposits were $82 billion at Sept. 30, 2008, $31 billion at June 30, 2008 and $27 billion at Sept. 30, 2007. The Company placed an increased level of deposits principally with either the Federal Reserve or in overnight deposits with large global banks. At the end of the third quarter, total assets were $268 billion and averaged $199 billion during the quarter.
capital ratios
The unrealized net of tax loss on our securities portfolio was $2.8 billion at Sept. 30, 2008 compared with $1.8 billion at June 30, 2008. The increase primarily resulted from wider credit spreads.
 
On Oct. 14, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 3, 2008 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 24, 2008.
 
Third Quarter Highlights of Continuing Operations  continued
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration, approximately $1.1 trillion in assets under management and services approximately $12 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Summary and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Sept. 30, 2008 and are available at (Investor Relations  financial reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8 a.m. EDT on Thursday, October 16, 2008. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The earnings release, together with the quarterly earnings summary, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on October 16, 2008. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning October 16, 2008 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through October 30, 2008 by dialing (866) 452-2106 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1212 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Investment Securities Portfolio
At Sept. 30, 2008, our investment securities portfolio totaled $41.6 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities portfolio was $2.8 billion at Sept. 30, 2008. The unrealized net of tax loss at June 30, 2008 was $1.8 billion. The increase compared to the prior quarter was primarily driven by wider credit spreads. The securities in our portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 91% rated AAA/AA.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
At Sept. 30, 2008, we assumed an additional decline of approximately 15% in national home prices over the next two years and estimated the impact it would have on the cash flows of the underlying individual securities. As a result, we recorded an impairment charge and wrote down to current market value certain securities, resulting in a $162 million pre-tax securities loss comprised of the following:
 
At the time of purchase, 100% of our Alt-A portfolio was rated AAA. At Sept. 30, 2008, this portfolio had migrated to 74% AAA-rated, 10% AA-rated, 10% A-rated and 6% other. At the time of purchase, the portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 711 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is approximately 13%. The unrealized loss on the Alt-A portfolio at Sept. 30, 2008 was $2.3 billion.
At Sept. 30, 2008, the fair value of our total asset-backed securities ("ABS") CDOs was $51 million. The fair value of this portfolio, net of OTTI, was 11% of par at Sept. 30, 2008. At Sept. 30, 2008, $12 million of ABS CDOs are included in trading assets and $39 million are included in securities available-for-sale.
 
The home equity lines of credit ("HELOC") securities are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade. The securities losses in the third quarter of 2008 related to HELOC securities resulted from both a deterioration of specific securities combined with weakening credit support due to below investment grade ratings of certain bond insurers.
At Sept. 30, 2008, the fair value of our subprime mortgage securities portfolio was $1.2 billion with 81% of the portfolio rated AA or higher. The weighted-average current credit enhancement on this portfolio was approximately 35% at Sept. 30, 2008.
SILO/LILO and Tax Settlements
In the third quarter of 2008, we reached a settlement with the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") to formally close our 1998 through 2002 audit cycle. We also settled our 1994 through 1996 New York State and New York City audits. As part of the IRS settlement, we also accepted the IRS uniform SILO/LILO settlement offer announced on Aug. 6, 2008. The combined after-tax charge of the settlements was $30 million. In the second quarter of 2008 we recorded a $380 million after-tax charge related to the SILO transactions covered by this settlement.
Support Agreements
As previously disclosed, BNY Mellon elected to support its clients invested in money market mutual funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. ("Lehman") bankruptcy filing. The support agreements relate to five commingled cash funds used primarily for overnight custody cash sweeps, four Dreyfus money market funds and various securities lending customers. These agreements are in addition to agreements that existed at June 30, 2008 covering SIV exposure in two short-term net asset value funds and the support agreements covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC to a commingled short-term net asset value fund.
During the third quarter of 2008, we also offered to support certain clients holding auction rate securities in the Wealth Management (expense of $15 million) and Treasury Services (expense of $3 million) segments.
Balance Sheet
During the recent market turmoil, there was a significant increase in deposits, reflecting client reactions to market volatility. Due to the anticipated short-term nature of these deposits, we have placed them primarily with either the Federal Reserve or in overnight deposits with large global banks. At Sept. 30, 2008, total assets grew to $267.5 billion compared with $201.2 billion at June 30, 2008. Total assets averaged $198.8 billion for the third quarter of 2008, compared with $196.0 billion for the second quarter of 2008. Deposits totaled $174.2 billion at Sept. 30, 2008 and $127.2 billion at June 30, 2008. Total deposits averaged $120.3 billion in the third quarter of 2008 and $119.6 billion in the second quarter of 2008.
The recent market events resulted in a significant increase in our percentage of liquid assets to total assets to 43% at Sept. 30, 2008 from 30% at June 30, 2008. At Sept. 30, 2008, we had approximately $70.9 billion of overnight liquid funds and cash of $45.3 billion (including approximately $37.9 billion on deposit with the Federal Reserve) for a total of approximately $116.2 billion of available funds.
 
Nonperforming Assets
 
Allowance for Credit Losses, Provision and Net Charge-offs
 
The unallocated allowance was 19% at Sept. 30, 2008 compared with 22% at June 30, 2008 and 28% at Sept. 30, 2007.
Consolidated Net Income Including Discontinued Operations
Net income, including discontinued operations, totaled $303 million, or $0.26 per share, in the third quarter of 2008, compared with $309 million, or $0.27 per share, in the second quarter of 2008 and $640 million, or $0.56 per share, in the third quarter of 2007.
 
Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information included in this earnings release is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. This information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also reflect certain items that are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, statements with respect to ability and intention to hold certain securities, assumptions regarding additional declines in national home prices and estimated impact of this decline, the description of client deposits and assumptions regarding performance in our Alt-A and securities available-for-sale portfolios. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of October 16, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081017172105.txt.gz
TIME:20081017172105
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 13, 2008, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") agreed to participate in the U.S. Treasury's TARP Capital Purchase Program. The Company has agreed to issue and sell to the U.S. Treasury preferred stock and warrants to purchase shares of common stock of the Company in accordance with the terms of the Capital Purchase Program for an aggregate purchase price of $3 billion. The U.S. Treasury's term sheet describing the Capital Purchase Program is available on the U.S. Treasury's website at http://www.ustreas.gov.
On October 14, 2008, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (the "FDIC") announced a new program, the Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program. The Company and its U.S. bank subsidiaries are eligible institutions under this program. The FDIC's Financial Institution Letter describing this program is available on the FDIC's website at http://www.fdic.gov/tlgp.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081022160108.txt.gz
TIME:20081022160108
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Summary are with the third quarter of 2007 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Summary, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's future financial goals, including future revenue, expenses and earnings, new business wins, and pipelines for new business; ability and intention to hold certain securities; assumptions regarding additional declines in national home prices and estimated impact of these declines; ability to achieve plans for revenue and expense synergies and growth in asset management and securities servicing businesses; statements with respect to the merger integration, including revenue synergies and targeted run rates, expense synergy targets and estimated merger and integration charges; as well as the Company's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the businesses of Mellon Financial and The Bank of New York may not be integrated successfully or the integration may be more difficult, time-consuming or costly than expected; the combined company may not realize, to the extent or at the time we expect, revenue synergies and cost savings from the transaction; service quality metrics in Asset Servicing may not be attained; revenue following the merger may be lower than expected as a result of losses of customers or other reasons; deposit attrition, operating costs, customer loss and business disruption following the merger, including, without limitation, difficulties in maintaining relationships with employees, may be greater than expected; as well as the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and the Company's other filings with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of October 16, 2008 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
NON-GAAP MEASURES
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Summary, certain financial measures, which are noted, exclude or are adjusted for certain items. These adjustments or exclusions can impact revenue, noninterest expense, pre-tax income, net income and earnings per share amounts as well as related ratios and growth rates. We believe this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends in our business. We believe this information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Below is a listing of financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: SILO/LILO/tax settlement charges and securities losses
Noninterest expense: Support agreement charges, merger & integration and intangible amortization expenses
Earnings per share: SILO/LILO/tax settlement charges, support agreement charges and merger & integration expenses. Earnings per share calculations do not exclude securities losses.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
)
THIRD QUARTER 2008 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. third quarter 2007
 
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps - basis points.
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Sept. 30, 2008, our investment securities portfolio totaled $41.6 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities portfolio was $2.8 billion at Sept. 30, 2008. The unrealized net of tax loss at June 30, 2008 was $1.8 billion. The increase compared to the prior quarter was primarily driven by wider credit spreads. The securities in our portfolio continued to remain highly rated, with 91% rated AAA/AA.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
At Sept. 30, 2008, we assumed an additional decline of approximately 15% in national home prices over the next two years and estimated the impact it would have on the cash flows of the underlying individual securities. As a result, we recorded an impairment charge and wrote down to current market value certain securities, resulting in a $162 million pre-tax securities loss comprised of the following:
 
At the time of purchase, 100% of our Alt-A portfolio was rated AAA. At Sept. 30, 2008, this portfolio had migrated to 74% AAA-rated, 10% AA-rated, 10% A-rated and 6% other. At the time of purchase, the portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 711 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is approximately 13%. The unrealized loss on the Alt-A portfolio at Sept. 30, 2008 was $2.3 billion.
At Sept. 30, 2008, the fair value of our total asset-backed securities ("ABS") CDOs was $51 million. The fair value of this portfolio, net of OTTI, was 11% of par at Sept. 30, 2008. At Sept. 30, 2008, $12 million of ABS CDOs are included in trading assets and $39 million are included in securities available-for-sale.
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
The home equity lines of credit ("HELOC") securities are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade. The securities losses in the third quarter of 2008 related to HELOC securities resulted from both a deterioration of specific securities combined with weakening credit support due to below investment grade ratings of certain bond insurers.
At Sept. 30, 2008, the fair value of our subprime mortgage securities portfolio was $1.2 billion with 81% of the portfolio rated AA or higher. The weighted-average current credit enhancement on this portfolio was approximately 35% at Sept. 30, 2008.
SILO/LILO AND TAX SETTLEMENTS
In the third quarter of 2008, we reached a settlement with the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") to formally close our 1998 through 2002 audit cycle. We also settled our 1994 through 1996 New York State and New York City audits. As part of the IRS settlement, we also accepted the IRS uniform SILO/LILO settlement offer announced on Aug. 6, 2008. The combined after-tax charge of the settlements was $30 million. In the second quarter of 2008 we recorded a $380 million after-tax charge related to the SILO transactions covered by this settlement.
SUPPORT AGREEMENTS
As previously disclosed, BNY Mellon elected to support its clients invested in money market mutual funds, cash sweep funds and similar collective funds impacted by the Lehman Brothers Holdings, Inc. ("Lehman") bankruptcy filing. The support agreements relate to five commingled cash funds used primarily for overnight custody cash sweeps, four Dreyfus money market funds and various securities lending customers. These agreements are in addition to agreements that existed at June 30, 2008 covering SIV exposure in two short-term net asset value funds and the support agreements covering securities related to Whistle Jacket Capital/White Pine Financial, LLC to a commingled short-term net asset value fund.
During the third quarter of 2008, we also offered to support certain clients holding auction rate securities in the Wealth Management (expense of $15 million) and Treasury Services (expense of $3 million) segments.
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
BALANCE SHEET
During the recent market turmoil, there was a significant increase in deposits, reflecting client reactions to market volatility. Due to the anticipated short-term nature of these deposits, we have placed them primarily with either the Federal Reserve or in overnight deposits with large global banks. At Sept. 30, 2008, total assets grew to $267.5 billion compared with $201.2 billion at June 30, 2008. Total assets averaged $198.8 billion for the third quarter of 2008, compared with $196.0 billion for the second quarter of 2008. Deposits totaled $174.2 billion at Sept. 30, 2008 and $127.2 billion at June 30, 2008. Total deposits averaged $120.3 billion in the third quarter of 2008 and $119.6 billion in the second quarter of 2008.
The recent market events resulted in a significant increase in our percentage of liquid assets to total assets to 43% at Sept. 30, 2008 from 30% at June 30, 2008. At Sept. 30, 2008, we had approximately $70.9 billion of overnight liquid funds and cash of $45.3 billion (including approximately $37.9 billion on deposit with the Federal Reserve) for a total of approximately $116.2 billion of available funds.
CAPITAL RATIOS
The capital ratios for the third quarter of 2008 reflect the record level of client deposits generated subsequent to the market turmoil that began in mid-September. Noninterest-bearing deposits were $82 billion at Sept. 30, 2008, $31 billion at June 30, 2008 and $27 billion at Sept. 30, 2007. The Company placed an increased level of deposits principally with either the Federal Reserve or in overnight deposits with large global banks. At the end of the third quarter, total assets were $268 billion and averaged $199 billion during the quarter.
The unrealized net of tax loss on our securities portfolio was $2.8 billion at Sept. 30, 2008 compared with $1.8 billion at June 30, 2008. The increase primarily resulted from wider credit spreads.
 
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The unallocated allowance was 19% at Sept. 30, 2008 compared with 22% at June 30, 2008 and 28% at Sept. 30, 2007.
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
1) Revenue Synergies
 
2) Expense Synergies
 
 
3) Merger & Integration Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation)
 
As of 9/30/08, all wealth management clients are serviced by the same trust accounting and custody platforms.
4) Wealth Management 
5) Service Quality Goals for 2010 - Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> Global Investor Survey (May 2008)
> R&M Global Custody Survey (March 2008)
> Global Custodian Survey (December 2007)
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high-net-worth individuals and families, family offices and business enterprises, charitable gift programs and endowments and foundations)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, the results of Mellon United National Bank and Mellon 1
OTHER
st
Business Bank, business exits, merger and integration expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q08 Quarterly Earnings Summary
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information included in this earnings summary is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. This information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also reflect certain items that are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
 
 
Page 21

Exhibit 99.2
 
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity.
The results prior to the consummation of the merger, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q06 - 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following acquisitions/divestitures have impacted the reporting of our results:
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). The financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
During the first quarter of 2008, we sold the B-Trade and G-Trade execution businesses to BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. We maintain a 35% equity interest in BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. The historical results of the B-Trade and G-Trade businesses are included in the Clearing Services segment.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 2, 2006, Mellon Financial Corporation completed the acquisition of Walter Scott & Partners. The financial results are included in the Asset Management segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired JPMorgan Chase's Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
The following transactions have impacted the reporting of our results:
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008.
Securities losses  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007 and first, second and third quarters of 2008.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of The Bank of New York/Mellon merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007 and the first and second quarters of 2008).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow. In addition, page 15 provides additional details on the impact of the applicable items on total revenue as well the impact on Continuing operations fully diluted earnings per share. Please note that there is no adjustment to Continuing operations fully diluted earnings per share related to securities losses.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
Where average deposits in a business segment are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The second quarter of 2008 includes a charge ($380 million after tax) related to SILO transactions which reduced net interest revenue by $377 million.
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - GAAP TO NON-GAAP RECONCILIATIONS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20081030170723.txt.gz
TIME:20081030170723
EVENTS:	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 26, 2008, as part of the Troubled Asset Relief Program ("TARP") Capital Purchase Program, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") agreed to issue and sell, and the U.S. Department of the Treasury (the "Treasury") agreed to purchase, (i) 3,000,000 shares (the "Preferred Shares") of the Company's Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B, having a liquidation preference of $1,000 per share, and (ii) a ten-year warrant (the "Warrant") to purchase up to 14,516,129 shares of the Company's voting common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Common Stock"), at an exercise price of $31.00 per share, for an aggregate purchase price of $3.0 billion in cash.
This transaction closed on October 28, 2008 (the "Closing Date"). The issuance and sale of these securities was a private placement exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933.
Cumulative dividends on the Preferred Shares will accrue on the liquidation preference at a rate of 5% per annum for the first five years, and at a rate of 9% per annum thereafter, but will be paid only if, as and when declared by the Company's Board of Directors. The Preferred Shares have no maturity date and rank senior to the Common Stock (and with the Company's other authorized series of preferred stock, of which no shares are currently outstanding) with respect to the payment of dividends and distributions and amounts payable upon liquidation, dissolution and winding up of the Company. Subject to the approval of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Preferred Shares are redeemable at the option of the Company at 100% of their liquidation preference, provided that the Preferred Shares may be redeemed prior to the first dividend payment date falling after the third anniversary of the Closing Date (October 28, 2011) only if (i) the Company has raised aggregate gross proceeds in one or more Qualified Equity Offerings (as defined in the letter agreement, dated October 26, 2008 between the Company and the Treasury (including the Securities Purchase AgreementStandard Terms incorporated by reference therein) (the "Purchase Agreement") and set forth below) in excess of $750 million and (ii) the aggregate redemption price does not exceed the aggregate net proceeds from such Qualified Equity Offerings.
pari passu
The Treasury may not transfer a portion or portions of the Warrant with respect to, and/or exercise the Warrant for more than one-half of, the 14,516,129 shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant, in the aggregate, until the earlier of (i) the date on which the Company has received aggregate gross proceeds of not less than $3 billion from one or more Qualified Equity Offerings (as defined in the Purchase Agreement and set forth below) and (ii) December 31, 2009. In the event the Company completes one or more Qualified Equity Offerings (as defined in the Purchase Agreement and set forth below) on or prior to December 31, 2009 that result in the Company receiving aggregate gross proceeds of not less than $3 billion, the number of the shares of Common Stock underlying the portion of the Warrant then held by the Treasury will be reduced by one-half of the shares of Common Stock originally covered by the Warrant. For the purposes of the foregoing, "Qualified Equity Offering" is defined as the sale and issuance for cash by the Company to persons other than the Company or any Company subsidiary after the Closing Date of shares of perpetual Preferred Stock, Common Stock or any combination of such stock, that, in each case, qualify as and may be included in Tier I capital of the Company at the time of issuance under the applicable risk-based capital guidelines of the Company's federal banking agency (other than any such sales and issuances made pursuant to agreements or arrangements entered into, or pursuant to financing plans which were publicly announced, on or prior to October 13, 2008).
The Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the Preferred Shares and the Warrant were sold, contains limitations on the payment of dividends on the Common Stock (including with respect to the payment of cash dividends in excess of $0.24 per share, which was the amount of the last regular dividend declared by the Company prior to October 14, 2008) and on the Company's ability to repurchase its Common Stock, and subjects the Company to certain of the executive compensation limitations included in the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008 (the "EESA"). As a condition to the closing of the transaction, each of Messrs. Robert P. Kelly, Gerald L. Hassell, Thomas P. Gibbons, Steven G. Elliott and Ronald P. O'Hanley, the Company's Senior Executive Officers (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) (the "Senior Executive Officers"), (i) executed a waiver (the "Waiver") voluntarily waiving any claim against the Treasury or the Company for any changes to such Senior Executive Officer's compensation or benefits that are required to comply with the regulation issued by the Treasury under the TARP Capital Purchase Program as published in the Federal Register on October 20, 2008 and acknowledging that the regulation may require modification of the compensation, bonus, incentive and other benefit plans, arrangements and policies and agreements (including so-called "golden parachute" agreements) (collectively, "Benefit Plans") as they relate to the period the Treasury holds any equity or debt securities of the Company acquired through the TARP Capital Purchase Program; and (ii) entered into a letter agreement (the "Letter Agreement") with the Company amending the Benefit Plans with respect to such Senior Executive Officer as may be necessary, during the period that the Treasury owns any debt or equity securities of the Company acquired pursuant to the Purchase Agreement or the Warrant, as necessary to comply with Section 111(b) of the EESA.
Copies of the Purchase Agreement, the form of Warrant, the Certificate of Designations with respect to the Preferred Shares, the form of Waiver executed by the Senior Executive Officers and the form of Letter Agreement executed by the Senior Executive Officers are included as exhibits to this Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated by reference into these Item 3.02, 3.03, 5.02 and 5.03. The foregoing summary of certain provisions of these documents is qualified in its entirety by reference thereto.
 
The information set forth under "Item 3.02 Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities" is incorporated by reference into this Item 3.03.
 
(e) The information set forth under "Item 3.02 Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities" is incorporated by reference into this Item 5.02.
 
On October 27, 2008, the Company filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware a Certificate of Designations to its Restated Certificate of Incorporation establishing the terms of the Preferred Shares. A copy of the Certificate of Designations is included as an exhibit to this Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 5.03.
 
(d) Exhibits.
The following exhibit is being filed as part of this Report on Form 8-K:
3.1 Certificate of Designations with respect to the Preferred Shares.
3.2 Warrant to Purchase up to 14,516,129 shares of Common Stock.
10.1 Letter Agreement, dated October 26, 2008, including Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms incorporated by reference therein, between the Company and the United States Department of the Treasury.
10.2 Form of Waiver, executed by each of Messrs. Robert P. Kelly, Gerald L. Hassell, Thomas P. Gibbons, Steven G. Elliott and Ronald P. O'Hanley.
10.3 Form of Letter Agreement, executed by each of Messrs. Robert P. Kelly, Gerald L. Hassell, Thomas P. Gibbons, Steven G. Elliott and Ronald P. O'Hanley with the Company.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""), in accordance with the provisions of Sections 103 and 151 thereof, does hereby certify:
Corporation
The board of directors of the Corporation (the ""), in accordance with the restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws of the Corporation and applicable law, authorized the issuance and sale by the Corporation of shares of its preferred stock at a meeting duly convened and held on October 13, 2008 and authorized the formation of a Pricing Committee of the Board of Directors (the "") at a meeting duly convened and held on October 14, 2008, and pursuant to the authority conferred upon the Committee in accordance with Section 141(c) of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, Article 3, Section 1 of the amended and restated bylaws of the Corporation and the resolutions of the Board of Directors, the Committee adopted the following resolution at a meeting duly convened and held on October 23, 2008 creating a series of 3,000,000 shares of Preferred Stock of the Corporation designated as "".
Board of Directors
Committee
Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B
, that pursuant to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation and the amended and restated bylaws of the Corporation and applicable law, a series of Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation be and hereby is created, and that the designation and number of shares of such series, and the voting and other powers, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other rights, and the qualifications, limitations and restrictions thereof, of the shares of such series, are as follows:
RESOLVED
Part 1. . There is hereby created out of the authorized and unissued shares of preferred stock of the Corporation a series of preferred stock designated as the "Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B" (the "). The authorized number of shares of Designated Preferred Stock shall be 3,000,000.
Designation and Number of Shares
Designated Preferred Stock"
Part 2. . The Standard Provisions contained in Annex A attached hereto are incorporated herein by reference in their entirety and shall be deemed to be a part of this Certificate of Designations to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein.
Standard Provisions
Part. 3. . The following terms are used in this Certificate of Designations (including the Standard Provisions in Annex A hereto) as defined below:
Definitions
(a) "" means the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation.
Common Stock
 
(b) "" means March 20, June 20, September 20 and December 20 of each year.
Dividend Payment Date
(c) "" means the Common Stock, and any other class or series of stock of the Corporation the terms of which expressly provide that it ranks junior to Designated Preferred Stock as to dividend rights and/or as to rights on liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
Junior Stock
(d) "" means $1,000 per share of Designated Preferred Stock.
Liquidation Amount
(e) "" means $750,000,000.
Minimum Amount
(f) "" means any class or series of stock of the Corporation (other than Designated Preferred Stock) the terms of which do not expressly provide that such class or series will rank senior or junior to Designated Preferred Stock as to dividend rights and/or as to rights on liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation (in each case without regard to whether dividends accrue cumulatively or non-cumulatively). Without limiting the foregoing, Parity Stock shall include the Corporation's Series A Noncumulative Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share.
Parity Stock
(g) "" means October 26, 2008.
Signing Date
Part. 4. . Holders of shares of Designated Preferred Stock will be entitled to one vote for each such share on any matter on which holders of Designated Preferred Stock are entitled to vote, including any action by written consent.
Certain Voting Matters
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has caused this Certificate of Designations to be signed by Arlie Nogay, its Corporate Secretary, this 27th day of October, 2008.
 
 
ANNEX A
Section 1. . Each share of Designated Preferred Stock shall be identical in all respects to every other share of Designated Preferred Stock. The Designated Preferred Stock shall be perpetual, subject to the provisions of Section 5 of these Standard Provisions that form a part of the Certificate of Designations. The Designated Preferred Stock shall rank equally with Parity Stock and shall rank senior to Junior Stock with respect to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any dissolution, liquidation or winding up of the Corporation.
General Matters
Section 2. . As used herein with respect to Designated Preferred Stock:
Standard Definitions
(a) "" means (i) during the period from the Original Issue Date to, but excluding, the first day of the first Dividend Period commencing on or after the fifth anniversary of the Original Issue Date, 5% per annum and (ii) from and after the first day of the first Dividend Period commencing on or after the fifth anniversary of the Original Issue Date, 9% per annum.
Applicable Dividend Rate
(b) "" means the "appropriate Federal banking agency" with respect to the Corporation as defined in Section 3(q) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Section 1813(q)), or any successor provision.
Appropriate Federal Banking Agency
(c) "" means a merger, consolidation, statutory share exchange or similar transaction that requires the approval of the Corporation's stockholders.
Business Combination
(d) "" means any day except Saturday, Sunday and any day on which banking institutions in the State of New York generally are authorized or required by law or other governmental actions to close.
Business Day
(e) "" means the bylaws of the Corporation, as they may be amended from time to time.
Bylaws
(f) "" means the Certificate of Designations or comparable instrument relating to the Designated Preferred Stock, of which these Standard Provisions form a part, as it may be amended from time to time.
Certificate of Designations
(g) "" means the Corporation's certificate or articles of incorporation, articles of association, or similar organizational document.
Charter
(h) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 3(a).
Dividend Period
(i) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 3(a).
Dividend Record Date
(j) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 4(a).
Liquidation Preference
 
(k) "" means the date on which shares of Designated Preferred Stock are first issued.
Original Issue Date
(l) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 7(b).
Preferred Director
(m) "" means any and all series of preferred stock of the Corporation, including the Designated Preferred Stock.
Preferred Stock
(n) "" means the sale and issuance for cash by the Corporation to persons other than the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries after the Original Issue Date of shares of perpetual Preferred Stock, Common Stock or any combination of such stock, that, in each case, qualify as and may be included in Tier 1 capital of the Corporation at the time of issuance under the applicable risk-based capital guidelines of the Corporation's Appropriate Federal Banking Agency (other than any such sales and issuances made pursuant to agreements or arrangements entered into, or pursuant to financing plans which were publicly announced, on or prior to October 13, 2008).
Qualified Equity Offering
(o) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 3(b).
Share Dilution Amount
(p) "" mean these Standard Provisions that form a part of the Certificate of Designations relating to the Designated Preferred Stock.
Standard Provisions
(q) "" has the meaning set forth in Section 5(a).
Successor Preferred Stock
(r) "" means, with regard to any matter as to which the holders of Designated Preferred Stock are entitled to vote as specified in Sections 7(a) and 7(b) of these Standard Provisions that form a part of the Certificate of Designations, any and all series of Parity Stock upon which like voting rights have been conferred and are exercisable with respect to such matter.
Voting Parity Stock
Section 3. .
Dividends
(a) . Holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive, on each share of Designated Preferred Stock if, as and when declared by the Board of Directors or any duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors, but only out of assets legally available therefor, cumulative cash dividends with respect to each Dividend Period (as defined below) at a rate per annum equal to the Applicable Dividend Rate on (i) the Liquidation Amount per share of Designated Preferred Stock and (ii) the amount of accrued and unpaid dividends for any prior Dividend Period on such share of Designated Preferred Stock, if any. Such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative from the Original Issue Date, shall compound on each subsequent Dividend Payment Date (, no dividends shall accrue on other dividends unless and until the first Dividend Payment Date for such other dividends has passed without such other dividends having been paid on such date) and shall be payable quarterly in arrears on each Dividend Payment Date, commencing with the first such Dividend Payment Date to occur at least 20 calendar days after the Original Issue Date. In the event that any Dividend Payment Date would otherwise fall on a day that is not a Business Day, the dividend payment due on that date will be postponed to the next day that is a Business Day and no additional dividends will accrue as a result of that postponement. The period from and including any Dividend Payment Date to, but excluding, the next Dividend Payment Date is a "", provided that the initial Dividend Period shall be the period from and including the Original Issue Date to, but excluding, the next Dividend Payment Date.
Rate
i.e.
Dividend Period
 
Dividends that are payable on Designated Preferred Stock in respect of any Dividend Period shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months. The amount of dividends payable on Designated Preferred Stock on any date prior to the end of a Dividend Period, and for the initial Dividend Period, shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, and actual days elapsed over a 30-day month.
Dividends that are payable on Designated Preferred Stock on any Dividend Payment Date will be payable to holders of record of Designated Preferred Stock as they appear on the stock register of the Corporation on the applicable record date, which shall be the 15th calendar day immediately preceding such Dividend Payment Date or such other record date fixed by the Board of Directors or any duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors that is not more than 60 nor less than 10 days prior to such Dividend Payment Date (each, a ""). Any such day that is a Dividend Record Date shall be a Dividend Record Date whether or not such day is a Business Day.
Dividend Record Date
Holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall not be entitled to any dividends, whether payable in cash, securities or other property, other than dividends (if any) declared and payable on Designated Preferred Stock as specified in this Section 3 (subject to the other provisions of the Certificate of Designations).
(b) . So long as any share of Designated Preferred Stock remains outstanding, no dividend or distribution shall be declared or paid on the Common Stock or any other shares of Junior Stock (other than dividends payable solely in shares of Common Stock) or Parity Stock, subject to the immediately following paragraph in the case of Parity Stock, and no Common Stock, Junior Stock or Parity Stock shall be, directly or indirectly, purchased, redeemed or otherwise acquired for consideration by the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries unless all accrued and unpaid dividends for all past Dividend Periods, including the latest completed Dividend Period (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount), on all outstanding shares of Designated Preferred Stock have been or are contemporaneously declared and paid in full (or have been declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof has been set aside for the benefit of the holders of shares of Designated Preferred Stock on the applicable record date). The foregoing limitation shall not apply to (i) redemptions, purchases or other acquisitions of shares of Common Stock or other Junior Stock in connection with the administration of any employee benefit plan in the ordinary course of business (including purchases to offset the Share Dilution Amount (as defined below) pursuant to a publicly announced repurchase plan) and consistent with past practice, that any purchases to offset the Share Dilution Amount shall in no event exceed the Share Dilution Amount; (ii) purchases or other acquisitions by a broker-dealer subsidiary of the Corporation solely for the purpose of market-making, stabilization or customer facilitation transactions in Junior Stock or Parity Stock in the ordinary course of its business; (iii) purchases by a broker-dealer subsidiary of the Corporation of capital stock of the Corporation for resale pursuant to an offering by the Corporation of such capital stock underwritten by such broker-dealer subsidiary; (iv) any dividends or distributions of rights or Junior Stock in connection with a stockholders' rights plan or any redemption or repurchase of rights pursuant to any
Priority of Dividends
provided
 
stockholders' rights plan; (v) the acquisition by the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries of record ownership in Junior Stock or Parity Stock for the beneficial ownership of any other persons (other than the Corporation or any of its subsidiaries), including as trustees or custodians; and (vi) the exchange or conversion of Junior Stock for or into other Junior Stock or of Parity Stock for or into other Parity Stock (with the same or lesser aggregate liquidation amount) or Junior Stock, in each case, solely to the extent required pursuant to binding contractual agreements entered into prior to the Signing Date or any subsequent agreement for the accelerated exercise, settlement or exchange thereof for Common Stock. "" means the increase in the number of diluted shares outstanding (determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States, and as measured from the date of the Corporation's consolidated financial statements most recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission prior to the Original Issue Date) resulting from the grant, vesting or exercise of equity-based compensation to employees and equitably adjusted for any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split, reclassification or similar transaction.
Share Dilution Amount
When dividends are not paid (or declared and a sum sufficient for payment thereof set aside for the benefit of the holders thereof on the applicable record date) on any Dividend Payment Date (or, in the case of Parity Stock having dividend payment dates different from the Dividend Payment Dates, on a dividend payment date falling within a Dividend Period related to such Dividend Payment Date) in full upon Designated Preferred Stock and any shares of Parity Stock, all dividends declared on Designated Preferred Stock and all such Parity Stock and payable on such Dividend Payment Date (or, in the case of Parity Stock having dividend payment dates different from the Dividend Payment Dates, on a dividend payment date falling within the Dividend Period related to such Dividend Payment Date) shall be declared so that the respective amounts of such dividends declared shall bear the same ratio to each other as all accrued and unpaid dividends per share on the shares of Designated Preferred Stock (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount) and all Parity Stock payable on such Dividend Payment Date (or, in the case of Parity Stock having dividend payment dates different from the Dividend Payment Dates, on a dividend payment date falling within the Dividend Period related to such Dividend Payment Date) (subject to their having been declared by the Board of Directors or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors out of legally available funds and including, in the case of Parity Stock that bears cumulative dividends, all accrued but unpaid dividends) bear to each other. If the Board of Directors or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors determines not to pay any dividend or a full dividend on a Dividend Payment Date, the Corporation will provide written notice to the holders of Designated Preferred Stock prior to such Dividend Payment Date.
pro rata
Subject to the foregoing, and not otherwise, such dividends (payable in cash, securities or other property) as may be determined by the Board of Directors or any duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors may be declared and paid on any securities, including Common Stock and other Junior Stock, from time to time out of any funds legally available for such payment, and holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall not be entitled to participate in any such dividends.
 
Section 4. .
Liquidation Rights
(a) . In the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the affairs of the Corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary, holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive for each share of Designated Preferred Stock, out of the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof (whether capital or surplus) available for distribution to stockholders of the Corporation, subject to the rights of any creditors of the Corporation, before any distribution of such assets or proceeds is made to or set aside for the holders of Common Stock and any other stock of the Corporation ranking junior to Designated Preferred Stock as to such distribution, payment in full in an amount equal to the sum of (i) the Liquidation Amount per share and (ii) the amount of any accrued and unpaid dividends (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount), whether or not declared, to the date of payment (such amounts collectively, the "").
Voluntary or Involuntary Liquidation
Liquidation Preference
(b) . If in any distribution described in Section 4(a) above the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof are not sufficient to pay in full the amounts payable with respect to all outstanding shares of Designated Preferred Stock and the corresponding amounts payable with respect of any other stock of the Corporation ranking equally with Designated Preferred Stock as to such distribution, holders of Designated Preferred Stock and the holders of such other stock shall share ratably in any such distribution in proportion to the full respective distributions to which they are entitled.
Partial Payment
(c) . If the Liquidation Preference has been paid in full to all holders of Designated Preferred Stock and the corresponding amounts payable with respect of any other stock of the Corporation ranking equally with Designated Preferred Stock as to such distribution has been paid in full, the holders of other stock of the Corporation shall be entitled to receive all remaining assets of the Corporation (or proceeds thereof) according to their respective rights and preferences.
Residual Distributions
(d) . For purposes of this Section 4, the merger or consolidation of the Corporation with any other corporation or other entity, including a merger or consolidation in which the holders of Designated Preferred Stock receive cash, securities or other property for their shares, or the sale, lease or exchange (for cash, securities or other property) of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation, shall not constitute a liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
Merger, Consolidation and Sale of Assets Not Liquidation
Section 5. .
Redemption
(a) . Except as provided below, the Designated Preferred Stock may not be redeemed prior to the first Dividend Payment Date falling on or after the third anniversary of the Original Issue Date. On or after the first Dividend Payment Date falling on or after the third anniversary of the Original Issue Date, the Corporation, at its option, subject to the approval of the Appropriate Federal Banking Agency, may redeem, in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time, out of funds legally available therefor, the shares of Designated Preferred Stock at the time outstanding, upon notice given as provided in Section 5(c) below, at a redemption price equal to the sum of (i) the Liquidation Amount per share and (ii) except as otherwise provided below, any accrued and unpaid dividends (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount) (regardless of whether any dividends are actually declared) to, but excluding, the date fixed for redemption.
Optional Redemption
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, prior to the first Dividend Payment Date falling on or after the third anniversary of the Original Issue Date, the Corporation, at its option, subject to the approval of the Appropriate Federal Banking Agency, may redeem, in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time, the shares of Designated Preferred Stock at the time outstanding, upon notice given as provided in Section 5(c) below, at a redemption price equal to the sum of (i) the Liquidation Amount per share and (ii) except as otherwise provided below, any accrued and unpaid dividends (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount) (regardless of whether any dividends are actually declared) to, but excluding, the date fixed for redemption; that (x) the Corporation (or any successor by Business Combination) has received aggregate gross proceeds of not less than the Minimum Amount (plus the "Minimum Amount" as defined in the relevant certificate of designations for each other outstanding series of preferred stock of such successor that was originally issued to the United States Department of the Treasury (the "") in connection with the Troubled Asset Relief Program Capital Purchase Program) from one or more Qualified Equity Offerings (including Qualified Equity Offerings of such successor), and (y) the aggregate redemption price of the Designated Preferred Stock (and any Successor Preferred Stock) redeemed pursuant to this paragraph may not exceed the aggregate net cash proceeds received by the Corporation (or any successor by Business Combination) from such Qualified Equity Offerings (including Qualified Equity Offerings of such successor).
provided
Successor Preferred Stock
The redemption price for any shares of Designated Preferred Stock shall be payable on the redemption date to the holder of such shares against surrender of the certificate(s) evidencing such shares to the Corporation or its agent. Any declared but unpaid dividends payable on a redemption date that occurs subsequent to the Dividend Record Date for a Dividend Period shall not be paid to the holder entitled to receive the redemption price on the redemption date, but rather shall be paid to the holder of record of the redeemed shares on such Dividend Record Date relating to the Dividend Payment Date as provided in Section 3 above.
(b) . The Designated Preferred Stock will not be subject to any mandatory redemption, sinking fund or other similar provisions. Holders of Designated Preferred Stock will have no right to require redemption or repurchase of any shares of Designated Preferred Stock.
No Sinking Fund
(c) . Notice of every redemption of shares of Designated Preferred Stock shall be given by first class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the holders of record of the shares to be redeemed at their respective last addresses appearing on the books of the Corporation. Such mailing shall be at least 30 days and not more than 60 days before the date fixed for redemption. Any notice mailed as provided in this Subsection shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given, whether or not the holder receives such notice, but failure duly to give such notice by mail, or any defect in such notice or in the mailing thereof, to any holder of shares of Designated Preferred Stock designated for redemption shall not affect the validity of the proceedings for the redemption of any other shares of Designated Preferred Stock. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if shares of Designated Preferred Stock are issued in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Corporation or any other similar facility, notice of redemption may be given to the
Notice of Redemption
 
holders of Designated Preferred Stock at such time and in any manner permitted by such facility. Each notice of redemption given to a holder shall state: (1) the redemption date; (2) the number of shares of Designated Preferred Stock to be redeemed and, if less than all the shares held by such holder are to be redeemed, the number of such shares to be redeemed from such holder; (3) the redemption price; and (4) the place or places where certificates for such shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price.
(d) . In case of any redemption of part of the shares of Designated Preferred Stock at the time outstanding, the shares to be redeemed shall be selected either or in such other manner as the Board of Directors or a duly authorized committee thereof may determine to be fair and equitable. Subject to the provisions hereof, the Board of Directors or a duly authorized committee thereof shall have full power and authority to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which shares of Designated Preferred Stock shall be redeemed from time to time. If fewer than all the shares represented by any certificate are redeemed, a new certificate shall be issued representing the unredeemed shares without charge to the holder thereof.
Partial Redemption
pro rata
(e) . If notice of redemption has been duly given and if on or before the redemption date specified in the notice all funds necessary for the redemption have been deposited by the Corporation, in trust for the benefit of the holders of the shares called for redemption, with a bank or trust company doing business in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, and having a capital and surplus of at least $500 million and selected by the Board of Directors, so as to be and continue to be available solely therefor, then, notwithstanding that any certificate for any share so called for redemption has not been surrendered for cancellation, on and after the redemption date dividends shall cease to accrue on all shares so called for redemption, all shares so called for redemption shall no longer be deemed outstanding and all rights with respect to such shares shall forthwith on such redemption date cease and terminate, except only the right of the holders thereof to receive the amount payable on such redemption from such bank or trust company, without interest. Any funds unclaimed at the end of three years from the redemption date shall, to the extent permitted by law, be released to the Corporation, after which time the holders of the shares so called for redemption shall look only to the Corporation for payment of the redemption price of such shares.
Effectiveness of Redemption
pro rata
(f) . Shares of Designated Preferred Stock that are redeemed, repurchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation shall revert to authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock ( that any such cancelled shares of Designated Preferred Stock may be reissued only as shares of any series of Preferred Stock other than Designated Preferred Stock).
Status of Redeemed Shares
provided
Section 6. . Holders of Designated Preferred Stock shares shall have no right to exchange or convert such shares into any other securities.
Conversion
Section 7. .
Voting Rights
(a) . The holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall not have any voting rights except as set forth below or as otherwise from time to time required by law.
General
 
(b) . Whenever, at any time or times, dividends payable on the shares of Designated Preferred Stock have not been paid for an aggregate of six quarterly Dividend Periods or more, whether or not consecutive, the authorized number of directors of the Corporation shall automatically be increased by two and the holders of the Designated Preferred Stock shall have the right, with holders of shares of any one or more other classes or series of Voting Parity Stock outstanding at the time, voting together as a class, to elect two directors (hereinafter the " and each a "") to fill such newly created directorships at the Corporation's next annual meeting of stockholders (or at a special meeting called for that purpose prior to such next annual meeting) and at each subsequent annual meeting of stockholders until all accrued and unpaid dividends for all past Dividend Periods, including the latest completed Dividend Period (including, if applicable as provided in Section 3(a) above, dividends on such amount), on all outstanding shares of Designated Preferred Stock have been declared and paid in full at which time such right shall terminate with respect to the Designated Preferred Stock, except as herein or by law expressly provided, subject to revesting in the event of each and every subsequent default of the character above mentioned; that it shall be a qualification for election for any Preferred Director that the election of such Preferred Director shall not cause the Corporation to violate any corporate governance requirements of any securities exchange or other trading facility on which securities of the Corporation may then be listed or traded that listed or traded companies must have a majority of independent directors. Upon any termination of the right of the holders of shares of Designated Preferred Stock and Voting Parity Stock as a class to vote for directors as provided above, the Preferred Directors shall cease to be qualified as directors, the term of office of all Preferred Directors then in office shall terminate immediately and the authorized number of directors shall be reduced by the number of Preferred Directors elected pursuant hereto. Any Preferred Director may be removed at any time, with or without cause, and any vacancy created thereby may be filled, only by the affirmative vote of the holders a majority of the shares of Designated Preferred Stock at the time outstanding voting separately as a class together with the holders of shares of Voting Parity Stock, to the extent the voting rights of such holders described above are then exercisable. If the office of any Preferred Director becomes vacant for any reason other than removal from office as aforesaid, the remaining Preferred Director may choose a successor who shall hold office for the unexpired term in respect of which such vacancy occurred.
Preferred Stock Directors
"
Preferred Directors
Preferred Director
provided
(c) . So long as any shares of Designated Preferred Stock are outstanding, in addition to any other vote or consent of stockholders required by law or by the Charter, the vote or consent of the holders of at least 66
Class Voting Rights as to Particular Matters
 2
/
3
% of the shares of Designated Preferred Stock at the time outstanding, voting as a separate class, given in person or by proxy, either in writing without a meeting or by vote at any meeting called for the purpose, shall be necessary for effecting or validating:
(i) . Any amendment or alteration of the Certificate of Designations for the Designated Preferred Stock or the Charter to authorize or create or increase the authorized amount of, or any issuance of, any shares of, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares of, any class or series of capital stock of the Corporation ranking senior to Designated Preferred Stock with respect to either or both the payment of dividends and/or the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation;
Authorization of Senior Stock
 
(ii) . Any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provision of the Certificate of Designations for the Designated Preferred Stock or the Charter (including, unless no vote on such merger or consolidation is required by Section 7(c)(iii) below, any amendment, alteration or repeal by means of a merger, consolidation or otherwise) so as to adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers of the Designated Preferred Stock; or
Amendment of Designated Preferred Stock
(iii) . Any consummation of a binding share exchange or reclassification involving the Designated Preferred Stock, or of a merger or consolidation of the Corporation with another corporation or other entity, unless in each case (x) the shares of Designated Preferred Stock remain outstanding or, in the case of any such merger or consolidation with respect to which the Corporation is not the surviving or resulting entity, are converted into or exchanged for preference securities of the surviving or resulting entity or its ultimate parent, and (y) such shares remaining outstanding or such preference securities, as the case may be, have such rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof, taken as a whole, as are not materially less favorable to the holders thereof than the rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof, of Designated Preferred Stock immediately prior to such consummation, taken as a whole;
Share Exchanges, Reclassifications, Mergers and Consolidations
, , that for all purposes of this Section 7(c), any increase in the amount of the authorized Preferred Stock, including any increase in the authorized amount of Designated Preferred Stock necessary to satisfy preemptive or similar rights granted by the Corporation to other persons prior to the Signing Date, or the creation and issuance, or an increase in the authorized or issued amount, whether pursuant to preemptive or similar rights or otherwise, of any other series of Preferred Stock, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for any other series of Preferred Stock, ranking equally with and/or junior to Designated Preferred Stock with respect to the payment of dividends (whether such dividends are cumulative or non-cumulative) and the distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation will not be deemed to adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers, and shall not require the affirmative vote or consent of, the holders of outstanding shares of the Designated Preferred Stock.
provided
however
(d) . No vote or consent of the holders of Designated Preferred Stock shall be required pursuant to Section 7(c) above if, at or prior to the time when any such vote or consent would otherwise be required pursuant to such Section, all outstanding shares of the Designated Preferred Stock shall have been redeemed, or shall have been called for redemption upon proper notice and sufficient funds shall have been deposited in trust for such redemption, in each case pursuant to Section 5 above.
Changes after Provision for Redemption
(e) . The rules and procedures for calling and conducting any meeting of the holders of Designated Preferred Stock (including, without limitation, the fixing of a record date in connection therewith), the solicitation and use of proxies at such a meeting, the obtaining of written consents and any other aspect or matter with regard to such a meeting or such consents shall be governed by any rules of the Board of Directors or any duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors, in its discretion, may adopt from time to time, which rules and procedures shall conform to the requirements of the Charter, the Bylaws, and applicable law and the rules of any national securities exchange or other trading facility on which Designated Preferred Stock is listed or traded at the time.
Procedures for Voting and Consents
 
Section 8. . To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Corporation and the transfer agent for Designated Preferred Stock may deem and treat the record holder of any share of Designated Preferred Stock as the true and lawful owner thereof for all purposes, and neither the Corporation nor such transfer agent shall be affected by any notice to the contrary.
Record Holders
Section 9. . All notices or communications in respect of Designated Preferred Stock shall be sufficiently given if given in writing and delivered in person or by first class mail, postage prepaid, or if given in such other manner as may be permitted in this Certificate of Designations, in the Charter or Bylaws or by applicable law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if shares of Designated Preferred Stock are issued in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Corporation or any similar facility, such notices may be given to the holders of Designated Preferred Stock in any manner permitted by such facility.
Notices
Section 10. . No share of Designated Preferred Stock shall have any rights of preemption whatsoever as to any securities of the Corporation, or any warrants, rights or options issued or granted with respect thereto, regardless of how such securities, or such warrants, rights or options, may be designated, issued or granted.
No Preemptive Rights
Section 11. . The Corporation shall replace any mutilated certificate at the holder's expense upon surrender of that certificate to the Corporation. The Corporation shall replace certificates that become destroyed, stolen or lost at the holder's expense upon delivery to the Corporation of reasonably satisfactory evidence that the certificate has been destroyed, stolen or lost, together with any indemnity that may be reasonably required by the Corporation.
Replacement Certificates
Section 12. . The shares of Designated Preferred Stock shall not have any rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers or relative, participating, optional or other special rights, or qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, other than as set forth herein or in the Charter or as provided by applicable law.
Other Rights
 

Exhibit 3.2
THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED, SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF EXCEPT WHILE A REGISTRATION STATEMENT RELATING THERETO IS IN EFFECT UNDER SUCH ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS OR PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER SUCH ACT OR SUCH LAWS. THIS INSTRUMENT IS ISSUED SUBJECT TO THE RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFER AND OTHER PROVISIONS OF A SECURITIES PURCHASE AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE ISSUER OF THESE SECURITIES AND THE INVESTOR REFERRED TO THEREIN, A COPY OF WHICH IS ON FILE WITH THE ISSUER. THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT MAY NOT BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SAID AGREEMENT. ANY SALE OR OTHER TRANSFER NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SAID AGREEMENT WILL BE VOID.
1. . Unless the context otherwise requires, when used herein the following terms shall have the meanings indicated.
Definitions
has the meaning ascribed to it in the Purchase Agreement.
"Affiliate"
means a procedure whereby two independent appraisers, one chosen by the Company and one by the Original Warrantholder, shall mutually agree upon the determinations then the subject of appraisal. Each party shall deliver a notice to the other appointing its appraiser within 15 days after the Appraisal Procedure is invoked. If within 30 days after appointment of the two appraisers they are unable to agree upon the amount in question, a third independent appraiser shall be chosen within 10 days thereafter by the mutual consent of such first two appraisers. The decision of the third appraiser so appointed and chosen shall be given within 30 days after the selection of such third appraiser. If three appraisers shall be appointed and the determination of one appraiser is disparate from the middle determination by more than twice the amount by which the other determination is disparate from the middle determination, then the determination of such appraiser shall be excluded, the remaining two determinations shall be averaged and such average shall be binding and conclusive upon the Company and the Original Warrantholder; otherwise, the average of all three determinations shall be binding upon the Company and the Original Warrantholder. The costs of conducting any Appraisal Procedure shall be borne by the Company.
"Appraisal Procedure"
means the board of directors of the Company, including any duly authorized committee thereof.
"Board of Directors"
means a merger, consolidation, statutory share exchange or similar transaction that requires the approval of the Company's stockholders.
"Business Combination"
means any day except Saturday, Sunday and any day on which banking institutions in the State of New York generally are authorized or required by law or other governmental actions to close.
"business day"
means (A) with respect to any Person that is a corporation or company, any and all shares, interests, participations or other equivalents (however designated) of capital or capital stock of such Person and (B) with respect to any Person that is not a corporation or company, any and all partnership or other equity interests of such Person.
"Capital Stock"
means, with respect to any Person, its certificate or articles of incorporation, articles of association, or similar organizational document.
"Charter"
has the meaning ascribed to it in the Purchase Agreement.
"Common Stock"
means the Person whose name, corporate or other organizational form and jurisdiction of organization is set forth in Item 1 of Schedule A hereto.
"Company"
has the meaning set forth in Section 13(B).
"conversion"
has the meaning set forth in Section 13(B).
"convertible securities"
has the meaning ascribed to it in the Purchase Agreement.
"CPP"
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor statute, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"Exchange Act"
means the amount set forth in Item 2 of Schedule A hereto.
"Exercise Price"
has the meaning set forth in Section 3.
"Expiration Time"
means, with respect to any security or other property, the fair market value of such security or other property as determined by the Board of Directors, acting in good faith or, with respect to Section 14, as determined by the Original Warrantholder acting in good faith. For so long as the Original Warrantholder holds this Warrant or any portion thereof, it may object in writing to the Board of Director's calculation of fair market value within 10 days of receipt of written notice thereof. If the Original Warrantholder and the Company are unable to agree on fair market value during the 10-day period following the delivery of the Original Warrantholder's objection, the Appraisal Procedure may be invoked by either party to determine Fair Market Value by delivering written notification thereof not later man the 30
"Fair Market Value"
th
day after delivery of the Original Warrantholder's objection.
 
has the meaning ascribed to it in the Purchase Agreement. "has the meaning set forth in Section 13(B).
"Governmental Entities"
Initial Number"
means the date set forth in Item 3 of Schedule A hereto.
"Issue Date"
means, with respect to a particular security, on any given day, the last reported sale price regular way or, in case no such reported sale takes place on such day, the average of the last closing bid and ask prices regular way, in either case on the principal national securities exchange on which the applicable securities are listed or admitted to trading, or if not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the average of the closing bid and ask prices as furnished by two members of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. selected from time to time by the Company for that purpose. "Market Price" shall be determined without reference to after hours or extended hours trading. If such security is not listed and traded in a manner that the quotations referred to above are available for the period required hereunder, the Market Price per share of Common Stock shall be deemed to be (i) in the event that any portion of the Warrant is held by the Original Warrantholder, the fair market value per share of such security as determined in good faith by the Original Warrantholder or (ii) in all other circumstances, the fair market value per share of such security as determined in good faith by the Board of Directors in reliance on an opinion of a nationally recognized independent investment banking corporation retained by the Company for this purpose and certified in a resolution to the Warrantholder. For the purposes of determining the Market Price of the Common Stock on the "trading day" preceding, on or following the occurrence of an event, (i) that trading day shall be deemed to commence immediately after the regular scheduled closing time of trading on the New York Stock Exchange or, if trading is closed at an earlier time, such earlier time and (ii) that trading day shall end at the next regular scheduled closing time, or if trading is closed at an earlier time, such earlier time (for the avoidance of doubt, and as an example, if the Market Price is to be determined as of the last trading day preceding a specified event and the closing time of trading on a particular day is 4:00 p.m. and the specified event occurs at 5:00 p.m. on that day, the Market Price would be determined by reference to such 4:00 p.m. closing price).
"Market Price"
means a regular quarterly cash dividend on shares of Common Stock out of surplus or net profits legally available therefor (determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in effect from time to time), that Ordinary Cash Dividends shall not include any cash dividends paid subsequent to the Issue Date to the extent the aggregate per share dividends paid on the outstanding Common Stock in any quarter exceed the amount set forth in Item 4 of Schedule A hereto, as adjusted for any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split, reclassification or similar transaction.
"Ordinary Cash Dividends"
provided
means the United States Department of the Treasury. Any actions specified to be taken by the Original Warrantholder hereunder may only be taken by such Person and not by any other Warrantholder.
"Original Warrantholder"
 
has the meaning set forth in Section 13(B).
"Permitted Transactions"
has the meaning given to it in Section 3(a)(9) of the Exchange Act and as used in Sections 13(d)(3) and 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act.
"Person"
has the meaning set forth in Section 13(C).
"Per Share Fair Market Value"
means the perpetual preferred stock issued to the Original Warrantholder on the Issue Date pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
"Preferred Shares"
means any purchase of shares of Common Stock by the Company or any Affiliate thereof pursuant to (A) any tender offer or exchange offer subject to Section 13(e) or 14(e) of the Exchange Act or Regulation 14E promulgated thereunder or (B) any other offer available to substantially all holders of Common Stock, in the case of both (A) or (B), whether for cash, shares of Capital Stock of the Company, other securities of the Company, evidences of indebtedness of the Company or any other Person or any other property (including, without limitation, shares of Capital Stock, other securities or evidences of indebtedness of a subsidiary), or any combination thereof, effected while this Warrant is outstanding. The "of a Pro Rata Repurchase shall mean the date of acceptance of shares for purchase or exchange by the Company under any tender or exchange offer which is a Pro Rata Repurchase or the date of purchase with respect to any Pro Rata Repurchase that is not a tender or exchange offer.
"Pro Rata Repurchases"
Effective Date"
means the Securities Purchase AgreementStandard Terms incorporated into the Letter Agreement, dated as of the date set forth in Item 5 of Schedule A hereto, as amended from time to time, between the Company and the United States Department of the Treasury (the "including all annexes and schedules thereto.
"Purchase Agreement"
Letter Agreement"),
has the meaning ascribed to it in the Purchase Agreement.
"Qualified Equity Offering"
with respect to the Warrantholder, means, to the extent applicable and required to permit the Warrantholder to exercise this Warrant for shares of Common Stock and to own such Common Stock without the Warrantholder being in violation of applicable law, rule or regulation, the receipt of any necessary approvals and authorizations of, filings and registrations with, notifications to, or expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period under, the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder.
"Regulatory Approvals"
means the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
"SEC"
means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or any successor statute, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
"Securities Act"
has the meaning set forth in Section 2.
"Shares"
means (A) if the shares of Common Stock are not traded on any national or regional securities exchange or association or over-the-counter market, a business day or (B) if the shares of Common Stock are traded on any national or regional securities exchange or
"trading day"
 
association or over-the-counter market, a business day on which such relevant exchange or quotation system is scheduled to be open for business and on which the shares of Common Stock (i) are not suspended from trading on any national or regional securities exchange or association or over-the-counter market for any period or periods aggregating one half hour or longer; and (ii) have traded at least once on the national or regional securities exchange or association or over-the-counter market that is the primary market for the trading of the shares of Common Stock.
means United States generally accepted accounting principles.
"U.S. GAAP"
"has the meaning set forth in Section 2.
Warrantholder"
means this Warrant, issued pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
"Warrant"
2. . This certifies that, for value received, the United States Department of the Treasury or its permitted assigns (the " is entitled, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth, to acquire from the Company, in whole or in part, after the receipt of all applicable Regulatory Approvals, if any, up to an aggregate of the number of fully paid and nonassessable shares of Common Stock set forth in item 6 of Schedule A hereto, at a purchase price per share of Common Stock equal to the Exercise Price. The number of shares of Common Stock (the "and the Exercise Price are subject to adjustment as provided herein, and all references to "Common Stock," "Shares" and "Exercise Price" herein shall be deemed to include any such adjustment or series of adjustments.
Number of Shares; Exercise Price
Warrantholder")
Shares")
3. . Subject to Section 2, to the extent permitted by applicable laws and regulations, the right to purchase the Shares represented by this Warrant is exercisable, in whole or in part by the Warrantholder, at any time or from time to time after the execution and delivery of this Warrant by the Company on the date hereof, but in no event later than 5:00 p.m., New York City time on the tenth anniversary of the Issue Date (the ", by (A) the surrender of this Warrant and Notice of Exercise annexed hereto, duly completed and executed on behalf of the Warrantholder, at the principal executive office of the Company located at the address set forth in Item 7 of Schedule A hereto (or such other office or agency of the Company in the United States as it may designate by notice in writing to the Warrantholder at the address of the Warrantholder appearing on the books of the Company), and (B) payment of the Exercise Price for the Shares thereby purchased:
Exercise of Warrant; Term
Expiration Time")
(i) by having the Company withhold, from the shares of Common Stock that would otherwise be delivered to the Warrantholder upon such exercise, shares of Common stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant equal in value to the aggregate Exercise Price as to which this Warrant is so exercised based on the Market Price of the Common Stock on the trading day on which this Warrant is exercised and the Notice of Exercise is delivered to the Company pursuant to this Section 3, or
(ii) with the consent of both the Company and the Warrantholder, by tendering in cash, by certified or cashier's check payable to the order of the Company, or by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account designated by the Company.
 
If the Warrantholder does not exercise this Warrant in its entirety, the Warrantholder will be entitled to receive from the Company within a reasonable time, and in any event not exceeding three business days, a new warrant in substantially identical form for the purchase of that number of Shares equal to the difference between the number of Shares subject to this Warrant and the number of Shares as to which this Warrant is so exercised. Notwithstanding anything in this Warrant to the contrary, the Warrantholder hereby acknowledges and agrees that its exercise of this Warrant for Shares is subject to the condition that the Warrantholder will have first received any applicable Regulatory Approvals.
4. . Certificates for Shares issued upon exercise of this Warrant will be issued in such name or names as the Warrantholder may designate and will be delivered to such named Person or Persons within a reasonable time, not to exceed three business days after the date on which this Warrant has been duly exercised in accordance with the terms of this Warrant. The Company hereby represents and warrants that any Shares issued upon the exercise of this Warrant in accordance with the provisions of Section 3 will be duly and validly authorized and issued, fully paid and nonassessable and free from all taxes, liens and charges (other than liens or charges created by the Warrantholder, income and franchise taxes incurred in connection with the exercise of the Warrant or taxes in respect of any transfer occurring contemporaneously therewith). The Company agrees that the Shares so issued will be deemed to have been issued to the Warrantholder as of the close of business on the date on which this Warrant and payment of the Exercise Price are delivered to the Company in accordance with the terms of this Warrant, notwithstanding that the stock transfer books of the Company may then be closed or certificates representing such Shares may not be actually delivered on such date. The Company will at all times reserve and keep available, out of its authorized but unissued Common Stock, solely for the purpose of providing for the exercise of this Warrant, the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock then issuable upon exercise of this Warrant at any time. The Company will (A) procure, at its sole expense, the listing of the Shares issuable upon exercise of this Warrant at any time, subject to issuance or notice of issuance, on all principal stock exchanges on which the Common Stock is then listed or traded and (B) maintain such listings of such Shares at all times after issuance. The Company will use reasonable best efforts to ensure that the Shares may be issued without violation of any applicable law or regulation or of any requirement of any securities exchange on which the Shares are listed or traded.
Issuance of Shares; Authorization: Listing
5. . No fractional Shares or scrip representing fractional Shares shall be issued upon any exercise of this Warrant. In lieu of any fractional Share to which the Warrantholder would otherwise be entitled, the Warrantholder shall be entitled to receive a cash payment equal to the Market Price of the Common Stock on the last trading day preceding the date of exercise less the pro-rated Exercise Price for such fractional share.
No Fractional Shares or Scrip
6. . This Warrant does not entitle the Warrantholder to any voting rights or other rights as a stockholder of the Company prior to the date of exercise hereof. The Company will at no time close its transfer books against transfer of this Warrant in any manner which interferes with the timely exercise of this Warrant.
No Rights as Stockholders; Transfer Books
 
7.. Issuance of certificates for Shares to the Warrantholder upon the exercise of this Warrant shall be made without charge to the Warrantholder for any issue or transfer tax or other incidental expense in respect of the issuance of such certificates, all of which taxes and expenses shall be paid by the Company.
Charges. Taxes and Expenses
8. .
Transfer/Assignment
(A) Subject to compliance with clause (B) of this Section 8, this Warrant and all rights hereunder are transferable, in whole or in part, upon the books of the Company by the registered holder hereof in person or by duly authorized attorney, and a new warrant shall be made and delivered by the Company, of the same tenor and date as this Warrant but registered in the name of one or more transferees, upon surrender of this Warrant, duly endorsed, to the office or agency of the Company described in Section 3. All expenses (other than stock transfer taxes) and other charges payable in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of the new warrants pursuant to this Section 8 shall be paid by the Company.
(B) The transfer of the Warrant and the Shares issued upon exercise of the Warrant are subject to the restrictions set forth in Section 4.4 of the Purchase Agreement. If and for so long as required by the Purchase Agreement, this Warrant shall contain the legends as set forth in Sections 4.2(a) and 4.2(b) of the Purchase Agreement.
9.. This Warrant is exchangeable, upon the surrender hereof by the Warrantholder to the Company, for a new warrant or warrants of like by tenor and representing the right to purchase the same aggregate number of Shares. The Company shall maintain a registry showing the name and address of the Warrantholder as the registered holder of this Warrant. This Warrant may be surrendered for exchange or exercise in accordance with its terms, at the office of the Company, and the Company shall be entitled to rely in all respects, prior to written notice to the contrary, upon such registry.
Exchange and Registry of Warrant
10. . Upon receipt by the Company of evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of this Warrant, and in the case of any such loss, theft or destruction, upon receipt of a bond, indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to the Company, or, in the case of any such mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation of this Warrant, the Company shall make and deliver, in lieu of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Warrant, a new Warrant of like tenor and representing the right to purchase the same aggregate number of Shares as provided for in such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Warrant.
Loss, Theft, Destruction or Mutilation of Warrant
11. If the last or appointed day for the taking of any action or the expiration of any right required or granted herein shall not be a business day, then such action may be taken or such right may be exercised on the next succeeding day that is a business day.
Saturdays, Sundays, Holidays, etc.
12. . The Company covenants that it will use its reasonable best efforts to timely file all reports and other documents required to be filed by it under the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated by the SEC thereunder (or, if the Company is not required to file such reports, it will, upon the request of any Warrantholder, make publicly
Rule 144 Information
 
available such information as necessary to permit sales pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act), and it will use reasonable best efforts to take such further action as any Warrantholder may reasonably request, in each case to the extent required from time to time to enable such holder to, if permitted by the terms of this Warrant and the Purchase Agreement, sell this Warrant without registration under the Securities Act within the limitation of the exemptions provided by (A) Rule 144 under the Securities Act, as such rule may be amended from time to time, or (B) any successor rule or regulation hereafter adopted by the SEC. Upon the written request of any Warrantholder, the Company will deliver to such Warrantholder a written statement that it has complied with such requirements.
13. . The Exercise Price and the number of Shares issuable upon exercise of this Warrant shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as follows; , that if more than one subsection of this Section 13 is applicable to a single event, the subsection shall be applied that produces the largest adjustment and no single event shall cause an adjustment under more than one subsection of this Section 13 so as to result in duplication:
Adjustments and Other Rights
provided
(A) . If the Company shall (i) declare and pay a dividend or make a distribution on its Common Stock in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide or reclassify the outstanding shares of Common Stock into a greater number of shares , or (iii) combine or reclassify the outstanding shares of Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, the number of Shares issuable upon exercise of this Warrant at the time of the record date for such dividend or distribution or the effective date of such subdivision, combination or reclassification shall be proportionately adjusted so that the Warrantholder after such date shall be entitled to purchase the number of shares of Common Stock which such holder would have owned or been entitled to receive in respect of the shares of Common Stock subject to this Warrant after such date had this Warrant been exercised immediately prior to such date. In such event, the Exercise Price in effect at the time of the record date for such dividend or distribution or the effective date of such subdivision, combination or reclassification shall be adjusted to the number obtained by dividing (x) the product of (1) the number of Shares issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant before such adjustment and (2) the Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the record or effective date, for the dividend, distribution, subdivision, combination or reclassification giving rise to adjustment by (y) the new number of Shares issuable upon exercise of the Warrant determined pursuant to the immediately preceding sentence.
Stock Splits, Subdivisions, Reclassifications or Combinations
(B) . Until the earlier of (i) the date on which the Original Warrantholder no longer holds this Warrant or any portion thereof and (ii) the third anniversary of the Issue Date, if the Company shall issue shares of Common Stock (or rights or warrants or other securities exercisable or convertible into or exchangeable (collectively, a "for shares of Common Stock) (collectively, "(other than in Permitted Transactions (as defined below) or a transaction to which subsection (A) of this Section 13 is applicable) without consideration or at a consideration per share (or having a conversion price per share) that is less than 90% of the Market Price on the last trading day preceding the date of the agreement on pricing such shares (or such convertible securities) then, in such event:
Certain Issuances of Common Shares or Convertible Securities
conversion")
convertible securities")
(A) the number of Shares issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant immediately prior to the date of the agreement on pricing of such shares (or of such convertible securities) (the "shall be increased to the number obtained by multiplying the Initial Number by a fraction (A) the numerator of which shall be the sum of (x) the number of shares of Common Stock of the Company outstanding on such date and (y) the number of additional shares of Common Stock issued (or into which convertible securities may be exercised or convert) and (B) the denominator of which shall be the sum of (I) the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding on such date and (II) the number of shares of Common Stock which the aggregate consideration receivable by the Company for the total number of shares of Common Stock so issued (or into which convertible securities may be exercised or convert) would purchase at the Market Price on the last trading day preceding the date of the agreement on pricing such shares (or such convertible securities); and
Initial Number")
 
(B) the Exercise Price payable upon exercise of the Warrant shall be adjusted by multiplying such Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the date of the agreement on pricing of such shares (or of such convertible securities) by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of this Warrant prior to such date and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of this Warrant immediately after the adjustment described in clause (A) above.
For purposes of the foregoing, the aggregate consideration receivable by the Company in connection with the issuance of such shares of Common Stock or convertible securities shall be deemed to be equal to the sum of the net offering price (including the Fair Market Value of any non-cash consideration and after deduction of any related expenses payable to third parties) of all such securities plus the minimum aggregate amount, if any, payable upon exercise or conversion of any such convertible securities into shares of Common Stock; and "shall mean issuances (i) as consideration for or to fund the acquisition of businesses and/or related assets, (ii) in connection with employee benefit plans and compensation related arrangements in the ordinary course and consistent with past practice approved by the Board of Directors, (iii) in connection with a public or broadly marketed offering and sale of Common Stock or convertible securities for cash conducted by the Company or its affiliates pursuant to registration under the Securities Act or Rule 144A thereunder on a basis consistent with capital raising transactions by comparable financial institutions and (iv) in connection with the exercise of preemptive rights on terms existing as of the Issue Date. Any adjustment made pursuant to this Section 13(B) shall become effective immediately upon the date of such issuance.
Permitted Transactions"
(C) . In case the Company shall fix a record date for the making of a distribution to all holders of shares of its Common Stock of securities, evidences of indebtedness, assets, cash, rights or warrants (excluding Ordinary Cash Dividends, dividends of its Common Stock and other dividends or distributions referred to in Section 13 (A)), in each such case, the Exercise Price in effect prior to such record date shall be reduced immediately thereafter to the price determined by multiplying the Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the reduction by the quotient of (x) the Market Price of the Common Stock on the last trading day preceding the first date on which the Common Stock trades regular way on the principal national securities exchange on which the
Other Distributions
 
Common Stock is listed or admitted to trading without the right to receive such distribution, minus the amount of cash and/or the Fair Market Value of the securities, evidences of indebtedness, assets, rights or warrants to be so distributed in respect of one share of Common Stock (such amount and/or Fair Market Value, the "divided by (y) such Market Price on such date specified in clause (x); such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed. In such event, the number of Shares issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant shall be increased to the number obtained by dividing (x) the product of (1) the number of Shares issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant before such adjustment, and (2) the Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the distribution giving rise to this adjustment by (y) the new Exercise Price determined in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence. In the case of adjustment for a cash dividend that is, or is coincident with, a regular quarterly cash dividend, the Per Share Fair Market Value would be reduced by the per share amount of the portion of the cash dividend that would constitute an Ordinary Cash Dividend. In the event that such distribution is not so made, the Exercise Price and the number of Shares issuable upon exercise of this Warrant then in effect shall be readjusted, effective as of the date when the Board of Directors determines not to distribute such shares, evidences of indebtedness, assets, rights, cash or warrants, as the case may be, to the Exercise Price that would then be in effect and the number of Shares that would then be issuable upon exercise of this Warrant if such record date had not been fixed.
Per Share Fair Market Value")
(D) . In case the Company effects a Pro Rata Repurchase of Common Stock, then the Exercise Price shall be reduced to the price determined by multiplying the Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the Effective Date of such Pro Rata Repurchase by a fraction of which the numerator shall be (i) the product of (x) the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately before such Pro Rata Repurchase and (y) the Market Price of a share of Common Stock on the trading day immediately preceding the first public announcement by the Company or any of its Affiliates of the intent to effect such Pro Rata Repurchase, minus (ii) the aggregate purchase price of the Pro Rata Repurchase, and of which the denominator shall be the product of (i) the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to such Pro Rata Repurchase minus the number of shares of Common Stock so repurchased and (ii) the Market Price per share of Common Stock on the trading day immediately preceding the first public announcement by the Company or any of its Affiliates of the intent to effect such Pro Rata Repurchase. In such event, the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant shall be increased to the number obtained by dividing (x) the product of (1) the number of Shares issuable upon the exercise of this Warrant before such adjustment, and (2) the Exercise Price in effect immediately prior to the Pro Rata Repurchase giving rise to this adjustment by (y) the new Exercise Price determined in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence. For the avoidance of doubt, no increase to the Exercise Price or decrease in the number of Shares issuable upon exercise of this Warrant shall be made pursuant to this Section 13(D).
Certain Repurchases of Common Stock
(E) . In case of any Business Combination or reclassification of Common Stock (other than a reclassification of Common Stock referred to in Section 13(A)), the Warrantholder's right to receive Shares upon exercise of this Warrant shall be converted into the right to exercise this Warrant to acquire the number of shares of stock or other securities or property (including cash) which the Common Stock issuable (at the time of such Business Combination or reclassification) upon exercise of this Warrant immediately prior to such Business Combination or reclassification would have been entitled to receive upon
Business Combinations
 
consummation of such Business Combination or reclassification; and in any such case, if necessary, the provisions set forth herein with respect to the rights and interests thereafter of the Warrantholder shall be appropriately adjusted so as to be applicable, as nearly as may reasonably be, to the Warrantholder's right to exercise this Warrant in exchange for any shares of stock or other securities or property pursuant to this paragraph. In determining the kind and amount of stock, securities or the property receivable upon exercise of this Warrant following the consummation of such Business Combination, if the holders of Common Stock have the right to elect the kind or amount of consideration receivable upon consummation of such Business Combination, then the consideration that the Warrantholder shall be entitled to receive upon exercise shall be deemed to be the types and amounts of consideration received by the majority of all holders of the shares of common stock that affirmatively make an election (or of all such holders if none make an election).
(F) . All calculations under this Section 13 shall be made to the nearest one-tenth (l/10th) of a cent or to the nearest one- hundredth (l/100th) of a share, as the case may be. Any provision of this Section 13 to the contrary notwithstanding, no adjustment in the Exercise Price or the number of Shares into which this Warrant is exercisable shall be made if the amount of such adjustment would be less than $0.01 or one-tenth (l/10th) of a share of Common Stock, but any such amount shall be carried forward and an adjustment with respect thereto shall be made at the time of and together with any subsequent adjustment which, together with such amount and any other amount or amounts so carried forward, shall aggregate $0.01 or 1/10th of a share of Common Stock, or more.
Rounding of Calculations; Minimum Adjustments
(G) . In any case in which the provisions of this Section 13 shall require that an adjustment shall become effective immediately after a record date for an event, the Company may defer until the occurrence of such event (i) issuing to the Warrantholder of this Warrant exercised after such record date and before the occurrence of such event the additional shares of Common Stock issuable upon such exercise by reason of the adjustment required by such event over and above the shares of Common Stock issuable upon such exercise before giving effect to such adjustment and (ii) paying to such Warrantholder any amount of cash in lieu of a fractional share of Common Stock; that the Company upon request shall deliver to such Warrantholder a due bill or other appropriate instrument evidencing such Warrantholder's right to receive such additional shares, and such cash, upon the occurrence of the event requiring such adjustment.
Timing of Issuance of Additional Common Stock Upon Certain Adjustments
provided, however,
(H) . In the event the Company (or any successor by Business Combination) completes one or more Qualified Equity Offerings on or prior to December 31, 2009 that result in the Company (or any such successor ) receiving aggregate gross proceeds of not less than 100% of the aggregate liquidation preference of the Preferred Shares (and any preferred stock issued by any such successor to the Original Warrantholder under the CPP), the number of shares of Common Stock underlying the portion of this Warrant then held by the Original Warrantholder shall be thereafter reduced by a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the product of (i) 0.5 and (ii) the number of shares underlying the Warrant on the Issue Date (adjusted to take into account all other theretofore made adjustments pursuant to this Section 13).
Completion of Qualified Equity Offering
 
(I) . For so long as the Original Warrantholder holds this Warrant or any portion thereof, if any event occurs as to which the provisions of this Section 13 are not strictly applicable or, if strictly applicable, would not, in the good faith judgment of the Board of Directors of the Company, fairly and adequately protect the purchase rights of the Warrants in accordance with the essential intent and principles of such provisions, then the Board of Directors shall make such adjustments in the application of such provisions, in accordance with such essential intent and principles, as shall be reasonably necessary, in the good faith opinion of the Board of Directors, to protect such purchase rights as aforesaid. The Exercise Price or the number of Shares into which this Warrant is exercisable shall not be adjusted in the event of a change in the par value of the Common Stock or a change in the jurisdiction of incorporation of the Company.
Other Events
(J) . Whenever the Exercise Price or the number of Shares into which this Warrant is exercisable shall be adjusted as provided in Section 13, the Company shall forthwith file at the principal office of the Company a statement showing in reasonable detail the facts requiring such adjustment and the Exercise Price that shall be in effect and the number of Shares into which this Warrant shall be exercisable after such adjustment, and the Company shall also cause a copy of such statement to be sent by mail, first class postage prepaid, to each Warrantholder at the address appearing in the Company's records.
Statement Regarding Adjustments
(K) . In the event that the Company shall propose to take any action of the type described in this Section 13 (but only if the action of the type described in this Section 13 would result in an adjustment in the Exercise Price or the number of Shares into which this Warrant is exercisable or a change in the type of securities or property to be delivered upon exercise of this Warrant), the Company shall give notice to the Warrantholder, in the manner set forth in Section 13(J), which notice shall specify the record date, if any, with respect to any such action and the approximate date on which such action is to take place. Such notice shall also set forth the facts with respect thereto as shall be reasonably necessary to indicate the effect on the Exercise Price and the number, kind or class of shares or other securities or property which shall be deliverable upon exercise of this Warrant. In the case of any action which would require the fixing of a record date, such notice shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date so fixed, and in case of all other action, such notice shall be given at least 15 days prior to the taking of such proposed action. Failure to give such notice, or any defect therein, shall not affect the legality or validity of any such action.
Notice of Adjustment Event
(L) . As a condition precedent to the taking of any action which would require an adjustment pursuant to this Section 13, Company shall take any action which may be necessary, including obtaining regulatory, New York Stock Exchange or stockholder approvals or exemptions, in order that the Company may thereafter validly and legally issue as fully paid and nonassessable all shares of Common Stock that the Warrantholder is entitled to receive upon exercise of this Warrant pursuant to this Section 13.
Proceedings Prior to Any Action Requiring Adjustment
 
(M) . Any adjustments pursuant to this Section 13 shall be made successively whenever an event referred to herein shall occur. If an adjustment in Exercise Price made hereunder would reduce the Exercise Price to an amount below par value of the Common Stock, then such adjustment in Exercise Price made hereunder shall reduce the Exercise Price to the par value of the Common Stock.
Adjustment Rules
14. . At any time following the date on which the shares of Common Stock of the Company are no longer listed or admitted to trading on a national securities exchange (other than in connection with any Business Combination), the Original Warrantholder may cause the Company to exchange all or a portion of this Warrant for an economic interest (to be determined by the Original Warrantholder after consultation with the Company) of the Company classified as permanent equity under U.S. GAAP having a value equal to the Fair Market Value of the portion of the Warrant so exchanged. The Original Warrantholder shall calculate any Fair Market Value required to be calculated pursuant to this Section 14, which shall not be subject to the Appraisal Procedure.
Exchange
15. . The Company will not, by amendment of its Charter or through any reorganization, transfer of assets, consolidation, merger, dissolution, issue or sale of securities or any other voluntary action, avoid or seek to avoid the observance or performance of any of the terms to be observed or performed hereunder by the Company, but will at all times in good faith assist in the carrying out of all the provisions of this Warrant and in taking of all such action as may be necessary or appropriate in order to protect the rights of the Warrantholder.
No Impairment
16. .
Governing Law
This Warrant will be governed by and construed in accordance with the federal law of the United States if and to the extent such law is applicable, and otherwise in accordance with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such State. Each of the Company and the Warrantholder agrees (a) to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction and venue of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia for any action, suit or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Warrant or the transactions contemplated hereby, and (b) that notice may be served upon the Company at the address in Section 20 below and upon the Warrantholder at the address for the Warrantholder set forth in the registry maintained by the Company pursuant to Section 9 hereof. To the extent permitted by applicable law, each of the Company and the Warrantholder hereby unconditionally waives trial by jury in any legal action or proceeding relating to the Warrant or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
17. . This Warrant shall be binding upon any successors or assigns of the Company.
Binding Effect
18. . This Warrant may be amended and the observance of any term of this Warrant may be waived only with the written consent of the Company and the Warrantholder.
Amendments
19 . . The Company agrees that it will not take any action which would entitle the Warrantholder to an adjustment of the Exercise Price if the total number of shares of Common Stock issuable after such action upon exercise of this Warrant, together with all shares of Common Stock then outstanding and all shares of Common Stock then issuable upon the exercise the of all outstanding options, warrants, conversion and other rights, would exceed the total number of shares of Common Stock then authorized by its Charter.
Prohibited Actions
 
20. . Any notice, request, instruction or other document to be given hereunder by any party to the other will be in writing and will be deemed to have been duly given (a) on the date of delivery if delivered personally, or by facsimile, upon confirmation of receipt, or (b) on the second business day following the date of dispatch if delivered by a recognized next day courier service. All notices hereunder shall be delivered as set forth in Item 8 of Schedule A hereto, or pursuant to such other instructions as may be designated in writing by the party to receive such notice.
Notices
21. . This Warrant, the forms attached hereto and Schedule A hereto (the terms of which are incorporated by reference herein), and the Letter Agreement (including all documents incorporated therein), contain the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersede all prior and contemporaneous arrangements or undertakings with respect thereto.
Entire Agreement
 
 
The undersigned, pursuant to the provisions set forth in the attached Warrant, hereby agrees to subscribe for and purchase the number of shares of the Common Stock set forth below covered by such Warrant. The undersigned, in accordance with Section 3 of the Warrant, hereby agrees to pay the aggregate Exercise Price for such shares of Common Stock in the manner set forth below. A new warrant evidencing the remaining shares of Common Stock covered by such Warrant, but not yet subscribed for and purchased, if any, should be issued in the name set forth below.
Number of Shares of Common Stock
                                        
Method of Payment of Exercise Price (note if cashless exercise pursuant to Section 3(i) of the Warrant or cash exercise pursuant to Section 3(ii) of the Warrant, with consent of the Company and the Warrantholder)                      
                                         
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Warrant to be duly executed by a duly authorized officer.
Dated: October 28, 2008
 
SCHEDULE A
Item 1
Name: The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
Corporate or other organizational form: Corporation
Jurisdiction of organization: Delaware
Item 2
Exercise Price: $31.00
Item 3
Issue Date: October 28, 2008
Item 4
Amount of last dividend declared prior to the Issue Date: $0.24
Item 5
Date of Letter Agreement between the Company and the United States Department of the Treasury: October 26, 2008
Item 6
Number of shares of Common Stock: 14,516,129
Item 7
Company's address:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, New York 10286
Item 8
Notice information:
If to the Company:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, New York 10286
Attention: General Counsel
Telephone: (212) 495-1784
Facsimile: (212) 635-1070
with a copy to:
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP
125 Broad Street
New York, New York 10004
Attention: Mark J. Welshimer
Facsimile: (212) 558-3588
If to the Warrantholder:
United States Department of the Treasury
1500 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Room 2312
Washington, D.C. 20220
Attention: Assistant General Counsel (Banking and Finance)
Facsimile: (202) 622-1974
 

Exhibit 10.1
Dear Ladies and Gentlemen:
The company set forth on the signature page hereto (the intends to issue in a private placement the number of shares of a series of its preferred stock set forth on Schedule A hereto (the "") and a warrant to purchase the number of shares of its common stock set forth on Schedule A hereto (the "" and, together with the Preferred Shares, the "") and the United States Department of the Treasury (the "") intends to purchase from the Company the Purchased Securities.
"Company")
Preferred Shares
Warrant
Purchased Securities
Investor
The purpose of this letter agreement is to confirm the terms and conditions of the purchase by the Investor of the Purchased Securities. Except to the extent supplemented or superseded by the terms set forth herein or in the Schedules hereto, the provisions contained in the Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms attached hereto as Exhibit A (the "") are incorporated by reference herein. Terms that are defined in the Securities Purchase Agreement are used in this letter agreement as so defined. In the event of any inconsistency between this letter agreement and the Securities Purchase Agreement, the terms of this letter agreement shall govern.
Securities Purchase Agreement
Each of the Company and the Investor hereby confirms its agreement with the other party with respect to the issuance by the Company of the Purchased Securities and the purchase by the Investor of the Purchased Securities pursuant to this letter agreement and the Securities Purchase Agreement on the terms specified on Schedule A hereto.
This letter agreement (including the Schedules hereto) and the Securities Purchase Agreement (including the Annexes thereto) and the Warrant constitute the entire agreement, and supersede all other prior agreements, understandings, representations and warranties, both written and oral, between the parties, with respect to the subject matter hereof. This letter agreement constitutes the "Letter Agreement" referred to in the Securities Purchase Agreement.
This letter agreement may be executed in any number of separate counterparts, each such counterpart being deemed to be an original instrument, and all such counterparts will together constitute the same agreement. Executed signature pages to this letter agreement may be delivered by facsimile and such facsimiles will be deemed as sufficient as if actual signature pages had been delivered.
In witness whereof, this letter agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the duly authorized representatives of the parties hereto as of the date written below.
 
Date: October 26, 2008
EXHIBIT A
EXHIBIT A
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
INDEX OF DEFINED TERMS
 
 
 
WHEREAS, the United States Department of the Treasury (the "") may from time to time agree to purchase shares of preferred stock and warrants from eligible financial institutions which elect to participate in the Troubled Asset Relief Program Capital Purchase Program ("");
Investor
CPP
WHEREAS, an eligible financial institution electing to participate in the CPP and issue securities to the Investor (referred to herein as the "") shall enter into a letter agreement (the "") with the Investor which incorporates this Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms;
Company
Letter Agreement
WHEREAS, the Company agrees to expand the flow of credit to U.S. consumers and businesses on competitive terms to promote the sustained growth and vitality of the U.S. economy;
WHEREAS, the Company agrees to work diligently, under existing programs, to modify the terms of residential mortgages as appropriate to strengthen the health of the U.S. housing market;
WHEREAS, the Company intends to issue in a private placement the number of shares of the series of its Preferred Stock ("") set forth on to the Letter Agreement (the "") and a warrant to purchase the number of shares of its Common Stock ("") set forth on to the Letter Agreement (the "") (the "" and, together with the Preferred Shares, the "") and the Investor intends to purchase (the "") from the Company the Purchased Securities; and
Preferred Stock
Schedule A
Preferred Shares
Common Stock
Schedule A
Initial Warrant Shares
Warrant
Purchased Securities
Purchase
WHEREAS, the Purchase will be governed by this Securities Purchase Agreement Standard Terms and the Letter Agreement, including the schedules thereto (the ""), specifying additional terms of the Purchase. This Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms (including the Annexes hereto) and the Letter Agreement (including the Schedules thereto) are together referred to as this "Agreement". All references in this Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms to "Schedules" are to the Schedules attached to the Letter Agreement.
Schedules
, in consideration of the premises, and of the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth herein, the parties agree as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
1.1 . On the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Company agrees to sell to the Investor, and the Investor agrees to purchase from the Company, at the Closing (as hereinafter defined), the Purchased Securities for the price set forth on (the "").
Purchase
Schedule A
Purchase Price
1.2 .
Closing
(a) On the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, the closing of the Purchase (the "") will take place at the location specified in , at the time and on the date set forth in or as soon as practicable thereafter, or at such other place, time and date as shall be agreed between the Company and the Investor. The time and date on which the Closing occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "".
Closing
Schedule A
Schedule A
Closing Date
(b) Subject to the fulfillment or waiver of the conditions to the Closing in this Section 1.2, at the Closing the Company will deliver the Preferred Shares and the Warrant, in each case as evidenced by one or more certificates dated the Closing Date and bearing appropriate legends as hereinafter provided for, in exchange for payment in full of the Purchase Price by wire transfer of immediately available United States funds to a bank account designated by the Company on .
Schedule A
(c) The respective obligations of each of the Investor and the Company to consummate the Purchase are subject to the fulfillment (or waiver by the Investor and the Company, as applicable) prior to the Closing of the conditions that (i) any approvals or authorizations of all United States and other governmental, regulatory or judicial authorities (collectively, "") required for the consummation of the Purchase shall have been obtained or made in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to each party and shall be in full force and effect and all waiting periods required by United States and other applicable law, if any, shall have expired and (ii) no provision of any applicable United States or other law and no judgment, injunction, order or decree of any Governmental Entity shall prohibit the purchase and sale of the Purchased Securities as contemplated by this Agreement.
Governmental Entities
(d) The obligation of the Investor to consummate the Purchase is also subject to the fulfillment (or waiver by the Investor) at or prior to the Closing of each of the following conditions:
(i) (A) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in (x) Section 2.2(g) of this Agreement shall be true and correct in all respects as though made on and as of the Closing Date, (y) Sections 2.2(a) through (f) shall be true and correct in all material respects as though made on and as of the Closing Date (other than representations and warranties that by their terms speak as of another date, which representations and warranties shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such other date) and (z) Sections 2.2(h) through (v) (disregarding all qualifications or limitations set forth in such representations and warranties as to "materiality", "Company Material Adverse Effect" and words of similar import) shall be true and correct as though made on and as of the Closing Date (other than representations and warranties that by their terms speak as of another date, which representations and warranties shall be true and correct as of such other date), except to the extent that the failure of such representations and warranties referred to in this Section 1.2(d)(i)(A)(z) to be so true and correct, individually or in the aggregate, does not have and would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect and (B) the Company shall have performed in all material respects all obligations required to be performed by it under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing;
 
(ii) the Investor shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of the Company by a senior executive officer certifying to the effect that the conditions set forth in Section 1.2(d)(i) have been satisfied;
(iii) the Company shall have duly adopted and filed with the Secretary of State of its jurisdiction of organization or other applicable Governmental Entity the amendment to its certificate or articles of incorporation, articles of association, or similar organizational document ("") in substantially the form attached hereto as (the "") and such filing shall have been accepted;
Charter
Annex A
Certificate of Designations
(iv) (A) the Company shall have effected such changes to its compensation, bonus, incentive and other benefit plans, arrangements and agreements (including golden parachute, severance and employment agreements) (collectively, "") with respect to its Senior Executive Officers (and to the extent necessary for such changes to be legally enforceable, each of its Senior Executive Officers shall have duly consented in writing to such changes), as may be necessary, during the period that the Investor owns any debt or equity securities of the Company acquired pursuant to this Agreement or the Warrant, in order to comply with Section 111(b) of the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008 ("") as implemented by guidance or regulation thereunder that has been issued and is in effect as of the Closing Date, and (B) the Investor shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of the Company by a senior executive officer certifying to the effect that the condition set forth in Section 1.2(d)(iv)(A) has been satisfied;
Benefit Plans
EESA
(v) each of the Company's Senior Executive Officers shall have delivered to the Investor a written waiver in the form attached hereto as releasing the Investor from any claims that such Senior Executive Officers may otherwise have as a result of the issuance, on or prior to the Closing Date, of any regulations which require the modification of, and the agreement of the Company hereunder to modify, the terms of any Benefit Plans with respect to its Senior Executive Officers to eliminate any provisions of such Benefit Plans that would not be in compliance with the requirements of Section 111(b) of the EESA as implemented by guidance or regulation thereunder that has been issued and is in effect as of the Closing Date;
Annex B
(vi) the Company shall have delivered to the Investor a written opinion from counsel to the Company (which may be internal counsel), addressed to the Investor and dated as of the Closing Date, in substantially the form attached hereto as ;
Annex C
(vii) the Company shall have delivered certificates in proper form or, with the prior consent of the Investor, evidence of shares in book-entry form, evidencing the Preferred Shares to Investor or its designee(s); and
 
(viii) the Company shall have duly executed the Warrant in substantially the form attached hereto as Annex D and delivered such executed Warrant to the Investor or its designee(s).
1.3 . When a reference is made in this Agreement to "Recitals," "Articles," "Sections," or "Annexes" such reference shall be to a Recital, Article or Section of, or Annex to, this Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms, and a reference to "Schedules" shall be to a Schedule to the Letter Agreement, in each case, unless otherwise indicated. The terms defined in the singular have a comparable meaning when used in the plural, and vice versa. References to "herein", "hereof", "hereunder" and the like refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular section or provision, unless the context requires otherwise. The table of contents and headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and are not part of this Agreement. Whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed followed by the words "without limitation." No rule of construction against the draftsperson shall be applied in connection with the interpretation or enforcement of this Agreement, as this Agreement is the product of negotiation between sophisticated parties advised by counsel. All references to "$" or "dollars" mean the lawful currency of the United States of America. Except as expressly stated in this Agreement, all references to any statute, rule or regulation are to the statute, rule or regulation as amended, modified, supplemented or replaced from time to time (and, in the case of statutes, include any rules and regulations promulgated under the statute) and to any section of any statute, rule or regulation include any successor to the section. References to a "" shall mean any day except Saturday, Sunday and any day on which banking institutions in the State of New York generally are authorized or required by law or other governmental actions to close.
Interpretation
business day
2.1 .
Disclosure
(a) "" means a material adverse effect on (i) the business, results of operation or financial condition of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries taken as a whole; , , that Company Material Adverse Effect shall not be deemed to include the effects of (A) changes after the date of the Letter Agreement (the "") in general business, economic or market conditions (including changes generally in prevailing interest rates, credit availability and liquidity, currency exchange rates and price levels or trading volumes in the United States or foreign securities or credit markets), or any outbreak or escalation of hostilities, declared or undeclared acts of war or terrorism, in each case generally affecting the industries in which the Company and its subsidiaries operate, (B) changes or proposed changes after the Signing Date in generally accepted accounting principles in the United States ("") or regulatory accounting requirements, or authoritative interpretations thereof, (C) changes or proposed changes after the Signing Date in securities, banking and other laws of general applicability or related policies or interpretations of Governmental Entities (in the case of each of these clauses (A), (B) and (C), other than changes or
Company Material Adverse Effect
provided
however
Signing Date
GAAP
 
occurrences to the extent that such changes or occurrences have or would reasonably be expected to have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries taken as a whole relative to comparable U.S. banking or financial services organizations), or (D) changes in the market price or trading volume of the Common Stock or any other equity, equity-related or debt securities of the Company or its consolidated subsidiaries (it being understood and agreed that the exception set forth in this clause (D) does not apply to the underlying reason giving rise to or contributing to any such change); or (ii) the ability of the Company to consummate the Purchase and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Warrant and perform its obligations hereunder or thereunder on a timely basis.
(b) "" means information set forth or incorporated in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the most recently completed fiscal year of the Company filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") prior to the Signing Date (the "") or in its other reports and forms filed with or furnished to the SEC under Sections 13(a), 14(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "") on or after the last day of the Last Fiscal Year and prior to the Signing Date.
Previously Disclosed
SEC
Last Fiscal Year
Exchange Act
2.2 . Except as Previously Disclosed, the Company represents and warrants to the Investor that as of the Signing Date and as of the Closing Date (or such other date specified herein):
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) . The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, with the necessary power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business in all material respects as currently conducted, and except as has not, individually or in the aggregate, had and would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification; each subsidiary of the Company that is a "significant subsidiary" within the meaning of Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "") has been duly organized and is validly existing in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization. The Charter and bylaws of the Company, copies of which have been provided to the Investor prior to the Signing Date, are true, complete and correct copies of such documents as in full force and effect as of the Signing Date.
Organization, Authority and Significant Subsidiaries
Securities Act
(b) . The authorized capital stock of the Company, and the outstanding capital stock of the Company (including securities convertible into, or exercisable or exchangeable for, capital stock of the Company) as of the most recent fiscal month-end preceding the Signing Date (the "") is set forth on . The outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been duly authorized and are validly issued and outstanding, fully paid and nonassessable, and subject to no preemptive rights (and were not issued in violation of any preemptive rights). Except as provided in the Warrant, as of the Signing Date, the Company does not have outstanding any securities or other obligations providing the holder the right to acquire Common Stock that is not reserved for issuance as specified on , and the Company has not made any other commitment to
Capitalization
Capitalization Date
Schedule B
Schedule B
 
authorize, issue or sell any Common Stock. Since the Capitalization Date, the Company has not issued any shares of Common Stock, other than (i) shares issued upon the exercise of stock options or delivered under other equity-based awards or other convertible securities or warrants which were issued and outstanding on the Capitalization Date and disclosed on and (ii) shares disclosed on .
Schedule B
Schedule B
(c) . The Preferred Shares have been duly and validly authorized, and, when issued and delivered pursuant to this Agreement, such Preferred Shares will be duly and validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable, will not be issued in violation of any preemptive rights, and will rank with or senior to all other series or classes of Preferred Stock, whether or not issued or outstanding, with respect to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any dissolution, liquidation or winding up of the Company.
Preferred Shares
pari passu
(d) . The Warrant has been duly authorized and, when executed and delivered as contemplated hereby, will constitute a valid and legally binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the same may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and general equitable principles, regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity (""). The shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant (the "") have been duly authorized and reserved for issuance upon exercise of the Warrant and when so issued in accordance with the terms of the Warrant will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable, subject, if applicable, to the approvals of its stockholders set forth on .
The Warrant and Warrant Shares
Bankruptcy Exceptions
Warrant Shares
Schedule C
(e) .
Authorization, Enforceability
(i) The Company has the corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Warrant and, subject, if applicable, to the approvals of its stockholders set forth on , to carry out its obligations hereunder and thereunder (which includes the issuance of the Preferred Shares, Warrant and Warrant Shares). The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the Warrant and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company and its stockholders, and no further approval or authorization is required on the part of the Company, subject, in each case, if applicable, to the approvals of its stockholders set forth on . This Agreement is a valid and binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to the Bankruptcy Exceptions.
Schedule C
Schedule C
(ii) The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the Warrant and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby and compliance by the Company with the provisions hereof and thereof, will
 
not (A) violate, conflict with, or result in a breach of any provision of, or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute a default) under, or result in the termination of, or accelerate the performance required by, or result in a right of termination or acceleration of, or result in the creation of, any lien, security interest, charge or encumbrance upon any of the properties or assets of the Company or any Company Subsidiary under any of the terms, conditions or provisions of (i) subject, if applicable, to the approvals of the Company's stockholders set forth on , its organizational documents or (ii) any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, deed of trust, license, lease, agreement or other instrument or obligation to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which it or any Company Subsidiary may be bound, or to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any of the properties or assets of the Company or any Company Subsidiary may be subject, or (B) subject to compliance with the statutes and regulations referred to in the next paragraph, violate any statute, rule or regulation or any judgment, ruling, order, writ, injunction or decree applicable to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any of their respective properties or assets except, in the case of clauses (A)(ii) and (B), for those occurrences that, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule C
(iii) Other than the filing of the Certificate of Designations with the Secretary of State of its jurisdiction of organization or other applicable Governmental Entity, any current report on Form 8-K required to be filed with the SEC, such filings and approvals as are required to be made or obtained under any state "blue sky" laws, the filing of any proxy statement contemplated by Section 3.1 and such as have been made or obtained, no notice to, filing with, exemption or review by, or authorization, consent or approval of, any Governmental Entity is required to be made or obtained by the Company in connection with the consummation by the Company of the Purchase except for any such notices, filings, exemptions, reviews, authorizations, consents and approvals the failure of which to make or obtain would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(f) . The Board of Directors of the Company (the "") has taken all necessary action to ensure that the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Warrant and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, including the exercise of the Warrant in accordance with its terms, will be exempt from any anti-takeover or similar provisions of the Company's Charter and bylaws, and any other provisions of any applicable "moratorium", "control share", "fair price", "interested stockholder" or other anti-takeover laws and regulations of any jurisdiction. The Company has taken all actions necessary to render any stockholders' rights plan of the Company inapplicable to this Agreement and the Warrant and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, including the exercise of the Warrant by the Investor in accordance with its terms.
Anti-takeover Provisions and Rights Plan
Board of Directors
(g) . Since the last day of the last completed fiscal period for which the Company has filed a Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q or an Annual Report on Form 10-K with the SEC prior to the Signing Date, no fact, circumstance, event, change, occurrence, condition or development has occurred that, individually or in the aggregate, has had or would reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
No Company Material Adverse Effect
 
(h) . Each of the consolidated financial statements of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries (collectively the "") included or incorporated by reference in the Company Reports filed with the SEC since December 31, 2006, present fairly in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates indicated therein (or if amended prior to the Signing Date, as of the date of such amendment) and the consolidated results of their operations for the periods specified therein; and except as stated therein, such financial statements (A) were prepared in conformity with GAAP applied on a consistent basis (except as may be noted therein), (B) have been prepared from, and are in accordance with, the books and records of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries and (C) complied as to form, as of their respective dates of filing with the SEC, in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements and with the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto.
Company Financial Statements
Company Financial Statements
(i) .
Reports
(i) Since December 31, 2006, the Company and each subsidiary of the Company (each a "" and, collectively, the "") has timely filed all reports, registrations, documents, filings, statements and submissions, together with any amendments thereto, that it was required to file with any Governmental Entity (the foregoing, collectively, the "") and has paid all fees and assessments due and payable in connection therewith, except, in each case, as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. As of their respective dates of filing, the Company Reports complied in all material respects with all statutes and applicable rules and regulations of the applicable Governmental Entities. In the case of each such Company Report filed with or furnished to the SEC, such Company Report (A) did not, as of its date or if amended prior to the Signing Date, as of the date of such amendment, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and (B) complied as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act. With respect to all other Company Reports, the Company Reports were complete and accurate in all material respects as of their respective dates. No executive officer of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has failed in any respect to make the certifications required of him or her under Section 302 or 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Company Subsidiary
Company Subsidiaries
Company Reports
(ii) The records, systems, controls, data and information of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries are recorded, stored, maintained and operated under means (including any electronic, mechanical or photographic process, whether computerized or not) that are under the exclusive ownership and direct control of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries or
 
their accountants (including all means of access thereto and therefrom), except for any non-exclusive ownership and non-direct control that would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the system of internal accounting controls described below in this Section 2.2(i)(ii). The Company (A) has implemented and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) to ensure that material information relating to the Company, including the consolidated Company Subsidiaries, is made known to the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of the Company by others within those entities, and (B) has disclosed, based on its most recent evaluation prior to the Signing Date, to the Company's outside auditors and the audit committee of the Board of Directors (x) any significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal controls over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that are reasonably likely to adversely affect the Company's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information and (y) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Company's internal controls over financial reporting.
(j) . Neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries has any liabilities or obligations of any nature (absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) which are not properly reflected or reserved against in the Company Financial Statements to the extent required to be so reflected or reserved against in accordance with GAAP, except for (A) liabilities that have arisen since the last fiscal year end in the ordinary and usual course of business and consistent with past practice and (B) liabilities that, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
No Undisclosed Liabilities
(k) . Neither the Company nor any person acting on its behalf has taken any action (including any offering of any securities of the Company under circumstances which would require the integration of such offering with the offering of any of the Purchased Securities under the Securities Act, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder), which might subject the offering, issuance or sale of any of the Purchased Securities to Investor pursuant to this Agreement to the registration requirements of the Securities Act.
Offering of Securities
(l) . Except (i) as set forth on or (ii) as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, there is no (A) pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding, against the Company or any Company Subsidiary or to which any of their assets are subject nor is the Company or any Company Subsidiary subject to any order, judgment or decree or (B) unresolved violation, criticism or exception by any Governmental Entity with respect to any report or relating to any examinations or inspections of the Company or any Company Subsidiaries.
Litigation and Other Proceedings
Schedule D
(m) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, the Company and the Company Subsidiaries have all permits, licenses, franchises, authorizations, orders and
Compliance with Laws
 
approvals of, and have made all filings, applications and registrations with, Governmental Entities that are required in order to permit them to own or lease their properties and assets and to carry on their business as presently conducted and that are material to the business of the Company or such Company Subsidiary. Except as set forth on , the Company and the Company Subsidiaries have complied in all respects and are not in default or violation of, and none of them is, to the knowledge of the Company, under investigation with respect to or, to the knowledge of the Company, have been threatened to be charged with or given notice of any violation of, any applicable domestic (federal, state or local) or foreign law, statute, ordinance, license, rule, regulation, policy or guideline, order, demand, writ, injunction, decree or judgment of any Governmental Entity, other than such noncompliance, defaults or violations that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect. Except for statutory or regulatory restrictions of general application or as set forth on , no Governmental Entity has placed any restriction on the business or properties of the Company or any Company Subsidiary that would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule E
Schedule E
(n) . Except as would not reasonably be expected to have, either individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect: (A) each "employee benefit plan" (within the meaning of Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("")) providing benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company or any member of its "" (defined as any organization which is a member of a controlled group of corporations within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "")) that is sponsored, maintained or contributed to by the Company or any member of its Controlled Group and for which the Company or any member of its Controlled Group would have any liability, whether actual or contingent (each, a "") has been maintained in compliance with its terms and with the requirements of all applicable statutes, rules and regulations, including ERISA and the Code; (B) with respect to each Plan subject to Title IV of ERISA (including, for purposes of this clause (B), any plan subject to Title IV of ERISA that the Company or any member of its Controlled Group previously maintained or contributed to in the six years prior to the Signing Date), (1) no "reportable event" (within the meaning of Section 4043(c) of ERISA), other than a reportable event for which the notice period referred to in Section 4043(c) of ERISA has been waived, has occurred in the three years prior to the Signing Date or is reasonably expected to occur, (2) no "accumulated funding deficiency" (within the meaning of Section 302 of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code), whether or not waived, has occurred in the three years prior to the Signing Date or is reasonably expected to occur, (3) the fair market value of the assets under each Plan exceeds the present value of all benefits accrued under such Plan (determined based on the assumptions used to fund such Plan) and (4) neither the Company nor any member of its Controlled Group has incurred in the six years prior to the Signing Date, or reasonably expects to incur, any liability under Title IV of ERISA (other than contributions to the Plan or premiums to the PBGC in the ordinary course and without default) in respect of a Plan (including any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan", within the meaning of Section 4001(c)(3) of ERISA); and (C) each Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service with
Employee Benefit Matters
ERISA
Controlled Group
Code
Plan
 
respect to its qualified status that has not been revoked, or such a determination letter has been timely applied for but not received by the Signing Date, and nothing has occurred, whether by action or by failure to act, which could reasonably be expected to cause the loss, revocation or denial of such qualified status or favorable determination letter.
(o) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, (i) the Company and the Company Subsidiaries have filed all federal, state, local and foreign income and franchise Tax returns required to be filed through the Signing Date, subject to permitted extensions, and have paid all Taxes due thereon, and (ii) no Tax deficiency has been determined adversely to the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries, nor does the Company have any knowledge of any Tax deficiencies. "" or "" means any federal, state, local or foreign income, gross receipts, property, sales, use, license, excise, franchise, employment, payroll, withholding, alternative or add on minimum, ad valorem, transfer or excise tax, or any other tax, custom, duty, governmental fee or other like assessment or charge of any kind whatsoever, together with any interest or penalty, imposed by any Governmental Entity.
Taxes
Tax
Taxes
(p) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, the Company and the Company Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and all other properties and assets owned by them, in each case free from liens, encumbrances, claims and defects that would affect the value thereof or interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them. Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, the Company and the Company Subsidiaries hold all leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with no exceptions that would interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
Properties and Leases
(q) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect:
Environmental Liability
(i) there is no legal, administrative, or other proceeding, claim or action of any nature seeking to impose, or that would reasonably be expected to result in the imposition of, on the Company or any Company Subsidiary, any liability relating to the release of hazardous substances as defined under any local, state or federal environmental statute, regulation or ordinance, including the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened against the Company or any Company Subsidiary;
(ii) to the Company's knowledge, there is no reasonable basis for any such proceeding, claim or action; and
(iii) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is subject to any agreement, order, judgment or decree by or with any court, Governmental Entity or third party imposing any such environmental liability.
 
(r) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, all derivative instruments, including, swaps, caps, floors and option agreements, whether entered into for the Company's own account, or for the account of one or more of the Company Subsidiaries or its or their customers, were entered into (i) only in the ordinary course of business, (ii) in accordance with prudent practices and in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations and regulatory policies and (iii) with counterparties believed to be financially responsible at the time; and each of such instruments constitutes the valid and legally binding obligation of the Company or one of the Company Subsidiaries, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as may be limited by the Bankruptcy Exceptions. Neither the Company or the Company Subsidiaries, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party thereto, is in breach of any of its obligations under any such agreement or arrangement other than such breaches that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Risk Management Instruments
(s) . Except as set forth on Schedule F, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is subject to any material cease-and-desist or other similar order or enforcement action issued by, or is a party to any material written agreement, consent agreement or memorandum of understanding with, or is a party to any commitment letter or similar undertaking to, or is subject to any capital directive by, or since December 31, 2006, has adopted any board resolutions at the request of, any Governmental Entity (other than the Appropriate Federal Banking Agencies with jurisdiction over the Company and the Company Subsidiaries) that currently restricts in any material respect the conduct of its business or that in any material manner relates to its capital adequacy, its liquidity and funding policies and practices, its ability to pay dividends, its credit, risk management or compliance policies or procedures, its internal controls, its management or its operations or business (each item in this sentence, a ""), nor has the Company or any Company Subsidiary been advised since December 31, 2006 by any such Governmental Entity that it is considering issuing, initiating, ordering, or requesting any such Regulatory Agreement. The Company and each Company Subsidiary are in compliance in all material respects with each Regulatory Agreement to which it is party or subject, and neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received any notice from any Governmental Entity indicating that either the Company or any Company Subsidiary is not in compliance in all material respects with any such Regulatory Agreement. "" means the "appropriate Federal banking agency" with respect to the Company or such Company Subsidiaries, as applicable, as defined in Section 3(q) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Section 1813(q)).
Agreements with Regulatory Agencies
Regulatory Agreement
Appropriate Federal Banking Agency
(t) . The Company and the Company Subsidiaries are insured with reputable insurers against such risks and in such amounts as the management of the Company reasonably has determined to be prudent and consistent with industry practice. The Company and the Company Subsidiaries are in material compliance with their insurance policies and are not in default under any of the material terms thereof, each such policy is outstanding and in full force and effect, all premiums and other payments due under any material policy have been paid, and all claims thereunder have been filed in due and timely fashion, except, in each case, as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Insurance
 
(u) . Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, (i) the Company and each Company Subsidiary owns or otherwise has the right to use, all intellectual property rights, including all trademarks, trade dress, trade names, service marks, domain names, patents, inventions, trade secrets, know-how, works of authorship and copyrights therein, that are used in the conduct of their existing businesses and all rights relating to the plans, design and specifications of any of its branch facilities ("") free and clear of all liens and any claims of ownership by current or former employees, contractors, designers or others and (ii) neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries is materially infringing, diluting, misappropriating or violating, nor has the Company or any or the Company Subsidiaries received any written (or, to the knowledge of the Company, oral) communications alleging that any of them has materially infringed, diluted, misappropriated or violated, any of the Proprietary Rights owned by any other person. Except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, to the Company's knowledge, no other person is infringing, diluting, misappropriating or violating, nor has the Company or any or the Company Subsidiaries sent any written communications since January 1, 2006 alleging that any person has infringed, diluted, misappropriated or violated, any of the Proprietary Rights owned by the Company and the Company Subsidiaries.
Intellectual Property
Proprietary Rights
(v) . No broker, finder or investment banker is entitled to any financial advisory, brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with this Agreement or the Warrant or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of the Company or any Company Subsidiary for which the Investor could have any liability.
Brokers and Finders
3.1 .
Commercially Reasonable Efforts
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, each of the parties will use its commercially reasonable efforts in good faith to take, or cause to be taken, all actions, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or desirable, or advisable under applicable laws, so as to permit consummation of the Purchase as promptly as practicable and otherwise to enable consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and shall use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the other party to that end.
(b) If the Company is required to obtain any stockholder approvals set forth on , then the Company shall comply with this Section 3.1(b) and Section 3.1(c). The Company shall call a special meeting of its stockholders, as promptly as practicable following the Closing, to vote on proposals (collectively, the "") to (i) approve the exercise of the Warrant for Common Stock for purposes of the rules of the national security exchange on which the Common Stock is listed and/or (ii) amend the Company's Charter to increase the number of authorized shares of Common Stock to at least such number as shall be sufficient to permit the full exercise of the Warrant for Common Stock and comply with the  other provisions of this Section 3.1(b) and
Schedule C
Stockholder Proposals
 
Section 3.1(c). The Board of Directors shall recommend to the Company's stockholders that such stockholders vote in favor of the Stockholder Proposals. In connection with such meeting, the Company shall prepare (and the Investor will reasonably cooperate with the Company to prepare) and file with the SEC as promptly as practicable (but in no event more than ten business days after the Closing) a preliminary proxy statement, shall use its reasonable best efforts to respond to any comments of the SEC or its staff thereon and to cause a definitive proxy statement related to such stockholders' meeting to be mailed to the Company's stockholders not more than five business days after clearance thereof by the SEC, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to solicit proxies for such stockholder approval of the Stockholder Proposals. The Company shall notify the Investor promptly of the receipt of any comments from the SEC or its staff with respect to the proxy statement and of any request by the SEC or its staff for amendments or supplements to such proxy statement or for additional information and will supply the Investor with copies of all correspondence between the Company or any of its representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC or its staff, on the other hand, with respect to such proxy statement. If at any time prior to such stockholders' meeting there shall occur any event that is required to be set forth in an amendment or supplement to the proxy statement, the Company shall as promptly as practicable prepare and mail to its stockholders such an amendment or supplement. Each of the Investor and the Company agrees promptly to correct any information provided by it or on its behalf for use in the proxy statement if and to the extent that such information shall have become false or misleading in any material respect, and the Company shall as promptly as practicable prepare and mail to its stockholders an amendment or supplement to correct such information to the extent required by applicable laws and regulations. The Company shall consult with the Investor prior to filing any proxy statement, or any amendment or supplement thereto, and provide the Investor with a reasonable opportunity to comment thereon. In the event that the approval of any of the Stockholder Proposals is not obtained at such special stockholders meeting, the Company shall include a proposal to approve (and the Board of Directors shall recommend approval of) each such proposal at a meeting of its stockholders no less than once in each subsequent six-month period beginning on January 1, 2009 until all such approvals are obtained or made.
(c) None of the information supplied by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries for inclusion in any proxy statement in connection with any such stockholders meeting of the Company will, at the date it is filed with the SEC, when first mailed to the Company's stockholders and at the time of any stockholders meeting, and at the time of any amendment or supplement thereof, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.
3.2 . Unless otherwise provided in this Agreement or the Warrant, each of the parties hereto will bear and pay all costs and expenses incurred by it or on its behalf in connection with the transactions contemplated under this Agreement and the Warrant, including fees and expenses of its own financial or other consultants, investment bankers, accountants and counsel.
Expenses
 
3.3 .
Sufficiency of Authorized Common Stock; Exchange Listing
(a) During the period from the Closing Date (or, if the approval of the Stockholder Proposals is required, the date of such approval) until the date on which the Warrant has been fully exercised, the Company shall at all times have reserved for issuance, free of preemptive or similar rights, a sufficient number of authorized and unissued Warrant Shares to effectuate such exercise. Nothing in this Section 3.3 shall preclude the Company from satisfying its obligations in respect of the exercise of the Warrant by delivery of shares of Common Stock which are held in the treasury of the Company. As soon as reasonably practicable following the Closing, the Company shall, at its expense, cause the Warrant Shares to be listed on the same national securities exchange on which the Common Stock is listed, subject to official notice of issuance, and shall maintain such listing for so long as any Common Stock is listed on such exchange.
(b) If requested by the Investor, the Company shall promptly use its reasonable best efforts to cause the Preferred Shares to be approved for listing on a national securities exchange as promptly as practicable following such request.
3.4 . From the Signing Date until the Closing, the Company shall promptly notify the Investor of (i) any fact, event or circumstance of which it is aware and which would reasonably be expected to cause any representation or warranty of the Company contained in this Agreement to be untrue or inaccurate in any material respect or to cause any covenant or agreement of the Company contained in this Agreement not to be complied with or satisfied in any material respect and (ii) except as Previously Disclosed, any fact, circumstance, event, change, occurrence, condition or development of which the Company is aware and which, individually or in the aggregate, has had or would reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect; , , that delivery of any notice pursuant to this Section 3.4 shall not limit or affect any rights of or remedies available to the Investor; , , that a failure to comply with this Section 3.4 shall not constitute a breach of this Agreement or the failure of any condition set forth in Section 1.2 to be satisfied unless the underlying Company Material Adverse Effect or material breach would independently result in the failure of a condition set forth in Section 1.2 to be satisfied.
Certain Notifications Until Closing
provided
however
provided
further
3.5 .
Access, Information and Confidentiality
(a) From the Signing Date until the date when the Investor holds an amount of Preferred Shares having an aggregate liquidation value of less than 10% of the Purchase Price, the Company will permit the Investor and its agents, consultants, contractors and advisors (x) acting through the Appropriate Federal Banking Agency, to examine the corporate books and make copies thereof and to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries with the principal officers of the Company, all upon reasonable notice and at such reasonable times and as often as the Investor may reasonably request and (y) to review any information material to the Investor's investment in the Company provided by the Company to its Appropriate Federal Banking Agency. Any investigation pursuant to this Section 3.5 shall be conducted during normal business hours and in such manner as not to interfere unreasonably with the conduct of the business of the Company, and nothing herein shall require the Company or any Company Subsidiary to disclose any information to the Investor to the extent (i) prohibited by applicable law or regulation, or (ii) that such disclosure would reasonably be expected to cause a violation of any agreement to which the Company or any Company
 
Subsidiary is a party or would cause a risk of a loss of privilege to the Company or any Company Subsidiary (that the Company shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make appropriate substitute disclosure arrangements under circumstances where the restrictions in this clause (ii) apply).
provided
(b) The Investor will use reasonable best efforts to hold, and will use reasonable best efforts to cause its agents, consultants, contractors and advisors to hold, in confidence all non-public records, books, contracts, instruments, computer data and other data and information (collectively, "") concerning the Company furnished or made available to it by the Company or its representatives pursuant to this Agreement (except to the extent that such information can be shown to have been (i) previously known by such party on a non-confidential basis, (ii) in the public domain through no fault of such party or (iii) later lawfully acquired from other sources by the party to which it was furnished (and without violation of any other confidentiality obligation)); that nothing herein shall prevent the Investor from disclosing any Information to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process.
Information
provided
4.1 . The Investor acknowledges that the Purchased Securities and the Warrant Shares have not been registered under the Securities Act or under any state securities laws. The Investor (a) is acquiring the Purchased Securities pursuant to an exemption from registration under the Securities Act solely for investment with no present intention to distribute them to any person in violation of the Securities Act or any applicable U.S. state securities laws, (b) will not sell or otherwise dispose of any of the Purchased Securities or the Warrant Shares, except in compliance with the registration requirements or exemption provisions of the Securities Act and any applicable U.S. state securities laws, and (c) has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters and in investments of this type that it is capable of evaluating the merits and risks of the Purchase and of making an informed investment decision.
Purchase for Investment
4.2 .
Legends
(a) The Investor agrees that all certificates or other instruments representing the Warrant and the Warrant Shares will bear a legend substantially to the following effect:
"THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED, SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF EXCEPT WHILE A REGISTRATION STATEMENT RELATING THERETO IS IN EFFECT UNDER SUCH ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS OR PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER SUCH ACT OR SUCH LAWS."
 
(b) The Investor agrees that all certificates or other instruments representing the Warrant will also bear a legend substantially to the following effect:
"THIS INSTRUMENT IS ISSUED SUBJECT TO THE RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFER AND OTHER PROVISIONS OF A SECURITIES PURCHASE AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE ISSUER OF THESE SECURITIES AND THE INVESTOR REFERRED TO THEREIN, A COPY OF WHICH IS ON FILE WITH THE ISSUER. THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT MAY NOT BE SOLD OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SAID AGREEMENT. ANY SALE OR OTHER TRANSFER NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SAID AGREEMENT WILL BE VOID."
(c) In addition, the Investor agrees that all certificates or other instruments representing the Preferred Shares will bear a legend substantially to the following effect:
"THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT ARE NOT SAVINGS ACCOUNTS, DEPOSITS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OF A BANK AND ARE NOT INSURED BY THE FEDERAL DEPOSIT INSURANCE CORPORATION OR ANY OTHER GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY.
THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED, SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF EXCEPT WHILE A REGISTRATION STATEMENT RELATING THERETO IS IN EFFECT UNDER SUCH ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS OR PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER SUCH ACT OR SUCH LAWS. EACH PURCHASER OF THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT IS NOTIFIED THAT THE SELLER MAY BE RELYING ON THE EXEMPTION FROM SECTION 5 OF THE SECURITIES ACT PROVIDED BY RULE 144A THEREUNDER. ANY TRANSFEREE OF THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT BY ITS ACCEPTANCE HEREOF (1) REPRESENTS THAT IT IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" (AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT), (2) AGREES THAT IT WILL NOT OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT EXCEPT (A) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT WHICH IS THEN EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (B) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A, TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (C) TO THE ISSUER OR (D) PURSUANT TO ANY OTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT AND (3) AGREES THAT IT WILL GIVE TO EACH PERSON TO WHOM THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT ARE TRANSFERRED A NOTICE SUBSTANTIALLY TO THE EFFECT OF THIS LEGEND."
 
(d) In the event that any Purchased Securities or Warrant Shares (i) become registered under the Securities Act or (ii) are eligible to be transferred without restriction in accordance with Rule 144 or another exemption from registration under the Securities Act (other than Rule 144A), the Company shall issue new certificates or other instruments representing such Purchased Securities or Warrant Shares, which shall not contain the applicable legends in Sections 4.2(a) and (c) above; that the Investor surrenders to the Company the previously issued certificates or other instruments. Upon Transfer of all or a portion of the Warrant in compliance with Section 4.4, the Company shall issue new certificates or other instruments representing the Warrant, which shall not contain the applicable legend in Section 4.2(b) above; that the Investor surrenders to the Company the previously issued certificates or other instruments.
provided
provided
4.3 . The Company will not merge or consolidate with, or sell, transfer or lease all or substantially all of its property or assets to, any other party unless the successor, transferee or lessee party (or its ultimate parent entity), as the case may be (if not the Company), expressly assumes the due and punctual performance and observance of each and every covenant, agreement and condition of this Agreement to be performed and observed by the Company.
Certain Transactions
4.4 . Subject to compliance with applicable securities laws, the Investor shall be permitted to transfer, sell, assign or otherwise dispose of ("") all or a portion of the Purchased Securities or Warrant Shares at any time, and the Company shall take all steps as may be reasonably requested by the Investor to facilitate the Transfer of the Purchased Securities and the Warrant Shares; that the Investor shall not Transfer a portion or portions of the Warrant with respect to, and/or exercise the Warrant for, more than one-half of the Initial Warrant Shares (as such number may be adjusted from time to time pursuant to Section 13 thereof) in the aggregate until the earlier of (a) the date on which the Company (or any successor by Business Combination) has received aggregate gross proceeds of not less than the Purchase Price (and the purchase price paid by the Investor to any such successor for securities of such successor purchased under the CPP) from one or more Qualified Equity Offerings (including Qualified Equity Offerings of such successor) and (b) December 31, 2009. "" means the sale and issuance for cash by the Company to persons other than the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries after the Closing Date of shares of perpetual Preferred Stock, Common Stock or any combination of such stock, that, in each case, qualify as and may be included in Tier 1 capital of the Company at the time of issuance under the applicable risk-based capital guidelines of the Company's Appropriate Federal Banking Agency (other than any such sales and issuances made pursuant to agreements or arrangements entered into, or pursuant to financing plans which were publicly announced, on or prior to October 13, 2008). "" means a merger, consolidation, statutory share exchange or similar transaction that requires the approval of the Company's stockholders.
Transfer of Purchased Securities and Warrant Shares; Restrictions on Exercise of the Warrant
Transfer
provided
Qualified Equity Offering
Business Combination
 
4.5 .
Registration Rights
(a) .
Registration
(i) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company covenants and agrees that as promptly as practicable after the Closing Date (and in any event no later than 30 days after the Closing Date), the Company shall prepare and file with the SEC a Shelf Registration Statement covering all Registrable Securities (or otherwise designate an existing Shelf Registration Statement filed with the SEC to cover the Registrable Securities), and, to the extent the Shelf Registration Statement has not theretofore been declared effective or is not automatically effective upon such filing, the Company shall use reasonable best efforts to cause such Shelf Registration Statement to be declared or become effective and to keep such Shelf Registration Statement continuously effective and in compliance with the Securities Act and usable for resale of such Registrable Securities for a period from the date of its initial effectiveness until such time as there are no Registrable Securities remaining (including by refiling such Shelf Registration Statement (or a new Shelf Registration Statement) if the initial Shelf Registration Statement expires). So long as the Company is a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) at the time of filing of the Shelf Registration Statement with the SEC, such Shelf Registration Statement shall be designated by the Company as an automatic Shelf Registration Statement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if on the Signing Date the Company is not eligible to file a registration statement on Form S-3, then the Company shall not be obligated to file a Shelf Registration Statement unless and until requested to do so in writing by the Investor.
(ii) Any registration pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(i) shall be effected by means of a shelf registration on an appropriate form under Rule 415 under the Securities Act (a ""). If the Investor or any other Holder intends to distribute any Registrable Securities by means of an underwritten offering it shall promptly so advise the Company and the Company shall take all reasonable steps to facilitate such distribution, including the actions required pursuant to Section 4.5(c); that the Company shall not be required to facilitate an underwritten offering of Registrable Securities unless the expected gross proceeds from such offering exceed (i) 2% of the initial aggregate liquidation preference of the Preferred Shares if such initial aggregate liquidation preference is less than $2 billion and (ii) $200 million if the initial aggregate liquidation preference of the Preferred Shares is equal to or greater than $2 billion. The lead underwriters in any such distribution shall be selected by the Holders of a majority of the Registrable Securities to be distributed; that to the extent appropriate and permitted under applicable law, such Holders shall consider the qualifications of any broker-dealer Affiliate of the Company in selecting the lead underwriters in any such distribution.
Shelf Registration Statement
provided
provided
 
(iii) The Company shall not be required to effect a registration (including a resale of Registrable Securities from an effective Shelf Registration Statement) or an underwritten offering pursuant to Section 4.5(a): (A) with respect to securities that are not Registrable Securities; or (B) if the Company has notified the Investor and all other Holders that in the good faith judgment of the Board of Directors, it would be materially detrimental to the Company or its securityholders for such registration or underwritten offering to be effected at such time, in which event the Company shall have the right to defer such registration for a period of not more than 45 days after receipt of the request of the Investor or any other Holder; that such right to delay a registration or underwritten offering shall be exercised by the Company (1) only if the Company has generally exercised (or is concurrently exercising) similar black-out rights against holders of similar securities that have registration rights and (2) not more than three times in any 12-month period and not more than 90 days in the aggregate in any 12-month period.
provided
(iv) If during any period when an effective Shelf Registration Statement is not available, the Company proposes to register any of its equity securities, other than a registration pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(i) or a Special Registration, and the registration form to be filed may be used for the registration or qualification for distribution of Registrable Securities, the Company will give prompt written notice to the Investor and all other Holders of its intention to effect such a registration (but in no event less than ten days prior to the anticipated filing date) and will include in such registration all Registrable Securities with respect to which the Company has received written requests for inclusion therein within ten business days after the date of the Company's notice (a ""). Any such person that has made such a written request may withdraw its Registrable Securities from such Piggyback Registration by giving written notice to the Company and the managing underwriter, if any, on or before the fifth business day prior to the planned effective date of such Piggyback Registration. The Company may terminate or withdraw any registration under this Section 4.5(a)(iv) prior to the effectiveness of such registration, whether or not Investor or any other Holders have elected to include Registrable Securities in such registration.
Piggyback Registration
(v) If the registration referred to in Section 4.5(a)(iv) is proposed to be underwritten, the Company will so advise Investor and all other Holders as a part of the written notice given pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(iv). In such event, the right of Investor and all other Holders to registration pursuant to Section 4.5(a) will be conditioned upon such persons' participation in such underwriting and the inclusion of such person's Registrable Securities in the underwriting if such securities are of the same class of securities as the securities to be offered in the underwritten offering, and each such person will (together with the Company and the other persons distributing their securities through such underwriting) enter into an underwriting agreement in customary form with the underwriter or underwriters selected for such underwriting by the Company; that the Investor (as opposed to other Holders) shall not be required to indemnify any person in connection with any registration. If any participating person disapproves of the terms of the underwriting, such person may elect to withdraw therefrom by written notice to the Company, the managing underwriters and the Investor (if the Investor is participating in the underwriting).
provided
 
(vi) If either (x) the Company grants "piggyback" registration rights to one or more third parties to include their securities in an underwritten offering under the Shelf Registration Statement pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(ii) or (y) a Piggyback Registration under Section 4.5(a)(iv) relates to an underwritten offering on behalf of the Company, and in either case the managing underwriters advise the Company that in their reasonable opinion the number of securities requested to be included in such offering exceeds the number which can be sold without adversely affecting the marketability of such offering (including an adverse effect on the per share offering price), the Company will include in such offering only such number of securities that in the reasonable opinion of such managing underwriters can be sold without adversely affecting the marketability of the offering (including an adverse effect on the per share offering price), which securities will be so included in the following order of priority: (A) first, in the case of a Piggyback Registration under Section 4.5(a)(iv), the securities the Company proposes to sell, (B) then the Registrable Securities of the Investor and all other Holders who have requested inclusion of Registrable Securities pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(ii) or Section 4.5(a)(iv), as applicable, on the basis of the aggregate number of such securities or shares owned by each such person and (C) lastly, any other securities of the Company that have been requested to be so included, subject to the terms of this Agreement; that if the Company has, prior to the Signing Date, entered into an agreement with respect to its securities that is inconsistent with the order of priority contemplated hereby then it shall apply the order of priority in such conflicting agreement to the extent that it would otherwise result in a breach under such agreement.
pro rata
provided, however,
(b) . All Registration Expenses incurred in connection with any registration, qualification or compliance hereunder shall be borne by the Company. All Selling Expenses incurred in connection with any registrations hereunder shall be borne by the holders of the securities so registered on the basis of the aggregate offering or sale price of the securities so registered.
Expenses of Registration
pro rata
(c) . The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts, for so long as there are Registrable Securities outstanding, to take such actions as are under its control to not become an ineligible issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) and to remain a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) if it has such status on the Signing Date or becomes eligible for such status in the future. In addition, whenever required to effect the registration of any Registrable Securities or facilitate the distribution of Registrable Securities pursuant to an effective Shelf Registration Statement, the Company shall, as expeditiously as reasonably practicable:
Obligations of the Company
(i) Prepare and file with the SEC a prospectus supplement with respect to a proposed offering of Registrable Securities pursuant to an effective registration statement, subject to Section 4.5(d), keep such registration statement effective and keep such prospectus supplement current until the securities described therein are no longer Registrable Securities.
 
(ii) Prepare and file with the SEC such amendments and supplements to the applicable registration statement and the prospectus or prospectus supplement used in connection with such registration statement as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of the Securities Act with respect to the disposition of all securities covered by such registration statement.
(iii) Furnish to the Holders and any underwriters such number of copies of the applicable registration statement and each such amendment and supplement thereto (including in each case all exhibits) and of a prospectus, including a preliminary prospectus, in conformity with the requirements of the Securities Act, and such other documents as they may reasonably request in order to facilitate the disposition of Registrable Securities owned or to be distributed by them.
(iv) Use its reasonable best efforts to register and qualify the securities covered by such registration statement under such other securities or Blue Sky laws of such jurisdictions as shall be reasonably requested by the Holders or any managing underwriter(s), to keep such registration or qualification in effect for so long as such registration statement remains in effect, and to take any other action which may be reasonably necessary to enable such seller to consummate the disposition in such jurisdictions of the securities owned by such Holder; that the Company shall not be required in connection therewith or as a condition thereto to qualify to do business or to file a general consent to service of process in any such states or jurisdictions.
provided
(v) Notify each Holder of Registrable Securities at any time when a prospectus relating thereto is required to be delivered under the Securities Act of the happening of any event as a result of which the applicable prospectus, as then in effect, includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances then existing.
(vi) Give written notice to the Holders:
(A) when any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 4.5(a) or any amendment thereto has been filed with the SEC (except for any amendment effected by the filing of a document with the SEC pursuant to the Exchange Act) and when such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto has become effective;
(B) of any request by the SEC for amendments or supplements to any registration statement or the prospectus included therein or for additional information;
 
(C) of the issuance by the SEC of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of any registration statement or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose;
(D) of the receipt by the Company or its legal counsel of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Common Stock for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose;
(E) of the happening of any event that requires the Company to make changes in any effective registration statement or the prospectus related to the registration statement in order to make the statements therein not misleading (which notice shall be accompanied by an instruction to suspend the use of the prospectus until the requisite changes have been made); and
(F) if at any time the representations and warranties of the Company contained in any underwriting agreement contemplated by Section 4.5(c)(x) cease to be true and correct.
(vii) Use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance or obtain the withdrawal of any order suspending the effectiveness of any registration statement referred to in Section 4.5(c)(vi)(C) at the earliest practicable time.
(viii) Upon the occurrence of any event contemplated by Section 4.5(c)(v) or 4.5(c)(vi)(E), promptly prepare a post-effective amendment to such registration statement or a supplement to the related prospectus or file any other required document so that, as thereafter delivered to the Holders and any underwriters, the prospectus will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. If the Company notifies the Holders in accordance with Section 4.5(c)(vi)(E) to suspend the use of the prospectus until the requisite changes to the prospectus have been made, then the Holders and any underwriters shall suspend use of such prospectus and use their reasonable best efforts to return to the Company all copies of such prospectus (at the Company's expense) other than permanent file copies then in such Holders' or underwriters' possession. The total number of days that any such suspension may be in effect in any 12-month period shall not exceed 90 days.
(ix) Use reasonable best efforts to procure the cooperation of the Company's transfer agent in settling any offering or sale of Registrable Securities, including with respect to the transfer of physical stock certificates into book-entry form in accordance with any procedures reasonably requested by the Holders or any managing underwriter(s).
(x) If an underwritten offering is requested pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(ii), enter into an underwriting agreement in customary form, scope and substance and take all such other actions reasonably requested by the Holders of a majority of the
 
Registrable Securities being sold in connection therewith or by the managing underwriter(s), if any, to expedite or facilitate the underwritten disposition of such Registrable Securities, and in connection therewith in any underwritten offering (including making members of management and executives of the Company available to participate in "road shows", similar sales events and other marketing activities), (A) make such representations and warranties to the Holders that are selling stockholders and the managing underwriter(s), if any, with respect to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, and the Shelf Registration Statement, prospectus and documents, if any, incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein, in each case, in customary form, substance and scope, and, if true, confirm the same if and when requested, (B) use its reasonable best efforts to furnish the underwriters with opinions of counsel to the Company, addressed to the managing underwriter(s), if any, covering the matters customarily covered in such opinions requested in underwritten offerings, (C) use its reasonable best efforts to obtain "cold comfort" letters from the independent certified public accountants of the Company (and, if necessary, any other independent certified public accountants of any business acquired by the Company for which financial statements and financial data are included in the Shelf Registration Statement) who have certified the financial statements included in such Shelf Registration Statement, addressed to each of the managing underwriter(s), if any, such letters to be in customary form and covering matters of the type customarily covered in "cold comfort" letters, (D) if an underwriting agreement is entered into, the same shall contain indemnification provisions and procedures customary in underwritten offerings (provided that the Investor shall not be obligated to provide any indemnity), and (E) deliver such documents and certificates as may be reasonably requested by the Holders of a majority of the Registrable Securities being sold in connection therewith, their counsel and the managing underwriter(s), if any, to evidence the continued validity of the representations and warranties made pursuant to clause (i) above and to evidence compliance with any customary conditions contained in the underwriting agreement or other agreement entered into by the Company.
(xi) Make available for inspection by a representative of Holders that are selling stockholders, the managing underwriter(s), if any, and any attorneys or accountants retained by such Holders or managing underwriter(s), at the offices where normally kept, during reasonable business hours, financial and other records, pertinent corporate documents and properties of the Company, and cause the officers, directors and employees of the Company to supply all information in each case reasonably requested (and of the type customarily provided in connection with due diligence conducted in connection with a registered public offering of securities) by any such representative, managing underwriter(s), attorney or accountant in connection with such Shelf Registration Statement.
(xii) Use reasonable best efforts to cause all such Registrable Securities to be listed on each national securities exchange on which similar securities issued by the Company are then listed or, if no similar securities issued by the Company are then listed on any national securities exchange, use its reasonable best efforts to cause all such Registrable Securities to be listed on such securities exchange as the Investor may designate.
 
(xiii) If requested by Holders of a majority of the Registrable Securities being registered and/or sold in connection therewith, or the managing underwriter(s), if any, promptly include in a prospectus supplement or amendment such information as the Holders of a majority of the Registrable Securities being registered and/or sold in connection therewith or managing underwriter(s), if any, may reasonably request in order to permit the intended method of distribution of such securities and make all required filings of such prospectus supplement or such amendment as soon as practicable after the Company has received such request.
(xiv) Timely provide to its security holders earning statements satisfying the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and Rule 158 thereunder.
(d) . Upon receipt of written notice from the Company that a registration statement, prospectus or prospectus supplement contains or may contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omits or may omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that circumstances exist that make inadvisable use of such registration statement, prospectus or prospectus supplement, the Investor and each Holder of Registrable Securities shall forthwith discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities until the Investor and/or Holder has received copies of a supplemented or amended prospectus or prospectus supplement, or until the Investor and/or such Holder is advised in writing by the Company that the use of the prospectus and, if applicable, prospectus supplement may be resumed, and, if so directed by the Company, the Investor and/or such Holder shall deliver to the Company (at the Company's expense) all copies, other than permanent file copies then in the Investor and/or such Holder's possession, of the prospectus and, if applicable, prospectus supplement covering such Registrable Securities current at the time of receipt of such notice. The total number of days that any such suspension may be in effect in any 12-month period shall not exceed 90 days.
Suspension of Sales
(e) . A Holder's registration rights as to any securities held by such Holder (and its Affiliates, partners, members and former members) shall not be available unless such securities are Registrable Securities.
Termination of Registration Rights
(f) .
Furnishing Information
(i) Neither the Investor nor any Holder shall use any free writing prospectus (as defined in Rule 405) in connection with the sale of Registrable Securities without the prior written consent of the Company.
(ii) It shall be a condition precedent to the obligations of the Company to take any action pursuant to Section 4.5(c) that Investor and/or the selling Holders and the underwriters, if any, shall furnish to the Company such information regarding themselves, the Registrable Securities held by them and the intended method of disposition of such securities as shall be required to effect the registered offering of their Registrable Securities.
 
(g) .
Indemnification
(i) The Company agrees to indemnify each Holder and, if a Holder is a person other than an individual, such Holder's officers, directors, employees, agents, representatives and Affiliates, and each Person, if any, that controls a Holder within the meaning of the Securities Act (each, an ""), against any and all losses, claims, damages, actions, liabilities, costs and expenses (including reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of attorneys and other professionals incurred in connection with investigating, defending, settling, compromising or paying any such losses, claims, damages, actions, liabilities, costs and expenses), joint or several, arising out of or based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of material fact contained in any registration statement, including any preliminary prospectus or final prospectus contained therein or any amendments or supplements thereto or any documents incorporated therein by reference or contained in any free writing prospectus (as such term is defined in Rule 405) prepared by the Company or authorized by it in writing for use by such Holder (or any amendment or supplement thereto); or any omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , that the Company shall not be liable to such Indemnitee in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, liability (or action or proceeding in respect thereof) or expense arises out of or is based upon (A) an untrue statement or omission made in such registration statement, including any such preliminary prospectus or final prospectus contained therein or any such amendments or supplements thereto or contained in any free writing prospectus (as such term is defined in Rule 405) prepared by the Company or authorized by it in writing for use by such Holder (or any amendment or supplement thereto), in reliance upon and in conformity with information regarding such Indemnitee or its plan of distribution or ownership interests which was furnished in writing to the Company by such Indemnitee for use in connection with such registration statement, including any such preliminary prospectus or final prospectus contained therein or any such amendments or supplements thereto, or (B) offers or sales effected by or on behalf of such Indemnitee "by means of" (as defined in Rule 159A) a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405) that was not authorized in writing by the Company.
Indemnitee
provided
(ii) If the indemnification provided for in Section 4.5(g)(i) is unavailable to an Indemnitee with respect to any losses, claims, damages, actions, liabilities, costs or expenses referred to therein or is insufficient to hold the Indemnitee harmless as contemplated therein, then the Company, in lieu of indemnifying such Indemnitee, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such Indemnitee as a result of such losses, claims, damages, actions, liabilities, costs or expenses in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the Indemnitee, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, actions, liabilities, costs or expenses as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and of the
 
Indemnitee, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other factors, whether the untrue statement of a material fact or omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Indemnitee and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission; the Company and each Holder agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 4.5(g)(ii) were determined by allocation or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in Section 4.5(g)(i). No Indemnitee guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from the Company if the Company was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
pro rata
(h) . The rights of the Investor to registration of Registrable Securities pursuant to Section 4.5(a) may be assigned by the Investor to a transferee or assignee of Registrable Securities with a liquidation preference or, in the case of Registrable Securities other than Preferred Shares, a market value, no less than an amount equal to (i) 2% of the initial aggregate liquidation preference of the Preferred Shares if such initial aggregate liquidation preference is less than $2 billion and (ii) $200 million if the initial aggregate liquidation preference of the Preferred Shares is equal to or greater than $2 billion; , , the transferor shall, within ten days after such transfer, furnish to the Company written notice of the name and address of such transferee or assignee and the number and type of Registrable Securities that are being assigned. For purposes of this Section 4.5(h), "market value" per share of Common Stock shall be the last reported sale price of the Common Stock on the national securities exchange on which the Common Stock is listed or admitted to trading on the last trading day prior to the proposed transfer, and the "market value" for the Warrant (or any portion thereof) shall be the market value per share of Common Stock into which the Warrant (or such portion) is exercisable less the exercise price per share.
Assignment of Registration Rights
provided
however
(i) . With respect to any underwritten offering of Registrable Securities by the Investor or other Holders pursuant to this Section 4.5, the Company agrees not to effect (other than pursuant to such registration or pursuant to a Special Registration) any public sale or distribution, or to file any Shelf Registration Statement (other than such registration or a Special Registration) covering, in the case of an underwritten offering of Common Stock or Warrants, any of its equity securities or, in the case of an underwritten offering of Preferred Shares, any Preferred Stock of the Company, or, in each case, any securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for such securities, during the period not to exceed ten days prior and 60 days following the effective date of such offering or such longer period up to 90 days as may be requested by the managing underwriter for such underwritten offering. The Company also agrees to cause such of its directors and senior executive officers to execute and deliver customary lock-up agreements in such form and for such time period up to 90 days as may be requested by the managing underwriter. "" means the registration of (A) equity securities and/or options or other rights in respect thereof solely registered on Form S-4 or Form S-8 (or successor form) or (B) shares of equity securities and/or options or other rights in respect thereof to be offered to directors, members of management, employees, consultants, customers, lenders or vendors of the Company or Company Subsidiaries or in connection with dividend reinvestment plans.
Clear Market
Special Registration
 
(j) . With a view to making available to the Investor and Holders the benefits of certain rules and regulations of the SEC which may permit the sale of the Registrable Securities to the public without registration, the Company agrees to use its reasonable best efforts to:
Rule 144; Rule 144A
(i) make and keep public information available, as those terms are understood and defined in Rule 144(c)(1) or any similar or analogous rule promulgated under the Securities Act, at all times after the Signing Date;
(ii) (A) file with the SEC, in a timely manner, all reports and other documents required of the Company under the Exchange Act, and (B) if at any time the Company is not required to file such reports, make available, upon the request of any Holder, such information necessary to permit sales pursuant to Rule 144A (including the information required by Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Securities Act);
(iii) so long as the Investor or a Holder owns any Registrable Securities, furnish to the Investor or such Holder forthwith upon request: a written statement by the Company as to its compliance with the reporting requirements of Rule 144 under the Securities Act, and of the Exchange Act; a copy of the most recent annual or quarterly report of the Company; and such other reports and documents as the Investor or Holder may reasonably request in availing itself of any rule or regulation of the SEC allowing it to sell any such securities to the public without registration; and
(iv) take such further action as any Holder may reasonably request, all to the extent required from time to time to enable such Holder to sell Registrable Securities without registration under the Securities Act.
(k) As used in this Section 4.5, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings:
(i) "" means the Investor and any other holder of Registrable Securities to whom the registration rights conferred by this Agreement have been transferred in compliance with Section 4.5(h) hereof.
Holder
(ii) "" means one counsel for the selling Holders chosen by Holders holding a majority interest in the Registrable Securities being registered.
Holders' Counsel
(iii) "," "," and "" shall refer to a registration effected by preparing and (A) filing a registration statement in compliance with the Securities Act and applicable rules and regulations thereunder, and the declaration or ordering of effectiveness of such registration statement or (B) filing a prospectus and/or prospectus supplement in respect of an appropriate effective registration statement on Form S-3.
Register
registered
registration
 
(iv) "" means (A) all Preferred Shares, (B) the Warrant (subject to Section 4.5(p)) and (C) any equity securities issued or issuable directly or indirectly with respect to the securities referred to in the foregoing clauses (A) or (B) by way of conversion, exercise or exchange thereof, including the Warrant Shares, or share dividend or share split or in connection with a combination of shares, recapitalization, reclassification, merger, amalgamation, arrangement, consolidation or other reorganization, that, once issued, such securities will not be Registrable Securities when (1) they are sold pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act, (2) except as provided below in Section 4.5(o), they may be sold pursuant to Rule 144 without limitation thereunder on volume or manner of sale, (3) they shall have ceased to be outstanding or (4) they have been sold in a private transaction in which the transferor's rights under this Agreement are not assigned to the transferee of the securities. No Registrable Securities may be registered under more than one registration statement at any one time.
Registrable Securities
provided
(v) "" mean all expenses incurred by the Company in effecting any registration pursuant to this Agreement (whether or not any registration or prospectus becomes effective or final) or otherwise complying with its obligations under this Section 4.5, including all registration, filing and listing fees, printing expenses, fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company, blue sky fees and expenses, expenses incurred in connection with any "road show", the reasonable fees and disbursements of Holders' Counsel, and expenses of the Company's independent accountants in connection with any regular or special reviews or audits incident to or required by any such registration, but shall not include Selling Expenses.
Registration Expenses
(vi) "", "", "", "" and "" mean, in each case, such rule promulgated under the Securities Act (or any successor provision), as the same shall be amended from time to time.
Rule 144
Rule 144A
Rule 159A
Rule 405
Rule 415
(vii) "" mean all discounts, selling commissions and stock transfer taxes applicable to the sale of Registrable Securities and fees and disbursements of counsel for any Holder (other than the fees and disbursements of Holders' Counsel included in Registration Expenses).
Selling Expenses
(l) At any time, any holder of Securities (including any Holder) may elect to forfeit its rights set forth in this Section 4.5 from that date forward; , that a Holder forfeiting such rights shall nonetheless be entitled to participate under Section 4.5(a)(iv)  (vi) in any Pending Underwritten Offering to the same extent that such Holder would have been entitled to if the holder had not withdrawn; and , , that no such forfeiture shall terminate a Holder's rights or obligations under Section 4.5(f) with respect to any prior registration or Pending Underwritten Offering. "meanswith respect to any Holder forfeiting its rights pursuant to this Section 4.5(l), any underwritten offering of Registrable Securities in which such Holder has advised the Company of its intent to register its Registrable Securities either pursuant to Section 4.5(a)(ii) or 4.5(a)(iv) prior to the date of such Holder's forfeiture.
provided
provided
further
Pending Underwritten Offering"
,
 
(m) . The parties hereto acknowledge that there would be no adequate remedy at law if the Company fails to perform any of its obligations under this Section 4.5 and that the Investor and the Holders from time to time may be irreparably harmed by any such failure, and accordingly agree that the Investor and such Holders, in addition to any other remedy to which they may be entitled at law or in equity, to the fullest extent permitted and enforceable under applicable law shall be entitled to compel specific performance of the obligations of the Company under this Section 4.5 in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Section 4.5.
Specific Performance
(n) . The Company shall not, on or after the Signing Date, enter into any agreement with respect to its securities that may impair the rights granted to the Investor and the Holders under this Section 4.5 or that otherwise conflicts with the provisions hereof in any manner that may impair the rights granted to the Investor and the Holders under this Section 4.5. In the event the Company has, prior to the Signing Date, entered into any agreement with respect to its securities that is inconsistent with the rights granted to the Investor and the Holders under this Section 4.5 (including agreements that are inconsistent with the order of priority contemplated by Section 4.5(a)(vi)) or that may otherwise conflict with the provisions hereof, the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to amend such agreements to ensure they are consistent with the provisions of this Section 4.5.
No Inconsistent Agreements
(o) . In the case of any securities held by the Investor that cease to be Registrable Securities solely by reason of clause (2) in the definition of "Registrable Securities," the provisions of Sections 4.5(a)(ii), clauses (iv), (ix) and (x)-(xii) of Section 4.5(c), Section 4.5(g) and Section 4.5(i) shall continue to apply until such securities otherwise cease to be Registrable Securities. In any such case, an "underwritten" offering or other disposition shall include any distribution of such securities on behalf of the Investor by one or more broker-dealers, an "underwriting agreement" shall include any purchase agreement entered into by such broker-dealers, and any "registration statement" or "prospectus" shall include any offering document approved by the Company and used in connection with such distribution.
Certain Offerings by the Investor
(p) . The Holders agree to sell the Warrant or any portion thereof under the Shelf Registration Statement only beginning 30 days after notifying the Company of any such sale, during which 30-day period the Investor and all Holders of the Warrant shall take reasonable steps to agree to revisions to the Warrant to permit a public distribution of the Warrant, including entering into a warrant agreement and appointing a warrant agent.
Registered Sales of the Warrant
4.6 . Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Investor shall not exercise any voting rights with respect to the Warrant Shares.
Voting of Warrant Shares
 
4.7 . Upon request by the Investor at any time following the Closing Date, the Company shall promptly enter into a depositary arrangement, pursuant to customary agreements reasonably satisfactory to the Investor and with a depositary reasonably acceptable to the Investor, pursuant to which the Preferred Shares may be deposited and depositary shares, each representing a fraction of a Preferred Share as specified by the Investor, may be issued. From and after the execution of any such depositary arrangement, and the deposit of any Preferred Shares pursuant thereto, the depositary shares issued pursuant thereto shall be deemed "Preferred Shares" and, as applicable, "Registrable Securities" for purposes of this Agreement.
Depositary Shares
4.8 .
Restriction on Dividends and Repurchases
(a) Prior to the earlier of (x) the third anniversary of the Closing Date and (y) the date on which the Preferred Shares have been redeemed in whole or the Investor has transferred all of the Preferred Shares to third parties which are not Affiliates of the Investor, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary shall, without the consent of the Investor:
(i) declare or pay any dividend or make any distribution on the Common Stock (other than (A) regular quarterly cash dividends of not more than the amount of the last quarterly cash dividend per share declared or, if lower, publicly announced an intention to declare, on the Common Stock prior to October 14, 2008, as adjusted for any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split, reclassification or similar transaction, (B) dividends payable solely in shares of Common Stock and (C) dividends or distributions of rights or Junior Stock in connection with a stockholders' rights plan); or
(ii) redeem, purchase or acquire any shares of Common Stock or other capital stock or other equity securities of any kind of the Company, or any trust preferred securities issued by the Company or any Affiliate of the Company, other than (A) redemptions, purchases or other acquisitions of the Preferred Shares, (B) redemptions, purchases or other acquisitions of shares of Common Stock or other Junior Stock, in each case in this clause (B) in connection with the administration of any employee benefit plan in the ordinary course of business (including purchases to offset the Share Dilution Amount (as defined below) pursuant to a publicly announced repurchase plan) and consistent with past practice; that any purchases to offset the Share Dilution Amount shall in no event exceed the Share Dilution Amount, (C) purchases or other acquisitions by a broker-dealer subsidiary of the Company solely for the purpose of market-making, stabilization or customer facilitation transactions in Junior Stock or Parity Stock in the ordinary course of its business, (D) purchases by a broker-dealer subsidiary of the Company of capital stock of the Company for resale pursuant to an offering by the Company of such capital stock underwritten by such broker-dealer subsidiary, (E) any redemption or repurchase of rights pursuant to any stockholders' rights plan, (F) the acquisition by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries of record ownership in Junior Stock or Parity Stock for the beneficial ownership of any other persons (other than the Company or any other Company Subsidiary), including as trustees or custodians, and (G) the exchange or conversion of Junior Stock for or into other Junior Stock or of Parity Stock or
provided
 
trust preferred securities for or into other Parity Stock (with the same or lesser aggregate liquidation amount) or Junior Stock, in each case set forth in this clause (G), solely to the extent required pursuant to binding contractual agreements entered into prior to the Signing Date or any subsequent agreement for the accelerated exercise, settlement or exchange thereof for Common Stock (clauses (C) and (F), collectively, the ""). "" means the increase in the number of diluted shares outstanding (determined in accordance with GAAP, and as measured from the date of the Company's most recently filed Company Financial Statements prior to the Closing Date) resulting from the grant, vesting or exercise of equity-based compensation to employees and equitably adjusted for any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split, reclassification or similar transaction.
Permitted Repurchases
Share Dilution Amount
(b) Until such time as the Investor ceases to own any Preferred Shares, the Company shall not repurchase any Preferred Shares from any holder thereof, whether by means of open market purchase, negotiated transaction, or otherwise, other than Permitted Repurchases, unless it offers to repurchase a ratable portion of the Preferred Shares then held by the Investor on the same terms and conditions.
(c) "means Common Stock and any other class or series of stock of the Company the terms of which expressly provide that it ranks junior to the Preferred Shares as to dividend rights and/or as to rights on liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company. "means any class or series of stock of the Company the terms of which do not expressly provide that such class or series will rank senior or junior to the Preferred Shares as to dividend rights and/or as to rights on liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company (in each case without regard to whether dividends accrue cumulatively or non-cumulatively).
Junior Stock"
Parity Stock"
4.9 .
Repurchase of Investor Securities
(a) Following the redemption in whole of the Preferred Shares held by the Investor or the Transfer by the Investor of all of the Preferred Shares to one or more third parties not affiliated with the Investor, the Company may repurchase, in whole or in part, at any time any other equity securities of the Company purchased by the Investor pursuant to this Agreement or the Warrant and then held by the Investor, upon notice given as provided in clause (b) below, at the Fair Market Value of the equity security.
(b) Notice of every repurchase of equity securities of the Company held by the Investor shall be given at the address and in the manner set forth for such party in Section 5.6. Each notice of repurchase given to the Investor shall state: (i) the number and type of securities to be repurchased, (ii) the Board of Director's determination of Fair Market Value of such securities and (iii) the place or places where certificates representing such securities are to be surrendered for payment of the repurchase price. The repurchase of the securities specified in the notice shall occur as soon as practicable following the determination of the Fair Market Value of the securities.
 
(c) As used in this Section 4.9, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings:
(i) "" means a procedure whereby two independent appraisers, one chosen by the Company and one by the Investor, shall mutually agree upon the Fair Market Value. Each party shall deliver a notice to the other appointing its appraiser within 10 days after the Appraisal Procedure is invoked. If within 30 days after appointment of the two appraisers they are unable to agree upon the Fair Market Value, a third independent appraiser shall be chosen within 10 days thereafter by the mutual consent of such first two appraisers. The decision of the third appraiser so appointed and chosen shall be given within 30 days after the selection of such third appraiser. If three appraisers shall be appointed and the determination of one appraiser is disparate from the middle determination by more than twice the amount by which the other determination is disparate from the middle determination, then the determination of such appraiser shall be excluded, the remaining two determinations shall be averaged and such average shall be binding and conclusive upon the Company and the Investor; otherwise, the average of all three determinations shall be binding upon the Company and the Investor. The costs of conducting any Appraisal Procedure shall be borne by the Company.
Appraisal Procedure
(ii) "" means, with respect to any security, the fair market value of such security as determined by the Board of Directors, acting in good faith in reliance on an opinion of a nationally recognized independent investment banking firm retained by the Company for this purpose and certified in a resolution to the Investor. If the Investor does not agree with the Board of Director's determination, it may object in writing within 10 days of receipt of the Board of Director's determination. In the event of such an objection, an authorized representative of the Investor and the chief executive officer of the Company shall promptly meet to resolve the objection and to agree upon the Fair Market Value. If the chief executive officer and the authorized representative are unable to agree on the Fair Market Value during the 10-day period following the delivery of the Investor's objection, the Appraisal Procedure may be invoked by either party to determine the Fair Market Value by delivery of a written notification thereof not later than the 30th day after delivery of the Investor's objection.
Fair Market Value
4.10 . Until such time as the Investor ceases to own any debt or equity securities of the Company acquired pursuant to this Agreement or the Warrant, the Company shall take all necessary action to ensure that its Benefit Plans with respect to its Senior Executive Officers comply in all respects with Section 111(b) of the EESA as implemented by any guidance or regulation thereunder that has been issued and is in effect as of the Closing Date, and shall not adopt any new Benefit Plan with respect to its Senior Executive Officers that does not comply therewith. "" means the Company's "senior executive officers" as defined in subsection 111(b)(3) of the EESA and regulations issued thereunder, including the rules set forth in 31 C.F.R. Part 30.
Executive Compensation
Senior Executive Officers
 
5.1 . This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Closing:
Termination
(a) by either the Investor or the Company if the Closing shall not have occurred by the 30
th
calendar day following the Signing Date; , , that in the event the Closing has not occurred by such 30
provided
however
th
calendar day, the parties will consult in good faith to determine whether to extend the term of this Agreement, it being understood that the parties shall be required to consult only until the fifth day after such 30
th
calendar day and not be under any obligation to extend the term of this Agreement thereafter; , , that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 5.1(a) shall not be available to any party whose breach of any representation or warranty or failure to perform any obligation under this Agreement shall have caused or resulted in the failure of the Closing to occur on or prior to such date; or
provided
further
(b) by either the Investor or the Company in the event that any Governmental Entity shall have issued an order, decree or ruling or taken any other action restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and such order, decree, ruling or other action shall have become final and nonappealable; or
(c) by the mutual written consent of the Investor and the Company.
In the event of termination of this Agreement as provided in this Section 5.1, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and there shall be no liability on the part of either party hereto except that nothing herein shall relieve either party from liability for any breach of this Agreement.
5.2 . All covenants and agreements, other than those which by their terms apply in whole or in part after the Closing, shall terminate as of the Closing. The representations and warranties of the Company made herein or in any certificates delivered in connection with the Closing shall survive the Closing without limitation.
Survival of Representations and Warranties
5.3 . No amendment of any provision of this Agreement will be effective unless made in writing and signed by an officer or a duly authorized representative of each party; that the Investor may unilaterally amend any provision of this Agreement to the extent required to comply with any changes after the Signing Date in applicable federal statutes. No failure or delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise of any other right, power or privilege. The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative of any rights or remedies provided by law.
Amendment
provided
5.4 . The conditions to each party's obligation to consummate the Purchase are for the sole benefit of such party and may be waived by such party in whole or in part to the extent permitted by applicable law. No waiver will be effective unless it is in a writing signed by a duly authorized officer of the waiving party that makes express reference to the provision or provisions subject to such waiver.
Waiver of Conditions
 
5.5 .
Governing Law: Submission to Jurisdiction, Etc
This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the federal law of the United States if and to the extent such law is applicable, and otherwise in accordance with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such State. Each of the parties hereto agrees (a) to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction and venue of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia and the United States Court of Federal Claims for any and all actions, suits or proceedings arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Warrant or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, and (b) that notice may be served upon (i) the Company at the address and in the manner set forth for notices to the Company in Section 5.6 and (ii) the Investor in accordance with federal law. To the extent permitted by applicable law, each of the parties hereto hereby unconditionally waives trial by jury in any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the Warrant or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
5.6 . Any notice, request, instruction or other document to be given hereunder by any party to the other will be in writing and will be deemed to have been duly given (a) on the date of delivery if delivered personally, or by facsimile, upon confirmation of receipt, or (b) on the second business day following the date of dispatch if delivered by a recognized next day courier service. All notices to the Company shall be delivered as set forth in , or pursuant to such other instruction as may be designated in writing by the Company to the Investor. All notices to the Investor shall be delivered as set forth below, or pursuant to such other instructions as may be designated in writing by the Investor to the Company.
Notices
Schedule A
 
5.7
Definitions
(a) When a reference is made in this Agreement to a subsidiary of a person, the term "" means any corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other entity (x) of which such person or a subsidiary of such person is a general partner or (y) of which a majority of the voting securities or other voting interests, or a majority of the securities or other interests of which having by their terms ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or persons performing similar functions with respect to such entity, is directly or indirectly owned by such person and/or one or more subsidiaries thereof.
subsidiary
 
(b) The term "" means, with respect to any person, any person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by or under common control with, such other person. For purposes of this definition, "" (including, with correlative meanings, the terms "" and "") when used with respect to any person, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to cause the direction of management and/or policies of such person, whether through the ownership of voting securities by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
control
controlled by
under common control with
(c) The terms "" or "" mean the actual knowledge after reasonable and due inquiry of the "" (as such term is defined in Rule 3b-2 under the Exchange Act, but excluding any Vice President or Secretary) of the Company.
knowledge of the Company
Company's knowledge
officers
5.8 . Neither this Agreement nor any right, remedy, obligation nor liability arising hereunder or by reason hereof shall be assignable by any party hereto without the prior written consent of the other party, and any attempt to assign any right, remedy, obligation or liability hereunder without such consent shall be void, except (a) an assignment, in the case of a Business Combination where such party is not the surviving entity, or a sale of substantially all of its assets, to the entity which is the survivor of such Business Combination or the purchaser in such sale and (b) as provided in Section 4.5.
Assignment
5.9 . If any provision of this Agreement or the Warrant, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remaining provisions hereof, or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it has been held invalid or unenforceable, will remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated thereby, so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination, the parties shall negotiate in good faith in an effort to agree upon a suitable and equitable substitute provision to effect the original intent of the parties.
Severability
5.10 . Nothing contained in this Agreement, expressed or implied, is intended to confer upon any person or entity other than the Company and the Investor any benefit, right or remedies, except that the provisions of Section 4.5 shall inure to the benefit of the persons referred to in that Section.
No Third Party Beneficiaries
 
ANNEX A
ANNEX B
In consideration for the benefits I will receive as a result of my employer's participation in the United States Department of the Treasury's TARP Capital Purchase Program, I hereby voluntarily waive any claim against the United States or my employer for any changes to my compensation or benefits that are required to comply with the regulation issued by the Department of the Treasury as published in the Federal Register on October 20, 2008.
I acknowledge that this regulation may require modification of the compensation, bonus, incentive and other benefit plans, arrangements, policies and agreements (including so-called "golden parachute" agreements) that I have with my employer or in which I participate as they relate to the period the United States holds any equity or debt securities of my employer acquired through the TARP Capital Purchase Program.
This waiver includes all claims I may have under the laws of the United States or any state related to the requirements imposed by the aforementioned regulation, including without limitation a claim for any compensation or other payments I would otherwise receive, any challenge to the process by which this regulation was adopted and any tort or constitutional claim about the effect of these regulations on my employment relationship.
ANNEX C
(a) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the state of its incorporation.
(b) The Preferred Shares have been duly and validly authorized, and, when issued and delivered pursuant to the Agreement, the Preferred Shares will be duly and validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable, will not be issued in violation of any preemptive rights, and will rank with or senior to all other series or classes of Preferred Stock issued on the Closing Date with respect to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any dissolution, liquidation or winding up of the Company.
pari passu
(c) The Warrant has been duly authorized and, when executed and delivered as contemplated hereby, will constitute a valid and legally binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the same may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and general equitable principles, regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity.
(d) The shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant have been duly authorized and reserved for issuance upon exercise of the Warrant and when so issued in accordance with the terms of the Warrant will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable , subject to the approvals of the Company's stockholders set forth on .
[
insert, if applicable:
Schedule C
]
(e) The Company has the corporate power and authority to execute and deliver the Agreement and the Warrant and , subject to the approvals of the Company's stockholders set forth on ,to carry out its obligations thereunder (which includes the issuance of the Preferred Shares, Warrant and Warrant Shares).
[
insert, if applicable:
Schedule C
]
(f) The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of the Agreement and the Warrant and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company and its stockholders, and no further approval or authorization is required on the part of the Company , subject, in each case, to the approvals of the Company's stockholders set forth on .
[
insert, if applicable:
Schedule C
]
(g) The Agreement is a valid and binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the same may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and general equitable principles, regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity; , , such counsel need express no opinion with respect to Section 4.5(g) or the severability provisions of the Agreement insofar as Section 4.5(g) is concerned.
provided
however
ANNEX D
SCHEDULE A
 
SCHEDULE B
 
 
SCHEDULE C
 
If no stockholder approvals are required, please so indicate by checking the box: .
x
 
SCHEDULE D
List any exceptions to the representation and warranty in Section 2.2(1) of the Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms.
If none, please so indicate by checking the box: .
x
SCHEDULE E
List any exceptions to the representation and warranty in the second sentence of Section 2.2(m) of the Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms.
If none, please so indicate by checking the box: .
x
List any exceptions to the representation and warranty in the last sentence of Section 2.2(m) of the Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms.
If none, please so indicate by checking the box: .
x
SCHEDULE F
List any exceptions to the representation and warranty in Section 2.2(s) of the Securities Purchase Agreement  Standard Terms.
If none, please so indicate by checking the box: .
x

Exhibit 10.2
In consideration for the benefits I will receive as a result of my employer's participation in the United States Department of the Treasury's TARP Capital Purchase Program, I hereby voluntarily waive any claim against the United States or my employer for any changes to my compensation or benefits that are required to comply with the regulation issued by the Department of the Treasury as published in the Federal Register on October 20, 2008.
I acknowledge that this regulation may require modification of the compensation, bonus, incentive and other benefit plans, arrangements, policies and agreements (including so-called "golden parachute" agreements) that I have with my employer or in which I participate as they relate to the period the United States holds any equity or debt securities of my employer acquired through the TARP Capital Purchase Program.
This waiver includes all claims I may have under the laws of the United States or any state related to the requirements imposed by the aforementioned regulation, including without limitation a claim for any compensation or other payments I would otherwise receive, any challenge to the process by which this regulation was adopted and any tort or constitutional claim about the effect of these regulations on my employment relationship.
A signature transmitted by facsimile will be deemed an original signature.
I[Insert Name], intending to be legally bound hereby, and for full consideration, have executed this Waiver this day of , 2008.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
,
    
                    
 

Exhibit 10.3
October 24, 2008
Via Certified Mail, Return Receipt Requested
[Insert Name and Address]
Dear [Insert Name],
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "") anticipates entering into a Securities Purchase Agreement (the ""), with the United States Department of Treasury ("") that provides for the Company's participation in the Treasury's TARP Capital Purchase Program (the ""). If the Company does not participate or ceases at any time to participate in the CPP, this letter shall be of no further force and effect.
Company
Participation Agreement
Treasury
CPP
For the Company to participate in the CPP and as a condition to the closing of the investment contemplated by the Participation Agreement, the Company is required to establish specified standards for incentive compensation to its senior executive officers and to make changes to its compensation arrangements. To comply with these requirements, and in consideration of the benefits that you will receive as a result of the Company's participation in the CPP, you agree as follows:
 
 
 
In addition, the Company is required to review its Benefit Plans to ensure that they do not encourage senior executive officers to take unnecessary and excessive risks that threaten the value of the Company. To the extent any such review requires revisions to any Benefit Plan with respect to you, you and the Company agree to negotiate such changes promptly and in good faith.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Board appreciates the concessions you are making and looks forward to your continued leadership during these financially turbulent times.
 
 
cc: [Insert Name], via Hand Delivery
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090121160240.txt.gz
TIME:20090121160240
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On January 20, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2008 and fourth quarter 2008. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website,
http://www.bnymellon.com/
, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Continuing EPS reduced by:
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter income from continuing operations, before an extraordinary item, and after preferred stock dividends, of $53 million, or $0.05 per common share. This compares to income from continuing operations, before an extraordinary item, of $700 million, or $0.61 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2007 and $305 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008. In the fourth quarter of 2008, net income applicable to common stock, including the impact of an extraordinary item, was $28 million, or $0.02 per common share.
NEW YORK, January 20, 2009 
"In an extraordinarily challenging year, we generated profits in every quarter, achieved revenue growth of 9%, gained share in our businesses, outperformed on the merger and integration goals and had top-ranked client service globally. As we enter 2009, our business model works and we continue to maintain the capital strength needed in this uncertain market environment. I want to thank all of our employees, as our success is a reflection of their excellent work," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
"Our operating performance during the fourth quarter includes record revenue from our institutional servicing businesses and well-controlled operating expenses. These results were offset by securities write-downs reflecting their deterioration and enormous liquidity discounts for mortgage-backed securities. We believe that the actual incurred loss will ultimately be materially lower based on current assumptions. We should have the opportunity to earn back a substantial portion of the write-downs over the remaining lives of the securities."
Income from continuing operations, before an extraordinary item, and after preferred stock dividends, for the full-year 2008 totaled $1.409 billion, or $1.22 per common share, compared with $2.227 billion, or $2.38 per common share, before an extraordinary item, in 2007. Net income applicable to common stock for the full-year 2008 totaled $1.386 billion, or $1.20 per common share, compared with $2.039 billion, or $2.18 per common share, for full-year 2007.
 
1
(Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2008 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2007). Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Fourth Quarter Highlights of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
was $2.886 billion, comprised of $1.816 billion of fee and other revenue and $1.070 billion of net interest revenue, and included a pre-tax charge for the write-down of certain investment securities ($1.241 billion) in total fee and other revenue.
Total revenue
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
The was $60 million in the fourth quarter of 2008 compared with $20 million in the fourth quarter of 2007 and $30 million in the third quarter of 2008. During the fourth quarter of 2008, the total allowance for credit losses increased by $35 million and net charge-offs totaled $25 million.
provision for credit losses
was $2.875 billion. This compares to noninterest expense of $2.752 billion in the fourth quarter of 2007 and $3.332 billion in the third quarter of 2008.
Total noninterest expense
 
N/M  Not meaningful
 
 
 
Results for the fourth quarter of 2008 include an of $135 million. Excluding the impact of securities losses, the restructuring charge, support agreement charges, and M&I expenses the effective tax rate was 32.6% in the fourth quarter of 2008.
income tax benefit
The at the end of the fourth quarter of 2008 totaled $237 billion compared to $198 billion at Dec. 31, 2007 and $268 billion at Sept. 30, 2008. We continued to benefit from an above trend level of client deposits, particularly noninterest-bearing client deposits. In addition, at year end we maintained $53 billion in deposits with the Federal Reserve.
balance sheet
The was $ 4.1 billion at Dec. 31, 2008 compared with $2.8 billion at Sept. 30, 2008. The increase primarily resulted from wider credit spreads.
unrealized net of tax loss on our securities portfolio
The at Dec. 31, 2008 compared to Sept. 30, 2008 reflect the benefit we received from the $3 billion of Series B preferred stock issued to the U.S. Treasury in October of 2008 and a lower level of risk adjusted assets.
capital ratios
 
3
On Jan. 13, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 24 cents per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 3, 2009 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 23, 2009. The Company anticipates that future quarterly dividend declarations will be timed to correspond with the announcement of quarterly earnings.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $20.2 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $928 billion in assets under management and services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Dec. 31, 2008 and are available at (Investor Relationsfinancial reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 5 p.m. EST on Jan. 20, 2009. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The earnings release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review, will be available at beginning at approximately 4:30 p.m. EST on Jan. 20, 2009. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 20, 2009 at approximately 9 p.m. EST through Feb. 3, 2009 by dialing (866) 442-1776 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1076 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
7
 
 
8
Investment Securities Portfolio
At Dec. 31, 2008, our investment securities portfolio totaled $39.4 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities portfolio was $4.1 billion at Dec. 31, 2008. The unrealized net of tax loss at Sept. 30, 2008 was $2.8 billion. The increase compared to the prior quarter was primarily driven by wider credit spreads.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
Note: The "Watch list" includes those securities we view as having a higher risk of additional impairment charges.
Since the end of the third quarter, the housing market indicators and the broader economy have deteriorated significantly. Therefore, in the fourth quarter of 2008, we adjusted our modeling assumptions to reflect this further deterioration. Accordingly, we changed the modeling assumptions on all Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities ("RMBS") with the primary changes being on the default rates. In addition, to properly reflect the declining value of homes in the current foreclosure environment, we adjusted our RMBS loss severity assumptions to decrease the amount we expect to receive to cover the value of the original loan. As a result of these adjustments to our assumptions, a larger number of securities (primarily Alt-A) generated an expected loss and consequently, we recorded an impairment charge and wrote down to current market value those securities, resulting in a $1.2 billion pre-tax securities loss comprised of the following:
 
At Dec. 31, 2008, the expected incurred loss included in securities write-downs recorded in the fourth quarter of 2008 is estimated to be $208 million. The difference between the expected loss and the total impairment charges incurred during the fourth quarter of 2008 is largely driven by the market illiquidity relating to mortgage-backed securities. The underlying market discount rate rose throughout 2008, particularly during the fourth quarter, and accounted for the gap between the expected loss and the impairment charges. The expected loss to be incurred is determined based on a projected principal write-down of a mortgage-backed security that occurs when the losses on the underlying mortgage pool are expected to be large enough to cause a reduction in the total contractual amount of principal that we are entitled to receive pursuant to the terms of the security.
 
9
At the time of purchase, the Alt-A portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 715 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better-performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is approximately 13%. The unrealized loss on the Alt-A portfolio at Dec. 31, 2008 was $2.8 billion.
The home equity lines of credit ("HELOC") securities are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade. The securities write-downs in the fourth quarter of 2008 related to HELOC securities resulted from both a deterioration of specific securities combined with weak credit support due to below investment grade ratings of certain bond insurers.
Restructuring Charge
In November 2008, the Company announced that due to weakness in the global economy it would reduce its workforce by approximately 4%, or 1,800 positions. The goals of this workforce reduction are to reduce expense growth and further improve the efficiency of the organization. This program is expected to result in annualized savings of $160-170 million.
In December 2008, the Company recorded a pre-tax restructuring charge of $181 million or $0.09 per common share. This charge was comprised of $166 million for severance costs, $9 million of expense from stock-based award acceleration, $5 million of other compensation costs and $1 million of non-personnel expenses directly related to the workforce reduction. The restructuring charge is recorded as a separate line on the income statement. The Company also expects to record an additional related charge of approximately $20-25 million, pre-tax, of restructuring expense in the first half of 2009, primarily related to severance and accruals for vacant space.
Extraordinary Loss on Consolidation of Commercial Paper Conduit
On Dec. 30, 2008, we voluntarily called the first loss notes of Old Slip Funding LLC ("Old Slip"), making us the primary beneficiary and triggering the consolidation of Old Slip (approximately $125 million in assets). The consolidation resulted in the recognition of an extraordinary loss (non-cash accounting charge) of $26 million after tax, or $0.02 per common share, representing the current mark-to-market discount from par associated with spread-widening for the assets in Old Slip.
Series B-Perpetual Preferred Stock
On Oct. 28, 2008, we issued $3 billion of securities to the U.S. Department of the Treasury comprised of Series B preferred stock ($2.779 billion) and a warrant for common stock ($221 million) as part of the Troubled Asset Relief Program ("TARP") Capital Purchase Program authorized under the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act. The preferred dividends and the amortization of the discount on the Series B preferred stock reduced net income applicable to common stock by $33 million, or $ 0.03 per common share in the fourth quarter of 2008 and are expected to reduce earnings per share by approximately $0.16 per common share in 2009.
The proceeds from the Series B preferred stock have been utilized to improve the flow of funds in the financial markets. Specifically we have:
 
All of these efforts address the need to improve liquidity in the financial system and are consistent with our business model which is focused on institutional clients.
 
10
Nonperforming Assets
 
Consolidated Net Income Applicable to Common Stock, Including Discontinued Operations
Net income applicable to common stock, including discontinued operations, totaled $28 million, or $0.02 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2008, compared with $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008 and $520 million, or $0.45 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2007.
Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information included in this earnings release is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. This information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also reflect certain items that are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
11
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
12
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the effectiveness of the Company's business model; expectations with respect to global business environment; actual incurred losses on securities portfolio and the ability to earn back a substantial portion of the write-downs over the remaining lives of the securities; annualized savings from workforce reduction; assumptions with respect to expected loss from securities portfolio; additional restructuring charges; the timing of future quarterly dividend declarations; and the impact of preferred stock dividends and amortization of discount on earnings per share. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the Company) which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2007, the Company's quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of Jan. 20, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090126165433.txt.gz
TIME:20090126165433
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Review are with the fourth quarter of 2007 and all information is reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to workforce reduction program, including annualized savings and additional pre-tax charge; actual incurred losses on securities portfolio and the ability to earn back a substantial portion of the write-downs over the remaining lives of the securities; anticipated expenses in connection with participation in FDIC Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program; impact of preferred stock dividends and amortization of discount on earnings per share; estimated impact of varying scenarios on capital ratios and proforma capital ratios; impact of institutional credit strategy; asset servicing goals; statements with respect to the merger integration, including revenue synergies and targeted run rates, expense synergy targets and estimated merger and integration charges; as well as the Company's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions, and are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2007 , the Company's quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2008, and the Company's other filings with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of Jan. 20, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
NON-GAAP MEASURES
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Review, certain financial measures, which are noted, exclude or are adjusted for certain items. These adjustments or exclusions can impact revenue, noninterest expense, pre-tax income, net income and earnings per share amounts as well as related ratios and growth rates. We believe this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends in our business. We believe this information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: SILO/LILO/tax settlement charges and securities write-downs
Noninterest expense: Support agreement and restructuring charges, merger & integration and intangible amortization expenses
Earnings per share: SILO/LILO/tax settlement charges, securities write-downs, support agreement and restructuring charges, merger & integration and intangible amortization expenses.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2008 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. fourth quarter 2007)
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
(a)
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps - basis points.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Dec. 31, 2008, our investment securities portfolio totaled $39.4 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our total securities portfolio was $4.1 billion at Dec. 31, 2008. The unrealized net of tax loss at Sept. 30, 2008 was $2.8 billion. The increase compared to the prior quarter was primarily driven by wider credit spreads.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
Note: The "Watch List" includes those securities we view as having a higher risk of additional impairment charges.
Since the end of the third quarter, the housing market indicators and the broader economy have deteriorated significantly. Therefore, in the fourth quarter of 2008, we adjusted our modeling assumptions to reflect this further deterioration. Accordingly, we changed the modeling assumptions on all Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (RMBS) with the primary changes being on the default rates. In addition, to properly reflect the declining value of homes in the current foreclosure environment, the Company adjusted its RMBS loss severity assumptions to decrease the amount it expects to receive to cover the value of the original loan. As a result of these adjustments to our assumptions, a larger number of securities (primarily Alt-A) generated an expected loss and consequently, we recorded an impairment charge and wrote down to current market value those securities, resulting in a $1.2 billion pre-tax securities loss comprised of the following:
 
At Dec. 31, 2008, the expected loss included in securities write-downs recorded in the fourth quarter of 2008 is estimated to be $208 million. The difference between the expected loss and the total impairment charges incurred during the fourth quarter of 2008 is large driven by the market illiquidity relating to mortgage-backed securities. The underlying market discount rate rose throughout 2008, particularly during the fourth quarter, and accounted for the gap between the expected loss and the impairment charges. The expected loss is determined based on a projected principal write-down of a mortgage-backed security that occurs when the losses on the underlying
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
mortgage pool are expected to be large enough to cause a reduction in the total contractual amount of principal that the Company is entitled to receive pursuant to the terms of the security.
At the time of purchase, the Alt-A portfolio's weighted-average FICO score was 715 and its weighted-average LTV was 74%. Approximately 50% of the total portfolio is supported by better performing fixed-rate collateral. Finally, the portfolio's weighted-average current credit enhancement is approximately 13%. The unrealized loss on the Alt-A portfolio at Dec. 31, 2008 was $2.8 billion.
The home equity lines of credit ("HELOC") securities are tested for impairment based on the quality of the underlying security and the condition of the monoline insurer providing credit support. Securities were deemed impaired if we expected they would not be repaid in full without the support of the insurer and the insurer was rated below investment grade. The securities write-downs in the fourth quarter of 2008 related to HELOC securities resulted from both a deterioration of specific securities combined with weakening credit support due to below investment grade ratings of certain bond insurers.
RESTRUCTURING CHARGE
In November 2008, the Company announced that due to weakness in the global economy it would reduce its workforce by approximately 4%, or 1,800 positions. The goals of this workforce reduction are to reduce expense growth and further improve the efficiency of the organization. This program is expected to result in annualized savings of $160-170 million.
In December 2008, the Company recorded a pre-tax restructuring charge of $181 million or $0.09 per common share. This charge was comprised of $166 million for severance costs, $9 million of expense from stock-based award acceleration, $5 million of other compensation costs and $1 million of non-personnel expenses directly related to the workforce reduction. The restructuring charge is recorded as a separate line on the income statement. The Company also expects to record an additional related charge of approximately $20-25 million, pre-tax, of restructuring expense in the first half of 2009, primarily related to severance and accruals for vacant space.
EXTRAORDINARY LOSS ON CONSOLIDATION OF COMMERCIAL PAPER CONDUIT
On Dec. 30, 2008, we voluntarily called the first loss notes of Old Slip Funding LLC ("Old Slip"), making us the primary beneficiary and triggering the consolidation of Old Slip (approximately $125 million in assets). The consolidation resulted in the recognition of an extraordinary loss (non-cash accounting charge) of $26 million after tax, or $0.02 per common share, representing the current mark-to-market discount from par associated with spread-widening for the assets in Old Slip.
BALANCE SHEET
The balance sheet at the end of the fourth quarter of 2008 totaled $237 billion compared to $198 billion at Dec. 31, 2007 and $268 billion at Sept. 30, 2008. We continued to benefit from an above trend level of client deposits, particularly noninterest-bearing client deposits. In addition, at year end, we maintained $53 billion in deposits with the Federal Reserve.
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SERIES B-PERPETUAL PREFERRED STOCK
On Oct. 28, 2008, we issued $3 billion of securities to the U.S. Department of the Treasury comprised of Series B preferred stock ($2.779 billion) and a warrant for common stock ($221 million) as part of the Troubled Asset Relief Program ("TARP") Capital Purchase Program authorized under the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act. The preferred dividends and the amortization of the discount on the Series B preferred stock reduced net income applicable to common stock by $33 million, or $ 0.03 per common share in the fourth quarter of 2008 and are expected to reduce earnings per share by approximately $0.16 per common share in 2009.
The proceeds from the Series B preferred stock have been utilized to improve the flow of funds in the financial markets. Specifically we have:
 
All of these efforts address the need to improve liquidity in the financial system and are consistent with our business model which is focused on institutional clients.
CAPITAL RATIOS
The capital ratios at Dec. 31, 2008 compared with Sept. 30, 2008 reflect the benefit we received from the $3 billion of Series B preferred stock issued to the U.S. Treasury in October of 2008 and a lower level of risk adjusted assets.
 
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
STRESS TESTING CAPITAL RATIOS FOR INVESTMENT PORTFOLIO VALUATION DECLINES
We routinely stress test the adequacy of our capital base by modeling the impact to our Tier 1 capital and tangible capital ratios for impairments and valuation declines related to our investment securities portfolio.
The table below provides pro forma estimates of the Tier 1, tangible and adjusted tangible capital ratios, utilizing ratios at Dec. 31, 2008 as the base, adjusted for the estimated impact of varying levels of 2009 First Call earnings estimates, and stress tested at increasing levels of impairments and valuation declines.
 
N/A = Stress testing for the Tangible Common equity to assets ratio only completed for $0.5, $1, $2 and $3 billion.
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INSTITUTIONAL CREDIT STRATEGY
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
1) Revenue Synergies
 
 
2) Expense Synergies
 
 
3) Merger & Integration Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation)
 
4) Service Quality Goals for 2010 - Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> Global Custodian survey (released January 2009)
> Global Investor survey (May 2008)
> R&M Global Custody survey (March 2008)
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high-net-worth individuals and families, family offices and business enterprises, charitable gift programs and endowments and foundations)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides institutional trust and custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, execution, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, the results of Mellon United National Bank, business exits, merger and integration expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 21
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information included in this earnings release is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. This information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also reflect certain items that are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
 
 
Page 22
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q08 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
Page 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or "BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity.
The results prior to the consummation of the merger, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q06 - 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following acquisitions/divestitures have impacted the reporting of our results:
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). The financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
During the first quarter of 2008, we sold the B-Trade and G-Trade execution businesses to BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. We maintain a 35% equity interest in BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. The historical results of the B-Trade and G-Trade businesses are included in the Clearing Services segment.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 2, 2006, Mellon Financial Corporation completed the acquisition of Walter Scott & Partners. The financial results are included in the Asset Management segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired JPMorgan Chase's Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
The following transactions have impacted the reporting of our results:
Securities losses  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007 and first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2008.
Restructuring charge  Recorded a charge related to the 4% global workforce reduction.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of The Bank of New York/Mellon merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007 and the first and second quarters of 2008).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow. In addition, page 15 provides additional details on the impact of the applicable items on total revenue as well the impact on Continuing operations fully diluted earnings per share.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
Where average deposits in a business segment are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: See pages 3 through 5 for additional details of revenue/expense items impacting continuing operations.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: During the first quarter of 2008, we sold the B-Trade and G-Trade execution businesses to BNY ConvergEx Group LLC. The historical results of these businesses are included in the Clearing Services segment and have historically contributed approximately $50-60 million of revenue and $10-15 million of pretax income on a quarterly basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: The Other segment primarily includes the results of leasing operations, corporate treasury activities, business exits and corporate overhead. On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - GAAP TO NON-GAAP RECONCILIATIONS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
Note: See pages 8-14 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective sector results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
 
 
Note: See pages 8-14 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective sector results.
n/mnot meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090223164248.txt.gz
TIME:20090223164248
EVENTS:	Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefit Plans	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefit Plans
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.04. Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefits Plans
On February 17, 2009, the Plan Administrator for the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan and The Employee Savings & Investment Plan of the Bank of New York Company Inc. (collectively, the "Plans") notified The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") of a blackout period impacting the Plans, in accordance with the requirements of Section 101(i)(2)(E) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"). The blackout period is expected to begin on Wednesday, March 25, 2009 at 4:00 pm Eastern Time and is expected to end during the week of April 6, 2009 (the "Blackout Period"). The purpose of the Blackout Period is (i) to implement the merger of the Plans to form The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 401(k) Savings Plan (the "BNY Mellon 401(k) Plan"); (ii) to adopt new investment options for the BNY Mellon 401(k) Plan; and (iii) to effect a transition of the Plans' administration to a new recordkeeper.
During the Blackout Period, participants in the Plans will be temporarily unable to access their Plan accounts, including being unable to direct or diversify investments, change contribution rates, or obtain loans or distributions. Notice of the Blackout Period was sent to all participants and beneficiaries under the Plans on February 17, 2009.
Since the Plans include BNY Mellon common stock as an investment option, on February 23, 2009, BNY Mellon sent a separate notice to its directors and executive officers informing them of the Blackout Period and the prohibitions on their directly or indirectly purchasing, exercising, selling, or otherwise transferring equity securities of BNY Mellon in any non-exempt transactions during the Blackout Period (the "Insider Notice"). The Insider Notice was provided to BNY Mellon's directors and executive officers pursuant to the requirements of Section 306(a) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and Rule 104 of the Securities and Exchange Commission's Regulation BTR.
A copy of the Insider Notice is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein it its entirety.
During the Blackout Period and for a period of two years after the end date thereof, a security holder or other interested person may obtain, without charge, information regarding the Blackout Period, including the actual end date of the Blackout Period. This information is available by contacting Richard Pearlman at The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, PA 15219 or via telephone at (412) 234-1029.
Item 9.01  Financial Statement and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Pursuant to the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the "Act"), The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") is required to notify you of upcoming temporary restrictions that will be placed on your ability to engage in certain activities regarding BNY Mellon securities. These temporary restrictions are mandated by the Act due to the blackout period impacting the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan and The Employee Savings & Investment Plan of the Bank of New York Company Inc. (collectively, the "Plans").
The blackout period for the Plans is expected to begin on Wednesday, March 25, 2009 at 4:00 pm Eastern Time and is expected to end during the week of April 6, 2009 (the "Blackout Period"). The purpose of the Blackout Period is (i) to implement the merger of the Plans to form The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 401(k) Savings Plan (the "BNY Mellon 401(k) Plan"); (ii) to adopt new investment options for the BNY Mellon 401(k) Plan; and (iii) to effect a transition of the Plans' administration to a new recordkeeper.
During the Blackout Period, participants in the Plans will be temporarily unable to access their Plan accounts, including being unable to direct or diversify investments, change contribution rates, or obtain loans or distributions. These restrictions were described in a Blackout Period notice that was distributed to each participant and beneficiary under the Plans on February 17, 2009. The form of notice applicable to participants and beneficiaries in each Plan is attached.
Since the Plans include BNY Mellon common stock as an investment option, the Act requires that you be prohibited from directly or indirectly purchasing, exercising, selling, or otherwise transferring equity securities of BNY Mellon during the Blackout Period other than in an exempt transaction if those securities were acquired in connection with your service or employment as a director or executive officer of BNY Mellon. These prohibitions are in addition to any other restrictions to which you may be subject under the BNY Mellon Personal Securities Trading Policy.
For more information about the Blackout Period, or to obtain the actual end date of the Blackout Period, please contact Richard Pearlman at The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, One Mellon Center, 500 Grant Street, Pittsburgh, PA 15219 or via telephone at (412) 234-1029.
concerning your rights
Important Notice
under The Bank of New York Employee Savings and Investment Plan
February 16, 2009
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has selected ING as the new recordkeeper for The Bank of New York Employee Savings and Investment Plan. The move to ING will take place during the late March and early April 2009 timeframe. This notice provides you with important information about your account and how it will transition to ING.
 
 
This period, during which you will be unable to exercise these rights otherwise available under The Bank of New York Employee Savings and Investment Plan, is commonly referred to as the "transition period" in other communication materials and includes a "blackout period" when you will not have access to your account. Whether or not you are planning retirement in the near future, we encourage you to carefully consider how this transition and blackout period may affect your retirement planning, as well as your overall financial plan.
 
 
For your long-term retirement security, you should give careful consideration to the importance of a well-balanced and diversified investment portfolio, taking into account all your assets, income and investments. You should be aware that there is a risk to holding substantial portions of your assets in the securities of any one company, as individual securities tend to have wider price swings, up and down, in short periods of time, than investments in diversified funds. Stocks that have wide price swings might have a large loss during the blackout period, and you would not be able to direct the sale of such stocks from your account during the blackout period.
 
 
 
BNYSO021609
concerning your rights
Important Notice
under the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan
February 16, 2009
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation has selected ING as the new recordkeeper for the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan. The move to ING will take place during the late March and early April, 2009 timeframe. This notice provides you with important information about your account and how it will transition to ING.
 
 
This period, during which you will be unable to exercise these rights otherwise available under the Mellon 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan, is commonly referred to as the "transition period" in other communication materials and includes a "blackout period" when you will not have access to your account. Whether or not you are planning retirement in the near future, we encourage you to carefully consider how this transition and blackout period may affect your retirement planning, as well as your overall financial plan.
 
 
For your long-term retirement security, you should give careful consideration to the importance of a well-balanced and diversified investment portfolio, taking into account all your assets, income and investments. You should be aware that there is a risk to holding substantial portions of your assets in the securities of any one company, as individual securities tend to have wider price swings, up and down, in short periods of time, than investments in diversified funds. Stocks that have wide price swings might have a large loss during the blackout period, and you would not be able to direct the sale of such stocks from your account during the blackout period.
 
 
 
MELSO021609


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090417170258.txt.gz
TIME:20090417170258
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 14, 2009, the Board of Directors of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") amended and restated the By-Laws of the Corporation to reflect certain changes: (1) Section 9 of Article Two was amended to reflect that at least 25% of regular meetings of the Board of Directors are no longer required to be held in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania; (2) Section 1 of Article Three was amended to reflect that in the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee of the Board of Directors, specific direction for replacing "Continuing BNY Directors" and "Continuing Mellon Directors", as such terms are defined in Article Five of the By-Laws, are no longer required, (3) Section 5 of Article Five was amended to reflect that each of the Board of Directors' Human Resources and Compensation Committee, Executive Committee, Audit Committee, Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee and Risk Committee are no longer required to be composed of certain numbers of "Continuing BNY Directors" and "Continuing Mellon Directors", as such terms are defined in Article Five of the By-Laws, and chaired by such directors, (4) Section 3 of Article Three and Section 7 of Article Four were amended to reflect the change of the name of the committee of the Board of Directors formerly called the "Audit and Examining Committee" to the "Audit Committee" and (5) Section 9 of Article Two and Section 4 of Article Five reference the Board of Directors' constating document as the "Corporate Governance Guidelines" rather than "Board Policies".
Item 9.01  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
 
Section 9. REGULAR MEETINGS. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as the Board of Directors shall determine in or which are otherwise furnished to the Directors at Organization Meeting, and if so determined or furnished, notice of such meetings need not be given.
its Board Policies adopted at
its
Organization Meeting
each
year
accordance
with the Corporate Governance Guidelines
such
its
each year
, provided that at least 25 percent of such regular meetings (but if the number of such meetings is less than eight, no more than two per year) shall be held in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania
Section 1. APPOINTMENT; POWERS. The Board of Directors may appoint one or more standing or temporary committees consisting of two or more Directors. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member. The Board of Directors may invest such committees with such powers and authority, subject to such conditions, as it may see fit, but no such committee shall have the power or authority with respect to the following matters: (i) approving or adopting, or recommending to the stockholders, any action or matter expressly required by law to be submitted to stockholders for approval or (ii) adopting, amending or repealing these By-Laws.
; provided, that during the Specified Period (as defined in Article Five), a Continuing BNY Director (as defined in Article Five) shall be appointed as an alternate for a member of the committee who is a Continuing BNY Director and a Continuing Mellon Director (as defined in Article Five) shall be appointed as an alternate for a member of the committee who is a Continuing Mellon Director
Section 3. AUDIT COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, an Audit Committee, which,
AND
EXAMINING
and Examining
so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Audit Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Audit Committee.
and Examining
and Examining
Section 7. CHIEF AUDITOR. Subject to any requirement of law or the rules of any exchange on which shares of Common Stock of the Corporation are listed, the Board of Directors shall appoint a Chief Auditor who shall be the chief auditing officer of the Corporation. He or she shall report to the Audit Committee and shall continuously examine the affairs of the Corporation under the general supervision and direction of the Board of Directors. He or she shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Committee or the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may also appoint other officers who shall perform such auditing duties as may be assigned to them by the Board of Directors or the Chief Auditor of the Corporation.
and Examining
Auditing and
Examining
Audit
Section 4. LEAD DIRECTOR. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time, the lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing BNY Director selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee. During the period beginning on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six month anniversary of the Effective Time, the lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing Mellon Director selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. Thereafter, the lead Director shall be a Director selected by a majority of the entire Board of Directors. The Lead Director shall have such duties and responsibilities as may be set forth in the Corporation's from time to time.
Board
policies
Corporate
Governance Guidelines
Section 5.
COMPOSITION OF COMMITTEES.
During the Specified Period, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing Mellon Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing BNY Directors on the Committee, and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, each of the Executive Committee, Audit and Examining Committee, Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee and Risk Committee shall be comprised of at least five members with a number of Continuing BNY Directors that is greater by one than the number of Continuing Mellon Directors on the Committee and a Continuing BNY Director shall be
. Until the end of the Specified Period or the date on which the Board of Directors determines to terminate the Integration Committee (which shall not be earlier than the Succession Date) (such termination date, the "Integration Date"), the Integration Committee shall be comprised of two Continuing Mellon Directors and two Continuing BNY Directors and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of such Committee. At the end of such period, the Integration Committee shall be disbanded.
the
chair of each such Committee. During the Specified Period, the Corporate Social Responsibility Committee shall be comprised of at least four members, of whom two shall be Continuing BNY Directors and two shall be Continuing Mellon
Directors
INTEGRATION
COMMITTEE


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090422160836.txt.gz
TIME:20090422160836
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On April 21, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2009 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
(d)    EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported first quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $322 million, or $0.28 per common share. This compares to income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $749 million, or $0.65 per common share, in the first quarter of 2008 and income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders, before an extraordinary item, of $53 million, or $0.05 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2008.
NEW YORK, April 21, 2009 
"In a difficult market environment, we continued to focus on winning new business, managing expenses and building the capital base. Our efforts resulted in market share gains in most of our businesses, a 10% decline in operating expenses and stronger capital ratios. The decision to reduce the dividend was not made lightly, and reflects our commitment to build capital further, pursue growth opportunities and, with the permission of our regulators, repay the government's investment in BNY Mellon. We anticipate returning to our historic payout ratio as soon as practical.
"Given our global leadership position in asset management and securities servicing and the strength of our balance sheet, we remain confident in our ability to manage successfully through this global recession," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the first quarter of 2009 and are compared to the first quarter of 2008. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
First Quarter Highlights
was $2.930 billion, comprised of $2.138 billion of fee and other revenue and $792 million of net interest revenue, and included a pre-tax charge for the write-down of certain investments ($347 million) in fee and other revenue.
Total revenue
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
The was $80 million in the first quarter of 2009 compared with $16 million in the first quarter of 2008 and $60 million in the fourth quarter of 2008. During the first quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased by $30 million and net charge-offs totaled $50 million.
provision for credit losses
was $2.342 billion. This compares to noninterest expense of $2.612 billion in the first quarter of 2008 and $2.870 billion in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Total noninterest expense
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
The was 27.2% in the first quarter of 2009. Excluding the impact of investment write-downs, restructuring charges, support agreement charges, goodwill impairment and M&I expenses, the effective tax rate was 32.6% in the first quarter of 2009.
effective tax rate
 
 
 
 
3
Also, on April 21, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 9 cents per common share. This cash dividend is payable on May 11, 2009 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on May 1, 2009. The decision to reduce the quarterly dividend from 24 cents reflects our commitment to build capital, pursue growth opportunities and, with the permission of our regulators, repay the government's investment in the Company.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this earnings release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized. Certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. Where financial measures are presented excluding certain specified amounts, we believe the presentation enhances investor understanding of period-to-period results.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through March 31, 2009 and are available at (Investor Relations  financial reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on April 21, 2009. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplement financial trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 21, 2009. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 21, 2009 at approximately 2:00 p.m. EDT through May 5, 2009 by dialing (866) 442-1776 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1076 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
6
 
 
7
 
 
8
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, including discontinued operations, totaled $322 million, or $0.28 per common share, in the first quarter of 2009, compared with $28 million, or $0.02 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2008 and $746 million, or $0.65 per common share, in the first quarter of 2008.
Supplemental information  Explanation of non-GAAP financial measures
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
9
 
 
10
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's ability to manage its business through the global recession; expectations with respect to the timing and amount of future dividends; building capital, pursuing growth opportunities and repayment of the TARP investment. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of April 21, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
11


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090427170640.txt.gz
TIME:20090427170640
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
All narrative comparisons in this Quarterly Earnings Review are with the first quarter of 2008 and all information is
reported on a continuing operations basis, unless otherwise noted.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, investments in assets subsequent to the end of first quarter of 2009; FDIC deposit assessments; expectations with respect to service quality; expectations with respect to the timing and amount of future dividends and growth; repayment of the TARP investment; and expected losses on the securities portfolio; as well as the Company's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings review speak only as of April 21, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
NON-GAAP MEASURES
Throughout this Quarterly Earnings Review, certain financial measures, which are noted, exclude and/or are adjusted for certain items. These adjustments or exclusions can impact revenue, noninterest expense, pre-tax income, net income and earnings per share amounts as well as related ratios and growth rates. We believe this supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends in our business. We believe this information facilitates comparisons with prior periods and reflects the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These items also are excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment write-downs and SILO/LILO charges.
Noninterest expense: Support agreement and restructuring charges, merger & integration ("M&I") expenses; intangible amortization expense and goodwill impairment.
Earnings per share: Investment write-downs, SILO/LILO/tax settlement charges, support agreement and restructuring charges, M&I expenses, intangible amortization expense and goodwill impairment.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
)
FIRST QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (vs. first quarter 2008
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2009, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $36.6 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our available for sale securities portfolio was $4.5 billion at March 31, 2009. The unrealized net of tax loss at Dec. 31, 2008 was $4.1 billion.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
Since the end of the fourth quarter, the housing market indicators and the broader economy continued to deteriorate. To reflect the declining value of homes in the current environment, we adjusted our non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities ("RMBS") loss severity assumptions to decrease the amount we expect to receive to cover the value of the original loan. These adjustments to our assumptions, along with projected defaults, generated a loss in our Alt-A securities portfolio of $125 million in the first quarter of 2009.
The following table provides the detail of securities portfolio losses for the first quarter of 2009.
 
Effective March 31, 2009, the Company adopted FAS 115-2 "Recognition and Presentation of Other-Than-Temporary Impairment (OTTI)" which changes the accounting for OTTI. As a result, in the first quarter of 2009, the expected loss component of $295 million was recorded as a securities loss in earnings and the non-credit related component of $1.290 billion remains in accumulated OCI.
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
 
Source: Industry analysis/company reports
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
Revenue Synergies
 
Expense Synergies
 
 
 
M&I Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation)
 
Service Quality Goals for 2010  Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> R&M Global Custody Survey (March 2009)
> Global Custodian Survey (January 2009)
> Global Investor Survey (May 2008)
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the execution business to the Other segment from the Clearing Services segment. Historical segment results for Clearing Services and Other have been restated to reflect this change.
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, family offices and business enterprises, charitable gift programs and endowments and foundations)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, the results of Mellon United National Bank, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
Reported amounts are presented in accordance with GAAP. We believe that the supplemental non-GAAP information is useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of our business. We believe they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which our management internally monitors financial performance. These non-GAAP items are also excluded from our segment measures used internally to evaluate segment performance because management does not consider them to be particularly relevant or useful in evaluating the operating performance of our business segments.
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page 21
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 1Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page 22

Exhibit 99.2
 
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or "BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity.
The results prior to the consummation of the merger, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (2006, 1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following transactions have impacted the reporting of our results:
On Jan. 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160 which resulted in a reclassification of Minority Interest, to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). The financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. In addition, the financial results of Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired JPMorgan Chase's Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
The following transactions have impacted the reporting of our results:
Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007 and full year of 2008, and the first quarter of 2009.
Restructuring charge  Recorded charges in the fourth quarter of 2008 and first quarter of 2009 related to the 4% global workforce reduction.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of The Bank of New York/Mellon merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007, first and second quarters of 2008 and the first quarter of 2009).
Goodwill impairment  Recorded a $50 million pre-tax charge in the first quarter of 2009 related to the Mellon United National Bank subsidiary.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow. In addition, page 15 provides additional details on the impact of the applicable items on total revenue as well the impact on Continuing operations fully diluted earnings per share.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
Where average deposits in a business segment are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER- 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION - GAAP TO NON-GAAP RECONCILIATIONS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
Note: See pages 8-14 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective sector results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
 
Note: See pages 8-14 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective sector results.
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090508091509.txt.gz
TIME:20090508091509
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 7, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release in connection with the results of the stress test conducted on large U.S. banks by government regulators. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, May 7, 2009 - The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today confirmed that it is not required to raise additional capital as a result of the stress test conducted on the large U.S. banks by government regulators.
"We are pleased with our very favorable results. Applying the results of the stress test, we have estimated that our current healthy capital ratios would strengthen significantly even under the adverse conditions modeled in what proved to be a tough test," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon. "For our clients worldwide, the results confirm that we have the clear ability to meet their needs in a very challenging environment."
Kelly said the results also reinforce the company's ability to repay the government's capital investment as part of the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). "Hopefully, this will permit us to accelerate the repayment process, subject to approval from our regulators, and provide an excellent return for U.S. taxpayers," he said.
Earlier this week, The Bank of New York Mellon priced the sale of a $1.5 billion non-guaranteed five-year and ten-year senior debt offering that received very strong investor interest. The offering is expected to close on May 12, 2009.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's business and its expectations with respect to the repayment of the TARP investment and the closing of the debt offering. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090511172816.txt.gz
TIME:20090511172816
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
Press Release
 
     The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today announced a proposed offering of $1 billion of its common stock to the public. Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated will serve as joint bookrunning managers for the offering.
NEW YORK, May 11, 2009 
     The underwriters will have a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 15 percent of the offered amount of the company's common stock.
     Subject to consultation with the company's banking regulators, the company intends to formally notify the U.S. Department of Treasury of its intent to repurchase its preferred stock and the warrant for its common stock held by the Treasury under the Troubled Asset Relief Program  Capital Purchase Program. The company may use part of the proceeds of this offering to fund any such repurchase or for general corporate purposes.
     The Bank of New York Mellon has filed a shelf registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and will file a prospectus supplement related to this offering. Prospective investors should read the registration statement (including the base prospectus), the prospectus supplement and other documents the company has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the company and the offering. This announcement does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of any offer to buy the common stock, nor shall there be any offer or sale of the common stock in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful. The offering will be made only by means of a prospectus. Investors may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Additionally, the prospectus can be requested by contacting Goldman, Sachs & Co., Attention: Prospectus Department, 85 Broad Street, New York, NY 10004, telephone: 212-902-1171 or 866-471-2526, fax: 212-902-9316, email: Prospectus-ny@ny.email.gs.com; or Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated, Attention: Prospectus Department, 180 Varick Street, 2nd Floor, New York, New York, 10014, telephone (866) 718-1649, or by e-mailing prospectus@morganstanley.com.
     The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day.
     The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's expectations with respect to the repayment of the TARP investment. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090512114646.txt.gz
TIME:20090512114646
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

 
 
 
Press Release
 
     The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, announced it has priced an upsized $1.2 billion offering of 42 million shares of its common stock at $28.75 per share. The underwriters will have a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 6.3 million shares of the company's common stock.
NEW YORK, May 12, 2009 
     Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Morgan Stanley are serving as joint bookrunning managers for the offering. Barclays Capital Inc.; BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC; Citigroup Global Markets Inc.; Merrill Lynch & Co.; and UBS Securities LLC are acting as co-managers for the offering.
     This announcement does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of any offer to buy the common stock, nor shall there be any offer or sale of the common stock in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful.
     Copies of the registration statement, the prospectus supplement and other documents the company has filed with the SEC are available for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at . Additionally, the prospectus can be requested by contacting Goldman, Sachs & Co., Attention: Prospectus Department, 85 Broad Street, New York, NY 10004, telephone: 212-902-1171 or 866-471-2526, fax: 212-902-9316, email: ; or Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated, Attention: Prospectus Department, 180 Varick Street, 2nd Floor, New York, New York, 10014, telephone (866) 718-1649, or by e-mailing .
www.sec.gov
Prospectus-ny@ny.email.gs.com
prospectus@morganstanley.com
     The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090515103448.txt.gz
TIME:20090515103448
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
ITEM 1.01. ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 1.1
Execution Version
May 11, 2009
Goldman, Sachs & Co. Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
     As representatives (the "")
Representatives
     of the several Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto,
c/o 85 Broad Street New York, New York 10004
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation registered as a financial holding company and a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (the ""), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the "") an aggregate of 42,000,000 shares (the "") and, at the election of the Underwriters up to 6,300,000 additional shares (the "") of common stock ($0.01 par value) of the Company (the Firm Securities and the Optional Securities that the Underwriters elect to purchase pursuant to Section 2 hereof being collectively called the "").
Company
Underwriters
Firm Securities
Optional Securities
Securities
     1. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties
          (a) An "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-144261, 333-144261-01, 333-144261-02, 333-144261-03, 333-144261-04, 333-144261-05, 333-144261-06 and 333-144261-07) in respect of the Securities has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; such registration statement, and any post-effective amendment thereto, became effective on filing; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of such registration statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose has been initiated or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company (the base prospectus filed as part of such registration statement, in the form in which it has most recently been filed with the Commission on or prior to the date of this Agreement, is hereinafter called the ""; any preliminary prospectus (including any preliminary prospectus supplement) relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act is
Act
Commission
Basic Prospectus
 
hereinafter called a ""; the various parts of such registration statement, including all exhibits thereto but excluding any Form T-1 and including any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities that is filed with the Commission and deemed by virtue of Rule 430B to be part of such registration statement, each as amended at the time such part of the registration statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the ""; the Basic Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as defined in Section 1(c) hereof), is hereinafter called the ""; the form of the final prospectus relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof is hereinafter called the ""; any reference herein to the Basic Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act, as of the date of such prospectus; any reference to any amendment or supplement to the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and any documents filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), and incorporated therein, in each case after the date of the Basic Prospectus, such Preliminary Prospectus, or the Prospectus, as the case may be; any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the effective date of the Registration Statement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement; and any "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433 under the Act relating to the Securities is hereinafter called an "");
Preliminary Prospectus
Registration Statement
Pricing Prospectus
Prospectus
Exchange Act
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
          (b) No order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been received by the Company, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein;
provided
however
          (c) For the purposes of this Agreement, the "" is 8:25 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of this Agreement. The Pricing Prospectus, as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule II(a) hereto does not conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, and each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as supplemented by and taken together with the Pricing Prospectus as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances
Applicable Time
 
under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to statements or omissions made in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein;
provided
however
          (d) The documents incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein;
provided
however
          (e) The Registration Statement conforms, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, in the case of the Registration Statement, as of the applicable effective date as to each part of the Registration Statement, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and in the case of the Prospectus, as of the applicable filing date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein;
provided
however
          (f) Except as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Prospectus, (i) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any transactions, not in the ordinary course of business, that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis and (ii) there has not been any material adverse effect on, or any development involving a prospective material adverse effect on, the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operation of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or adversely affect the compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder, other than, with respect to clause (ii), any such effect resulting from changes in the general economic or equity or debt market
 
conditions in the Unites States or changes in the financial services industry in general and not specifically relating to the Company or its subsidiaries (a "");
Material Adverse Effect
          (g) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
          (h) Each of The Bank of New York Mellon, BNY Mellon, N.A. and Pershing Group, LLC (each, a "") has been duly incorporated, established or formed and is validly existing as a corporation, banking corporation or association, or other applicable type of entity, as applicable, in good standing (to the extent good standing is applicable in such jurisdiction) under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, establishment or formation, as applicable, and has the corporate, limited liability company or other organizational power and authority to own its properties and to conduct its business as and to the extent described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other applicable type of entity and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification, except where any failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the only "significant subsidiaries" of the Company, within the meaning assigned to such term in Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission, are The Bank of New York Mellon and Pershing Group, LLC;
Significant Subsidiary
          (i) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended); and, except for directors' qualifying shares, all issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity;
          (j) The unissued Securities to be issued and sold by the Company to the Underwriters hereunder have been duly and validly authorized and, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein and will be duly and validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable;
          (k) The issue and sale of the Securities and the compliance by the Company with this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the
 
Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "") or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended (the "") or (iii) result in any violation of the provisions of any statute or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or any of their properties, except in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually or in aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any such court or governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement except (x) such as have been obtained under the Act and (y) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
Certificate of Incorporation
By-Laws
FINRA
          (l) The statements set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of Common Stock" and "Description of Capital Stock", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the common stock ($0.01 par value) or the preferred stock, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Certain Regulatory Considerations", "Certain United States Federal Tax Consequences to Non-U.S. Holders of Common Stock" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
          (m) Other than as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or of which any property of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is the subject, which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to the Company's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
          (n) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof, will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "");
Investment Company Act
          (o) (A) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus), and (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) under the Act) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 under the Act, the Company was a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; and (B) at the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule
 
164(h)(2) under the Act) of the Securities, the Company was not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act;
          (p) The Company maintains a system of internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or under their supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective and the Company is not aware of any material weaknesses in its internal control over financial reporting;
          (q) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting; and
          (r) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act; such disclosure controls and procedures have been designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company and its subsidiaries is made known to the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer by others within those entities; and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective.
     2. . Subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, (a) the Company agrees to issue and sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at a purchase price per share of $27.8875, the number of Firm Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto and (b) in the event and to the extent that the Underwriters shall exercise the election to purchase Optional Securities as provided below, the Company agrees to issue and sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the purchase price per share set forth in clause (a) of this Section 2, that portion of the number of Optional Securities as to which such election shall have been exercised (to be adjusted by you so as to eliminate fractional shares) determined by multiplying such number of Optional Securities by a fraction, the numerator of which is the maximum number of Optional Securities which such Underwriter is entitled to purchase as set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto and the denominator of which is the maximum number of Optional Securities that all of the Underwriters are entitled to purchase hereunder.
Purchase and Sale of Securities
          The Company hereby grants to the Underwriters the right to purchase at their election up to 6,300,000 Optional Securities, at the purchase price per share set forth in the paragraph above, that the purchase price per Optional Share shall be reduced by an amount per share equal to any dividends or distributions declared by the Company and payable on the Firm Securities but not payable on the Optional Securities. Any such election to purchase Optional Securities may be exercised only by written notice from you to the Company, given
provided
 
within a period of 30 calendar days after the date of this Agreement, setting forth the aggregate number of Optional Securities to be purchased and the date on which such Optional Securities are to be delivered, as determined by you but in no event earlier than the First Time of Delivery (as defined in Section 4 hereof) or, unless you and the Company otherwise agree in writing, earlier than two or later than ten business days after the date of such notice.
     3. . Upon the authorization by you of the release of the Securities, the several Underwriters propose to offer the Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus.
The Offering
     4. . (a) The Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in definitive form, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Company shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Representatives, through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company (""), for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account specified by the Company to the Representatives at least forty-eight hours in advance. The Company will cause the certificates representing the Securities to be made available for checking and packaging at least twenty-four hours prior to the Time of Delivery (as defined below) with respect thereto at the office of DTC or its designated custodian (the ""). The time and date of such delivery and payment shall be, with respect to the Firm Shares, 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on May 15, 2009 or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing, and, with respect to the Optional Shares, 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the date specified by the Representatives in the written notice given by the Representatives of the Underwriters' election to purchase such Optional Shares, or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. Such time and date for delivery of the Firm Shares is herein called the "", such time and date for delivery of the Optional Shares, if not the First Time of Delivery, is herein called the "", and each such time and date for delivery is herein called a "".
Settlement
DTC
Designated Office
First Time of Delivery
Second Time of Delivery
Time of Delivery
          (b) The documents to be delivered at each Time of Delivery by or on behalf of the parties hereto pursuant to Section 8 hereof, including the cross-receipt for the Securities and any additional documents requested by the Underwriters pursuant to Section 8(k) hereof, will be delivered at the offices of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, One Liberty Plaza, New York, New York 10006 (the ""), and the Securities will be delivered at the Designated Office, all at such Time of Delivery. A meeting will be held at the Closing Location at 4:00 p.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next preceding such Time of Delivery, at which meeting the final drafts of the documents to be delivered pursuant to the preceding sentence will be available for review by the parties hereto. For the purposes of this Section 4, "" shall mean each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday which is not a day on which banking institutions in New York City are generally authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
Closing Location
New York Business Day
     5. . The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters:
Covenants
 
          (a) To prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by you and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commission's close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement; to make no further amendment or any supplement to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus prior to the last Time of Delivery which shall be reasonably disapproved by you promptly after reasonable notice thereof; to advise you, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus has been filed; to file promptly all other material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities; to advise you, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus in respect of the Securities, of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act, of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus or suspending any such qualification, to promptly use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order; and in the event of any such issuance of a notice of objection, promptly to take such steps including, without limitation, amending the Registration Statement or filing a new registration statement, at its own expense, as may be necessary to permit offers and sales of the Securities by the Underwriters (references herein to the Registration Statement shall include any such amendment or new registration statement);
          (b) If required by Rule 430B(h) under the Act, to prepare a form of prospectus in a form approved by you and to file such form of prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than may be required by Rule 424(b) under the Act; and to make no further amendment or supplement to such form of prospectus which shall be reasonably disapproved by you promptly after reasonable notice thereof;
          (c) If by the third anniversary (the "") of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, any of the Securities remain unsold by the Underwriters, the Company will file, if it has not already done so and is eligible to do so, a new automatic shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to you. If at the Renewal Deadline the Company is no longer eligible to file an automatic shelf registration statement, the Company will, if it has not already done so, file a new shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to you and will use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to be declared effective within 180 days after the Renewal Deadline. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale
Renewal Deadline
 
of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the expired registration statement relating to the Securities. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new automatic shelf registration statement or such new shelf registration statement, as the case may be;
          (d) Promptly from time to time to take such action as you may reasonably request to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as you may reasonably request and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of the Securities, that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction;
provided
          (e) Prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement and from time to time, to furnish the Underwriters with written and electronic copies of the Prospectus in New York City in such quantities as you may reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required at any time prior to the expiration of nine months after the time of issue of the Prospectus in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities and if at any such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify you and to file such document and to prepare and furnish to each Underwriter and to any dealer in the Securities as many written and electronic copies as you may from time to time reasonably request of an amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance, (i) if such untrue statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein, at the expense of such Underwriter, and (ii) in other cases, without charge to any such Underwriter or dealer; and in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales of any of the Securities at any time nine months or more after the time of issue of the Prospectus, upon your request but at the expense of such Underwriter, to prepare and deliver to such Underwriter as many written and electronic copies as you may request of an amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act;
          (f) To make generally available to its securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158 under the Act);
 
          (g) During the period beginning from the date hereof and continuing to and including the date 90 days after the date of the Prospectus, not to, without your prior written consent, directly or indirectly offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge, grant any option to purchase, make any short sale or otherwise dispose of any securities of the Company that in your judgment are substantially similar to the Securities, or any options or warrants to purchase any shares of common stock of the Company, or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for or that represent the right to receive shares of common stock of the Company, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, owned directly by the Company (including holding as a custodian) or with respect to which the Company has beneficial ownership within the rules and regulations of the Commission, except that (i) the Company may engage in any activity described in this Section 5(g) if and to the extent required by (A) applicable law or by any notice, order or regulation of any regulatory authority which is binding upon the Company or (B) a contractual obligation to the U.S. government or any regulatory authority binding upon the Company which exists as of the date hereof, and (ii) the Company may issue or grant any securities (including restricted stock, restricted stock units and phantom stock), and options to acquire securities, of the Company to its employees and directors (including on a cashless exercise basis) pursuant to an employee benefit plan or director plan that exists as of the date hereof (including, without limitation, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan);
          (h) To pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) under the Act and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) under the Act;
          (i) To use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement in the manner specified in the Pricing Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds";
          (j) To use its reasonable best efforts to list, subject to notice of issuance, the Securities on the New York Stock Exchange (the ""); and
Exchange
          (k) Upon request of any Underwriter, to furnish, or cause to be furnished, to such Underwriter an electronic version of the Company's trademarks, servicemarks and corporate logo for use on the website, if any, operated by such Underwriter for the purpose of facilitating the on-line offering of the Securities (the ""); , that the License shall be used solely for the purpose described above, is granted without any fee and may not be assigned or transferred.
License
provided, however
     6. .
Free Writing Prospectuses
          (a) The Company represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; each Underwriter represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a free writing prospectus; any such free writing prospectus the use of which has been consented to by the Company or the Representatives, as applicable, is listed on Schedule II(a) hereto;
 
          (b) The Company has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 under the Act applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission or retention where required and legending; and
          (c) The Company agrees that if at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus any event occurred or occurs as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus would conflict with the information in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, the Company will give prompt notice thereof to the Representatives and, if requested by the Representatives, will prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or other document which will correct such conflict, statement or omission; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
provided
however
     7. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Company's counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Securities under the Act and all other expenses (excluding the fees incurred by the counsel for the Underwriters) in connection with the preparation, printing, reproduction and filing of the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers; (ii) the cost of printing or producing any Agreement among Underwriters, this Agreement, the Blue Sky Memorandum, closing documents (including any compilations thereof) and any other documents in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Securities; (iii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 5(c) hereof, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky survey; (iv) all fees and expenses in connection with listing the Securities on the Exchange; (v) the cost of preparing the Securities; (vi) the cost and charges of any transfer agent or registrar; and (vii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, and Sections 9 and 12 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
Expenses
     8. . The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder, as to the Securities to be delivered at each Time of Delivery, shall be subject, in their discretion, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company herein are, at and as of such Time of Delivery, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
Conditions
 
          (a) The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by the rules and regulations under the Act and in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof; all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated by the Commission and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act shall have been received; no stop order suspending or preventing the use of the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been initiated by the Commission; and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission shall have been complied with, or is being complied with, to your reasonable satisfaction; FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of the this Agreement;
          (b) Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, shall have furnished to you such written opinion or opinions, dated such Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to you, and such counsel shall have received such papers and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
          (c) The general counsel of the Company (or, at the Company's sole option, an external counsel reasonably acceptable to the Representatives, solely with respect to clause (ix) below) shall have furnished to you such counsel's written opinion, dated such Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to you, to the effect that:
     (i) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus;
     (ii) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Prospectus, and all of the issued shares of capital stock of the Company (including the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery) have been duly and validly authorized and issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; and the Securities conform in all material respects to the description of the Securities in the Prospectus;
     (iii) The Company has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification or is subject to no material liability or disability by reason of the failure to be so qualified in any such jurisdiction except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect (such counsel being entitled to rely in respect of the opinion in this clause upon opinions of local counsel and in respect of matters of fact upon certificates of officers of the Company, that such counsel shall state that they believe that both you and such counsel are justified in relying upon such opinions and certificates);
provided
 
     (iv) All of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended), and, except for directors' qualifying shares, is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity;
     (v) To such counsel's knowledge and other than as set forth in the Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or of which any property of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is the subject which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to such counsel's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
     (vi) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
     (vii) The issue and sale of the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery and the compliance by the Company with this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not (A) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust or loan agreement or other agreement or instrument known to such counsel to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is subject, (B) result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or the By-Laws or (C) result in the violation of any statute or any order, rule or regulation known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or any of their properties, in each case (A) and (C) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect;
     (viii) No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or other governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement except (A) such as have been obtained under the Act and (B) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by FINRA in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
     (ix) The statements set forth in the Prospectus under the caption "Description of Common Stock" and "Description of Capital Stock", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the common stock ($0.01 par value) or the preferred stock, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Certain Regulatory Considerations", "Certain United States Federal Tax Consequences to Non-U.S. Holders of Common Stock" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to
 
describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
     (x) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof, will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act;
     (xi) The documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to such Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief), when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder; and such counsel has no reason to believe that any of such documents, when such documents became effective or were so filed, as the case may be, contained, in the case of a registration statement which became effective under the Act, an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or, in the case of other documents which were filed under the Act or the Exchange Act with the Commission, an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such documents were so filed, not misleading; and
     (xii) The Registration Statement, the Prospectus and any further amendments and supplements thereto, as applicable, made by the Company prior to such Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations thereunder; such counsel has no reason to believe (i) that, as of its effective date, the Registration Statement or any further amendment thereto made by the Company prior to such Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief), contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or (ii) that the Pricing Prospectus as of the Applicable Time (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; or (iii) that, as of its date, the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to such Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a
 
material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and such counsel does not know of any amendment to the Registration Statement required to be filed or of any contracts or other documents of a character required to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or required to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus or required to be described in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus which are not filed or incorporated by reference or described as required.
     In rendering such opinion, such counsel may rely as to matters of fact upon certificates of officers of the Company and its subsidiaries, that such counsel shall state that such counsel believes such counsel is justified in relying upon such certificates.
provided
          (d) On the date of the Prospectus at a time prior to the execution of this Agreement, at 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the effective date of any post effective amendment to the Registration Statement filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement and also at each Time of Delivery, each of the independent accounting firms of the Company who have certified the financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus shall have furnished to you a letter or letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, in form and substance satisfactory to you, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus;
          (e) (i) Neither the Company nor any of the Significant Subsidiaries shall have sustained since the date of the latest audited financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus; and (ii) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Prospectus, there shall not have been any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries taken as a whole, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii), otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus or the effect of which is in your judgment after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
          (f) On or after the Applicable Time (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Company's debt securities or preferred stock by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities or preferred stock;
 
          (g) On or after the Applicable Time there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) a suspension or material limitation in trading in the Company's securities on the Exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in securities settlement or clearance services in the United States; (iv) the outbreak or escalation of hostilities involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war; or (v) the occurrence of any other calamity or crisis or any change in financial, political or economic conditions in the United States or elsewhere, if the effect of any such event specified in clause (iv) or (v) in your judgment after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
          (h) The Company shall have complied with the provisions of Section 5(e) hereof with respect to the furnishing of prospectuses on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement;
          (i) The Securities shall have been duly listed, subject to notice of issuance, on the Exchange;
          (j) The Company has obtained and delivered to the Underwriters executed copies of an agreement from directors and certain executive officers of the Company, substantially to the effect set forth in Section 5(g) hereof in form and substance satisfactory to you (it being understood that Mr. Bernstein shall not be a person required to execute such agreement described in this paragraph); and
          (k) The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to you at such Time of Delivery certificates of the Chief Financial Officer of the Company satisfactory to you (i) to the effect that (A) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of such Time of Delivery with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of such Time of Delivery and (B) the Company has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to such Time of Delivery, and (ii) as to such other matters as you may reasonably request.
     9. . (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will
Indemnification and Contribution
 
reimburse each Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
provided
however
          (b) Each Underwriter will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred.
          (c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability except to the extent that it has been prejudiced in any material respect by such failure or from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect the settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of any
 
judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action or claim in respect of which indemnification or contribution may be sought hereunder (whether or not the indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such action or claim) unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act, by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
          (d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 9 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Securities. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above and such indemnifying party was prejudiced in a material respect by such failure, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total commissions or discounts received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or the Underwriters on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total public offering price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
 
          (e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters, under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
     10. . (a) If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Securities which it has agreed to purchase hereunder at a Time of Delivery, you may in your discretion arrange for you or another party or other parties to purchase such Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty six hours after such default by any Underwriter you do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty six hours within which to procure another party or other parties satisfactory to you to purchase such Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed periods, you notify the Company that you have so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, or the Company notifies you that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, you or the Company shall have the right to postpone such Time of Delivery for a period of not more than seven days, in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in your opinion may thereby be made necessary. The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall include any person substituted under this Section with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to this Agreement with respect to such Securities.
Underwriter Defaults
          (b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by you and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at such Time of Delivery, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the number of shares which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder at such Time of Delivery and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the number of Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
          (c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by you and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at such Time of Delivery, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then this Agreement (or, with respect to the Second Time of Delivery, the obligations of the Underwriters to purchase and of the Company to sell the Optional Securities)
 
shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 7 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in Section 9 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
     11. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any controlling person of any Underwriter, or the Company, or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Survival
     12. . If this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 10 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof; but, if for any other reason, any Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters through you for all out-of-pocket expenses approved in writing by you, including fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in making preparations for the purchase, sale and delivery of the Securities not so delivered, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof.
Liabilities Upon Termination
     13. . In all dealings hereunder, you shall act on behalf of each of the Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by you.
Notices, etc
     All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to you as the representatives; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement, Attention: Secretary; , , that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 9(c) hereof shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its Underwriters' Questionnaire, which address will be supplied to the Company by you upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
provided
however
     In accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), the underwriters are required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies their respective clients, including the Company, which information may include the name and address of their respective clients, as well as other information that will allow the underwriters to properly identify their respective clients.
     14. . This Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters, the Company and, to the extent provided in Sections 9 and 11 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company and each person who controls the Company or any Underwriter, and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns,
Parties to Agreement
 
and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
     15. . Time shall be of the essence of this Agreement. As used herein, the term "" shall mean any day when the Commission's office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
Time Is Of The Essence
business day
     16. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, (iii) no Underwriter has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) or any other obligation to the Company except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement and (iv) the Company has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters, or any of them, has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Underwriters Not Fiduciaries
     17. . This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Supercedes Prior Agreements
     18. 
Governing Law
. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
     19. . The Company and each of the Underwriters hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
     20. . This Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
     21. . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company is authorized to disclose to any persons the U.S. federal and state income tax treatment and tax structure of the potential transaction and all materials of any kind (including tax opinions and other tax analyses) provided to the Company relating to that treatment and structure, without the Underwriters' imposing any limitation of any kind. However, any information relating to the tax treatment and tax structure shall remain confidential (and the foregoing sentence shall not apply) to the extent necessary to enable any person to comply with securities laws. For this purpose, "" is limited to any facts that may be relevant to that treatment.
Disclosures
tax structure
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon the acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request, but without warranty on your part as to the authority of the signers thereof.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090609172133.txt.gz
TIME:20090609172133
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 9, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation issued a press release announcing that it has received approval from the United States Department of the Treasury (the "Treasury") to repurchase all 3,000,000 shares of its Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B, without par value and a liquidation preference of $1,000 per share it issued and sold to the Treasury on October 28, 2008, as part of the Treasury's Troubled Asset Relief Program Capital Purchase Program. A copy of the press release is filed as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 8.01.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEW YORK, June 9, 2009 - The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today confirmed that it is among the first large banks to receive permission to repurchase the preferred stock purchased by the U.S. government last October as part of the TARP capital investment program.
"This news will be welcomed by our clients around the world as well as by American taxpayers, who have realized a very good return on their investment in our company. We appreciate the support that the U.S. government provided to our industry and the overall economy at a critical time," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon.
The Bank of New York Mellon has raised $2.9 billion toward the repurchase of the $3 billion TARP capital investment in the company through a $1.5 billion non-guaranteed five-year and 10-year senior debt offering and the sale of $1.4 billion in new common stock to the public.
The company's announcement that it will repurchase the preferred stock coincides with the June 9 anniversary of its founding. The company opened its doors for the first time on June 9, 1784. "As the oldest bank in the United States, our company has a remarkable and unique history of innovation and change, supported by our continued financial strength and stability," Kelly added. "It is fitting that during this anniversary year, our company has continued to play a critical and stabilizing role in the global economy. We look forward to continuing to support our people, clients and communities for the next 225 years."
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's expectations with respect to the repurchase of the TARP investment. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090623165357.txt.gz
TIME:20090623165357
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 17, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") repurchased all 3,000,000 shares of its Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B, $0.01 par value and a liquidation preference of $1,000 per share (the "Series B Preferred Shares"), that it issued and sold to the United States Department of the Treasury (the "U. S. Treasury") on October 28, 2008, as part of the U.S. Treasury's Troubled Asset Relief Program Capital Purchase Program. The Company paid the U.S. Treasury a repurchase price of $3,036,250,000 which equals the full $3,000,000,000 liquidation amount of the Series B Preferred Shares plus $36,250,000 with respect to accrued but unpaid dividends through the date of repurchase (the "Repurchase"). On June 18, 2009, the Company filed a Certificate of Elimination with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware which, effective upon filing, eliminated all references in the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation to the Series B Preferred Shares. A copy of the Certificate of Elimination is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 5.03.
 
On June 17, 2009, the Company issued a press release in connection with the Repurchase. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference into this Item 8.01.
Including $36,250,000 paid with respect to dividends in connection with the Repurchase, the Company has paid the U.S. Treasury an aggregate of $95,416,666.67 in dividends on the Series B Preferred Shares since October 28, 2008. The Company also intends to notify the U.S. Treasury of its intent to repurchase, at fair market value, the ten-year warrant to purchase approximately 14.5 million shares of the Company's common stock issued to the U.S. Treasury in connection with the Series B Preferred Shares.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Corporation"), hereby certifies in accordance with the provisions of Section 151(g) of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware that the following resolutions were duly adopted by the Board of Directors of the Corporation (the "Board"):
RESOLVED, that pursuant to Section 151 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware and in accordance with the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (the "Restated Certificate of Incorporation"), a special committee, which was established by resolutions duly adopted by the Board, authorized the issuance of a series of 3,000,000 shares of Fixed Rate Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series B par value $0.01 per share (the "Series B Preferred Stock"), of the Corporation, and established the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating and other rights, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, by resolutions duly adopted by such special committee and, on October 27, 2008, filed a Certificate of Designations with respect to the Series B Preferred Stock (the "Series B Certificate of Designations") in the office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware; and
FURTHER RESOLVED, as of the date hereof, no shares of the Series B Preferred Stock are outstanding and no shares of the Series B Preferred Stock will be issued subject to the Series B Certificate of Designations; and
FURTHER RESOLVED, that when a certificate setting forth this resolution becomes effective, it shall have the effect of eliminating from the Restated Certificate of Incorporation all matters set forth in the Series B Certificate of Designations with respect to the Series B Preferred Stock.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused this Certificate of Elimination to be signed on its behalf by its duly authorized officer this 18th day of June, 2009.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, June 17, 2009 - The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today repurchased the 3 million shares of its preferred stock issued to the U.S. Treasury last October as part of the TARP Capital Purchase Program. The company has paid the Treasury $3,036,250,000, which reflects the liquidation value of the preferred stock and $36.25 million of accrued but unpaid dividends.
Related to this repurchase, the company will record an after-tax charge of approximately $197 million in the second quarter of 2009, representing the difference between the amortized cost of the preferred stock and the repurchase price.
Additionally, the company intends to notify the Treasury that it intends to repurchase, at fair market value, the warrant that the Treasury holds to purchase approximately 14.5 million shares of the company's common stock.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $19.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $881 billion in assets under management, services more than $11 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the Company's expectations with respect to the after-tax charge and the repurchase of the TARP warrant. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090723161121.txt.gz
TIME:20090723161121
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On July 22, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2009 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported second quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $267 million, or $0.23 per common share, compared with $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the second quarter of 2008 and $363 million, or $0.31 per common share, in the first quarter of 2009.
NEW YORK, July 22, 2009 
"Overall, revenue has stabilized, we continue to gain market share, remain profitable, and have among the best capital levels in our industry. However, investment losses remain stubbornly high primarily due to continued deterioration in the residential housing market. We will continue to focus on maintaining exceptional client service levels and reducing risk and expenses," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. Accordingly, all income statements in this release have been restated.
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $176 million, or $0.15 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009, compared with $309 million, or $0.27 per common share in the second quarter of 2008 and $322 million, or $0.28 per common share in the first quarter of 2009.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2009 and are compared to the second quarter of 2008. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Second Quarter Highlights
was $2.957 billion, comprised of $2.257 billion of fee and other revenue and $700 million of net interest revenue. Total revenue included a pre-tax charge for the write-down of investment securities ($256 million) in fee and other revenue.
Total revenue
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
lower level of average interest-earning assets as the balance sheet returned to expected levels, as well as a lower value and level of interest-free funds.
 
The was $61 million in the second quarter of 2009 compared with $13 million in the second quarter of 2008 and $59 million in the first quarter of 2009. During the second quarter of 2009, the total decreased $33 million as net charge-offs totaled $54 million and $40 million of the allowance for credit losses was transferred to discontinued operations.
provision for credit losses
allowance for credit losses
was $2.383 billion. This compares with total noninterest expense of $2.743 billion in the second quarter of 2008 and $2.280 billion in the first quarter of 2009.
Total noninterest expense
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
The on a continuing operations basis, was 2.2% in the second quarter of 2009. In the second quarter of 2009, the Company recognized $134 million of tax benefits primarily attributable to the final LILO/SILO tax settlement agreement at an amount less than originally recorded. Excluding the impact of the FDIC special assessment, M&I expenses, investment write-downs and the benefit of tax settlements recorded in the second quarter of 2009, the effective tax rate was 32.4% (Non-GAAP) in the second quarter of 2009.
effective tax rate,
Results in the second quarter of 2009 included an of $196.5 million related to the repurchase of preferred stock issued to the U.S. Treasury as part of the TARP Capital Purchase Program and $39.8 million for the final dividend on the Series B preferred stock. The redemption premium/dividends and the FDIC special assessment decreased EPS by $0.23 per share in the second quarter of 2009.
after-tax redemption charge
The was $4.4 billion at June 30, 2009 compared with a net of tax loss of $4.5 billion at March 31, 2009. Further information on the investment portfolio is detailed in the Quarterly Earnings Review on page 9.
unrealized net of tax loss on our securities portfolio
On June 30, 2009, the Company submitted to the U.S. Treasury notice of our intention to repurchase the warrant which we issued to the Treasury in connection with the TARP Capital Purchase Program. The Company and the Treasury are currently discussing the terms of the proposed repurchase of the warrant.
 
3
 
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. Accordingly, the income statements for all periods in this release have been restated. The restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in both treasury services and other fee revenue; a reduction in the provision for credit losses; a reduction in noninterest expense and a change in continuing earnings per share.
Also on July 22, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 9 cents per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 11, 2009 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Aug. 3, 2009.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $20.7 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $926 billion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Earnings Release Format
Throughout this Earnings Release, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis unless otherwise noted. Quarterly returns are annualized.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through June 30, 2009 and are available at (Investor Relationsfinancial reports). The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends have been restated for discontinued operations.
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on July 22, 2009. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on July 22, 2009. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 22, 2009 at approximately 2:00 p.m. EDT through Aug. 5, 2009 by dialing (866) 442-1776 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1076 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
Discontinued operations
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. The business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the second quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operation of $91 million primarily related to the write-down of goodwill and an increase in the provision for credit losses. The after-tax loss of $41 million in the first quarter of 2009 primarily resulted from a goodwill impairment charge.
The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Release have been restated. The restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in both treasury services and other fee revenue; a reduction in the provision for credit losses; a reduction in noninterest expense; and a change in continuing earnings per share.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
The Company has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. The Company believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although the Company in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in the Company's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by the Company. Further, the Company believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liability, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of the Company's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
The Company has also provided a measure of tangible book value per share which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. The Company has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of investment write-downs and a SILO charge; expense measures which exclude an FDIC special assessment, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. The Company believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of the Company to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within the Company's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. The SILO charge relates to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. We also present earnings information excluding the TARP dividend and redemption premium, so as to provide investors with a better understanding of operational results. In this earnings release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a Company-wide and on a business segment basis.
 
9
 
 
10
 
 
11
 
 
 
12
 
 
13
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, and relate to, among other things, the Company's proposed repurchase of the warrant issued to the U.S. Treasury, the state of the economy, including the residential housing market, our strategic focus with regard to Mellon United National Bank and the Company's ability to manage its business through the global recession. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of July 22, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090728160723.txt.gz
TIME:20090728160723
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NON-GAAP MEASURES
The Company has included in this review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. The Company believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although the Company in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in the Company's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by the Company. Further, the Company believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liability, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of the Company's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
The Company has also provided the measure of tangible book value per share which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. The Company has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of investment write-downs and a SILO charge; expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, intangible amortization expenses, the FDIC special assessment; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. The Company believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of the Company to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within the Company's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. The SILO charges relate to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. We also present earnings information excluding the TARP dividend and redemption premium, so as to provide investors with a better understanding of operational results. In this earnings review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a Company-wide and on a business segment basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment write-downs and SILO charges.
Noninterest expense: Merger & integration ("M&I") expenses; intangible amortization expense and FDIC special assessment.
Earnings per share: Investment write-downs, M&I expenses, FDIC special assessment, intangible amortization expense, SILO charges, the benefit of tax settlements and the TARP redemption premium and dividend.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. Accordingly, the income statements for all periods in this Earnings Review have been restated. The restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in treasury services and other fee revenue; a reduction in the provision for credit losses; a reduction in noninterest expense; and a change in continuing earnings per share. This business was formerly included in the Other segment.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SECOND QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BALANCE SHEET
During the second quarter of 2009, the Company's average balance sheet decreased to $209 billion from $220 billion in the first quarter. The decrease was largely driven by a $13 billion reduction in deposits reflecting the continued roll off of client cash that sought a safe haven during the credit crisis. The offsetting reduction in assets was primarily due to a reduction in cash held at central banks. During the quarter, the Company also further reduced cash held at central banks and invested in securities issued by government-sponsored and guaranteed entities.
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At June 30, 2009, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $48.2 billion. The unrealized net of tax loss on our securities portfolio recorded in OCI was $4.4 billion at June 30, 2009 compared with $4.5 billion at March 31, 2009. The improvement in the net of tax loss on our securities portfolio reflects the tightening of spreads, partially offset by higher interest rates and the impact of FAS 157-4.
As a result of adopting FAS 157-4, the unrealized pre-tax loss decreased by approximately $1.2 billion in the first quarter of 2009, reflecting the price at which the securities would sell in a more orderly market. As the credit markets improved and became more orderly during the second quarter of 2009, the FAS 157-4 related unrealized pre-tax loss declined to approximately $400 million at June 30, 2009. Excluding the impact of FAS 157-4, the unrealized pre-tax loss on the securities portfolio would have decreased by approximately $1.0 billion (pre-tax) at June 30, 2009, and the fair value of the portfolio would have been $400 million (pre-tax) less than the current fair value.
The following table provides the detail of our total securities portfolio.
 
In the second quarter of 2009, housing market indicators and the broader economy continued to deteriorate. To reflect the continued declining value of homes, we adjusted our non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities ("RMBS") loss severity assumptions to decrease the amount we expect to receive to cover the value of the original loan. In the second quarter of 2009, we reclassified the European Floating Rate Notes to the Watch List category. These securities are very highly rated (100% are included in the AAA/AA category) and well seasoned, but given the deterioration in the European housing market and the impairment of a small number of these securities, we determined a reclassification to the Watch List category was appropriate.
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table provides the detail of securities portfolio losses for the second quarter of 2009.
 
CAPITAL
On June 30, 2009, the Company submitted to the U.S. Treasury notice of our intention to repurchase the warrant which we issued to the Treasury in connection with the TARP Capital Purchase Program. The Company and the Treasury are currently discussing the terms of the proposed repurchase of the warrant.
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the second quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $91 million primarily related to the write-down of goodwill and an increase in the provision for credit losses. The after-tax loss of $41 million in the first quarter of 2009 primarily resulted from a goodwill impairment charge.
The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Review have been restated. The restatement resulted in a reduction to previously reported levels of net interest revenue and the net interest margin; a slight reduction in treasury services and other fee revenue; a reduction in the provision for credit losses; a reduction in noninterest expense; and a change in continuing earnings per share.
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
MERGER UPDATE - INTEGRATION MILESTONES
Revenue Synergies
 
Expense Synergies
 
 
M&I Charges (The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation)
 
 
Service Quality Goals for 2010  Asset Servicing
- BNY Mellon #1 rated custodian among the large custodian peer group
> Global Investor Survey (May 2009)
> R&M Global Custody Survey (March 2009)
> Global Custodian Survey (January 2009)
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, family offices and business enterprises, charitable gift programs and endowments and foundations)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page 21
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page 22
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 2Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to service quality, the Company's proposed repurchase of the warrant issued to the U.S. Treasury, securities investment decisions, our strategic focus with regard to Mellon United National Bank; as well as the Company's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008 and the Company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings review speak only as of July 22, 2009 and the Company undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page 23

Exhibit 99.2
 
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or "BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity.
The results prior to the consummation of the merger, reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (2006, 1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. Only the financial results for all periods of 2008 and 2009 have been restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired the JPMorgan Chase Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Restructuring charge  Recorded charges in the fourth quarter of 2008 and first and second quarters of 2009 related to the 4% global workforce reduction.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of The Bank of New York/Mellon merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007, first and second quarters of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
In business segments where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
 
Note: See pages 9-15 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective segment results.
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090806160212.txt.gz
TIME:20090806160212
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
By press release dated August 5, 2009, the Registrant announced that it has repurchased for $136 million the warrant to purchase approximately 14.5 million shares of the Registrant's common stock that the Registrant had issued to the U.S. Treasury as part of the TARP Capital Purchase Program.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, August 5, 2009 - The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today announced that it has repurchased for $136 million the warrant to purchase approximately 14.5 million shares of the company's common stock that the company had issued to the U.S. Treasury as part of the TARP Capital Purchase Program.
In mid-June, the company repurchased the 3 million shares of its preferred stock which had been issued to the U.S. Treasury as part of the TARP Capital Purchase Program. The aggregate amount paid by the company to the U.S. Treasury in connection with the repurchase of the preferred stock and the warrants, together with all dividends paid on the preferred stock, totaled $3.231 billion.
"We see significant improvement in the financial markets and we are pleased to have been able to repay the U.S. Treasury and provide taxpayers with a 12% annual return on their investment in our company," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $20.7 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $926 billion in assets under management, services more than $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.8 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20090817160407.txt.gz
TIME:20090817160407
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) On August 11, 2009, the Board of Directors of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") amended the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Corporation to reflect certain changes, as follows: (1) Sections 4 and 8 of Article Four were amended to revise the levels of officer appointments that require Board approval or confirmation by the Board; (2) Section 1(g) of Article Five was amended to revise the definition of "entire Board of Directors", and (3) Section 6 of Article Five was amended to delete the provisions requiring the Corporation's product lines to use certain brand names for the five year period commencing after the merger.
Item 9.01  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 4. SENIOR OFFICERS. The Board of Directors may appoint, or the Chief Executive Officer may appoint, subject to confirmation by the Board of Directors, one or more senior officers of the Corporation, any of whom may be designated as Vice Chairmen or as executive vice presidents or given any other descriptive titles, as the Board of Directors or the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors shall specify from time to time. Each senior officer shall have and exercise such powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
senior
, senior, group or administrative
Section 8. OTHER OFFICERS. The Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the delegate of either of them may appoint or hire such additional officers of the Corporation, who may be designated as vice presidents, , or given any other descriptive titles, and may hire such additional employees, as it or he or she may deem necessary or desirable to transact the business of the Corporation, and may establish the conditions of employment of any of the persons mentioned above and may fix their compensation and dismiss them. Such persons may have such descriptive titles as may be appropriate, and they shall, respectively, have and exercise such powers and duties as pertain to their several offices or as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, them by the appropriate appointing authority and as are not inconsistent with any provisions of these By-Laws.
executive
assistant vice presidents, officers, assistant
officers
managing
directors, senior vice presidents, first vice presidents, vice presidents, assistant vice presidents, officers, assistant officers, senior associates, associates
Section 1. DEFINITIONS. The following definitions shall apply to this Article Five and otherwise as applicable in these By-Laws:
 (g) "entire Board of Directors" means the total number of Directors which the Corporation would have if there were no vacancies. 
; provided, that with respect to any provisions of these By-Laws requiring the unanimous affirmative vote of the entire Board of Directors, "entire Board of Directors" shall mean all the Directors of the Corporation then in office
Section 6. CORPORATE NAME During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time, the Board of Directors shall not recommend for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, or otherwise approve or effect, any change to the name of the Corporation
; BRAND NAMES.
:
(a) 
without the unanimous affirmative vote of the entire Board of Directors
or
any of the brand names specified in paragraph (b) of this Section 6
.
(b) BRAND NAMES. The Corporation's product lines shall use the following brand names:
(
i
)
the
Asset Management product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Asset Management";
(ii)
the
Private Wealth Management product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Wealth Management";
(iii)
the
Custody product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Asset Servicing";
(iv)
the
Stock Transfer product line shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon Stock Transfer";
(v)
the
Payments and Cash Management product lines shall use the brand name "BNY Mellon" within the
United States
and the brand name "Bank of New York Mellon" outside of the
United States
;
.
(vi) the Client Management product line shall use both the brand names "BNY Mellon" and "Bank of New York Mellon"; and
(vii) all other lines of business of the Corporation shall use the brand name "Bank of New York Mellon" under Bank of New York Mellon Securities Services


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091021161641.txt.gz
TIME:20091021161641
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On October 20, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2009 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER CONTINUING EPS LOSS OF $2.04. IMPACTED BY:
CONTINUING EPS OF $0.54 (excluding investment securities portfolio restructuring and M&I expenses)
BALANCE SHEET RISK SIGNIFICANTLY REDUCED
CAPITAL REMAINS STRONG; 90% OF RESTRUCTURING CHARGE PREVIOUSLY REFLECTED IN TANGIBLE CAPITAL
REVENUE INCREASE AND EXPENSE DISCIPLINE RESULTED IN POSITIVE OPERATING LEVERAGE (excluding investment securities portfolio restructuring)
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported a third quarter loss from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $2.439 billion, or $2.04 per common share, compared with income of $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008 and $267 million, or $0.23 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009.
NEW YORK, Oct. 20, 2009 
"Consistent with our ongoing strategy to reduce balance sheet risk, we took advantage of the recent strength in the fixed income markets by selling or recognizing losses on a significant portion of our investment securities portfolio. This restructuring does not materially impact capital, is expected to benefit net interest revenue by $125-$175 million in 2010, and significantly reduces the risk of future securities losses," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"During the quarter, we remained focused on organic growth, continuing to provide exceptional client service and reducing expenses which resulted in positive operating leverage," added Kelly.
Net loss applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $2.458 billion, or $2.05 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008 and $176 million, or $0.15 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2009 and are compared to the third quarter of 2008, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized (unless otherwise stated). Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Third Quarter Results
Total revenue
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
The was $147 million in the third quarter of 2009 compared with $61 million in the second quarter of 2009. The increase primarily relates to downgrades in the insurance and media portfolios. The provision is expected to decline in the fourth quarter of 2009. During the third quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased $70 million and net charge-offs totaled $77 million.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
Results for the third quarter of 2009 include an of $1.527 billion. Excluding the impact of the investment securities losses and M&I expenses, the effective tax rate was 31.8% (Non-GAAP) in the third quarter of 2009.
income tax benefit
The was $1.0 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 compared with a net of tax unrealized loss of $4.8 billion at June 30, 2009. The improvement reflects $3.0 billion related to the restructuring of the securities portfolio and $0.8 billion resulting from the improvement in the fixed income markets. Subsequent to Sept. 30, 2009, approximately $2.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost of $3.6 billion) of the lowest quality securities were sold at fair value. See page 9 for further information on the investment securities portfolio.
unrealized net of tax losses on our securities portfolio
 
totaled $560 million, an increase of $182 million compared with June 30, 2009, primarily reflecting downgrades in the insurance portfolio.
Nonperforming assets
 On Oct. 20, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 9 cents per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 10, 2009 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 30, 2009.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
 
3
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.1 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $966 billion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Sept. 30, 2009 and are available at (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on Oct. 20, 2009. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on Oct. 20, 2009. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Oct. 20, 2009 at approximately 2:00 p.m. EDT through Nov. 3, 2009 by dialing (866) 442-1776 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1076 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
Investment Securities Portfolio
The following table provides a trend of the aggregate unrealized pre-tax gain (loss) of the investment securities portfolio.
 
 
The following table provides the pro forma impact of restructuring the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009.
 
 
9
Investment securities portfolio restructuring
Consistent with our ongoing strategy to reduce risk from the balance sheet, and reflecting the recent improvement in the fixed income markets, we have sold or are in the process of restructuring the watch list portion of our investment securities portfolio.
The restructuring impacts approximately $12.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost) of investment securities. As a result of investment securities sales and restructuring in the third quarter of 2009, we recognized a charge of $4.8 billion (pre-tax). Subsequent to Sept. 30, 2009, approximately $2.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost of $3.6 billion) of the lowest quality securities were sold at fair value. The majority of the remaining restructured securities are expected to be retained on the balance sheet. Approximately 50% of the charge relates to securities that we plan to retain an interest in and for which we expect to recover a portion of the loss over time. In the fourth quarter of 2009, any declines in the fair value of these securities will be reflected in our net income until the restructuring is complete.
The restructuring charge had a minimal impact on the tangible capital ratio, as 90% of the charge had previously been reflected in tangible capital.
As a result of the restructuring, we expect net interest revenue to be positively impacted by approximately $125-$175 million in 2010.
The fair value of the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009 was $54.1 billion. On a pro forma basis, reflecting the subsequent sale of securities, the fair value at Sept. 30, 2009 was $52.0 billion. The unrealized loss on the portfolio was $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 compared with $7.7 billion at June 30, 2009. The improvement reflects $4.8 billion related to the restructuring and $1.5 billion ($1.8 billion without the FAS 157-4 adjustment) resulting from the improvement in the fixed income markets.
Discontinued operations
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In July 2009, we signed a definitive agreement to sell Mellon United National Bank. Subject to regulatory approval, the transaction is expected to close in the first quarter of 2010. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the third quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $19 million primarily related to additional provision for credit losses resulting from the further deterioration of the South Florida real estate market. The after-tax loss of $151 million in the first nine months of 2009 primarily reflects the impairment and write-down of goodwill and an increase in the provision for credit losses.
 
10
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue and earnings measures which exclude the effect of investment securities losses and SILO/LILO charge; expense measures which exclude an FDIC special assessment, support agreement charges, asset-based taxes, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. We also present the aggregate unrealized securities losses excluding the impact of FAS 157-4 to provide investors with the impact disorderly markets had on the investment securities portfolio and the subsequent conversion to an orderly market. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expense relates to our Corporate Trust acquisition in 2006 and to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the transaction. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expense provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities losses, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. As a result, BNY Mellon believes that presenting measures that exclude investment securities losses from its results, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. The SILO/LILO charges relate to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. We also present earnings information excluding the TARP redemption premium and dividend, so as to provide investors with a better understanding of operational results.
 
11
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis.
 
 
 
 
12
 
 
13
 
 
 
 
14
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the restructuring of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio, including statements with respect to the impact of the restructuring on future pricing, net interest revenue and risk of future securities losses, retention of the remaining restructured securities; the reflection of declines in the fair value of securities in BNY Mellon's net income; expectations with respect to declines in the provision for credit losses; and expectations with respect to the closing of the sale of Mellon United National Bank. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008, the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of Oct. 20, 2009 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
15


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091023171227.txt.gz
TIME:20091023171227
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: October 23, 2009
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Joint Press Release of The Federal Customs Service of The Russian Federation and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
Litigation Settlement
 The Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation and The Bank of New York Mellon, advised by Egorov Puginsky Afanasiev & Partners, today announced the settlement of the litigation filed by the Customs Service against The Bank in the Moscow City Arbitration Court seeking $22.5 billion in damages.
MOSCOW, October 22, 2009
Following a voluntary withdrawal of the Federal Customs Service's claim against The Bank of New York Mellon, proceedings in the Moscow City Arbitration court have now been terminated and both parties have concurrently reached an out-of-court settlement agreement.
Under this agreement, without admission of liability, The Bank shall pay US$14 million as a compensation of trial costs, an amount equal to the amount paid by The Bank to the U.S. government in 2005 under a Non-Prosecution Agreement with the US Attorney's Office.
The claim, which sought US$22.5 billion damages, was brought by the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation in the Moscow City Arbitrazh Court in May 2007. The claim was based on the actions of The Bank's ex-employee Lucy Edwards (born Ludmila Pritzker), who from 1996-1999 participated in illegal banking operations concealing it from The Bank. In November 2005, The Bank of New York and the US Attorney's Offices signed a Non-Prosecution Agreement in which The Bank of New York agreed to pay US$14 million to the U.S. government.
After the filing of the case, the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation received a letter from the United States Attorney's Office dated July 29, 2008 explaining the Non Prosecution Agreement of 2005 and confirming that The Bank of New York was not charged with any criminal violation arising out of the investigation conducted by the US Attorney's Office for Southern District of New York.
Taking into consideration an official explanation made by the U.S. law enforcement authorities, the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation concluded that there is no basis to hold The Bank of New York Mellon civilly liable. Also bearing in mind The Bank's positive contribution to the development of the Russian financial markets, the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation voluntarily withdrew its claim against The Bank of New York Mellon.
The Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation and The Bank of New York Mellon are pleased that the dispute is finally resolved.
Andrey Belyaninov, the Head of the Federal Customs Service, said: "This case is an example of the increased vigilance of the Russian Federation in international financial markets. The fact that the Russian court scrutinized this case and the fact that the dispute was finally settled by an agreement between the parties also demonstrates the efficiency and independence of Russian courts."
Matthew Biben, Executive Vice President and Deputy General Counsel of The Bank of New York Mellon said: "We are gratified by the settlement of this case. This is a common sense resolution that benefits our company, our employees, shareholders and customers. The Bank of New York Mellon is pleased to have this matter behind us and looks forward to supporting our clients which include Russia's largest companies."
The Bank of New York Mellon and the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation would like to thank Egorov, Puginsky Afanasiev & Partners for its assistance in facilitating the negotiations which led to the settlement of this dispute.
The Federal Customs Service is an authorized federal executive body, which is carrying out its duties and functions under the Laws of the Russian Federation with regard to the development of state policy and legal regulations, oversight and control over the customs issues, as well as the functions of currency exchange regulatory agency and special anti-smuggling activities and other crimes and administrative violations control.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation [NYSE: BK] is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team.
 

Exhibit 99.2
This SETTLEMENT AND RELEASE AGREEMENT (the "Agreement") is made and entered into on this 21 day of October, 2009 by and between the Federal Customs Service and The Bank of New York Mellon.
RECITALS
WHEREAS, the Federal Customs Service and The Bank of New York Mellon are parties to an action styled , Case No. A40-24987/07-10-149 (the "Action") pending before the Arbitrazh Court of the City of Moscow (the "Court").
The Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation v. The Bank of New York Mellon
WHEREAS, without admitting liability or fault and in order to avoid further expense and the uncertainty of litigation, the Parties enter into this Agreement and by so doing seek and intend to fully, completely and finally resolve and terminate any and all manner of actions, causes of action, claims, covenants, contracts, controversies, agreements, promises, variances, damages and demands whatsoever, including attorney's fees, in law or equity, whether known or unknown, which they possess as against each other, their corporate parents, subsidiaries and affiliates, officers, directors, attorneys, employees, agents, successors, assigns, and heirs, (specifically including the Government of the Russian Federation and any division, agency or instrumentality thereof), including but not limited to those claims which could have been asserted in the Action or arising from or related in any way to any and all agreements or dealings between them from the beginning of time to the date of this Agreement.
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions contained in this Agreement, and for other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Parties hereby agree as follows:
AGREEMENT
1. Definitions.
Capitalized terms used in this Agreement, whether or not otherwise defined, shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them as follows:
a. "Action" shall mean the litigation dispute between the Parties hereto styled , Case No. A40-24987/07-10-149, which is pending before the Court.
The Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation v. The Bank of New York Mellon
b. "Agreement" shall mean this Settlement and Release Agreement entered into as of the Effective Date by and between FCS and the Bank.
c. The "Bank" shall mean The Bank of New York Mellon, a New York state-chartered depository institution and member of the Federal Reserve System as well as any affiliate, subsidiary, parent and/or related entity.
d. "Court" shall mean the Moscow City Arbitration Court in which the Action has been pending.
e. "Effective Date" shall mean October 21, 2009, the date on which both Parties have executed this Agreement.
f. "FCS" shall mean the Federal Customs Service as well as the Government of the Russian Federation and any other government agency, division, or instrumentality of the Russian Federation.
g. "Parties" shall mean the FCS and the Bank.
h. "Date of Payment" shall mean the date on which the Bank shall pay the Compensation, but not later than within 10 (ten) business days of the Effective Date.
i. "Compensation" shall mean the amount payable by the Bank as reimbursement of the costs and obligations incurred and carried by the counsels, representatives and attorneys of the FCS in connection with the Action. The amount of Compensation shall be limited to, and shall not exceed, Fourteen Million United States Dollars ($14,000,000 USD).
2. Confidentiality
The Parties agree, warrant and covenant that they will keep confidential and will not disclose, publish, report, inform or in any way communicate to any other persons or entities the content of the documents provided by the Parties during negotiations of the terms of this settlement or the content of the negotiations themselves which resulted in the signing of this Agreement.
 
3. Dismissal of Action.
By no later than three (3) days after the Effective Date FCS shall execute and file with the Court in the Action a Voluntary Dismissal With Prejudice, thus finally and completely concluding the Action.
4. Joint Public Statement.
Within ten (10) days after the Effective Date, the Parties shall publically (via press release) issue the following statement: "The Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation and The Bank of New York Mellon are pleased to announce that they have amicably resolved the law suit between them which was pending in the Arbitrazh Court of the City of Moscow."
5. Removal of Websites.
During the pendency of the Action, each Party maintained and regularly updated websites providing information, documents and contentions relating to the Action. This includes but is not limited to the FCS's website located at . and the Bank's website located at . Within ten (10) days after the Effective Date, the Parties agree to terminate, shut down, remove all content and cease operating and maintaining these and/or any other websites relating in any way to this Action.
www.russianbanksuit.com
www.bnymellon.com/russiacase
6. The Bank's Denial of Liability.
The Bank has expressly denied and continues to deny all charges of liability against it arising out of any of the conduct, statements, acts or omissions alleged, or that could have been alleged, in the Action. Nonetheless, the Bank has concluded that the further conduct of the Action would be protracted and expensive, and that it is desirable that the Action be fully and finally settled in the manner and upon the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. Neither this Agreement, nor any of its terms or provisions, nor any of the negotiations or proceedings connected with it, shall be construed as an admission or concession by the Bank with respect to any claims brought in this Action.
7. FCS's Claims.
The FCS believes that its claims and contentions are meritorious but concluded that for a number of reasons the further conduct of the Action would be protracted and expensive, and that it is desirable that the Action be fully and finally settled in the manner and upon the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. Neither this Agreement, nor any of its terms or provisions, nor any of the negotiations or proceedings connected with it, shall be construed as an admission or concession by FCS of the truth of any of the allegations or defenses raised by the Bank in the Action.
8. Mutual Releases
a. . The Bank does hereby settle, remise, release, acquit, satisfy and forever release the FCS and FCS's representatives, officials, predecessors, heirs, successors, subsidiaries, instrumentalities, divisions, directors, insurers, assigns, employees, attorneys, agents, and all other entities and persons acting by, through, under, or in concert with them, of and from any and all, actions, causes of actions, suits, debts, sums of money, accounts, bills, covenants, controversies, agreements, contracts, promises, damages (including, but not limited to, consequential, incidental, punitive, special or other), judgments, executions, claims, liabilities and demands, whatsoever, at law and in equity (including, but not limited to, claims founded in tort, contract, specific performance or any other legal theory whatsoever), and including without limitation, any and all claims, counterclaims, and causes of action, which could have been brought, asserted or maintained in the Action which the Bank ever had or now has against the FCS for, upon, arising from, or by reason of, any matter, cause or thing, whatsoever from the beginning of the world to the date of these presents, whether matured or unmatured, save and except for the obligations of this Agreement.
In favor of FCS
b. . FCS does hereby settle, remise, release, acquit, satisfy and forever release the Bank and the Bank's representatives, officials, predecessors, heirs, successors, subsidiaries, instrumentalities, divisions, directors, insurers, assigns, employees, attorneys, agents, and all other entities and persons acting by, through, under, or in concert with them, of and from any and all, actions, causes of actions, suits, debts, sums of money, accounts, bills, covenants, controversies, agreements, contracts, promises, damages (including, but not limited to, consequential, incidental, punitive, special or other), judgments, executions, claims, liabilities and demands, whatsoever, at law and in equity (including, but not limited to, claims founded in tort, contract, specific performance or any other legal theory whatsoever), and including without limitation, any and all claims, counterclaims, and causes of action, which could have been brought, asserted or maintained in the Action which FCS ever had or now has against the Bank for, upon, arising from, or by reason of, any matter, cause or thing, whatsoever from the beginning of the world to the date of these presents, whether matured or unmatured, save and except for the obligations of this Agreement.
In favor of the Bank
 
The FCS hereby acknowledges, represents and warrants that:
9. Representations and Warranties by FCS.
a. FCS has taken any and all actions and obtained any and all authorizations to enter into this Agreement, including but not limited to obtaining any and all necessary approvals or authorizations and complying with any and all applicable laws and regulations;
b. FCS has not relied on any statement, representation, or promise of any other Party not expressly contained herein;
c. FCS has had an opportunity to obtain independent legal advice from attorneys of its choice with respect to the advisability of entering into this Agreement;
d. FCS has not assigned or otherwise transferred (voluntarily, involuntarily, or by operation of law) any right, title, or interest in any claim which it has, may have, or may have had against the Bank;
e. FCS has carefully read this Agreement, knows and understands the content of the Agreement, has had a full and fair opportunity to inquire into the facts and circumstances giving rise to the Action and concerning this Agreement, and freely executes this Agreement; and
f. The individual that executes this Agreement on behalf of FCS has the authority to bind FCS to this Agreement.
The Bank hereby acknowledges, represents, and warrants that:
10. Representations by the Bank.
a. The Bank is duly authorized and has taken any and all corporate actions necessary to enter into this Agreement, including but not limited to obtaining board authorization, written consents and to the extent necessary regulatory approvals.
b. The Bank has not relied on any statement, representation, or promise of any other Party not expressly contained herein;
c. The Bank has had an opportunity to obtain independent legal advice from attorneys of its choice with respect to the advisability of entering into this Agreement;
d. The Bank has not assigned or otherwise transferred (voluntarily, involuntarily or by operation of law) any right, title, or interest in any claim which it has, may have, or may have had against FCS;
e. The Bank has carefully read this Agreement, knows and understands the content of the Agreement, has had a full and fair opportunity to inquire into the facts and circumstances giving rise to the Action and concerning this Agreement, and freely executes this Agreement;
f. The individual that executes this Agreement on behalf of the Bank has the authority to bind the Bank to this Agreement.
11. Disputes with regard to the Agreement.
Should any dispute arise between the Parties with regard to interpretation or enforcement of this Agreement, the prevailing Party in any arbitration brought pursuant to Paragraph 14 below shall be entitled to recover from the non-prevailing Party its reasonable Fees and Costs. As used herein the term Fees and Costs means attorneys' fees and costs incurred in any arbitration brought pursuant to Paragraph 14 below.
12. Terms of payment of the Compensation.
The Parties agree that the Bank shall pay the Compensation as follows.
By no later than ten (10) business days after the Effective Date, the Bank shall pay the sum of Fourteen Million United States Dollars ($14,000,000 USD) that shall be transferred to the Podhurst Orseck, P.A. Trust Account (Account No. 17538xxxxx) at City National Bank, 25 West Flagler Street, Miami, Florida, ABA 066004367, to the attention of Kim Putz, Assistant Vice-President.
13. Governing Law.
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed exclusively in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to the principles of conflicts of laws.
 
14. Arbitration.
Any controversy or claim arising out of or related to this Agreement shall be finally settled by arbitration in Paris, France under the Rules of Arbitration of the International Chamber of Commerce by three arbitrators appointed in accordance with the said Rules. The Arbitration Panel shall issue its award within six (6) months of the filing of the Notice of Arbitration. The language of the arbitration shall be English.
15. Liquidated Damages.
The Parties recognize that any non-monetary breach of this Agreement will be difficult if not impossible to quantify. Therefore, in the event of any material breach of this Agreement except for the provisions of paragraphs 3 and 4, the breaching Party shall pay to the non-breaching Party upon the request of the latter the liquidated damages in the amount of 10 000.00 (ten thousand) US dollars as compensation for each and every such breach.
16. Related Litigation.
FCS and FCS's representatives, officials, predecessors, heirs, successors, subsidiaries, instrumentalities, divisions, directors, insurers, assigns, employees, attorneys, agents, and all other entities and persons acting by, through, under, or in concert with them, agree that they shall not directly or indirectly prosecute, assist, participate, solicit or otherwise bring any claims, litigations, causes of actions, lawsuits, suits, or actions against the Bank in any forum arising in any way from the facts giving rise to the claims asserted by FCS in the Action.
17. Notices.
Any notice, transmission, demand or communications related to this Agreement shall be delivered by hand delivery, U.S. mail or Russian Post or by FedEx to the following addresses:
If to the FCS:
FEDERAL CUSTOMS SERVICE
11/5 Novozavodskaya Street 121087
Moscow Russia
If to the Bank:
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON
One Wall Street
New York, New York 10286
Attn: Matthew Biben
18. Amendment.
This Agreement may only be modified or amended by written agreement signed by the Parties hereto.
19. Enforceability.
If any term or condition of this Agreement shall be declared to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable to any extent or in any application, then the remainder of this Agreement and such term or condition except to such extent or in such application, shall not be affected hereby and each and every term and condition of this Agreement shall be valid and enforced to the fullest extent and the broadest application permitted by law.
20. Language Discrepancy.
This Agreement shall be prepared and signed in both English and Russian and reviewed by the Parties' Russian and United States counsel prior to signature. If any discrepancy arises between the English and Russian versions, the English version will govern.
21. Cooperation.
The Parties agree to cooperate with each other in resolving any disputes that arise with respect to this Agreement or the Action.
 
22. Entire Agreement.
This Agreement embodies all of the agreements, understandings and negotiations by and among the Parties, and there are no oral or other understandings, representation or agreements by or among the Parties relating or pertaining to the subject matter of this Agreement or to the prior dealings by or among the Parties.
23. Binding Effect.
This Agreement shall be binding and shall inure to the benefit of the Parties and their respective successors and assigns.
24. Force Majeure.
Neither Party shall be liable nor deemed to be in default for any delay or failure to perform under this Agreement resulting, directly or indirectly, from acts of God, acts of public enemy, military authority, war, fires, explosions, earthquakes, floods or any similar cause beyond the reasonable control of either Party. Any such force majeure event shall not relieve either Party from its duty to reasonably mitigate the effects of such event and from making all reasonable efforts to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement.
25. Rules of Construction.
The paragraph and sub-paragraph headings in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not effect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this agreement.
26. Counterparts.
This Agreement may be executed in separate counterparts each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement. This Agreement shall become effective and enforceable upon the date the last Party has executed this Agreement.
27. Further Assurances.
The Parties agree to execute and deliver any and all additional papers, documents and other assurances, and take any and all actions that are reasonably necessary to carry out the terms and intent of this Agreement.
The Federal Custom Service
By:  
/s/    Andrey Belyaninov
    
Name:  Andrey Belyaninov
Title:  Head of the Federal Customs Service of the Russian Federation
The Bank of New York Mellon
By:  
/s/    Matthew Biben    
Name: Matthew Biben
Title: Deputy General Counsel & Executive Vice President
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091026172632.txt.gz
TIME:20091026172632
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NON-GAAP MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue and earnings measures which exclude the effect of investment securities losses and SILO/LILO charges; expense measures which exclude merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, intangible amortization expenses, support agreement charges, asset-based taxes, the FDIC special assessment; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. We also present the aggregate unrealized investment securities losses excluding the impact of FAS 157-4 to provide investors with the impact disorderly markets had on the investment securities portfolio and the subsequent conversion to an orderly market. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expense relates to our Corporate Trust acquisition in 2006 and to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the transaction. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities losses, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. As a result, BNY Mellon believes that presenting measures which exclude investment securities losses from its results, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
The SILO/LILO charges relate to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. We also present earnings information excluding the TARP redemption premium and dividend, so as to provide investors with a better understanding of operational results. In this earnings review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment securities losses and SILO/LILO charges.
Noninterest expense: M&I expenses; intangible amortization expense, support agreement charges, FDIC special assessment and restructuring charge.
Earnings per share: Investment securities losses, M&I expenses, FDIC special assessment, support agreement charges, intangible amortization expense, SILO/LILO/tax settlement, the benefit of tax settlements and the TARP redemption premium and dividend.
 
 
Page 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
THIRD QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 3Q09 vs. 2Q09 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
 
Page 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
The following table provides a trend of the aggregate unrealized pre-tax gain (loss) of the investment securities portfolio.
 
 
Portfolio aggregate unrealized gain/(loss) - pre-tax
 
 
The following table provides the pro forma impact of restructuring the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009.
 
 
Pro forma investment securities portfolio reflecting the investment portfolio restructuring at Sept. 30, 2009
 
 
 
Page 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Investment securities portfolio restructuring
Consistent with our ongoing strategy to reduce risk from the balance sheet, and reflecting the recent improvement in the fixed income markets, we have sold or are in the process of restructuring the watch list portion of our investment securities portfolio.
The restructuring impacts approximately $12.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost) of investment securities. As a result of investment securities sales and restructuring in the third quarter of 2009, we recognized a charge of $4.8 billion (pre-tax). Subsequent to Sept. 30, 2009, approximately $2.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost of $3.6 billion) of the lowest quality securities were sold at fair value. The majority of the remaining restructured investment securities are expected to be retained on the balance sheet. Approximately 50% of the charge relates to investment securities that we plan to retain an interest in and for which we expect to recover a portion of the loss over time. In the fourth quarter of 2009, any declines in the fair value of these investment securities will be reflected in our net income until the restructuring is complete.
The restructuring charge had a minimal impact on the tangible capital ratio, as 90% of the charge had previously been reflected in tangible capital.
As a result of the restructuring, we expect net interest revenue to be positively impacted by approximately $125-$175 million in 2010.
The fair value of the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009 was $54.1 billion. On a pro forma basis, reflecting the subsequent sale of investment securities, the fair value at Sept. 30, 2009 was $52.0 billion. The unrealized loss on the portfolio was $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 compared with $7.7 billion at June 30, 2009. The improvement reflects $4.8 billion related to the restructuring and $1.5 billion ($1.8 billion without the FAS 157-4 adjustment) resulting from the improvement in the fixed income markets.
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING ACTIVITIES REVENUE
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading activities
 
CAPITAL
 
 
 
 
Page 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
Nonperforming assets increased $182 million compared with June 30, 2009, reflecting downgrades, primarily in the insurance and media portfolios. The increase in nonperforming assets in the third quarter of 2009 resulted from $137 million in the insurance portfolio, $25 million in the media portfolio and a $21 million net increase in other residential mortgages.
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $147 million in 3Q09 compared with $61 million in 2Q09. The increase primarily relates to downgrades in the insurance and media portfolios. BNY Mellon expects the provision to decline in the fourth quarter of 2009. During the third quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased $70 million and net charge-offs totaled $77 million.
 
 
Page 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In July 2009, we signed a definitive agreement to sell Mellon United National Bank. Subject to regulatory approval, the transaction is expected to close in the first quarter of 2010. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the third quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $19 million primarily related to additional provision for credit losses resulting from the further deterioration of the South Florida real estate market. The after-tax loss of $151 million in the first nine months of 2009 primarily reflects the impairment and write-down of goodwill and an increase in the provision for credit losses.
 
 
Page 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, family offices and business enterprises, charitable gift programs and endowments and foundations)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
MERGER UPDATE  INTEGRATION MILESTONES
 
 
 
 
Service Quality Goals for 2010  Asset Servicing
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
 
Page 21
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page 22
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page 23
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 3Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the restructuring of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio, including statements with respect to the impact of the restructuring on net interest revenue and the risk of future investment securities losses, retention of the remaining restructured investment securities; the reflection of declines in the fair value of investment securities in BNY Mellon's net income; expectations with respect to declines in the provisions for credit losses; and expectations with respect to the closing of the sale of Mellon United National Bank; merger synergy targets; as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008, the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings review speak only as of Oct. 20, 2009 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page 24

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity ("the merger").
The results prior to the consummation of the merger reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (2006, 1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus the segment trends data filed on Form 10-Q.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. Only the financial results for all periods of 2007, 2008 and 2009 have been restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
On October 1, 2006, The Bank of New York acquired the JPMorgan Chase Corporate Trust business in exchange for our retail and regional middle market banking businesses. Results of the Corporate Trust business are included in the Issuer Services segment.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/ Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and the first, second and third quarters of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Workforce reduction restructuring charge  Recorded charges in the fourth quarter of 2008 and first and second quarters of 2009 related to the 4% global workforce reduction.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of the merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007, first and second quarters of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
In business segments where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated October 20, 2009, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
Note: See pages 9-15 for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective segment results.
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS11 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091102171334.txt.gz
TIME:20091102171334
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: November 2, 2009
 

Exhibit 5.1
November 2, 2009
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, NY 10286
Re:
Registration Statement on Form S-3
Ladies and Gentlemen:
This opinion is being furnished in connection with the registration for resale of 2,034,229 shares (the "Shares") of the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Corporation"). The Shares may be sold by certain selling stockholders from time to time, as described in the prospectus supplement dated November 2, 2009 (the "Prospectus Supplement") and the accompanying prospectus dated July 2, 2007 (the "Base Prospectus" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "Prospectus") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3 (Reg. No. 333-144261) (the "Registration Statement").
I have acted as counsel for the Corporation in connection with the proposed issue and sale of the Shares. I, or those acting under my supervision, have examined originals or copies, certified or otherwise identified to my satisfaction, of such documents and records and have made such investigation of fact and such examination of law as I, or they, have deemed appropriate in order to enable me to render the opinions set forth herein. In conducting such investigation, I, or they, relied, without independent verification, upon certificates of officers of the Corporation, public officials and other appropriate persons.
The opinions expressed herein are limited to matters governed by the corporate laws of Delaware and the federal laws of the United States of America.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, and subject to the exceptions, qualifications, limitations, assumptions and reliances stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable.
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Corporation as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
November 2, 2009
Page 2
Registration Statement. I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus under the captions "Legal Matters" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Very truly yours,
/s/ Arlie R. Nogay
Arlie R. Nogay


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091106120742.txt.gz
TIME:20091106120742
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 20, 2009, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2009 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. The Registrant previously furnished the press release as Exhibit 99.1 to a Current Report on Form 8-K, dated October 20, 2009, pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K.
A version of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, http://www.bnymellon.com/, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER CONTINUING EPS LOSS OF $2.04. IMPACTED BY:
 
 
CONTINUING EPS OF $0.54 (excluding investment securities portfolio restructuring and M&I expenses)
BALANCE SHEET RISK SIGNIFICANTLY REDUCED
 
 
 
 
CAPITAL REMAINS STRONG; 90% OF RESTRUCTURING CHARGE PREVIOUSLY REFLECTED IN TANGIBLE CAPITAL
 
REVENUE INCREASE AND EXPENSE DISCIPLINE RESULTED IN POSITIVE OPERATING LEVERAGE (excluding investment securities portfolio restructuring)
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported a third quarter loss from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $2.439 billion, or $2.04 per common share, compared with income of $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008 and $267 million, or $0.23 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009.
NEW YORK, Oct. 20, 2009 
Net loss applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $2.458 billion, or $2.05 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $303 million, or $0.26 per common share, in the third quarter of 2008 and $176 million, or $0.15 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009.
 
  
 
 
 Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2009 and are compared to the third quarter of 2008, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized (unless otherwise stated). Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Third Quarter Results
Total revenue
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
The was $147 million in the third quarter of 2009 compared with $61 million in the second quarter of 2009. The increase primarily relates to downgrades in the insurance and media portfolios. The provision is expected to decline in the fourth quarter of 2009. During the third quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased $70 million and net charge-offs totaled $77 million.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
Results for the third quarter of 2009 include an of $1.527 billion. Excluding the impact of the investment securities losses and M&I expenses, the effective tax rate was 31.8% (Non-GAAP) in the third quarter of 2009.
income tax benefit
The was $1.0 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 compared with a net of tax unrealized loss of $4.8 billion at June 30, 2009. The improvement reflects $3.0 billion related to the restructuring of the securities portfolio and $0.8 billion resulting from the improvement in the fixed income markets. Subsequent to Sept. 30, 2009, approximately $2.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost of $3.6 billion) of the lowest quality securities were sold at fair value. See page 9 for further information on the investment securities portfolio.
unrealized net of tax losses on our securities portfolio
 
 
totaled $560 million, an increase of $182 million compared with June 30, 2009, primarily reflecting downgrades in the insurance portfolio.
Nonperforming assets
 On Oct. 20, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of 9 cents per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 10, 2009 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 30, 2009.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
 
  
 
 
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.1 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $966 billion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
Investment Securities Portfolio
The following table provides a trend of the aggregate unrealized pre-tax gain (loss) of the investment securities portfolio.
 
 
The following table provides the pro forma impact of restructuring the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009.
 
 
 
  
 
 
Investment securities portfolio restructuring
Consistent with our ongoing strategy to reduce risk from the balance sheet, and reflecting the recent improvement in the fixed income markets, we have sold or are in the process of restructuring the watch list portion of our investment securities portfolio.
The restructuring impacts approximately $12.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost) of investment securities. As a result of investment securities sales and restructuring in the third quarter of 2009, we recognized a charge of $4.8 billion (pre-tax). Subsequent to Sept. 30, 2009, approximately $2.1 billion (pre-restructuring amortized cost of $3.6 billion) of the lowest quality securities were sold at fair value. The majority of the remaining restructured securities are expected to be retained on the balance sheet. Approximately 50% of the charge relates to securities that we plan to retain an interest in and for which we expect to recover a portion of the loss over time. In the fourth quarter of 2009, any declines in the fair value of these securities will be reflected in our net income until the restructuring is complete.
The restructuring charge had a minimal impact on the tangible capital ratio, as 90% of the charge had previously been reflected in tangible capital.
As a result of the restructuring, we expect net interest revenue to be positively impacted by approximately $125-$175 million in 2010.
The fair value of the investment securities portfolio at Sept. 30, 2009 was $54.1 billion. On a pro forma basis, reflecting the subsequent sale of securities, the fair value at Sept. 30, 2009 was $52.0 billion. The unrealized loss on the portfolio was $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 compared with $7.7 billion at June 30, 2009. The improvement reflects $4.8 billion related to the restructuring and $1.5 billion ($1.8 billion without the FAS 157-4 adjustment) resulting from the improvement in the fixed income markets.
Discontinued operations
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fits our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In July 2009, we signed a definitive agreement to sell Mellon United National Bank. Subject to regulatory approval, the transaction is expected to close in the first quarter of 2010. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the third quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $19 million primarily related to additional provision for credit losses resulting from the further deterioration of the South Florida real estate market. The after-tax loss of $151 million in the first nine months of 2009 primarily reflects the impairment and write-down of goodwill and an increase in the provision for credit losses.
 
  
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue and earnings measures which exclude the effect of investment securities losses and SILO/LILO charge; expense measures which exclude an FDIC special assessment, support agreement charges, asset-based taxes, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. We also present the aggregate unrealized securities losses excluding the impact of FAS 157-4 to provide investors with the impact disorderly markets had on the investment securities portfolio and the subsequent conversion to an orderly market. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expense relates to our Corporate Trust acquisition in 2006 and to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the transaction. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expense provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities losses, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. As a result, BNY Mellon believes that presenting measures that exclude investment securities losses from its results, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. The SILO/LILO charges relate to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income. We also present earnings information excluding the TARP redemption premium and dividend, so as to provide investors with a better understanding of operational results.
 
  
 
 
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis.
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the restructuring of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio, including statements with respect to the impact of the restructuring on future pricing, net interest revenue and risk of future securities losses, retention of the remaining restructured securities; the reflection of declines in the fair value of securities in BNY Mellon's net income; expectations with respect to declines in the provision for credit losses; and expectations with respect to the closing of the sale of Mellon United National Bank. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008, the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of Oct. 20, 2009 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091124155220.txt.gz
TIME:20091124155220
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Exhibit 5.1
 
 
November 24, 2009
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, NY  10286
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
This opinion is being furnished in connection with the registration for resale of 1,000,000 shares (the Shares) of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the Corporation).  The Shares may be sold by certain selling stockholders from time to time, as described in the prospectus supplement dated November 16, 2009 (the Prospectus Supplement) and the accompanying prospectus dated July 2, 2007 (the Base Prospectus and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus) that form part of the Companys effective registration statement on Form S-3 (Reg. No. 333-144261) (the Registration Statement).
 
I have acted as counsel for the Corporation in connection with the proposed issue and sale of the Shares.  I, or those acting under my supervision, have examined originals or copies, certified or otherwise identified to my satisfaction, of such documents and records and have made such investigation of fact and such examination of law as I, or they, have deemed appropriate in order to enable me to render the opinions set forth herein.  In conducting such investigation, I, or they, relied, without independent verification, upon certificates of officers of the Corporation, public officials and other appropriate persons.
 
The opinions expressed herein are limited to matters governed by the corporate laws of Delaware and the federal laws of the United States of America.
 
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, and subject to the exceptions, qualifications, limitations, assumptions and reliances stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable.
 
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Corporation as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the Form 8-K).  The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement.  I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
 
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus under the captions Legal Matters and Validity of Securities.  By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
Very truly yours,
/s/ Arlie R. Nogay
Arlie R. Nogay


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091208160736.txt.gz
TIME:20091208160736
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As previously disclosed, The Bank of New York Mellon (the "Bank"), a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant"), is being investigated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (the "CFTC" or the "Commission") in connection with a loan to Sentinel Management Group, Inc. ("Sentinel") by the Bank, which was secured by securities and cash in an account maintained at the Bank for Sentinel.
The Bank has received a notice from the Division of Enforcement (the "Division") of the CFTC indicating that the Division is considering a recommendation to the Commission that it file a civil enforcement action against the Bank for possible violations of the Commodity Exchange Act and CFTC regulations. The notice provides the Bank an opportunity to provide a written submission responding to issues raised in the Division's proposed enforcement proceeding prior to any decision by the Commission on initiating an enforcement proceeding, and is neither a formal allegation nor a finding of wrongdoing. On December 2, 2009, the Bank was given access to a draft of the complaint which the Division would propose to file if the Commission were to pursue a civil enforcement action. The Bank intends to respond by explaining why it believes an enforcement action is unwarranted. If an enforcement action is commenced, the Bank intends to vigorously defend itself.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20091209092333.txt.gz
TIME:20091209092333
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 3, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") substantially completed the restructuring of a portion of our investment securities portfolio, consisting of predominantly residential mortgage backed securities ("RMBS") issued by various REMICs. The RMBS are backed by pools of fixed and adjustable-rate mortgages secured by liens on one- to four-family residential properties.
The restructuring was previously reported in our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for quarterly period ending on September 30, 2009.
In the transaction completed on December 3, 2009, The Bank of New York Mellon and BNY Mellon, N.A., wholly-owned subsidiaries of BNY Mellon, sold 322 RMBS to CSMC Series 2009-ASG in exchange for 1) 100% of the subordinated Class B certificates (the "Certificates") of CSMC Series 2009-ASG, a Delaware statutory trust (the "Trust"), and 2) the net proceeds of $770,699,000 principal amount of Class A Notes, representing approximately 16% of the value of the Trust, which were sold to third party investors in transactions exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act pursuant to Rule 144A thereunder. The Class A Notes, rated AAA by DBRS, bear interest at one-month LIBOR plus 1.25% and are expected to have a weighted average life of less than one year.
The RMBS sold in the transaction had a fair value of $5 billion at September 30, 2009 and the sale did not result in a significant gain or loss. As a result of SFAS No. 167  Amendments to FIN No. 46 (R) (ASC 810), discussed in our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ending September 30, 2009, effective January 1, 2010 we will be required to consolidate the Trust. As a result, after that date the RMBS will be recorded as assets and the Class A Notes will be recorded as liabilities on our consolidated balance sheet. We do not expect the consolidation of the Trust to have a significant impact on our capital ratios or financial condition.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100120070142.txt.gz
TIME:20100120070142
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On January 20, 2010, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2009 and fourth quarter 2009. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.59 OR $712 MILLION;
NET BENEFIT OF $0.04 DUE TO:
ASSET AND WEALTH MANAGEMENT FEES +13% SEQUENTIALLY
SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED RESTRUCTURING OF INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
CAPITAL RATIOS REMAIN STRONG
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $712 million, or $0.59 per common share, compared with $50 million, or $0.04 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a loss of $2.439 billion, or $2.04 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009.
NEW YORK, Jan. 20, 2010 
"We saw excellent growth in asset and wealth management revenues this quarter, which benefited from long-term flows, the contribution from Insight Investment Management, higher equity values and stronger investment performance. However, the persistent low interest rate environment globally increasingly challenged our net interest revenue and fee revenue," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"In 2009, we completed our merger, raised equity and repaid TARP, successfully completed the restructuring of our investment securities portfolio and ended the year with strong capital ratios. I want to thank all of our employees, as our accomplishments in a very challenging year reflect their excellent work and dedication," added Mr. Kelly.
The net loss from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders totaled $1.097 billion, or $0.93 per common share, for the full year 2009 compared to net income of $1.398 billion, or $1.21 per common share, for the full year 2008. Net loss applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, for the full-year 2009 totaled $1.367 billion, or $1.16 per common share, compared to net income of $1.386 billion, or $1.20 per common share, for the full-year 2008.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2009 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2008, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Fourth Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
The decreased to $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009 compared with $147 million in the third quarter of 2009. The decrease in the provision reflects a lower number of downgrades in the fourth quarter of 2009. During the fourth quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased $32 million and net charge-offs totaled $33 million.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
Results for the fourth quarter of 2009 include a of $41 million which consists primarily of a $51 million benefit from a higher proportion of foreign earnings, as well as a $133 million benefit from discrete tax items primarily related to a tax loss on mortgages. Excluding the impact of the restructuring charges, M&I expenses, securities gains and the discrete tax benefit, the effective tax rate was approximately 22% (Non-GAAP) in the fourth quarter of 2009.
net income tax benefit
The was $783 million at Dec. 31, 2009 compared with a net of tax unrealized loss of $1.0 billion at Sept. 30, 2009.
unrealized net of tax losses on our investment securities portfolio
 
totaled $550 million, a decrease of $10 million compared with Sept. 30, 2009.
Nonperforming assets
 On Jan. 20, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 9, 2010 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Feb. 1, 2010.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
 
3
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Dec. 31, 2009 and are available at (Investor RelationsFinancial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EST on Wednesday, Jan. 20, 2010. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EST on Jan. 20, 2010. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 20, 2010 at approximately 2:00 p.m. EST through Wednesday, Feb. 3, 2010 by dialing (800) 664-4219 (U.S.) or (203) 369-3307 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
Investment Securities Portfolio
At Dec. 31, 2009, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $55.9 billion. The unrealized pre-tax loss on our securities portfolio was $1.2 billion at Dec. 31, 2009 compared with $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 and $7.6 billion at Dec. 31, 2008.
In the fourth quarter of 2009, we securitized $5.0 billion, fair value, of our investment securities portfolio into a Grantor Trust. The Grantor Trust contains Alt-A, prime and subprime RMBS which were previously written down to fair value as part of the 3Q09 restructuring of the investment securities portfolio. As a result of this transaction, we received $771 million in cash for a Class A senior tranche that was sold to third parties and retained Class B certificates with a fair value of $4.2 billion, which is included in the tables below. The transaction resulted in a $39 million net loss in the fourth quarter of 2009, which was offset by $54 million of net gains on the sale of $3.6 billion of investment securities. The following table presents the fourth quarter 2009 activity related to restructuring and reducing risk in the investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
9
Restructuring charge
As part of an ongoing effort to improve efficiency and develop a global operating model that provides the highest quality of service to our clients, BNY Mellon continues to execute its global location strategy. This strategy includes migrating positions to our global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions.
In December 2009, we recorded a pre-tax restructuring charge of $139 million, or $0.07 per common share. This charge was comprised of $102 million for severance costs and $37 million for asset write-offs and other costs. The restructuring charge is recorded as a separate line on the income statement.
Discontinued operations
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In July 2009, we signed a definitive agreement to sell Mellon United National Bank. The transaction was completed on Jan. 15, 2010. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the fourth quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $119 million largely related to additional write-downs primarily for retained South Florida real estate loans. The value of these loans, which are carried at the lower of cost or market, was $383 million (face value of $635 million) at Dec. 31, 2009. The after-tax loss of $270 million for the full-year of 2009 primarily reflects the loan write-downs and the elimination of $82 million of goodwill recorded in the second quarter of 2009.
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $593 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009, compared with $28 million, or $0.02 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a net loss of $2.458 billion, or $2.05 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009.
Income statement adjustments
The following reclassifications were made to the income statement in the second quarter 2009.
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it
 
10
excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue and earnings measures which exclude the effect of investment securities gains (losses) and SILO/LILO charge; expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, an FDIC special assessment, support agreement charges, asset-based taxes, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the benefit of tax settlements and discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses relates to our Corporate Trust acquisition in 2006 and to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. As a result, BNY Mellon believes that presenting measures that exclude investment securities gains (losses) from its results, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. The SILO/LILO charges relate to a one-time settlement with the IRS of tax structured lease transactions in 2008. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
 
11
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis.
 
 
 
 
12
 
 
 
13
 
14
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to BNY Mellon's global location strategy. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008, the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of Jan. 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
15


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100126090954.txt.gz
TIME:20100126090954
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
NON-GAAP MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of investment securities gains (losses) and expense, pre-tax income and net income measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, intangible amortization expenses, support agreement charges, asset-based taxes, the FDIC special assessment, investment securities gains (losses), discrete tax benefits and the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses relate to our Corporate Trust acquisition in 2006 and to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities losses, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. As a result, BNY Mellon believes that presenting measures which exclude investment securities losses from its results, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Discrete tax benefits relate to a tax loss on mortgages. Excluding these benefits permits investors to calculate the tax impact for BNY Mellon's primary businesses.
In this earnings review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment securities gains (losses).
Noninterest expense: M&I expenses; intangible amortization expense, support agreement charges, FDIC special assessment and restructuring charges.
Earnings per share: Investment securities gains (losses), M&I expenses, restructuring charges, FDIC special assessment, support agreement charges, intangible amortization expense, discrete tax benefits and the benefit of tax settlements.
 
 
Page - 2
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2009 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 4Q09 vs. 3Q09 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 4
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 6
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps - basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 7
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Dec. 31, 2009, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $55.9 billion. The unrealized pre-tax loss on our securities portfolio was $1.2 billion at Dec. 31, 2009 compared with $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009 and $7.6 billion at Dec. 31, 2008.
In the fourth quarter of 2009, we securitized $5.0 billion, fair value, of our investment securities portfolio into a Grantor Trust. The Grantor Trust contains Alt-A, prime and subprime RMBS which were previously written down to fair value as part of the 3Q09 restructuring of the investment securities portfolio. As a result of this transaction, we received $771 million in cash for a Class A senior tranche that was sold to third parties and retained Class B certificates with a fair value of $4.2 billion, which is included in the tables below. The transaction resulted in a $39 million net loss in the fourth quarter of 2009, which was offset by $54 million of net gains on the sale of $3.6 billion of investment securities. The following table presents the fourth quarter 2009 activity related to restructuring and reducing risk in the investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
RESTRUCTURING CHARGE
As part of an ongoing effort to improve efficiency and develop a global operating model that provides the highest quality of service to our clients, BNY Mellon continues to execute its global location strategy. This strategy includes migrating positions to our global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions.
In December 2009, we recorded a pre-tax restructuring charge of $139 million, or $0.07 per common share. This charge was comprised of $102 million for severance costs and $37 million for asset write-offs and other costs. The restructuring charge is recorded as a separate line on the income statement.
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING ACTIVITIES REVENUE
 
 
CAPITAL
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $10 million compared with Sept. 30, 2009. The decrease primarily resulted from repayments and charge-offs, partially offset by additions of $14 million to a metal fabricating company and $9 million from residential mortgages.
 
 
Page - 10
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $65 million in 4Q09 compared with $147 million in 3Q09. The decrease in the provision reflects a lower number of downgrades in the fourth quarter of 2009. During the fourth quarter of 2009, the total allowance for credit losses increased $32 million and net charge-offs totaled $33 million.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In July 2009, we signed a definitive agreement to sell Mellon United National Bank. The transaction was completed on Jan. 15, 2010. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the fourth quarter of 2009, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $119 million largely related to additional write-downs primarily for retained South Florida real estate loans. The value of these loans, which are carried at the lower of cost or market, was $383 million (face value $635 million) at Dec. 31, 2009. The after-tax loss of $270 million for the full-year of 2009 primarily reflects the loan write-downs and the elimination of $82 million of goodwill recorded in the second quarter of 2009.
 
 
Page - 11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations and related entities)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 13
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 14
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
MERGER UPDATE  INTEGRATION MILESTONES
 
 
 
 
Service Quality Goals for 2010  Asset Servicing
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 22
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation 4Q09 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, including statements with respect to BNY Mellon's new business pipeline, the impact of the restructuring on net interest revenue, and expectations with respect to BNY Mellon's global location strategy; as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2008, the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings review speak only as of Jan. 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity ("the merger").
The results prior to the consummation of the merger reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus segment data on the Form 10-K for the quarter ended December 31, 2009.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the fourth quarter 2009 results of the Asset Management segment.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. The financial results for all periods were restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/ Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of the merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007, first and second quarters of 2008 and full year of 2009).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
In business segments where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated January 20, 2010, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (Continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
n/a - Information not available on a combined basis.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. During the first quarter of 2009, the financial results of the Execution business have been moved from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida; previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect all of these changes.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100203160233.txt.gz
TIME:20100203160233
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 2, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") entered into a Stock Purchase Agreement (the "Stock Purchase Agreement") with The PNC Financial Services Group, Inc. ("PNC"). Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Stock Purchase Agreement, which has been approved by the board of directors of each company, PNC will sell to BNY Mellon (the "Stock Sale") 100% of the issued and outstanding shares of PNC Global Investment Servicing Inc., an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary of PNC ("GIS") for $2.31 billion in cash. This purchase price is subject to customary post-closing upward or downward adjustment based on the tangible capital of GIS as of the closing of the Stock Sale.
Under the Stock Purchase Agreement, the obligation of each of BNY Mellon and PNC to consummate the Stock Sale is conditioned upon (i) the expiration or termination of the applicable Hart-Scott-Rodino Act waiting period, (ii) the receipt of specified U.S. and foreign governmental approvals and consents, (iii) the absence of any order or injunction prohibiting the consummation of the Stock Sale, (iv) subject to certain exceptions, the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the other party, and (v) performance in all material respects by the other party of its obligations under the Stock Purchase Agreement.
PNC has entered into various covenants in the Stock Purchase Agreement, including, among others, covenants (i) to cause GIS to operate in the ordinary course of business, and not to enter into certain types of transactions, between the execution of the Stock Purchase Agreement and the closing of the Stock Sale, (ii) not to solicit alternative acquisition proposals relating to GIS and (iii) subject to certain exceptions contained in the Stock Purchase Agreement, not to (a) hire any employees of GIS for 18 months following the closing of the Stock Sale or (b) engage in specified activities competitive with the business of GIS for a period of 48 months following the closing of the Stock Sale. BNY Mellon has also entered into covenants in the Stock Purchase Agreement, including, among others, a covenant to use commercially reasonable best efforts to obtain requisite regulatory approvals.
The Stock Purchase Agreement contains representations and warranties of PNC including, among others, with respect to consents and approvals of regulatory agencies, financial statements and absence of undisclosed liabilities, material contracts, litigation, compliance with law and possession of permits, insurance, taxes, employee benefits, intellectual property matters, real estate matters, intercompany arrangements, accuracy of governmental filings, accuracy of books and records, principal clients and absence of employees serving as officers, directors, or employees of clients, and representations and warranties of BNY Mellon, including representations regarding consents and approvals of regulatory agencies, accuracy of governmental filings, financial wherewithal to pay the purchase price, compliance with law, absence of agreements with regulatory agencies, and investment intent. The Stock Purchase
Agreement contains indemnification obligations of each party with respect to breaches of representations, warranties and covenants and certain other specified matters.
The Stock Purchase Agreement contains certain termination rights for BNY Mellon and PNC, as the case may be, applicable upon final, non-appealable denial of required regulatory approvals or injunction prohibiting the transactions contemplated by the Stock Purchase Agreement, a breach by the other party that is not or cannot be cured within 30 days' notice of such breach if such breach would result in a failure of the conditions to closing set forth in the Stock Purchase Agreement, or November 1, 2010 if the Stock Purchase has not been consummated by such date.
In connection with the entry into the Stock Purchase Agreement, BNY Mellon and PNC have also entered into a transition services agreement, pursuant to which PNC will continue to provide certain support services to GIS following the completion of the Stock Sale, and an agreement under which PNC will continue to source certain services it currently receives from GIS for a specified period after the completion of the Stock Sale.
The foregoing description of the Stock Sale and the Stock Purchase Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Stock Purchase Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 2.1 hereto, and is incorporated into this report by reference. The Stock Purchase Agreement and the above description of the Stock Purchase Agreement have been included to provide investors and security holders with information regarding the terms of the Stock Purchase Agreement. It is not intended to provide any other factual information about BNY Mellon, PNC or their respective subsidiaries and affiliates. The Stock Purchase Agreement contains representations and warranties of each of BNY Mellon, on the one hand, and PNC, on the other hand, made solely for the benefit of the other. The assertions embodied in those representations and warranties are qualified by information in confidential disclosure schedules that the parties have exchanged in connection with signing the Stock Purchase Agreement. The disclosure schedules contain information that modifies, qualifies and creates exceptions to the representations and warranties set forth in the Stock Purchase Agreement. In addition, such representations and warranties may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material by security holders of, or other investors in, BNY Mellon. Moreover, the representations and warranties in the Stock Purchase Agreement were used for the purpose of allocating risk between BNY Mellon, on the one hand, and PNC, on the other hand. Security holders and investors are not third-party beneficiaries under the Stock Purchase Agreement. Accordingly, you should read the representations and warranties in the Stock Purchase Agreement not in isolation but only in conjunction with the other information about BNY Mellon and PNC, or any of their respective subsidiaries or affiliates that the respective companies include in reports, statements and other filings they make with the Securities and Exchange Commission, and you should not rely on the representations, warranties and covenants
or any descriptions thereof as characterizations of the actual state of facts or condition of BNY Mellon or PNC or any of their respective subsidiaries or affiliates.
 
On February 2, 2010, BNY Mellon issued a press release announcing the execution of the Stock Purchase Agreement. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT, dated as of February 1, 2010 (this ""), is by and between , a Pennsylvania corporation (""), and , a Delaware corporation ("").
Agreement
THE PNC FINANCIAL SERVICES GROUP, INC.
Seller
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Buyer
WHEREAS, Seller owns indirectly through its direct wholly-owned subsidiary ("") all of the outstanding common stock of , a Delaware corporation (the ""), $.01 par value per share (the ""); and
PNC HOLDING, LLC
Intermediate Holdco
PNC GLOBAL INVESTMENT SERVICING INC.
Company
Company Common Stock
WHEREAS, the Company's wholly-owned Subsidiaries provide processing, technology and business intelligence for investment management and distribution clients; and
WHEREAS, Seller desires to cause Intermediate Holdco to sell and transfer, and Buyer desires to purchase, the Company Common Stock, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
WHEREAS, the parties desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with this Agreement; and
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth herein, and for other good and valuable consideration, and intending to be legally bound, the parties hereto agree as follows:
: For all purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the respective meanings set forth under this "Definitions" heading (such definitions to be equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms herein defined):
Definitions
"" shall mean the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
1940 Act
"" shall mean (a) all trade accounts receivable and rights to payment, including for services rendered, (b) all other accounts or notes receivable, (c) the full benefit of all security for any of the foregoing, and (d) any claim, remedy or other right related to any of the foregoing.
Accounts Receivable
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.10.
Acquisition Proposal
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.17(b).
Additional Arrangement
"" shall mean the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended.
Advisers Act
"" shall mean any individual, partnership, corporation, entity or other Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by
Affiliate
or is under common control with the Person specified. For the avoidance of doubt, neither BlackRock, Inc. nor any of its Subsidiaries shall be considered an Affiliate of Seller for any purpose of this Agreement.
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.4(b).
Agreed Claims
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
"" shall mean Albridge Solutions, Inc., a Delaware corporation and an indirect, wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company.
Albridge Solutions
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(c).
Allocation
"" shall mean any domestic or foreign federal, state or local statute, law (whether statutory or common law), ordinance, rule, administrative interpretation, regulation, order, writ, injunction, directive or judgment (including those of the FINRA or any other self-regulatory organization) applicable to and legally binding on the Company, Buyer or Seller or any of their respective Affiliates, equity holders, properties, assets, officers, directors, employees or agents, as the case may be.
Applicable Law
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(b).
Benefit Continuation Period
"" shall mean all books and records (in any form or medium) of, or maintained for, the Company, its Subsidiaries or the GIS Business, to the extent owned by, or in the possession of, the Company and its Affiliates.
Books and Records
"" shall mean any day that the NYSE is normally open for trading and that is not a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which banks in the City of New York are authorized or required to close for regular banking business.
Business Day
"" shall mean the PNC Global Investment Servicing (U.S.) Inc. Retirement Savings Plan.
Business 401(k) Plan
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Buyer
"" shall mean the disclosure schedule dated as of the date of the Agreement and delivered by Buyer to Seller prior to the execution and delivery of the Agreement.
Buyer Disclosure Schedule
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.2.
Buyer Indemnitees
"" shall mean, with respect to Buyer, any effect that prevents, or would be reasonably likely to prevent, Buyer from consummating the transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis.
Buyer Material Adverse Effect
"" shall mean the Bylaws of the Company, as currently in effect.
Bylaws
 
"" shall mean the Certificate of Incorporation of the Company, as currently in effect.
Certificate of Incorporation
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.4(a).
Claim Certificate
"" shall mean any Person to whom the Company or any of its Subsidiaries provides services under any Contract.
Client
"" shall mean Contracts with Clients of the GIS Business, including Principal Clients.
Client Contracts
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.3(a).
Closing
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.3(a).
Closing Date
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Closing Tangible Capital
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Closing Tangible Capital Statement
"" shall mean that certain Partnership Interest Purchase Agreement dated as of December 7, 2007, by and among the Company, Board Systems, LLC, Coates Analytics, L.P. and the other parties thereto.
Coates Acquisition Agreement
"" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(e).
Combined Service
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Company
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.5(a).
Company Balance Sheet
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Company Common Stock
"" shall mean the disclosure schedule dated as of the date of the Agreement and delivered by Seller to Buyer prior to the execution and delivery of the Agreement.
Company Disclosure Schedule
"" shall mean the employees of, and employees on leave of absence from, the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the Closing Date.
Company Employee
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.5(a).
Company Financial Statements
"" shall mean all the Intellectual Property (including Company Software) owned by any of the Company or its Subsidiaries.
Company Intellectual Property
 
"" shall mean a material adverse effect on (a) the business, results of operations, or financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole), or (b) the ability of Seller to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby on a timely basis; provided, however, that "Company Material Adverse Effect" shall not include any event, occurrence, fact, condition, or change, directly or indirectly, arising out of or attributable to: (i) any changes, conditions or effects in the United States or foreign economies in general; (ii) changes, conditions or effects that generally affect the industries in which the GIS Business operates; (iii) changes after the date of this Agreement in legal or regulatory requirements, practices or conditions generally applicable to any industry in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries operate; (iv) changes in GAAP or changes in regulatory accounting requirements after the date of this Agreement applicable to any industry in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries operates; or (v) the announcement of the execution of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby or actions or omissions of the Company or its Affiliates required by this Agreement or taken with the prior consent of, or requested by, Buyer; provided further, that any event, occurrence, fact, condition, or change referred to in clauses (i), (ii) or (iii) immediately above shall be taken into account in determining whether a Company Material Adverse Effect has occurred or could reasonably be expected to occur to the extent that such event, occurrence, fact, condition, or change has a disproportionate effect on the GIS Business compared to other participants in the industries in which they conduct their businesses.
Company Material Adverse Effect
"" shall mean each Plan primarily maintained by the Company or one of its Subsidiaries and each Plan maintained exclusively for current or former service providers of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Company Plan
"" shall mean all Software owned on the date hereof by any of the Company or its Subsidiaries that is not Third-Party Software to which the Company has assigned an application code.
Company Software
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.15(a).
Competitive Activities
"" shall mean that certain letter agreement dated as of October 7, 2009 between Seller and Buyer.
Confidentiality Agreement
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(b).
Continuing Employees
"" shall mean the business relationship agreement between Buyer and Seller to be entered into as of the Closing, the form of which is set forth in Exhibit B.
Continuing Relationship Agreement
"" shall mean any contract, agreement, indenture, note, bond, deed of trust, loan, instrument, lease, conditional sale contract, purchase or sales order, mortgage, license or other legally enforceable arrangement or obligation, whether written or oral, to which the applicable Person is a party or by which the applicable Person or any of its properties or assets is bound, in each case as amended, supplemented, restated, waived or otherwise modified and including all exhibits, schedules and other attachments thereto.
Contracts
"" shall mean any liabilities (a) under Title IV of ERISA, (b) under section 302 of ERISA, and (c) under sections 412 and 4971 of the Code.
Controlled Group Liability
 
"" in a Person shall mean the ownership of capital stock or other equity interests in or the holding of Contract rights with respect to such Person which gives the owner or holder thereof the ability to control the activities of such Person. Any Person that owns or controls 25% or more of the capital stock or other equity interests in another Person shall be presumed to hold a Controlling Interest in such other Person.
Controlling Interest
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.17.
Covered Arrangements
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Cut-Off Date
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Cut-Off Time
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.2.
Damages
"" shall mean an account designated by Seller not less than two Business Days prior to the Closing.
Designated Account
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.1.
Designated Buyer Representations
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.1.
Designated Seller Representations
"" of a Client or fund serviced by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company shall mean a director thereof as defined in Section 3(a)(7) of the Exchange Act.
Director
"" shall mean threats known as Software viruses, worms, sniffers, salamis, time bombs, logic bombs, Trojan horses, trap doors or other computer instructions, intentional devices or techniques that can or were designed to threaten, infect, assault, vandalize, defraud, disrupt, damage, steal, take over or be used to take over operation of, allow or enable to be used to allow or enable unauthorized access to or use of, by-pass, disable, or shut down all or any part of a computer system or network, or computer data, including its firewalls, security or user passwords or other similar protections, data or databases, hardware or Software.
Disabling Devices
"" shall mean the Antitrust Division of the U.S. Department of Justice.
DOJ
"" shall mean a Subsidiary other than a Foreign Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" shall mean any Applicable Law regulating or relating to human health or safety or the protection of natural resources or the environment (including Applicable Laws relating to pollution, contamination or the handling, release or disposal of Hazardous Materials).
Environmental Law
"" shall mean the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, and the rules, regulations and class exemptions of the Department of Labor thereunder.
ERISA
 
"" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC thereunder.
Exchange Act
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.3(a).
Excluded Buyer Qualifications
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.2(a).
Excluded Seller Qualifications
"" shall mean (a) any Taxes of the Company and its Subsidiaries for any Pre-Closing Period (other than any Taxes resulting from, arising out of, relating to, in the nature of or caused by any information reporting or backup withholding provisions of Applicable Law), and (b) any Taxes of any other Person, including Seller, Intermediate Holdco or any of their respective Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries and Buyer and any of its Affiliates) for which the Company and its Subsidiaries may be liable under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of state, local or foreign Tax law). For purposes of this Agreement, in the case of any Straddle Period, (i) Property Taxes of the Company and its Subsidiaries shall be allocated between the period ending on the Closing Date and the period beginning after the Closing Date pro rata on the basis of the number of days in such Tax period, and (ii) Taxes (other than Property Taxes) of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the Pre-Closing Period shall be computed as if such taxable period ended as of the close of business on the Closing Date.
Excluded Taxes
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(c).
Final
Allocation
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Final Tangible Capital
"" shall mean the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.
FINRA
"" shall mean any Subsidiary that is not incorporated, formed or organized under the laws of the United States of America, any State thereof, the District of Columbia or any of the territories or possessions of the United States of America or any political subdivision thereof.
Foreign Subsidiary
"" shall mean the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.
FTC
"" shall mean generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States as in effect at the time any applicable financial statements were or are prepared, consistently applied.
GAAP
"" shall mean the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries as conducted on the date of this Agreement.
GIS Business
"" means each of the following business lines of the GIS Business: Transfer Agency; Subaccounting; AOS; Banking Transaction Services; Fund Accounting; AIS; Custody; ABD; Securities Lending; PNC Managed Investments; Albridge Solutions and International.
GIS Line of Business
 
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.2(b).
GISUS
"" shall mean any United States or foreign government, any state or other political subdivision thereof, any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of or pertaining to government, including the SEC, or any other authority, agency, department, board, commission or instrumentality of the United States, any State of the United States or any political subdivision thereof or any foreign jurisdiction, any self-regulatory organization, and any court, tribunal or arbitrator(s) of competent jurisdiction.
Governmental Authority
"" shall mean any order, writ, judgment, injunction, decree, stipulation, determination, award or other written agreement (other than a Client Contract) entered by or with any Governmental Authority.
Governmental Order
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(e).
Grandfathered Employees
"" shall mean any pollutant, contaminant, hazardous or toxic waste, substance or other material that is listed, defined, designated or classified as, otherwise determined to be, hazardous, radioactive or toxic or a pollutant or a contaminant under or pursuant to any Environmental Law, including any mixture or solution thereof, and specifically including petroleum and all derivatives thereof or synthetic substitutes therefor, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials, radon or urea-formaldehyde.
Hazardous Materials
"" shall mean the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act, of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
HSR Act
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(b).
Inactive Employee
"" shall mean, without duplication, (a) all indebtedness for borrowed money or for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than current trade liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business and payable in accordance with customary practices), whether or not evidenced by a writing, (b) any other indebtedness that is evidenced by a note, bond, debenture, draft or similar instrument, (c) all obligations under financing or capital leases, (d) all obligations in respect of acceptances issued or created, (e) notes payable and drafts accepted representing extensions of credit, (f) all liabilities secured by any Lien on any property (other than any mechanics', carriers', workers', repairers' and similar Liens arising or incurred in the ordinary course of business), (g) letters of credit and any other agreements relating to the borrowing of money or extension of credit and (h) any guarantee of any of the foregoing obligations.
Indebtedness
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.4(a).
Indemnified Party
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.4(a).
Indemnifying Party
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(c).
Independent Expert
"" shall mean any and all of the following: (a) inventions, ideas, concepts and discoveries (whether or not patented, patentable or unpatentable and whether
Intellectual Property
 
or not reduced to practice), inventors' certificates, invention disclosures and improvements thereto; (b) patents, patent applications, and utility models, together with foreign counterparts, reissuances, continuations, continuations-in-part, divisionals, revisions, extensions and reexaminations thereof; (c) trademarks, service marks, trade dress, logos, trade names, domain names and corporate names, together with translations, adaptations, derivations and combinations thereof and including all goodwill associated therewith, and applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (d) writings and work of authorship (whether or not copyrightable), all copyrights, and Moral Rights, applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (e) mask works and applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (f) data, databases and compilations of information; (g) trade secrets and confidential or proprietary business, financial and technical information and data (including ideas, research and development, know-how, methods, procedures, formulas, compositions, technical data, designs, drawings, specifications, customer and supplier lists, pricing and cost and other financial information, and business, product and marketing plans and proposals); (h) Software; (i) all other proprietary or intellectual property rights; and (j) all whole or partial copies, abstracts, summaries and tangible embodiments or representations of any of the foregoing (in whatever form or medium).
"" shall mean the total indebtedness owing by all of the Company and its Subsidiaries, on the one hand, to Seller or any Affiliate of Seller other than the Company and any of its Subsidiaries, on the other hand; provided that Intercompany Indebtedness shall not include intercompany payables in respect of services rendered or in respect of accrued interest. For the avoidance of doubt, intercompany payables in respect of services rendered or in respect of accrued interest, in each case, as of the Closing shall be handled in a manner consistent with past practice.
Intercompany Indebtedness
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Intermediate Holdco
"" shall mean the Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
"" or "" with respect to Buyer shall mean any matter which is within the actual knowledge of those individuals set forth on Section 1 of the Buyer Disclosure Schedule.
Knowledge
Known
"" or "" with respect to Seller shall mean any matter which is within the actual knowledge of those individuals set forth on Section 1 of the Company Disclosure Schedule.
Knowledge
Known
"" shall mean premises leased or subleased to the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company pursuant to the Leases.
Leased Premises
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.14(b).
Leases
"" shall mean any lien, claim, charge, option, encumbrance, easement, defect in title, mortgage, pledge or security interest or other limitation, restriction or third-party rights of any kind.
Lien
 
"" shall mean any licensed database concerning financial information, financial indices, funds, financial or commodities markets, currency, securities, options, futures, derivatives or other instruments or investment vehicles, including pricing information, reference data, indicative data, exchange rates, evaluations, analytics, ratings, performance data, corporate actions data, constituent data and identities.
Market Data
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.6(a).
Material Contract
"" shall mean each license or sublicense to which Seller, the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries are a party with respect to Third-Party Intellectual Property involving annual payments in an aggregate amount in excess of $250,000 by the Company or its Subsidiaries.
Material Third-Party Intellectual Property Agreement
"" means all rights of paternity, integrity, disclosure and withdrawal and any other rights, with respect to copyrighted material, that are generally known as or referred to as "moral rights."
Moral Rights
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(c).
New Plans
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.12(a).
Non-U.S. Employment Agreements
"" shall mean The New York Stock Exchange, Inc.
NYSE
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(c).
Old Plans
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Operating Loss Reserve
"" shall mean the ordinary course of business of the GIS Business consistent in all material respects with past practice and without regard to the transactions contemplated hereby.
Ordinary Course of Business
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.14(a).
Owned Real Property
"" shall mean all municipal, state and federal and other governmental permits, licenses, registrations, agreements, waivers, exemptions and authorizations held or used by the applicable Person in connection with its business and operations.
Permits
"" shall mean all Liens that are for Taxes or assessments that are payable by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as primary obligor that are not yet due and payable, or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings to the extent scheduled in Section 2.11(d) of the Company Disclosure Schedule; Liens or pledges to secure payments of workmen's compensation and other payments, unemployment and other insurance, old-age pensions or other social security obligations, or the performance of bids, tenders, leases, contracts, public or statutory obligations, surety, stay or appeal bonds, or other similar obligations arising in the Ordinary Course of Business; workmen's, repairmen's, warehousemen's, vendors', mechanics' or carriers' Liens or other similar Liens arising in the Ordinary Course of Business and securing sums that are not past due, or deposits or pledges to
Permitted Liens
 
obtain the release of any such Liens; and statutory landlords' Liens under Leases to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party; and the following, provided none impairs in any material respect the use of the real property in question in the operation of the GIS Business in the Ordinary Course of Business or impairs in any material respect the value of such property for the purpose of the GIS Business: (a) zoning restrictions; (b) easements; (c) rights of way; (d) licenses and restrictions on use; (e) minor irregularities or imperfections in title; and (f) other minor encumbrances.
"" shall mean any individual, corporation, company, partnership (limited or general), limited liability company, joint venture, association, trust or other business entity.
Person
"" shall mean each employee benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA) and each compensation, bonus, incentive, deferred compensation, capital appreciation, pension, profit sharing, retirement, option, equity or equity-based, employment, retention, stay bonus, non-compete, non-solicitation, change of control, severance, reduction-in-force, termination pay or similar plan, program, policy, practice, arrangement or agreement, and each life, hospitalization, medical or other welfare or employee benefit insurance or fringe benefit plan, program, policy, practice, arrangement or agreement in effect as of the date hereof that is sponsored or maintained by the Company or its Affiliates or to which the Company or its Affiliates is party or contributes or is obligated to contribute, pay premiums or make other payments, whether actual or contingent, in all cases with respect to or on behalf of current or former employees, consultants and directors of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Plans
"" shall mean, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries, any taxable year or period that begins after the Closing Date and, in the case of any Straddle Period, the portion of such period beginning immediately after the Closing Date.
Post-Closing Period
"" shall mean, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries, any taxable year or period that ends on or before the Closing Date and, in the case of any Straddle Period, the portion of such period ending on and including the Closing Date.
Pre-Closing Period
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(e).
PRMA
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(a)(ii).
Principal Client Contract(s)
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(a).
Principal Clients
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.8(a).
Proceedings
"" shall mean real, personal, and intangible property taxes.
Property Taxes
ad valorem
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.2.
Purchase Price
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.12(c).
Qualified Plans
 
"" shall mean the HSR Act, the Sherman Antitrust Act of 1890, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the Clayton Act of 1914, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and any other federal, state and foreign statutes, rules, regulations, orders, decrees, administrative and judicial doctrines and other laws that are designed or intended to prohibit, restrict or regulate actions having the purpose or effect of monopolization or restraint of trade or lessening of competition through merger or acquisition.
Regulatory Laws
"" shall mean, with respect to any Person, any and all directors, officers, employees, consultants, financial advisors, counsel, accountants and other agents of such Person; provided, however, that the Person set forth on Section 2 of the Company Disclosure Schedule and its Affiliates shall not be, or be deemed to be, a Representative of Buyer or any Affiliate of Buyer for any purpose hereunder.
Representative
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.5(a).
Required Approvals
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.15(a).
Restricted Period
"" shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission, and any successor thereto.
SEC
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.2(b).
Section 4.2(b) Companies
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(d).
Section 338 Forms
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(a).
Section 338(h)(10) Election
"" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC thereunder.
Securities Act
"" shall mean the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, the 1940 Act, the Advisers Act, state "blue sky," securities and investment advisory laws, all applicable foreign securities laws, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Securities Laws
"" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Seller
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.3.
Seller Indemnitees
"" shall mean each Plan (other than a Company Plan) maintained by Seller, but under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a participating employer or in which Company Employees participate.
Seller Plan
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.9(e).
Seller's Retiree Medical Plan
"" shall mean all computer software (whether or not separately compilable), including all computer programs and instructions, whether in source code or object
Software
 
code form, algorithms, "firmware" and other forms of micro code, edit controls, methodologies, flow charts, pseudo codes and any and all systems documentation (including data entry and data processing procedures, report generation and quality control procedures), logic and designs for all programs, software specifications, manuals and other documentation and file layouts and programmer's notes or other written narratives of or comments on any or all programming or procedures used in the coding or maintenance of such computer software.
"" shall mean source code for the Software and any programmer's notes, comments, explanatory material and commentary to any such source code, development level programming, flow charts and specifications of the Software, and all subsequent versions, revisions, enhancements, modifications, updates or releases thereto.
Source Code
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.1.
Stock Purchase
"" shall mean, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries, any taxable period beginning on or prior to and ending after the Closing Date.
Straddle Period
"" of a Person shall mean any other Person 50% or more of the voting stock (or of any other form of other voting or controlling equity interest in the case of a Person that is not a corporation) of which is beneficially owned by the Person directly or indirectly through one or more other Persons.
Subsidiary
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.1.
Survival Period
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Exhibit A.
Target Tangible Capital
"" shall mean any claim with respect to Taxes made by any Taxing Authority that, if pursued successfully, would reasonably be expected to serve as the basis for a claim under Article VII.
Tax Claim
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.6(b).
Tax Proceeding
"" shall mean all returns, declarations, reports, statements, estimates, information statements and other forms and documents (including all schedules, exhibits, and other attachments thereto) required to be filed with any Taxing Authority in connection with the calculation, determination, assessment or collection of, any Taxes.
Tax Return
"" shall mean all federal, state, local, foreign and other income, gross receipts, sales, use, production, ad valorem, transfer, franchise, registration, profits, license, lease, service, service use, withholding, payroll, employment, unemployment, estimated, excise, severance, environmental, stamp, occupation, premium, property (real or personal), real property gains, windfall profits, customs, duties or other taxes, assessments or charges (of any kind whatsoever, together with any interest) additions or penalties with respect thereto and any interest in respect of such additions or penalties imposed by any Taxing Authority.
Taxes
"" shall mean any Governmental Authority having jurisdiction over the assessment, determination, collection or other imposition of any Tax.
Taxing Authority
 
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6.1(a)(v).
Termination Date
"" shall mean Intellectual Property belonging to third parties, including Seller or any Affiliate of Seller (other than the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), that is used or held for use by any of the Company or its Subsidiaries and not owned by any of the Company or its Subsidiaries, including any Third-Party Software and Market Data.
Third-Party Intellectual Property
"" shall mean all Software used or held for use by any of the Company or its Subsidiaries that is licensed or leased by third parties (including Seller or any Affiliate of Seller other than the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) to any of the Company or its Subsidiaries or that is commonly available "shrink wrap" Software copyrighted by third parties.
Third-Party Software
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 8.5(a).
Threshold Amount
"" shall mean this Agreement, the Transition Services Agreement, the Continuing Relationship Agreement and any other document, contract or certificate executed and delivered in connection with this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
Transaction Documents
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.9.
Transfer Taxes
"" shall mean a transition services agreement to be entered into on the date hereof, a form of which is attached as Exhibit C.
Transition Services Agreement
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.2(b).
Trust Company
"" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.5(a).
Unaudited Company Balance Sheet
"" shall mean a payment in immediately available funds by wire transfer in lawful money of the United States to such account or to a number of accounts as shall have been designated by written notice from the receiving party to the paying party.
Wire Transfer
Section 1.1 . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the Closing, Seller agrees to cause Intermediate Holdco to sell, assign and transfer to Buyer, and Buyer agrees to purchase from Intermediate Holdco, the Company Common Stock, free and clear of any Liens or rights or claims of others (the "").
Sale and Purchase of the Company Common Stock
Stock Purchase
Section 1.2 . The cash purchase price payable by Buyer for the Company Common Stock shall be Two billion three hundred and ten million U.S. Dollars ($2,310,000,000), subject to adjustment as set forth in Exhibit A (the "").
Purchase Price
Purchase Price
 
Section 1.3 .
The Closing
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the closing of the sale of the Company Common Stock to the Buyer (the "") shall take place on the later of (i) July 1, 2010, and (ii) the Business Day that is the first Business Day of a calendar month and that follows the satisfaction or waiver (subject to Applicable Law) of the latest to occur of the conditions set forth in Article V hereof (other than conditions that relate to actions to be taken, or documents to be delivered, at the Closing) by five or more Business Days, unless extended by mutual agreement of the parties (the ""), and the Closing shall be effective at 12:01 a.m. New York time on the Closing Date; provided, however, that the books of the Company shall be deemed to have been closed as of the Cut-Off Time (it being the intention of the parties that all transactions through the Cut-Off Time shall be for the account of Seller and all transactions from and after the Cut-Off Time shall be for the account of Buyer). The Closing shall take place at the offices of Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz, 51 West 52nd Street, New York, New York 10019.
Closing
Closing Date
(b) At the Closing:
(i) Buyer shall:
(1) pay to Seller (on behalf of Intermediate Holdco) by Wire Transfer to the Designated Account immediately available funds in an amount equal to the Purchase Price; and
(2) deliver the Transaction Documents required to be delivered by Buyer including the certificates contemplated by Sections 5.3(a) and 5.3(b);
(ii) Seller shall:
(1) deliver to Buyer the stock certificate representing the Company Common Stock, duly endorsed in blank (or accompanied by duly executed stock powers); and
(2) deliver the Transaction Documents required to be delivered by Seller including the certificates contemplated by Sections 5.2(a) and 5.2(b).
Except as set forth in the correspondingly numbered section of the Company Disclosure Schedule (provided that disclosure in any section of such Company Disclosure Schedule shall apply to any other section to the extent that it is reasonably apparent on the face of such disclosure that such disclosure is relevant to such other section of this Agreement), Seller hereby represents and warrants to Buyer as follows:
Section 2.1 .
Organization and Related Matters
(a) The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware. The Company has the corporate power and authority to own or lease all of its properties and assets and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified to do business in each jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the character or location of the properties and assets owned or leased by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
 
(b) Section 2.1(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and correct list of all the Subsidiaries of the Company. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or other securities evidencing ownership of the Company's Subsidiaries are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and such shares or other securities are owned by the Company or another of its Subsidiaries free and clear of any Lien (other than any Permitted Lien) with respect thereto. There are no outstanding subscriptions, options, warrants, puts, calls, rights, exchangeable or convertible securities or other commitments or agreements of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock or other securities or ownership or equity interest of any of the Company's Subsidiaries, or otherwise obligating any of the Company's Subsidiaries to issue, transfer, sell, purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any such stock, securities, or interests. Each Subsidiary of the Company (i) is a duly organized and validly existing corporation, partnership or limited liability company or other legal entity under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization reflected on Section 2.1(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (ii) is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where its ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of its business requires it to be so qualified (except for jurisdictions in which the failure to be so qualified would not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect) and (iii) has all requisite corporate power and authority to own or lease its properties and assets and to carry on its business as now conducted. PFPC Trust Company is not a "bank" as defined in Section 2 of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, 12 U.S.C. Section 1841.
Section 2.2 . The authorized capital stock of Company consists of 3,000 shares of Company Common Stock, all of which are issued and outstanding and have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid, non-assessable and free of preemptive rights. All of the Company Common Stock is owned by Intermediate Holdco free and clear of any Liens. Except as set forth above, as of the date hereof, no shares of capital stock or other voting securities of the Company are issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding. There are no outstanding subscriptions, options, warrants, puts, calls, rights, exchangeable or convertible securities or other commitments or agreements of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock or other securities or ownership or equity interests of the Company, or otherwise obligating the Company to issue, transfer, sell, purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any such stock, securities or interests.
Capitalization
 
Section 2.3 .
Authority; No Violation
(a) Seller has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and to consummate or cause to be consummated the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly approved by the Board of Directors of Seller. No other corporate proceedings (including any approvals of Seller's stockholders) on the part of Seller are necessary to approve this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and to consummate or cause to be consummated the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by Seller and assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by Buyer, this Agreement constitutes, and, when executed and delivered by Seller in accordance with this Agreement and assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery thereof by Buyer, the other Transaction Documents will constitute, the valid and binding obligations of Seller, enforceable against Seller in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by (i) the effect of bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, conservatorship, arrangement, moratorium or other laws affecting or relating to the rights of creditors generally, or (ii) the rules governing the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief or other equitable remedies and general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
(b) Intermediate Holdco has all requisite limited liability company power and authority to sell to Buyer the Company Common Stock. No other limited liability company proceedings on the part of Intermediate Holdco are necessary to sell to Buyer the Company Common Stock.
(c) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement or any of the other Transaction Documents by Seller nor the consummation by Seller or Intermediate Holdco of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, nor compliance by Seller or Intermediate Holdco with any of the terms or provisions hereof or thereof, will (i) violate any provision of the certificates of incorporation or bylaws of Seller or the organizational documents of Intermediate Holdco or (ii) assuming that the consents, waivers, approvals and notices referred to in Section 2.4 are duly obtained or given, (x) violate any statute, code, ordinance, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ, decree or injunction applicable to Seller, Intermediate Holdco or the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets or (y) violate, conflict with, result in a breach of any provision of or the loss of any benefit under, constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) under, result in the termination of or a right of termination or cancellation under or in any payment conditioned, in whole or in part, on consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, accelerate the performance required by or rights or obligations under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the respective properties or assets of Seller, Intermediate Holdco or the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries under, any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any Contract to which Seller, Intermediate Holdco or the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries is a party, or by which they or any of their respective properties, assets or business activities may be bound or affected, except (in the case of clause (ii)(y) above) for such violations, conflicts, breaches, defaults or the loss of benefits which, either individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect or do not relate to a Material Contract.
 
Section 2.4 . Except for (a) such consents, waivers, approvals and notices as are set forth in Section 2.4 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (b) compliance with any applicable requirements under the HSR Act, (c) filings and exemptions required to be made with or obtained from the FINRA, and (d) such consents, waivers, approvals and notices that may be required solely by reason of the participation of Buyer (as opposed to any other third party buyer) in the transactions contemplated hereby, none of Seller, Intermediate Holdco, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is required to obtain any material consents, waivers or approvals of, give notices to, or make any material filings, declarations or registrations with any Governmental Authority in connection with (i) the execution and delivery by Seller of this Agreement or any of the other Transaction Documents or (ii) the consummation by Seller and Intermediate Holdco of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby.
Consents and Approvals
Section 2.5 .
Financial Statements; Absence of Liabilities
(a) Section 2.5 of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth true and correct copies of (a) the audited consolidated balance sheets of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2008 (the "") and 2007, and the related audited consolidated statements of income, consolidated statements of stockholder's equity and consolidated statements of cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2008 and 2007, and (b) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of November 30, 2009 (the ""), and the related unaudited consolidated statement of income of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the eleven-month period ended November 30, 2009 (the financial statements described in clauses (a) and (b) being, the ""). The Company Balance Sheet and the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet fairly present in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof, and the other Company Financial Statements (including the related notes thereto, where applicable) present fairly in all material respects the results of the operations and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the respective fiscal periods therein set forth, in each case in accordance with GAAP, subject, in the case of the unaudited financial statements to normal year-end adjustments (none of which will be material) and the absence of notes, consistently applied (except as indicated in the related notes thereto).
Company Balance Sheet
Unaudited Company Balance Sheet
Company Financial Statements
(b) The Target Tangible Capital Statement set forth in Exhibit A-1 was prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with the preparation of the Company Balance Sheet and the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet from the Books and Records of the Company applying accounting principals, policies, practices and methodologies which Seller considers to be reasonable.
(c) None of the Companies or any of its Subsidiaries has any liability except (i) those which are adequately reflected on or reserved against in the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet or disclosed in the related notes thereto, (ii) liabilities arising under Material Contracts since November 30, 2009 other than as a result of a default or breach thereof, (iii) those which have been incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business since November 30, 2009, none of which individually or in the aggregate would reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, and (iv) those which, individually and in the aggregate, are immaterial in nature.
 
Section 2.6 .
Material Contracts
(a) As of the date hereof neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has entered into or is bound by any of the following Contracts (such Contracts, together with all Material Third-Party Intellectual Property Agreements and all Principal Client Contracts, being ""):
Material Contracts
(i) any Contract relating to any Indebtedness of more than $500,000;
(ii) any Contract under which any of the Company or its Subsidiaries has made or is obligated to make, directly or indirectly, any advance, loan, extension of credit or capital contribution to, or other investment in, any Person, other than in the Ordinary Course of Business;
(iii) any Contract that requires the Company or Subsidiary of the Company to purchase its total requirements of any product or service from a third party or that contains "take or pay" provisions;
(iv) any Contract that relates to the acquisition or disposition of any business or a material amount of stock or assets of any other Person (whether by merger, sale of stock, sale of assets or otherwise) that, as of the date of this Agreement has not been consummated, except for any such acquisition or disposition not involving any party other than the Company and its Subsidiaries;
(v) any Contract (other than a Client Contract) with a Governmental Authority;
(vi) any Contract prohibiting or restricting the ability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to conduct its respective business in any geographical area, to solicit Clients or to compete with any Person;
(vii) any Contract that provides for earn-outs or other similar contingent obligations to be paid by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries after November 30, 2009 that could reasonably be expected to exceed $500,000 in the aggregate under such Contract;
(viii) any Contract for the purchase by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of materials, supplies, products or services, involving annual payments in excess of $500,000 under such Contract;
(ix) any joint venture, strategic alliance, exclusive distribution, partnership or similar Contract involving a sharing of profits or expenses or payments based on revenues, profits or assets under management of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
 
(x) any Contract pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries grants or suffers the imposition of a Lien, other than a Permitted Lien, on any of its capital stock or any of its material assets, tangible or intangible;
(xi) any Contract for finder or solicitation services with a third-party solicitor of Clients or potential Clients of the GIS Business; and
(xii) any other Contract (other than with a Client) involving aggregate annual consideration in excess of $500,000.
(b) Each Material Contract is as of the date of this Agreement valid, binding and in full force and effect, and enforceable against each of the Company or its Subsidiaries and, to the Knowledge of Seller, each other party thereto, in accordance with its terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by (i) the effect of bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, conservatorship, arrangement, moratorium or other laws affecting or relating to the rights of creditors generally, or (ii) the rules governing the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief or other equitable remedies and general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law. Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has duly performed in all material respects all of its obligations in connection with such Material Contract to the extent that such obligations have accrued. There are no existing material defaults (or circumstances, occurrences, events or acts that, with the giving of notice or lapse of time or both would become defaults) of the Company or its Subsidiaries or, to the Knowledge of Seller, any other party thereto, under any Material Contract.
(c) Seller has provided Buyer with or made available to Buyer complete and correct copies of all (i) Principal Client Contracts and (ii) other Material Contracts (other than Client Contracts which are not Principal Client Contracts).
Section 2.7 . Except for Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. and Morgan Stanley & Co., Incorporated, all the fees and expenses which shall be borne entirely by Seller, neither Seller, Company, nor any Subsidiary of the Company has employed any broker or finder or incurred any liability for any broker's fees, commissions or finder's fees in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
No Broker
Section 2.8 .
Legal Proceedings
(a) There are no legal, administrative, arbitral or other proceedings, claims, suits, actions or governmental or regulatory investigations or inquiries of any nature (collectively, "") that are pending or, to the Knowledge of Seller, threatened against or relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or affecting any of the material properties or assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; and there are no Proceedings that are pending or, to the Knowledge of Seller, threatened against or relating to Seller or Intermediate Holdco that would challenge or seek to prevent or enjoin the transactions contemplated hereby. Nothing in this Section 2.8(a) shall apply to matters relating to Taxes, which shall be governed by Section 2.11.
Proceedings
(b) There are no outstanding Governmental Orders and no material unsatisfied judgments, penalties or awards against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets. Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with
 
the terms of each Governmental Order set forth in Section 2.8(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule. Nothing in this Section 2.8(b) shall apply to matters relating to Taxes, which shall be governed by Section 2.11.
Section 2.9 .
Compliance with Applicable Law; Permits
(a) Since January 1, 2008, each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been in compliance with Applicable Law. Since January 1, 2008, each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been in possession of all material Permits required under Applicable Law to own, operate and use its properties and assets to conduct the GIS Business in all material respects in the manner conducted at all such relevant times, and since January 1, 2008, each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been in material compliance with all such Permits, and all such material Permits are currently in full force and effect. There are no Proceedings pending or, to the Knowledge of Seller, threatened, that could reasonably be expected to result, nor will entering into the transactions contemplated hereby reasonably be expected to result, in the revocation, cancellation or suspension, or any adverse modification, of a material Permit applicable to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Since January 1, 2008, none of Seller, Intermediate Holdco, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company has received notice of a violation of any Applicable Law by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company. It is agreed and understood that this Section 2.9 shall not apply to matters related to Taxes, which shall be governed by Section 2.11.
(b) Section 2.9(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists, by Company or Subsidiary of the Company, all the jurisdictions with respect to which such Company or Subsidiary have filed or are required to file any material qualifications licenses, filings or other material Permits to own, operate and use its properties and assets and to conduct the GIS Business.
(c) Except as listed in Section 2.9(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, no exemptive orders, "no-action" letters or similar exemptions or regulatory relief have been obtained, nor are any requests pending therefor, by or with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that are material to the operation of the GIS Business.
(d) Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has (as applicable and in each case consistent with Applicable Law) adopted and implemented: (i) a formal code of ethics; (ii) a written policy on insider trading; and (iii) written policies regarding privacy and the confidentiality of Client information. Except as listed in Section 2.9(d) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, since January 1, 2008, there have been no material violations of such policies and procedures.
(e) To the Knowledge of Seller, there is no reason to believe that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries will be required by any Governmental Authority to maintain regulatory capital following the Closing Date in an amount greater than the amount thereof on and as of the Closing Date, after giving effect to the transactions contemplated by Section 4.14 hereof.
 
Section 2.10 . Each material insurance policy covering the Company and its Subsidiaries or any of its assets, properties or employees is in full force and effect, all premiums due and payable thereon have been paid and Seller has not received written notice from any insurer or agent of any intent to cancel any such insurance policy. Seller has complied in all material respects with the terms and provisions of such insurance policies to the extent affecting the Company and its Subsidiaries. There is no material claim by Seller pending under any of such policies with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as to which coverage has been denied or disputed by the underwriters of such policies.
Insurance
Section 2.11 .
Taxes
(a) All material Tax Returns of the Company and its Subsidiaries that are required to be filed have been timely filed (taking into account extensions) and all such Tax Returns are true, correct and complete in all material respects.
(b) The Company and its Subsidiaries have timely paid all material Taxes due and owing (whether or not shown to be due on such Tax Returns).
(c) The Company and its Subsidiaries have withheld and paid over to the proper Taxing Authority (or are holding for payment) all material Taxes required to be withheld from amounts owing to any employee, independent contractor, creditor, Client, shareholder or other party, and complied in all material respects with all information reporting and backup withholding provisions of Applicable Law, including the collection, review and retention of any required withholding certificates or comparable documents and any notice received pursuant to Section 3406(a)(1)(B) or (C) of the Code.
(d) There are no Liens for Taxes upon the assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries except for Permitted Liens.
(e) To the Knowledge of Seller, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been (i) a member of any affiliated, consolidated, combined or unitary group (other than a group of which Seller or the Company is or was the common parent) or (ii) a party to any tax sharing or indemnification agreement.
(f) With respect to Albridge Solutions only:
(i) no claim has been made by any Taxing Authority where Albridge Solutions does not file Tax Returns that it is, or may be, subject to a material amount of Tax by that jurisdiction;
(ii) no extensions or waivers of statutes of limitations have been given or requested with respect to any Taxes of Albridge Solutions;
(iii) no audit, examination, review or Tax Proceeding with respect to any Taxes or Tax Return of Albridge Solutions is pending and no Tax Authority has notified Seller or any of its Affiliates that it intends to investigate any Tax Return or Tax matter of Albridge Solutions;
 
(iv) the amount of liability for unpaid Taxes of Albridge Solutions for all periods ending on or before the date of the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet does not, in the aggregate, exceed the amount of accruals for Taxes (excluding reserves for deferred Taxes) reflected on the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet; and
(v) the amount of liability for unpaid Taxes of Albridge Solutions all periods following the date of the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet shall not, in the aggregate, exceed the amount of accruals for Taxes (excluding reserves for deferred Taxes) as adjusted for the passage of time in accordance with the past custom and practice of such entity (and which accruals shall not exceed comparable amounts incurred in similar periods in prior years).
(g) No private letter rulings, technical advice memoranda or similar agreement or rulings have been requested, entered into or issued by any Taxing Authority with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
(h) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has agreed to make, nor is it required to make, any adjustment under Sections 481(a) or 263A of the Code or any comparable provision of state, local or foreign Tax laws by reason of a change in accounting method or otherwise. None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has taken any action that could defer a liability for Taxes of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries from any Pre-Closing Period to any Post-Closing Period.
(i) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has been a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in connection with a distribution described in Section 355 of the Code.
(j) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or has been, a party to, or a promoter of, a "reportable transaction" within the meaning of Section 6707A(c)(1) of the Code and Treasury Regulations Section 1.6011-4(b).
Section 2.12 .
Employees; Employee Benefit Plans; ERISA
(a) Section 2.12(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists each Company Plan in the United States, each material Company Plan outside the United States and each material Seller Plan, in each case, other than the individual employment agreements for any employee, officer or director of the Company or its Subsidiaries employed outside the United States ("").
Non-U.S. Employment Agreements
(b) With respect to each Company Plan in the United States, each material Company Plan outside the United States and each material Seller Plan, in each case, other than the Non-U.S. Employment Agreements, the Company has delivered or made available to Buyer a true, correct and complete copy of each writing constituting a part of such Company Plan and Seller Plan. With respect to each material Company Plan, the Company has delivered or made available to Buyer all plan documents and amendments thereto, including any related trust, insurance contract or other funding source or arrangement, the most recent Form 5500 and accompanying schedules, if any, the current summary plan description and any material modifications thereto, if any, and the most recent determination letter from the IRS, if any. With respect to the Non-U.S. Employment Agreements, the Company has delivered or made available to Buyer complete copies of each different form of such agreements.
 
(c) With respect to each Company Plan that is intended to be a "qualified plan" within the meaning of Section 401(a) of the Code (""), the IRS has issued a favorable determination letter that has not been revoked, or the remedial amendment period under Section 401(b) of the Code and IRS Revenue Procedure 2005-66 has not expired, and to the Knowledge of Seller no events or circumstances exist that would reasonably be expected to result in the disqualification of any such Qualified Plan or the failure of any such Qualified Plan to qualify. Each Company Plan in Ireland is approved under the Taxes Consolidation Act of 1997 and to the Knowledge of Seller no event has occurred or circumstances exist that would reasonably be expected to result in revocation of such approval. No Company Plan is subject to Title IV of ERISA or Section 302 of ERISA or Section 412 or 4971 of the Code.
Qualified Plans
(d) All contributions required to be made under each Company Plan have been made in accordance with the terms of the Company Plan and Applicable Law and each Company Plan has been administered in all material respects in accordance with its terms and Applicable Law, in each case, except for any failures which would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a material liability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any entity, trade or business that is a member of a group described in Section 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code or Section 4001(b)(1) of ERISA that includes the Company, or that is a member of the same "controlled group" as the Company pursuant to Section 4001(a)(14) of ERISA has, at any time during the last six years, contributed to or been obligated to contribute to any multiemployer plan or a plan that has two or more contributing sponsors at least two of whom are not under common control, within the meaning of Section 4063 of ERISA.
(e) Except for liabilities which would not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in any material liability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, with respect to any Company Plan, there does not now exist, nor, to the Knowledge of Seller, do any circumstances exist that would reasonably be expected to result in any Controlled Group Liability that would be a liability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries following the Closing Date, other than liabilities relating to funding obligations for a Qualified Plan that are not yet due and liabilities that arise solely out of, or relate solely to, the Company Plans.
(f) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement nor the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will (either alone or in conjunction with any other event) result in, or cause the accelerated vesting, funding or delivery of, any payment or benefit to any employee, officer or director of the Company or its Subsidiaries under a Company Plan, or result in any limitation on the right of the Company or its Subsidiaries to amend, merge or terminate any Company Plan or related trust.
(g) There are no pending Proceedings (other than claims for benefits in the ordinary course) with respect to which written notice has been given to the Company or its Subsidiaries against the Company Plans, which would reasonably be expected to result in any material liability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any of its
 
Subsidiaries has engaged in any "prohibited transaction" (as defined in Section 4975 of the Code or Section 406 of ERISA), which would reasonably be expected to subject any of the Company Plans or their related trusts, or the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, to any material Tax or penalty imposed under Section 4975 of the Code or Section 502 of ERISA.
(h) The Company has, except to the extent limited by Applicable Law (including any data privacy laws), delivered or made available to Buyer a true and complete list of the names, corporate and functional titles, hire dates, incentive compensation, profit sharing and bonuses paid in 2008 and 2009, full or part-time status, status as exempt or non-exempt, annual salaries or hourly rates, and salary grade of all employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the date hereof, and has identified each such employee currently on a military leave of absence or not actively employed on account of disability. As relates to the Company and its Subsidiaries, there is not presently pending or existing, and to Seller's Knowledge there is not threatened, (i) any strike, slowdown, picketing or work stoppage, or (ii) any application for certification of a collective bargaining agent. With respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries, (A) no labor organization or group of employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has made a pending demand for recognition or certification, and there are and have been no representation or certification proceedings or petitions seeking a representation proceeding or any other form of conciliation involving a trade union, with the National Labor Relations Board or any other labor relations tribunal or authority, nor have any such demands, proceedings or petitions been brought or filed or threatened to be brought or filed within the past five years, and (B) to Seller's Knowledge, there are no organizing activities, strikes, work stoppages, slowdowns, lockouts or grievances, or other material labor disputes against or involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is, or has in the past three years been, party to any union, collective bargaining agreements or other similar labor agreements or understandings covering Company Employees employed in the United States or otherwise, and none of the Company Employees employed in the United States or otherwise is covered by any union, collective bargaining or other similar labor agreements or understanding with a labor union or labor organization. Except for compliance failures which would not reasonably be expected to be, individually or in the aggregate, material, (i) all Company Employees have proper work authorizations and are properly classified as exempt or non-exempt (or similar classification in applicable foreign jurisdictions), where applicable, (ii) each Company Employee has satisfied any required pre-employment screening requirements, including drug testing, background checks and finger printing examination and record keeping requirements that were in effect at the time of the hiring of such Company Employee and (iii) each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all Applicable Laws relating to employment and employment practices, occupational safety and health standards, terms and conditions of employment, wages and hours and affirmative action and neither the Company nor any Subsidiary of the Company is or has engaged in any unfair labor practice with respect to any Company Employee.
(i) Except as required by Code Section 4980B regarding COBRA continuation coverage or by other Applicable Law, no Company Plan provides life, health, medical or other welfare benefits to former Company Employees, spouses, dependents or beneficiaries thereof and neither the Company nor any Subsidiary of the Company has any current or projected liability to provide such benefits beyond the employee's retirement or termination of employment with the Company.
 
Section 2.13 .
Intellectual Property; Software
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries (i) have all right, title and interest in and to all Company Intellectual Property free and clear of all Liens and (ii) have the right and license or Client consent, as applicable, to possess or access and use all Third-Party Software and Market Data and hold such rights and licenses free and clear of all Liens. The Company Intellectual Property and the Third-Party Intellectual Property constitute all of the Intellectual Property that is used or held for use in the conduct of the GIS Business in the manner and to the full extent as the GIS Business is conducted on the date hereof and, to the extent that the GIS Business is conducted in the same manner after the Closing as it is on the date hereof, as the GIS Business will be conducted immediately after the Closing. Consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not result in an impairment of the rights of any of the Company or its Subsidiaries under, or in any increase of any royalty, revenue share, license fees or the payment of any other fee with respect to, any Material Third-Party Intellectual Property Agreement. All Third-Party Software and Market Data is licensed directly by the owner thereof to the Company or a Subsidiary.
(b) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is, and none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries will be as a result of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, in violation of any Material Third-Party Intellectual Property Agreement. No written or, to the Knowledge of Seller, oral claims or allegations with respect to misappropriation or infringement by any Company Intellectual Property have been made or are currently pending against any of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Knowledge of Seller, are pending against any other Person or threatened by any Person. To the Knowledge of Seller, no third party is infringing or misappropriating any Company Intellectual Property.
(c) The Company and its Subsidiaries have taken reasonable steps to protect and preserve the proprietary nature and/or confidentiality of all Company Intellectual Property, including all material trade secrets and know-how owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries or used in relation to the GIS Business. Source Code for Company Software and any Source Code for any Third-Party Software in the possession or control of any of the Company and any of its Subsidiaries is a material trade secret of such Person, as the case may be, or the third-party owner thereof (as applicable), and has not been disclosed by any of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any of such Person's Representatives to any Person other than pursuant to a duly executed confidentiality agreement and, in the case of Third-Party Software, permissibly and in accordance with the applicable Contract.
(d) No portion of the Company Software or any other Company Intellectual Property is subject to a license having terms that obligate the Company or any other Person (x) to provide or disclose the Source Code for the Company Software or any other Company Intellectual Property to the public or (y) to dedicate the Company Software or any other Company Intellectual Property, or any portion thereof, to the public domain.
(e) Section 2.13(e) of the Company Disclosure Schedule contains a true, correct and complete list of the Company Software. The Company and its Subsidiaries have the right, power and authority to sell, transfer, assign, convey and license the Company Software without liability to, or any requirement of, consent from, or obligation to pay royalties to, any other Person.
 
(f) Section 2.13(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule contains a true, correct, complete and accurate list of all Third-Party Software and Market Data which is licensed under any Material Third-Party Intellectual Property Agreement (other than commonly available "shrink wrap" Software copyrighted by third parties, which is not material to the GIS Business) that is used by any of the Company and its Subsidiaries, or held for use by any of the Company and its Subsidiaries. The Third-Party Software and Market Data (including any commonly available "shrink wrap" Software copyrighted by third parties) is used pursuant to an agreement or license and each such agreement or license is valid and enforceable and in full force and effect and none of the Company or its Subsidiaries, or any licensor is in default under or in breach of any such license or agreement (nor has any event occurred which would, with passage of time, notice, or both, constitute a breach or default). The Company and its Subsidiaries monitor the use of Third-Party Software and Market Data for compliance with all applicable licenses and restrictions on use with respect thereto and the Company and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with all such restrictions.
(g) All Company Software have the features and functions described or referenced in and performs in accordance with the documentation and other written material used in connection with such Company Software and are in machine readable form. The Company Software and, to the Knowledge of Seller, the Third-Party Software are free of material defects in features, functions, performance and operations. The Company Software and, to the Knowledge of Seller, the Third-Party Software contain no Disabling Devices.
(h) The Source Code for the Company Software will compile into object code, or otherwise be capable of being installed and operated, and when so installed will have all the features, functions and performance described in the documentation and marketing and promotional materials pertaining to the Company Software and will execute on the computer platforms for which it is designed. Subject to ordinary course updates or enhancements for the benefit of Clients generally, such modifications or customizations to Source Code as may be implemented with respect to a particular Client pursuant to such Client's request, and corresponding updates or revisions to documentation concerning the Company Software, all Source Code and other documentation concerning the Company Software is correct, accurate and sufficiently documented to enable a software developer of reasonable skill to understand, modify, debug, enhance, compile, support and otherwise utilize all aspects of the Company Software, without reference to other sources of information.
Section 2.14 .
Real Estate; Personal Property
(a) Section 2.14(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies all real property owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (the ""). Except as would not reasonably be expected to impair in any material respect the Company or its Subsidiaries' use and enjoyment of the Owned Real Property from and after the Closing, (i) the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company, as the case may be, holds good and marketable title to the Owned Real Property, free and clear of all Liens other than Permitted Liens, (ii) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has, since January 1, 2008, made any title claims, or has
Owned Real Property
 
outstanding any title claims, under any policy of title insurance respecting any of the Owned Real Property, (iii) no condemnation or eminent domain proceeding against any of the Owned Real Property is pending or, to the Knowledge of the Seller, threatened, (iv) neither the Company nor any of its Affiliates has, since January 1, 2008, received any written notice from any board of fire underwriters (or other body exercising similar functions) or any insurance company which has issued or refused to issue a policy with respect to any Owned Real Property or Leased Premises requesting performance of any structural or other repairs or alterations to any Owned Real Property or Leased Premises, (v) there are no Persons in possession of any portion of any of the Owned Real Property other than the Company or its Subsidiaries and no Persons other than the Company or its Subsidiaries have the right to use or occupy for any purpose any portion of any of the Owned Real Property and (vi) no Person has any options or rights (including rights of first refusal) to purchase or acquire any ownership interest in any Owned Real Property.
(b) Section 2.14(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies all of the real estate leases, subleases, licenses and other Contracts granting the right to use or occupy real property to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party (the ""). With respect to each such Lease, (i) there exists no material default or condition, or any state of facts or event which with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a material default, in the performance by the Company and its Subsidiaries of their respective obligations under any of the Leases or, to the Knowledge of Seller, by any other party to any of the Leases; (ii) none of the Company or any of its Affiliates has received, since January 1, 2008, any written or, to the Knowledge of Seller, oral communication from the landlord or lessor under any of the Leases claiming that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is in material breach of its obligations under the respective Leases; (iii) all construction and other allowances to be paid by the landlord to the tenant under each Lease has been, or is reasonably expected to be, paid in full, and (iv) all buildings and all fixtures, equipment and other real or tangible property and assets held under leases or subleases by the Company or its applicable Subsidiary are in all material respects held under valid leases or subleases, free and clear of all Liens (other than any Permitted Liens). Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in sole possession of the Leased Premises and none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has assigned, sublet, mortgaged or otherwise conveyed all or any portion of its respective interest in any of the Leases or Leased Premises; and, with respect to the sublease(s) set forth on Section 2.14(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (A) there exists no material default or condition, or any state of facts or event which with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a material default, in the performance by the Company and its Subsidiaries of their respective obligations under any of such sublease(s) or, to the Knowledge of Seller, by any subtenant thereunder; and (B) none of the Company or any of its Affiliates has received, since January 1, 2008, any written or, to the Knowledge of Seller, oral communication from any subtenant under any of such sublease(s) claiming that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is in material breach of its obligations with respect to such sublease(s). Seller has made available to Buyer complete and correct copies of each Lease.
Leases
(c) Section 2.14(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies all environmental audits or assessments relating to any Owned Real Property or Leased Premises which, to the Knowledge of Seller, is in the possession of or under the control of the Company or any of its Affiliates. Seller has made available to Buyer a complete and correct copy of each of such environmental audits or assessments.
 
(d) The buildings, plants, structures, furniture, fixtures, machinery, equipment, vehicles and other items of tangible personal property currently owned or leased by each of the Company and its Subsidiaries are structurally sound, are in all material respects in good operating condition and repair, and are adequate in all material respects for the uses to which they are being put, and none of such buildings, plants, structures, furniture, fixtures, machinery, equipment, vehicles and other items of tangible personal property is in need of maintenance or repairs except for ordinary, routine maintenance and repairs that are not material in nature or cost. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all of its personal property, free and clear of all Liens except Permitted Liens.
(e) Except with respect to Intellectual Property, which is the subject of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 2.13, the assets currently owned, leased or licensed by the Company and its Subsidiaries together with the assets owned by Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) which support the services to be provided to the Company and its Subsidiaries pursuant to the Transition Services Agreement comprise all of the rights, property and assets required for the current conduct of the GIS Business.
Section 2.15 .
Intercompany Arrangements
(a) Section 2.15(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies all agreements or material arrangements between the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company, on the one hand, and Seller or any of its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries), on the other hand.
(b) Neither Seller nor any of its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) owns, leases or licenses any material property or asset used in the conduct of the business of Company and its Subsidiaries except in connection with the provision of services under the agreements or arrangements identified on Section 2.15(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule.
Section 2.16 . None of the information regarding the Company or any of its Affiliates supplied or to be supplied by or on behalf of the Company or the Seller on or prior to the Closing Date for inclusion in any documents to be filed with any Governmental Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will, at the respective times such documents are filed with any Governmental Authority, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Filing Documents
Section 2.17 . Since November 30, 2009, the Company and its Subsidiaries have conducted the GIS Business in the Ordinary Course of Business, and there has not been, with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, any:
Absence of Certain Changes
(a) event, occurrence or development that has had, or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect;
 
(b) material damage, destruction or loss (whether or not covered by insurance) to its property; or
(c) action or omission prior to the date of this Agreement that, if taken after the date of this Agreement and on or prior to the Closing Date, would violate Section 4.1(b) hereof.
Section 2.18 .
Books and Records; Standards
(a) The Books and Records are true, accurate and complete in all material respects. The Books and Records have been kept in all material respects in compliance with the customary practice of the Company and its Subsidiaries and Applicable Law.
(b) The Company and its Subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls, policies and procedures sufficient to make it reasonable to expect that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with its management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded in conformity with any applicable accounting principles and in such a manner as to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with any applicable accounting principles and any other criteria applicable to such statements and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences; and (iv) the Books and Records include such transactions.
(c) To the extent permitted under Applicable Law, Seller has made available to Buyer prior to the date hereof true, accurate and complete copies of all internal and external audit control recommendations and exception items relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries made on or after January 1, 2008, and the responses of such Persons thereto.
(d) At the Closing, all of the Books and Records will be in the possession of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Section 2.19 .
Principal Clients; Client Contracts
(a) Section 2.19(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists, as of the date of the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet, each Client which is one of the 25 largest Clients of the Company and its Subsidiaries or one of the five (5) largest Clients of a GIS Line of Business, in either case in terms of revenues derived (including net interest income) for the 11 month period ended the date of the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet (the ""). Section 2.19(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists, for each Principal Client:
Principal Clients
(i) the Principal Client's name;
(ii) each Contract between the Company or a Subsidiary, on the one hand, and such Principal Client, on the other hand, having as its subject matter a GIS Line of Business with respect to which such Principal Client is one of the five (5) largest Clients of such GIS Line of Business (the "");
Principal Client Contract(s)
 
(iii) the revenues (including net interest income) derived in respect of such Principal Client by the GIS Business for which such Principal Client is one of the five (5) largest Clients during such period broken down by GIS Line of Business;
(iv) to the Knowledge of Seller, any outstanding material written complaint involving the provision of services by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to such Principal Client; and
(v) the identity of the sponsor of any Principal Client that is a registered mutual fund, hedge fund or other collective investment vehicle.
(b) Except as set forth herein and in the Principal Client Contracts delivered to Buyer hereunder, there have not been any material modifications (oral or written) of the terms of any Principal Client Contract including fee schedules related thereto.
(c) No Principal Client Contract contains any provision to cap, rebate, or reduce fees or expenses (other than to the extent expressly set forth in a fee schedule to such Principal Client Contract) or to reimburse any such fees of, or to reduce or rebate a performance allocation, or to provide any preferential or "most favored client" treatment to, any Client. None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received as of the date hereof any written notice that (A) any party to a Principal Client Contract intends to cancel or terminate such Principal Client Contract, or (B) any party to a Principal Client Contract intends to issue an RFP or otherwise solicit bids for the provision of services provided under any such Principal Client Contract.
(d) The Company or its relevant Subsidiary is eligible and qualified to act under each Client Contract and is not prohibited under Applicable Law from performing its duties and obligations under any Client Contract.
Section 2.20 . Except for matters that would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect: (a) None of the facilities or the operations thereof of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries violates any Environmental Law and no condition or event has occurred which, with notice or passage of time or both would constitute a violation of an Environmental Law; (b) each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in possession of all Permits required under applicable Environmental Law for the conduct of its operations, and each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with such Permits; (c) none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has stored or used any Hazardous Materials on or at any of its facilities except for inventories of chemicals which are used in the Ordinary Course of Business; (d) none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received, since January 1, 2008, any notice from any Person (including any Governmental Authority) that the facilities or the operations thereof of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in violation of any Environmental Law or that it is responsible (or potentially responsible) for the cleanup of any Hazardous Materials at, on or beneath the property of the Company or such Subsidiary, or at, on or beneath any land adjacent thereto or in connection with any waste or contamination site; (e) none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is the subject of any Proceedings involving potential liability with respect to violations of Environmental Law; (f) none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has buried,
Environmental Matters
 
dumped, disposed, spilled or released, or arranged for another Person to do so, any Hazardous Materials in violation of Environmental Law; (g) to the Knowledge of Seller, there are no underground storage tanks beneath any of the Owned Real Property or Leased Premises; (h) to the Knowledge of Seller, no Owned Real Property or Leased Premises contains asbestos, asbestos-containing materials, PCBs or urea foam insulation; (i) no environmental remediation, clean up, or abatement with respect to Hazardous Materials is currently taking place, or, to the Knowledge of Seller, has taken place, at any of the Owned Real Property or Leased Premises; and (j) the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has timely filed, since January 1, 2008, all reports required to be filed under applicable Environmental Law with respect to its property.
Section 2.21 . The Company and its Subsidiaries have taken reasonable steps to preserve the confidential nature of material confidential information with respect to the GIS Business.
Confidentiality Regarding the Business
Section 2.22 . None of the Company and its Subsidiaries nor, to the Knowledge of Seller, any "person associated with an investment adviser" (as defined in the Advisers Act) is ineligible pursuant to Section 203 of the Advisers Act to serve as an investment adviser or as a person associated with an investment adviser, or pursuant to Rule 206(4)-3 under the Advisers Act to serve as a solicitor, and has not been the subject of any legal or disciplinary event that must be disclosed to Clients pursuant to Rule 206(4)-4 promulgated under the Advisers Act. None of the Company and its Subsidiaries is precluded from acting as a fiduciary by operation of Section 411 of ERISA and Seller has no Knowledge of any basis for the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective Representatives becoming subject to disqualification from serving in any capacity described in Section 411(a) of ERISA by virtue of Section 411 of ERISA. None of the Company and its Subsidiaries nor any "person associated with the adviser" as contemplated above is otherwise ineligible under any other Applicable Law from providing services with respect to the GIS Business. There is no Proceeding pending or, to the Knowledge of Seller, threatened, that could reasonably be expected to result in the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Knowledge of Seller, any Affiliate of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or any "person associated with an investment adviser" as contemplated above) becoming ineligible to serve in such positions or capacity or requiring disclosure to Clients of the GIS Business, or, as applicable, shareholders or interest holders of such Clients.
No Convictions, Sanctions or Other Violations
Section 2.23 . No employee of the Company or any of its Affiliates acts as a director, officer or employee of any Client.
Officer and Director Positions
Section 2.24 . None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has, directly or indirectly, given or agreed to give (or authorized any Representative to give or agree to give), and, to the Knowledge of Seller, no Representative of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has given or agreed to give, any gift or similar benefit to any Client, Governmental Authority or other Person who is or may be in a position to help or hinder the GIS Business which (a) violated, or was for the purposes of concealing a violation of, Applicable Law, or (b) subjected or could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any such Subsidiary or Representative to any disqualification, damage, penalty or other liability in any Proceeding.
No Improper Gifts or Benefits
 
Section 2.25 . Except for the representations and warranties of Seller specifically set forth in the Transaction Documents, neither Seller nor any of its Affiliates or Representatives, nor any other Person, makes or shall be deemed to make any representation or warranty to Buyer, express or implied, at law or in equity, with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and Seller hereby disclaims any such representation or warranty whether by Seller or any of its Affiliates or Representatives or any other Person.
Limitations on Representations and Warranties
Except as set forth in the correspondingly numbered section of the Buyer Disclosure Schedule (provided that disclosure in any section of such Buyer Disclosure Schedule shall apply to any other section to the extent that it is reasonably apparent on the face of such disclosure that such disclosure is relevant to such other section of this Agreement), Buyer hereby represents and warrants to Seller as follows:
Section 3.1 . Buyer is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware. Buyer has the corporate power and authority to own or lease all of its properties and assets and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified to do business in each jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the character or location of the properties and assets owned or leased by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified would not reasonably be expected to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect.
Organization and Related Matters
Section 3.2 .
Authority; No Violation
(a) Buyer has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and to consummate or cause to be consummated the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly approved by the Board of Directors of Buyer. No other corporate proceedings (including any approvals of Buyer's stockholders) on the part of Buyer are necessary to approve this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents and to consummate or cause to be consummated the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by Buyer and assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by Seller, this Agreement constitutes, and, when executed and delivered by Buyer in accordance with this Agreement and assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery thereof by Seller, the other Transaction Documents will constitute, the valid and binding obligations of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforcement may be limited by (i) the effect of bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, conservatorship, arrangement, moratorium or other laws affecting or relating to the rights of creditors generally, or (ii) the rules governing the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief or other equitable remedies and general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
 
(b) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement or any of the other Transaction Documents by Buyer, nor the consummation by Buyer of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, nor compliance by Buyer with any of the terms or provisions hereof or thereof, will (i) violate any provision of the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of Buyer or (ii) assuming that the consents, waivers, approvals and notices referred to in Section 3.3 are duly obtained or given, (x) violate any statute, code, ordinance, rule, regulation, judgment, order, writ, decree or injunction applicable to Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets or (y) violate, conflict with, result in a breach of any provision of or the loss of any benefit under, constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) under, result in the termination of or a right of termination or cancellation under or in any payment conditioned, in whole or in part, on consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, accelerate the performance required by or rights or obligations under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the respective properties or assets of Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries under, any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any Contract to which Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries is a party, or by which they or any of their respective properties, assets or business activities may be bound, except (in the case of clause (ii)(y) above) for such violations, conflicts, breaches, defaults or the loss of benefits which, either individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Buyer Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.3 . Except for (a) such consents, waivers, approvals and notices as are set forth in Section 3.3 of the Buyer Disclosure Schedule, (b) compliance with any applicable requirements under the HSR Act, (c) filings and exemptions required to be made with or obtained from the FINRA, and (d) such consents, waivers, approvals and notices that may be required solely by reason of the participation of Seller, Intermediate Holdco, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company (as opposed to any other third party) in the transactions contemplated hereby, Buyer is not required to obtain any material consents, waivers or approvals of, give notices to, or make any material filings, declarations or registrations with any Governmental Authority or any other Person in connection with (i) the execution and delivery by Buyer of this Agreement or any of the other Transaction Documents or (ii) the consummation by Buyer of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby.
Consents and Approvals
Section 3.4 . There are no Proceedings that are pending or, to the Knowledge of Buyer, threatened against or relating to Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries or their respective properties, assets or businesses that could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect. There is no injunction, order, judgment, decree, or regulatory restriction imposed upon Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties, assets or business that would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect.
Legal Proceedings
Section 3.5 . Except for The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., no Person has acted, directly or indirectly, as a broker, finder or financial advisor for Buyer or its Subsidiaries in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, other than any broker, finder or financial advisor the fees and expenses of which are due only from Buyer.
No Broker
Section 3.6 . None of the information regarding Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries supplied or to be supplied by or on behalf of Buyer on or prior to
Filing Documents
 
the Closing Date for inclusion in any documents to be filed with any Governmental Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby will, at the respective times such documents are filed with any Governmental Authority, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Section 3.7 . Buyer will have as of the Closing sufficient cash available to pay the Purchase Price to Seller on the terms and conditions contained herein, and there will be no restriction on the use of such cash for such purpose. As of the date of this Agreement, Buyer has no reason to believe that it will be unable to obtain any funds required to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby.
Financial Wherewithal
Section 3.8 . Each of the Buyer and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, orders, judgments and decrees, except for such failures to comply that would not reasonable be expected to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect. Buyer and its Subsidiaries hold, own or possess all Permits necessary for the lawful ownership, operation and use of the properties and assets and the conduct of the businesses of Buyer and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted, except for such Permits which the failure to hold, own or possess would not reasonably be expected to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect. Buyer and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with their respective obligations under such Permits, with such exceptions as would not reasonably be expected to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect. Except for matters that would not reasonably be expected to have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect, to the knowledge of Buyer, since January 1, 2008, none of such Permits has been challenged or revoked and no statement of intention to challenge, revoke or fail to renew any such Permit has been received in writing by Buyer or any Subsidiary.
Compliance with Applicable Law
Section 3.9 . Neither Buyer nor any of its Subsidiaries is subject to any cease-and-desist or other order or enforcement action issued by, or is a party to any written agreement, consent agreement or memorandum of understanding with, or is a party to any commitment letter or similar undertaking to, or is subject to any order or directive that would, individually or in the aggregate, have a Buyer Material Adverse Effect.
Agreements with Regulatory Agencies
Section 3.10 . Buyer's acquisition of the Company Common Stock is exempt from registration under Securities Laws.
Securities Law Exemption
Section 3.11 . Except for the representations and warranties of Buyer specifically set forth in the Transaction Documents, neither Buyer nor any of its Affiliates or Representatives, nor any other Person, makes or shall be deemed to make any representation or warranty to Seller, express or implied, at law or in equity, with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and Buyer hereby disclaims any such representation or warranty whether by Buyer or any of its Affiliates or Representatives or any other Person.
Limitations on Representations and Warranties
 
Section 4.1 .
Conduct of Business by the Company
(a) During the period from the date of this Agreement and continuing through the Closing Date, except as expressly required by this Agreement, or as set forth in Section 4.1 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, or with the prior written consent of Buyer (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), Seller shall cause the Company and each of its Subsidiaries to, (i) carry on its business in the Ordinary Course of Business; (ii) comply with Applicable Law and (iii) use commercially reasonable efforts to (A) preserve its present business organization and relationships; (B) to keep available the present services of its employees; and (C) preserve intact its business, operations, assets, rights, franchises, goodwill and relations with Clients and others with whom it conducts business.
(b) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, except as required by this Agreement or as set forth in Section 4.1(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule or consented to in writing by Buyer (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), the Company shall not, and Seller shall cause the Company and its Subsidiaries to not, directly or indirectly:
(i) (A) amend or agree to amend its certificates of incorporation (except pursuant to Section 4.14) or bylaws provided that, effective immediately prior to the Closing, Seller, the Company and the Company's Subsidiaries may take such actions as may be necessary to amend any certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries such that none of the names of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries contains "PNC" or any other words or mark that is the property of Seller or any of Seller's Subsidiaries not being directly or indirectly transferred to Buyer hereunder, (B) merge with or into or consolidate with, or agree to merge with or into or consolidate with, any other Person, (C) adjust, split, combine or reclassify any capital stock, (D) grant any stock appreciation rights or grant to any individual, corporation or other entity any right to acquire any shares of its capital stock, (E) issue any additional shares of capital stock (except pursuant to Section 4.14), or (F) enter into any agreement, understanding or arrangement with respect to the sale or voting of its capital stock;
(ii) except pursuant to Section 4.2(b) of this Agreement and to Section 4.2(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, declare or pay any dividends or distributions on or in respect of any of its capital stock or redeem, purchase or acquire any of its capital stock other than (i) payments of dividends in the Ordinary Course of Business in an aggregate amount not exceeding the net income of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the period from November 30, 2009 to the date of such dividend, determined in accordance with GAAP and (ii) payments of any dividends or distributions to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries by one of the Company's Subsidiaries;
 
(iii) make any capital expenditures in excess of $1,000,000 for an individual or group of related expenditures for a single project;
(iv) make any material change in such Person's cash management practices and its policies, practices and procedures with respect to collection of Accounts Receivable, establishment of reserves for uncollectible accounts, accrual of Accounts Receivable, prepayment of expenses, payment of trade accounts payable, accrual of other expenses, deferral of revenue and acceptance of customer deposits;
(v) transfer, assign, sell or otherwise dispose of any of the assets shown or reflected in the Unaudited Company Balance Sheet or cancel any debts or entitlements, in each case other than in the Ordinary Course of Business;
(vi) enter into a new line of business or abandon or discontinue any existing line of business;
(vii) adopt any plan of liquidation or dissolution or file a petition in bankruptcy under any provisions of applicable bankruptcy law or consent to the filing of any bankruptcy petition against it under any similar law;
(viii) incur any long-term Indebtedness, or incur any other Indebtedness for borrowed money, or guarantee the Indebtedness of other Persons;
(ix) sell, transfer, lease, offer to sell, abandon or make any other disposition of any of its assets except in the Ordinary Course of Business, or grant or suffer to exist, or agree to grant or suffer to exist, any Liens on any of its properties or assets (other than any Permitted Lien);
(x) incur, assume or guarantee, or agree to incur, assume or guarantee, any material liability or obligation (whether or not currently due and payable) relating to its business or any of its assets except in the Ordinary Course of Business;
(xi) create, renew, amend, terminate or cancel, any Contract, other than in the Ordinary Course of Business; provided that neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall enter into any Contract that (A) includes any express non-competition, non-solicitation or exclusive dealing agreement, or any other agreement or obligation which purports to limit or restrict in any respect the ability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to solicit customers or the manner in which, or the localities in which, all or any portion of the business of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or would be conducted or (B) (I) if, entered into on or prior to January 1, 2009, would have been reasonably expected to be required to be disclosed on Section 2.19(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule and (II) is on terms that deviate materially and adversely from those applicable to existing Clients of similar size and for services of similar nature and scope;
(xii) enter into, or agree to enter into, any Contract or any financial transaction with Seller or any of its Affiliates (other than the Company and its
 
Subsidiaries) or any of the officers, directors or employees of Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) other than, in the case of Seller, short term arrangements terminable at will and entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business or as otherwise contemplated by this Agreement;
(xiii) (A) enter into, amend in any material respect, or terminate or renew any Company Plan (including any employment agreement) or any arrangement that would be a Company Plan if in effect as of the date hereof; (B) grant to any Company Employee any salary or wage increase or increase in severance or termination pay or material increase in any employee benefit; (C) make any loan to, or enter into any other Contract with any employee other than in the Ordinary Course of Business; or (D) hire any Company Employee (other than employees for non-senior management positions having an annual salary below $150,000 who are hired in the Ordinary Course of Business, but in any event not beyond a level which would increase the number of non-senior management employees having an annual salary below $150,000 above 105% of the level thereof in place on November 30, 2009) or terminate any employee (other than non-senior management employees having an annual salary below $150,000 who are terminated in the Ordinary Course of Business), except, in the case of clauses (A) through (D), to the extent applicable, (w) under or pursuant to the terms of a Plan as in effect from time to time, (x) reasonable and customary increases in base salary and payment of annual bonuses, in each case, in the Ordinary Course of Business, (y) changes that are required by Applicable Law (including Section 409A of the Code) and (z) pursuant to an action that applies uniformly to Company Employees and to similarly situated other employees of Seller and its Affiliates;
(xiv) accelerate the billing or other realizations of fees payable by Clients to the Company or delay the payment of liabilities beyond the Ordinary Course of Business;
(xv) purchase, or enter into any lease of, real property, except any renewals of existing leases (other than a lease with Seller or its Affiliates extending beyond the Closing) in the Ordinary Course of Business and where the relevant period during which the Company or such Subsidiary has the right to renew such lease falls entirely prior to the Closing Date;
(xvi) acquire any business or Person, by merger or consolidation, purchase of substantial assets or equity interests, or by any other manner, in a single transaction or a series of related transactions, or make any investment in any such business or Person (other than a Subsidiary or a business thereof);
(xvii) enter into any new Contract (other than a Client Contract) involving annual payments to the counterparty in excess of $500,000;
(xviii) transfer, assign or grant any license or sublicense of any material rights under or with respect to any Company Intellectual Property other than pursuant to Client Contracts in the Ordinary Course of Business;
 
(xix) settle or compromise any material Proceeding;
(xx) make any material change in any method of financial accounting or financial accounting practice, except as required by GAAP;
(xxi) make, change or rescind any Tax election, amend any Tax Return or take any position on any Tax Return, take any action, omit to take any action or enter into any other transaction that would have the effect of materially increasing the Tax liability or materially reducing any Tax asset of Buyer in respect of any Post-Closing Period; or
(xxii) authorize, resolve, commit or agree (by Contract or otherwise) to do any of the foregoing.
Section 4.2 .
Additional Financial Statements; Transfer of Subsidiary Groups; Other Pre-Closing Transfers
(a) Seller shall prepare in accordance with GAAP and furnish to Buyer on or before May 31, 2010 the audited consolidated balance sheets of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2009, and the related audited consolidated statements of income, consolidated statements of stockholder's equity and consolidated statements of cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.
(b) Prior to the Closing, Seller shall, at the request of Buyer, cause PNC Global Investments Servicing (US) Inc. ("") and PFPC Trust Company ("") to distribute the stock, limited partnership interests or membership interests, as applicable, of PFPC Distributors Inc., Albridge Solutions, Coates Analytics LP and Coates Holding LLC (the "") to the Company in order that at the Closing Date, the Section 4.2(b) Companies and their Subsidiaries shall not be Subsidiaries of Trust Company; provided, however, that in that event, Seller and Buyer shall, and shall cause their respective Affiliates to, treat the distributions of the stock, limited partnership interests or membership interests, as applicable, of the Section 4.2(b) Companies to the Company as having occurred in the deemed liquidation of GISUS and Trust Company resulting from the Section 338(h)(10) election.
GISUS
Trust Company
Section 4.2(b) Companies
(c) Seller shall, or shall cause the Company and its Subsidiaries to, transfer or assume the assets, contracts and liabilities set forth in Section 4.2(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule at or before the Closing Date.
Section 4.3 .
Review of Business
Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing, Seller shall cause the Company to provide such access to Buyer and its Representatives to all information and data relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries, including the Books and Records of the Company and its Subsidiaries, and such other information, Contracts, documents and properties of or relating to the Company, its Subsidiaries or any of their employees, consultants, operations or personnel as is reasonably requested in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated in connection herewith, subject to compliance with Applicable Law. Such review
 
shall occur only during normal business hours upon reasonable advance notice by Buyer to Seller and the Company and shall be conducted in a manner that does not unreasonably interfere with the operations of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Subject to the preceding sentence, Seller shall cause the Company to permit Buyer and its Representatives reasonable access to the facilities, employees and consultants of the Company and its Subsidiaries. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither the Company, Seller nor Intermediate Holdco shall be required to provide access to or to disclose information where such access or disclosure would jeopardize the attorney-client privilege of it or its Affiliates or contravene any law, rule, regulation, order, judgment, decree, fiduciary duty or binding agreement; the parties shall make appropriate substitute disclosure arrangements under circumstances in which the preceding restrictions apply. No investigation pursuant to this Section 4.3 shall alter: any representation or warranty given hereunder by Seller; any of the Company Disclosure Schedules; the conditions to Closing in Article V; the indemnity provisions of Articles VII and VIII; or any covenant or other agreement contained herein. Following the Closing, Buyer shall cause the Company to provide to Seller and Intermediate Holdco, and Seller shall, and shall cause Intermediate Holdco and each of Seller's other Affiliates to, provide to Buyer and the Company, information and data in each such Person's possession relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries to the extent reasonably necessary to enable Seller, Intermediate Holdco or their respective Affiliates, on the one hand, and Buyer, the Company or their respective Affiliates, on the other hand, to respond to any claim or objection made by Buyer or Seller hereunder, to prepare and audit their respective financial statements and Tax Returns, and to secure any information which they may require in connection with the audit of any Tax Return, or in connection with the defense of any litigation to which they are a party or any inquiry or proceeding by a Governmental Authority; provided, however, that to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, Seller and Intermediate Holdco shall be permitted, following the Closing, to retain copies of all information and data, including any records of the Company, reasonably related to any Company Employee or any former employee of the Company. Buyer and Seller shall cause all such information to be preserved after the Closing Date for the same period of time that such party and its Affiliates preserve such information in accordance with their respective record retention policies and Applicable Law. In addition, if reasonably requested by the other party from time to time after the Closing, Buyer will provide Seller with access to the facilities and employees of the Company and Seller will provide Buyer with access to the facilities and employees of Seller (for the purposes st forth above), to the same extent provided by Seller to Buyer prior to the Closing pursuant to the provisions of the first sentence of this paragraph. At the request of either party, the parties shall negotiate in good faith the terms of a mutually satisfactory records retention and services agreement consistent with the foregoing provisions.
Section 4.4 .
Confidentiality and Announcements
(a) The parties agree to be bound by and comply with the provisions set forth in the Confidentiality Agreement, the provisions of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and further agree that the Confidentiality Agreement shall terminate upon the Closing (other than with respect to any non-public information relating to Seller or its Subsidiaries other than the Company and its Subsidiaries). In addition, without limiting the foregoing, from the date hereof through the Closing, Buyer shall keep confidential and not use for its benefit or for the benefit of any other Person (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries), any and all non-public information relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries, including the identity of and the
 
mandates of Clients; provided, however, that no such Person shall be liable hereunder with respect to any disclosure to the extent such disclosure is pursuant to legal process (including pursuant to the assertion of such party's rights under this Agreement) (by interrogatories, subpoena, civil investigative demand or similar process) or regulatory process or request, provided that in the event of any disclosure pursuant to legal process such Person exercises its commercially reasonable efforts to preserve the confidentiality of the non-public information disclosed, including by cooperating with Seller to obtain an appropriate protective order or other reliable assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded the non-public information required to be disclosed.
(b) From and after the date of this Agreement, Seller shall keep confidential non-public information in its possession relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries, including the identity of and the mandates of Clients; provided, however, that Seller shall not be liable hereunder with respect to any disclosure to the extent such disclosure is pursuant to legal process (including pursuant to the assertion of Seller's rights under this Agreement) (by interrogatories, subpoena, civil investigative demand or similar process), regulatory process or request, or to the extent such disclosure is reasonably necessary for purposes of compliance by Seller or its Affiliates with tax or regulatory reporting requirements, provided that in the event of any disclosure pursuant to legal process Seller exercises its commercially reasonable efforts to preserve the confidentiality of the non-public information disclosed, including by cooperating with Buyer to obtain an appropriate protective order or other reliable assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded the non-public information required to be disclosed; provided, further, however, that information relating to Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) or any of their respective clients and customers shall not be deemed non-public information relating to the Company and/or its Subsidiaries for purposes of the foregoing restrictions.
(c) From and after the Closing, Buyer shall keep confidential non-public information in its possession (other than information which was or becomes available to Buyer on a non-confidential basis from a source other than Seller or any of its Affiliates or Representatives) relating to the Seller and its Affiliates other than the Company and its Subsidiaries; provided, however that Buyer shall not be liable hereunder with respect to any disclosure to the extent such disclosure is pursuant to legal process (including pursuant to the assertion of Buyer's rights under this Agreement) (by interrogatories, subpoena, civil investigative demand or similar process) or regulatory process or request, provided that in the event of any disclosure pursuant to legal process Buyer exercises its commercially reasonable efforts to preserve the confidentiality of the non-public information disclosed, including by cooperating with Seller to obtain an appropriate protective order or other reliable assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded the non-public information required to be disclosed.
(d) Subject to Sections 4.4(a), (b) and (c), prior to the Closing, Seller and Buyer shall consult with each other as to the form, substance and timing of any press release or other public disclosure related to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, and no such press release or other public disclosure shall be made without the consent of the other party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed; provided, however, that either party may make such disclosure to the extent required by Applicable Law, based on advice of counsel, after making reasonable efforts under the circumstances to consult with the other prior to such disclosure.
 
Section 4.5
Regulatory Matters; Third Party Consents; Conduct of Business by Buyer.
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, each party hereto will use its commercially reasonable best efforts to promptly take, or cause to be taken, all actions, and do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable under this Agreement and Applicable Laws to consummate the Stock Purchase as soon as practicable after the date hereof, including (i) preparing as promptly as practicable all necessary applications, notices, petitions, filings, ruling requests, and other documents and to obtain as promptly as practicable all consents, waivers, licenses, orders, registrations, approvals, permits, rulings, authorizations and clearances necessary or advisable to be obtained from any third party and/or any Governmental Authority in order to consummate the Stock Purchase (collectively, the "") and (ii) as promptly as practicable taking all steps as may be necessary to obtain all such Required Approvals. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, each party hereto agrees to (A) make an appropriate and complete filing of a Notification and Report Form pursuant to the HSR Act with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby within fifteen (15) Business Days of the date of this Agreement, (B) make other required filings pursuant to other Applicable Law with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby as promptly as practicable, and (C) not extend any waiting period under the HSR Act or enter into any agreement with the FTC or the DOJ or any other Governmental Authority not to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except with the prior written consent of the other party hereto (which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed); that without limiting any other obligation under this Agreement, a party, following good faith consultation with the other party hereto, may extend the waiting period for a reasonable period, but in any case not beyond August 1, 2010. Each party shall supply as promptly as practicable any additional information or documentation that may be requested pursuant to the HSR Act or any other Applicable Law and use its commercially reasonable best efforts to take all other actions necessary, proper or advisable to cause the expiration or termination of the applicable waiting periods under the HSR Act and any other Applicable Law as soon as possible.
Required Approvals
provided
(b) Each of Buyer, on the one hand, and Seller and the Company, on the other hand, shall, in connection with the actions referenced in Section 4.5(a) to obtain all Required Approvals for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement under the HSR Act or any other Applicable Law, (i) cooperate in all respects with each other in connection with any communication, filing or submission and in connection with any investigation or other inquiry, including any proceeding initiated by a private party; (ii) keep the other party and/or its counsel informed of any communication received by such party from, or given by such party to, the FTC, the DOJ or any other U.S. or other Governmental Authority and of any communication received or given in connection with any proceeding by a private party, in each case regarding any of the transactions contemplated hereby; and (iii) permit the other party and/or its counsel to review in advance any submission, filing or communication (and documents submitted therewith) intended to be given by it to, and consult with each other in advance of any meeting or conference with, the FTC, the DOJ or any other Governmental Authority or, in connection with any proceeding by
 
a private party, with any other person, and to the extent permitted by the FTC, the DOJ or such other Governmental Authority or other person, give the other party and/or its counsel the opportunity to attend and participate in such meetings and conferences. Buyer and Seller may, as each deems advisable and necessary, reasonably designate any competitively sensitive material to be provided to the other under this Section 4.5(b) as "Antitrust Counsel Only Material." Such materials and the information contained therein shall be given only to the outside antitrust counsel of the recipient and will not be disclosed by such outside counsel to employees, officers or directors of the recipient unless express permission is obtained in advance from the source of the materials (Buyer, Seller, or the Company, as the case may be) or its legal counsel.
(c) In furtherance and not in limitation of the covenants of the parties contained in Sections 4.5(a) and 4.5(b), each of Buyer, Seller and the Company shall use its commercially reasonable best efforts to (i) avoid the entry of, or to have vacated, lifted, reversed or overturned any decree, judgment, injunction or other order, whether temporary, preliminary or permanent, that would restrain, prevent or delay the Closing on or before the Termination Date, including defending through litigation on the merits any claim asserted in any court with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by the FTC, the DOJ or any other applicable Governmental Authority or any private party; and (ii) avoid or eliminate each and every impediment under any Applicable Law so as to enable the Closing to occur as soon as possible (and in any event no later than the Termination Date), including (x) proposing, negotiating, committing to and effecting, by consent decree, hold separate order, or otherwise, the sale, divestiture or disposition of such businesses, product lines or assets of Buyer, the Company and their respective Subsidiaries, (y) otherwise taking or committing to take actions that after the Closing would limit Buyer's and/or its Subsidiaries' freedom of action with respect to, or its or their ability to operate and/or retain, one or more of the businesses, product lines or assets of the Buyer, the Company and/or their respective Subsidiaries, and (z) agreeing to divest, sell, dispose of, hold separate, or otherwise take or commit to take any action that limits its freedom of action with respect to, or Buyer's or Buyer's Subsidiaries' ability to operate or retain, any of the businesses, product lines or assets of Buyer, the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries; , , that any action contemplated by clauses (x), (y) and (z) is conditioned upon the consummation of the Stock Purchase and that nothing contained in this Agreement shall require Buyer to take any actions specified in this Section 4.5(c) that would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect (measured on a scale relative to the GIS Business, taken as a whole) on Buyer or the GIS Business.
provided
however
(d) Seller and Buyer shall use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain or give, at Buyer's sole expense, all Client, vendor, landlord, supplier and other consents, approvals or notices required for the GIS Business to continue to operate and to provide services to its existing Clients following the Closing in the same manner as, and under no less favorable terms than, before the Closing.
(e) Without limiting any other obligation under this Agreement, during the period from the date of this Agreement until the Closing Date, Buyer and its Subsidiaries shall not, directly or indirectly, acquire or agree or announce its intention to acquire by merger or consolidation, or by purchasing a substantial equity interest in or a substantial portion of the assets of, or by any other manner, any business or any corporation, partnership, association or
 
other business organization or division thereof or otherwise acquire or agree to acquire any assets, where Buyer has been advised by a Governmental Authority that consummation of such acquisition would reasonably be expected to prevent the parties from obtaining any approval or authorization required under Regulatory Laws in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or to prevent or materially delay or impede the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein.
(f) Each of the parties hereto shall cooperate reasonably and in good faith with each other to the extent necessary to enter into the Continuing Relationship Agreement, effective as of the Closing.
Section 4.6 . Each party to this Agreement shall give prompt notice to the other party hereto, to the extent known by such party, of (a) any event or existence of any condition that has caused or would reasonably be expected to cause any of its representations or warranties contained in this Agreement to be untrue or inaccurate in any material respect at any time after the date of this Agreement, (b) the occurrence of any matter or event that would reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect or a Buyer Material Adverse Effect, (c) any failure on its part to comply with or satisfy, in any material respect, any covenant, condition or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it under this Agreement, (d) any notice or other communication from any Person alleging that the consent of such Person is or may be required in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, and (e) any Proceeding pending or, to the applicable party's Knowledge, threatened against the party relating to the transactions contemplated hereby; provided, however, that no such notification shall affect the representations, warranties, covenants or agreements of the parties (or remedies with respect thereto) or the conditions to the obligations of the parties under this Agreement or be deemed to amend or supplement the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Buyer Disclosure Schedule, as the case may be; provided further that a breach of this Section 4.6 shall not be considered for purposes of determining the satisfaction of the closing conditions set forth in Article V or give rise to a right of termination under Article VI or a right to indemnification under Article VIII if the underlying breach or breaches with respect to which the other party failed to give notice would not result in the failure of the closing conditions set forth in Article V or would not result in the ability of such non-breaching party to terminate this Agreement or to obtain indemnification, as the case may be.
Notification of Certain Matters
Section 4.7 . Each of Seller and Buyer shall bear its own costs and expenses incurred in connection with the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby including any filing fees with respect to the HSR Act and compliance with other Regulatory Laws payable in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby; provided, however, that any fees and expenses incurred pursuant to Section 4.5(d) in connection with the obtaining of any third party consents shall be borne by Buyer.
Expenses
Section 4.8 . Each party to this Agreement shall, at the request of the other, at any time and from time to time following the Closing Date, execute and deliver to the requesting party such further instruments as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate in order more effectively to confirm or carry out the provisions of this Agreement.
Further Assurances
 
Section 4.9 .
Employee Benefits
(a) From and after the Closing, the Company shall, except as set forth on Section 4.9(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, retain responsibility for, or to the extent applicable, shall assume, each Company Plan (including any related trust, insurance contract or other funding source or arrangement) and shall honor each Company Plan in accordance with its terms as in effect immediately before the Closing, provided that nothing herein shall limit the right of the Company or Buyer to amend or terminate such plans, arrangements and agreements in accordance with their terms. From and after the Closing: (i) Buyer and its Affiliates (including the Company and its Subsidiaries) shall be solely responsible for all liabilities under the Company Plans; and (ii) Seller shall be solely responsible for liabilities under the Seller Plans.
(b) Upon the Closing Date, without any action by a Company Employee, Seller or Buyer, each Company Employee other than a Company Employee in the United States on disability or military leave of absence as of the Closing Date (an "") shall continue to be an employee of the Company and its Subsidiaries; provided that nothing herein shall limit the right of the Company or Buyer to terminate the employment of any such Company Employee on or after the Closing Date. Each Inactive Employee shall be transferred to Seller and its Subsidiaries (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) no later than immediately prior to the Closing. Each Inactive Employee who is available to return to active employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the 180-day anniversary of the Closing (or such later return date as shall be required under Applicable Law) shall be permitted so to return and shall be treated as continuing his/her employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries retroactive to the Closing Date. Subject in all cases to Applicable Law, Inactive Employees who do not return to such active employment by such 180-day anniversary (or applicable later date) shall not become Continuing Employees and shall remain employees of Seller. During the period from the Closing Date until December 31, 2010 (the ""), Buyer shall provide, or cause to be provided, compensation opportunities and employee benefits for the benefit of Company Employees who continue employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries after the Closing ("") which, in the aggregate, are substantially comparable in value to the compensation opportunities and generally available employee benefits (other than retiree medical) provided to the Continuing Employees by Seller, the Company and their respective Subsidiaries immediately prior to the Closing Date. Without limiting the foregoing, Buyer shall provide or cause to be provided to each Continuing Employee who is terminated without cause during the Benefit Continuation Period, subject to such Continuing Employee's execution and non-revocation of a release acceptable to Buyer, cash severance pay (before Taxes) and welfare benefit continuation (other than retiree medical) in each case no less favorable than the value of the cash severance pay (before Taxes) that would have been paid and/or provided to such Continuing Employee under the cash severance pay formula (and any related notice period) and the welfare benefit continuation (other than retiree medical) provided under Seller's Displacement Benefits Plan as in effect immediately prior to the Closing Date.
Inactive Employee
Benefit Continuation Period
Continuing Employees
(c) For purposes of vesting, eligibility to participate and level of benefits under the employee benefit plans of Buyer and its Subsidiaries, providing benefits to any Continuing Employees after the Closing (the ""), each Continuing Employee shall be credited with his or her years of service with the Company and its predecessors before the
New Plans
 
Closing, to the same extent as such Continuing Employee was entitled, before the Closing, to credit for such service under any similar Plan in which such Continuing Employee participated or was eligible to participate immediately prior to the Closing, provided that the foregoing shall not apply (i) with respect to any frozen or grandfathered plan, (ii) with respect to benefit accruals (including "compensation credits") under any defined benefit or "cash balance" pension plan, or (iii) to the extent that its application would result in a duplication of benefits. In addition, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (A) each Continuing Employee shall be immediately eligible to participate, without any waiting time, in any and all New Plans to the extent coverage under such New Plan is comparable to that under a Plan in which such Continuing Employee participated immediately before the Closing (such plans, collectively, the ""), and (B) for purposes of each New Plan providing medical, dental, pharmaceutical and/or vision benefits to any Continuing Employee, Buyer shall cause all pre-existing condition exclusions and actively-at-work requirements of such New Plan to be waived for such employee and his or her covered dependents, unless such conditions would not have been waived under the comparable plans of the Company or its Subsidiaries in which such employee participated immediately prior to the Closing and Buyer shall cause any eligible expenses incurred by such employee and his or her covered dependents during the portion of the plan year of the Old Plan ending on the date such employee's participation in the corresponding New Plan begins to be taken into account under such New Plan for purposes of satisfying all deductible, coinsurance and maximum out-of-pocket requirements applicable to such employee and his or her covered dependents for the applicable plan year as if such amounts had been paid in accordance with such New Plan.
Old Plans
(d) Effective as of the Closing, Seller and its Subsidiaries shall transfer sponsorship of the Business 401(k) Plan, together with all assets (including cash, cash equivalents or other mutually acceptable property) and liabilities (including loans) with respect to the account balances of each participant thereunder, to the Company or its Subsidiaries, and following the Closing Date, Buyer and its Subsidiaries (including the Company and its Subsidiaries) shall have sole responsibility for the Business 401(k) Plan, and Seller and its Subsidiaries (excluding the Company and its Subsidiaries) shall have no responsibility for or liability under the Business 401(k) Plan.
(e) Effective as of the Closing with respect to those Continuing Employees who, but for their failure to satisfy the age and service requirements, would be eligible to participate in Sellers Plans which provide medical and/or pharmaceutical benefits to retirees of Seller and its Subsidiaries (the "") as of the Closing Date (""), Seller will cause its Seller's Retiree Medical Plan to be amended to the extent necessary or appropriate to: (i) maintain and continue to credit interest to the Post Retirement Medical Accounts ("") established and/or maintained with respect to any Grandfathered Employee as of the day before the Closing Date; and (ii) create a PRMA with an initial $5,000 contribution (or such higher amount as may be provided to similarly situated active employees of Seller who initially become eligible for a PRMA) and thereafter credit it with interest for those Grandfathered Employees who subsequently satisfy the age and service conditions for the creation of a PRMA and receipt of an initial contribution under the terms of Seller's Retiree Medical Plan if service with Seller and the Company before the Closing and service with Buyer and the Company after the Closing ("") is taken into account under Seller's Retiree Medical Plan. Such Grandfathered Employees who later
Seller's Retiree Medical Plan
Grandfathered Employees
PRMA
Combined Service
 
terminate employment with the Company on or after age 55 (or who would otherwise be treated as vested under the terms of the PRMA if they had so terminated from active employment with Seller and their Combined Service were credited under Seller's Retiree Medical Plan) shall be permitted to elect coverage under Seller's Retiree Medical Plan in accordance with its terms as then in effect; provided, however, that such Grandfathered Employees shall be permitted to use the amounts accumulated in their PRMA as hereinabove described to pay the then premiums for such Seller's Retiree Medical Plan; which premiums shall not exceed those charged to similarly situated former employees of Seller electing such coverage following their retirement from active employment of Seller. For purposes of clarification and not limitation of Section 4.9(c), Continuing Employees shall be credited with their service with Seller and Company prior to the Closing Date for purposes of determining their eligibility for any Plans of Buyer and its Subsidiaries which provide medical and/or pharmaceutical benefits to retirees of Buyer and its Subsidiaries; provided that any such employee who ultimately receives benefits under Seller's Retiree Medical Plan shall not receive retiree medical benefits under such Plans of Buyer and its Subsidiaries. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the ability of Seller to amend or terminate the Seller's Retiree Medical Plan in accordance with its terms.
(f) Nothing in this Section 4.9, express or implied, shall be construed or interpreted to amend any employee benefit plan or to confer upon any individual, including any employee or former employee, any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement.
Section 4.10 . Seller shall not, nor shall it permit any of its Representatives to, directly or indirectly, solicit, encourage or facilitate inquiries or proposals, or enter into any agreement with respect to, or initiate or participate in any negotiations or discussions with any Person concerning, any acquisition or purchase of all or a substantial portion of the assets of or of any capital stock of or other ownership interest in the Company or any merger or business combination with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, in each case other than in respect of the transactions contemplated hereby (each, an ""), or furnish any information to any Person contacting them or making an inquiry with respect to a potential Acquisition Proposal. In addition, Seller shall use commercially reasonable efforts to enforce any and all confidentiality agreements obtained by Seller prior to the date hereof in connection with the potential sale of the GIS Business to any other party.
Third Party Proposals
Acquisition Proposal
Section 4.11 . During the period from the date of this Agreement continuing through the Closing, each party hereto agrees to use reasonable best efforts to fulfill or obtain the fulfillment of the conditions precedent to the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement as promptly as practicable, including the execution and delivery of any documents, certificates, instruments or other papers that are reasonably required for the consummation of such transactions. During the period from the date of this Agreement and continuing through the Closing, except as required by Applicable Law or with the prior written consent of the other party to this Agreement and subject to Section 4.5(c), no party to this Agreement shall take any action or fail to take any action within its reasonable control intended or reasonably expected to (x) result in any conditions to the Closing set forth in Article V not being satisfied, (y) result in a violation of any provision of this Agreement in any material respect, or (z) adversely affect or materially delay the receipt of any of the requisite regulatory approvals.
Efforts of Parties to Close
 
Section 4.12 . Seller agrees that, for a period of 18 months from the Closing Date, without the consent of the Buyer, it will not, and will not permit its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or the officers, directors or employees of it or its Subsidiaries or Affiliates to, hire any employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries who is such as of immediately following the Closing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing contained herein shall (a) apply to the hiring of any person who responds to general solicitations through media advertisements or to the hiring of any person through employment search firms in the ordinary course of business that are not specifically targeted at such employees or (b) prohibit the hiring of any person who at the time of such hiring has not been an employee of the Company or its Subsidiaries for at least six months; provided, however, that such six month period shall not apply to an employee who was terminated by Buyer, the Company or an Affiliate thereof following the Closing.
Non-Hire of Employees
Section 4.13 . Except as set forth in Section 4.13 of the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Transition Services Agreement or the Continuing Relationship Agreement or as otherwise contemplated by this Agreement, and notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 4.1, Seller shall, and shall cause its Affiliates to, and cause the Company and its Subsidiaries to, immediately prior to the Closing, (a) settle all Tax accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) and (b) execute and deliver such releases, termination agreements and discharges as are necessary to terminate all Contracts among any Seller or any Affiliate (other than the Company or its Subsidiaries), on one hand, and the Company or its Subsidiaries, on the other hand. For the avoidance of doubt, termination of such agreements shall not terminate any payable or receivable to extent already accrued or accruable as of the Closing.
Termination of Intercompany Agreements
Section 4.14 . Prior to the Closing, Seller shall cause any Intercompany Indebtedness outstanding immediately prior to the Closing to be converted into Company Common Stock (and Seller shall be entitled to take necessary actions in connection therewith, including amending the Certificate of Incorporation), which shall be part of the shares of Company Common Stock to be purchased by Buyer pursuant to Article I.
Intercompany Indebtedness
Section 4.15 .
Non-competition
(a) For a period of four years from the Closing Date (the ""), except as permitted by this Section 4.15, Seller shall not (and shall cause each of its Affiliates not to), without the prior written consent of Buyer, (i) engage in or carry on any Competitive Activities (as defined in Exhibit D), or (ii) have an equity interest in any Person that engages in any Competitive Activities; , , that "Competitive Activities" shall in no event be deemed to include performing any act or conducting any business (A) contemplated by the Transition Services Agreement or the Continuing Relationship Agreement, or (B) to retail customers of Seller or any of its Affiliates or investment professionals licensed with Seller's or Seller's Affiliates' private banking, wealth management or retail banking operations.
Restricted Period
provided
however
(b) This Section 4.15 shall cease to apply (i) to any Person at such time as it is no longer an Affiliate of Seller, or (ii) upon the occurrence of an arm's length transaction in which any Person acquires or combines with Seller in a transaction in which (A) Persons who are
 
directors of Seller immediately prior to the consummation of the transaction do not constitute upon the consummation of such transaction a majority of the board of directors of the Person which survives such transaction (or the publicly traded parent thereof) and (B) the holders of the common stock of Seller hold upon the consummation thereof 60% or less of the shares of equity securities normally entitled to vote in the election of directors of such Person, and shall not apply to any Person that, in an arm's length transaction, acquires or combines with one of Seller's Affiliates or acquires assets, operations or a business from Seller or one of its Affiliates if such Person is not an Affiliate of Seller after such transaction is consummated. No restriction in this Section 4.15 shall apply to BlackRock, Inc. or any of its controlled Affiliates.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section 4.15, nothing in this Agreement shall preclude, prohibit or restrict Seller or any of its Affiliates from (i) acquiring, owning or holding up to 10% of the outstanding securities of any entity whose securities are listed and traded on a national securities exchange or market or any securities required to be registered under the Exchange Act; (ii) holding or exercising rights of ownership with respect to any security in a fiduciary capacity or otherwise for the benefit of a third party not affiliated with Seller; (iii) acquiring more than 10% of the outstanding capital stock or other equity interests in, but less than a Controlling Interest in, any Person that derives 25% or less of its total annual revenues in its most recent fiscal year from Competitive Activities; or (iv) acquiring a Controlling Interest in any Person that derives less than 25% of its total annual revenues in its most recent fiscal year from Competitive Activities; provided, however, that in the case of this clause (iv) Seller shall divest or enter into a binding agreement to divest to an unaffiliated third party, or cause its applicable Affiliate to divest or enter into such an agreement, with respect to that portion of such Person that engages in Competitive Activities as soon as reasonably practicable, and in any event not later than one year, following the acquisition of such ownership or interest (except that the obligations set forth in this proviso shall not apply to Seller or any of its Affiliates in the event that Seller or any of its Affiliates consummate the acquisition of such Controlling Interest at any time during the final year of the Restricted Period); or (v) performing any act or conducting any business contemplated by this Agreement or the Transition Services Agreement.
(d) If Seller breaches, or threatens to commit a breach of, any of the provisions of this Section 4.15, Buyer and the Company shall have the right in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other rights and remedies available to Buyer or the Company under law or in equity (including the right and remedy to recover from Seller all monetary damages suffered by Buyer or the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company, as the case may be, as the result of any acts or omissions constituting a breach of this Section 4.15) to have such provision specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction, it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach may cause irreparable injury to each of Buyer and the Company and that money damages may not provide an adequate remedy to Buyer or the Company.
(e) Seller acknowledges that the restrictions contained in this Section 4.15 are reasonable and necessary to protect the legitimate interests of Buyer and constitute a material inducement to Buyer to enter into this Agreement and consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. In the event that any covenant contained in this Section 4.15 should ever be adjudicated to exceed the time, geographic, product or service, or other limitations permitted by
 
Applicable Law in any jurisdiction, then any court of competent jurisdiction is expressly empowered to reform such covenant, and such covenant shall be deemed reformed, in such jurisdiction to the maximum time, geographic, product or service, or other limitations permitted by Applicable Law. The covenants contained in this Section 4.15 and each provision hereof are severable and distinct covenants and provisions. The invalidity or unenforceability of any such covenant or provision as written shall not invalidate or render unenforceable the remaining covenants or provisions hereof, and any such invalidity or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such covenant or provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 4.16 . To the extent that Milestone Consideration or Earnout Consideration is not reflected in the applicable components of the Closing Tangible Capital Statement, Seller shall promptly reimburse the Company or its applicable Subsidiary for any Milestone Consideration or Earnout Consideration (as each such term is defined in the Coates Acquisition Agreement) payable by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to the Coates Acquisition Agreement following the Closing.
Coates Acquisition Agreement
Section 4.17 . (a) Buyer agrees either (i) to enter into such agreements and arrangements with or for the benefit of the counterparties to the comfort letters and agreements set forth in Section 4.17(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule (the "") such that on and after the Closing Date, Seller and each of its Affiliates is fully and unconditionally released from any liability or obligation of the Company or its Subsidiaries under or with respect to the Covered Arrangements or (ii) to enter into an agreement or agreements with Seller reasonably satisfactory to Seller in which Buyer agrees to indemnify and hold harmless Seller and its Affiliates from any liability under the Covered Agreements. Promptly upon completion of the matters referred to in the preceding sentence, Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) shall release all Liens held by Seller and such Affiliates on any property or assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries securing their obligations under the Covered Arrangements.
Other Agreements
Covered Arrangements
(b) Buyer and Seller agree with respect to the agreement set forth in Schedule 4.17(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule (the "") that the parties will negotiate in good faith and execute and deliver an agreement pursuant to which they will agree upon an equitable allocation of the rights and liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries, on the one hand, and the Seller and its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries), on the other hand, under the Additional Arrangement, including a provision whereby each such group of parties will agree to pay the amounts with respect to the delivery of services to such group pursuant to the Additional Arrangement and to indemnify the other group for the failure to do so.
Additional Arrangement
Section 5.1 . The obligations of each party to this Agreement to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions:
Mutual Conditions
(a) (i) There shall be no order, preliminary or permanent injunction or decree issued by any Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction preventing the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby in effect and (ii) no statute, rule or regulation shall have been enacted, entered or promulgated by any Governmental Authority which prohibits or makes illegal the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby;
 
(b) Any applicable waiting period under the HSR Act with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby shall have expired or been terminated; and
(c) All consents, waivers, approvals and notices set forth on Section 5.1(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule shall have been duly obtained or given, and the parties shall have received reasonable evidence or confirmation thereof.
Section 5.2 . The obligations of Buyer to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby shall be subject to the satisfaction of each of the following conditions, any of which may be waived in writing by Buyer:
Conditions to the Obligations of Buyer
(a) . The representations and warranties of Seller set forth in Article II of this Agreement shall be true and correct in all respects when made and on and as of the Closing Date (except that representations and warranties as of a specified date need only be true on and as of such date); provided, however, that for purposes of determining the satisfaction of the condition set forth in this Section 5.2(a), such representations and warranties shall be deemed to be so true and correct if the failure or failures of such representations and warranties to be true and correct (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any qualification set forth therein relating to "materiality" or "Company Material Adverse Effect" or words of similar meaning (the "")) do not constitute, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. Buyer shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Seller by an appropriate officer of Seller to the foregoing effect.
Representations and Warranties
Excluded Seller Qualifications
(b) . Seller shall have performed in all material respects the obligations required to be performed by it under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date. Buyer shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Seller by an appropriate officer of Seller to the foregoing effect.
Performance of Obligations of Seller
(c) . Seller shall have executed and delivered the Transition Services Agreement.
Transition Services Agreement
(d) . Seller shall have executed and delivered the Continuing Relationship Agreement.
Continuing Relationship Agreement
Section 5.3 . The obligations of Seller to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby shall be subject to satisfaction of each of the following conditions, which may be waived in writing by Seller:
Conditions to the Obligations of Seller
(a) The representations and warranties of Buyer set forth in Article III of this Agreement shall be true and correct in all respects as of the Closing Date (except that representations and warranties as of a specified date need only be true
Representations and Warranties.
 
on and as of such date); provided, however, that for purposes of determining the satisfaction of the condition set forth in this Section 5.3(a), such representations and warranties (except for Section 3.7, which shall be true and correct as of the Closing as written) shall be deemed to be so true and correct if the failure or failures of such representations and warranties to be true and correct (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any qualification set forth therein relating to "materiality" or "Buyer Material Adverse Effect" or words of similar meaning (the "")) do not constitute, individually or in the aggregate, a Buyer Material Adverse Effect. Seller shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Buyer by an appropriate officer of Buyer to the foregoing effect.
Excluded Buyer Qualifications
(b) Buyer shall have performed in all material respects the obligations required to be performed by it under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date. Seller shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Buyer by an appropriate officer of Buyer to the foregoing effect.
Performance of Obligations of Buyer.
(c) . Buyer shall have executed and delivered the Transition Services Agreement.
Transition Services Agreement
(d) . Buyer shall have executed and delivered the Continuing Relationship Agreement.
Continuing Relationship Agreement
Section 5.4 . None of the parties may rely on the failure of any condition set forth in this Article VI to be satisfied if such failure was caused by the failure of such party to act in good faith or to use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Closing to occur.
Frustration of Closing Conditions
Section 6.1 .
Termination
(a) This Agreement may be terminated prior to the Closing as follows:
(i) by written consent of the parties hereto;
(ii) by either of the parties hereto, if any Governmental Authority shall have issued an order, decree or ruling or taken any other action permanently restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, and such order, decree, ruling or other action shall have become final and non-appealable; provided, however, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 6.1(a)(ii) shall not be available to any party hereto whose failure to comply with Section 4.5 has been a cause of, or resulted in, such action;
(iii) by Seller, if there shall be a breach by Buyer of any representation or warranty or any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement which would result in a failure of a condition set forth in Section 5.3 and which breach cannot be cured or has not been cured (to the extent necessary to avoid a failure of such a condition) within 30 calendar days (but not later than the Termination Date) after the giving of written notice to Buyer of such breach;
 
(iv) by Buyer, if there shall be a breach by Seller of any representation or warranty or any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement which would result in a failure of a condition set forth in Section 5.2 and which breach cannot be cured or has not been cured (to the extent necessary to avoid a failure of such a condition) within 30 calendar days (but not later than the Termination Date) after the giving of written notice to Seller of such breach; or
(v) by Seller or Buyer if the Closing does not occur by the close of business on November 1, 2010 (the ""); provided, that notwithstanding the foregoing, no party hereto may terminate this Agreement pursuant to this clause (v) if the failure of the Closing to occur by the Termination Date was caused by the failure of such party to act in good faith or to use its commercially reasonable best efforts to cause the Closing to occur.
Termination Date
(b) The termination of this Agreement shall be effectuated by the delivery by the party terminating this Agreement to each other party of a written notice of such termination. If this Agreement so terminates, it shall become null and void and have no further force or effect, except as provided in Section 6.2.
Section 6.2 . If this Agreement is terminated in accordance with Section 6.1 hereof and the transactions contemplated hereby are not consummated, this Agreement shall become void and of no further force and effect, without any liability on the part of any party hereto, except that the provisions of Sections 4.4(a) and (d), 4.7, this Section 6.2, Article VIII, Section 9.8, and Section 9.9 and the Confidentiality Agreement shall remain in effect in accordance with their terms. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Section 6.2 shall relieve any party to this Agreement of liability for any willful and material breach of this Agreement.
Survival after Termination
Section 7.1 .
Section 338(h)(10) Elections
(a) Seller and Buyer shall, or shall cause their relevant Affiliates to, jointly make a timely and irrevocable election under Section 338(h)(10) of the Code and, if permissible, similar elections under any applicable state or local income Tax laws, with respect to the acquisition of the Company and each of its Domestic Subsidiaries that is treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, other than Albridge Solutions (collectively, the "").
Section 338(h)(10) Elections
(b) Buyer shall make an election under Section 338(g) of the Code and, if permissible, similar elections under any applicable state or local income Tax laws, with respect to the Company's Foreign Subsidiaries. Buyer shall deliver to Seller documentary evidence reasonably satisfactory to Seller that such election under Section 338(g) of the Code has been made in a timely manner, which documents shall include copies of the relevant IRS forms filed by Buyer in making such election.
 
(c) Buyer shall prepare an allocation of the Purchase Price, which shall be allocated among the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries (other than Albridge Solutions) as required pursuant to Section 338(h)(10) of the Code and the Treasury Regulations promulgated thereunder (the ""), and deliver such Allocation to Seller within 90 days following the date upon which the amount of the Final Tangible Capital is determined pursuant to Exhibit A. The Allocation shall incorporate, reflect and be consistent with Section 7.1(f). Seller shall have the right to review such Allocation and, to the extent Seller disagrees with the Allocation, Seller shall notify Buyer in writing, within 30 days after receipt of such Allocation of any objections. If Seller and Buyer are unable to reach an agreement regarding the Allocation, then within 30 days following Buyer's receipt of Seller's objection, any disagreement shall be resolved by an independent accounting firm or valuation expert (the "") jointly selected by Seller and Buyer. Any Allocation determined pursuant to the decision of the Independent Expert shall incorporate, reflect and be consistent with Section 7.1(f). The Allocation, as prepared by Buyer if no timely Seller objection has been given, as adjusted pursuant to any agreement between the parties or as determined pursuant to the decision of the Independent Expert shall be final (the ""). Any fees and expenses of the Independent Expert shall be borne equally by the parties.
Allocation
Independent Expert
Final Allocation
(d) Buyer and Seller shall cooperate in the preparation of all forms, attachments and schedules necessary to effectuate the Section 338(h)(10) Elections, including IRS Form 8023 and 8883 and any similar forms under applicable state and local income Tax laws (collectively, the "") in a manner consistent with the Final Allocation. Buyer and Seller shall, or shall cause their relevant Affiliates to timely file such Section 338 Forms, if any, with the applicable Taxing Authorities. Seller and Buyer agree that neither of them shall, or shall permit any of its Affiliates, to revoke the Section 338(h)(10) Elections following the filing of the Section 338 Forms without the prior written consent of Seller or Buyer, as the case may be. Except to the extent required pursuant to a "determination" within the meaning of Section 1313(a) of the Code, neither Seller nor Buyer shall take any position inconsistent with the Section 338(h)(10) Elections and the Section 338 Forms, if any.
Section 338 Forms
(e) Each of Buyer and Seller shall deliver to the other party at the Closing one or more duly executed IRS Forms 8023 that reflect the Section 338(h)(10) Elections.
(f) Seller and Buyer agree that at least U.S. $285,000,000 of the Purchase Price is attributable to the stock of Albridge Solutions.
Section 7.2 .
Tax Indemnification
(a) Seller shall pay or cause to be paid, shall be liable for, and shall indemnify, defend and hold Buyer and its Affiliates (including, after the Closing Date, the Company and its Subsidiaries) harmless from and against, without duplication (i) any and all Excluded Taxes (other than Taxes arising from or in connection with any action taken or transaction undertaken by Buyer or any of its Affiliates (including the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) after the Closing that is outside of the Ordinary Course of Business unless required or contemplated by
 
this Agreement), (ii) any Taxes arising from or in connection with any breach by Seller or any of its Affiliates of any covenant contained in this Agreement, (iii) any Transfer Taxes for which Seller is responsible pursuant to Section 7.9, and (iv) all costs and expenses, including reasonable legal, accounting, appraisal, consulting or similar fees, actually incurred relating to the foregoing. For the avoidance of doubt, the parties agree and acknowledge that the foregoing provisions of this Section 7.2(a) shall not apply in connection with the subject matter of the representations and warranties contained in Section 2.11(c).
(b) Buyer shall pay or cause to be paid, shall be liable for, and shall indemnify, defend and hold Seller and its Affiliates harmless from and against (i) any and all Taxes of the Company and its Subsidiaries (other than Excluded Taxes) and any Taxes arising from or in connection with any action taken by Buyer or any of its Affiliates (including the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) after the Closing that is outside of the Ordinary Course of Business unless required or contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) any Taxes arising from or in connection with the breach by Buyer or any of its Affiliates of any covenant contained in this Agreement, (iii) any Transfer Taxes for which Buyer is responsible pursuant to Section 7.9, and (iv) all costs and expenses, including reasonable legal, accounting, appraisal, consulting or similar fees actually incurred relating to the foregoing.
(c) Payment in full of any amount due under this Section 7.2 shall be made to the indemnified party in immediately available funds no later than the later of (i) ten (10) days after the indemnified party makes written demand on the indemnifying party and (ii) five (5) days prior to the date on which the underlying amount is required to be paid by the indemnified party.
Section 7.3 .
Filing of Tax Returns
(a) Seller shall timely prepare and file or shall cause to be timely prepared and filed (i) any combined, consolidated or unitary Tax Return that includes Seller or any of its Affiliates (excluding any Tax Return, other than any income Tax Return for periods ending on or before the Closing Date, that includes only the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries and is due after the Closing Date), and (ii) any Tax Return of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for any taxable period that ends on or before the Closing Date. Buyer shall not amend or revoke any such Tax Returns (or any elections relating thereto).
(b) Buyer shall, except to the extent that such Tax Returns are the responsibility of Seller under Section 7.3(a), be responsible for the preparation and filing of all Tax Returns with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries.
(c) For any Tax Return of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to a Straddle Period that is the responsibility of Buyer under Section 7.3(b), Buyer shall (i) prepare and file such Tax Returns in a manner consistent with the past practice of the Company or its Subsidiaries, as the case may be, unless otherwise required by Applicable Law and (ii) deliver to Seller for its review, comment and approval (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed) a copy of such proposed Tax Return (accompanied, where appropriate, by an allocation between the Pre-Closing Period and the Post Closing Period of the Taxes shown to be due on such Tax Return) at least twenty (20) days prior to the due date (giving effect to any validly obtained extension) thereof.
 
Section 7.4 . Seller shall be entitled to any refund or credit of or against (i) Excluded Taxes, and (ii) any Taxes for which Seller is responsible pursuant to Item 2 of Section 8.2(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule (and, in each case, any interest or penalty rebate with respect to such refund or credit). Buyer shall be entitled to any refund or credit of or against any Taxes of the Company and its Subsidiaries (and any interest or penalty rebate with respect to such refund or credit) other than refunds or credits to which the Seller would be entitled under the preceding sentence. Each party shall forward, and shall cause its Affiliates to forward, to the party entitled pursuant to this Section 7.4 to a refund or credit of Taxes, the amount of such refund or credit within ten (10) days after such refund is received or applied against another Tax liability, as the case may be, in each case net of any costs to the party receiving such refund or credit.
Tax Refunds
Section 7.5 . From and after the Closing Date, each party hereto shall, and shall cause its Affiliates to, provide the other party hereto with such cooperation, documentation and information as either of them reasonably may request in connection with (a) filing any Tax Return or claim for refund, (b) determining a liability for Taxes, an indemnity or payment obligation under this Article VII or a right to a refund of Taxes, (c) conducting any Tax Proceeding (which shall include granting any powers of attorney reasonably requested by the party entitled to control a Tax Proceeding pursuant to Section 7.6) or (d) determining an allocation of Taxes between a Pre-Closing Period and a Post-Closing Period. Such cooperation and information shall include providing copies of all relevant portions of relevant Tax Returns, together with all relevant accompanying schedules and work papers (or portions thereof) and other supporting documentation.
Assistance and Cooperation
Section 7.6 .
Contests
(a) If any Taxing Authority asserts a Tax Claim in respect of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, then the party hereto first receiving notice of such Tax Claim promptly shall provide written notice thereof to the other party or parties hereto; provided, however, that the failure of such party to give such prompt notice shall not relieve the other party of any of its obligations under this Article VII, except to the extent that the other party is actually prejudiced thereby. Such notice shall specify in reasonable detail the basis for such Tax Claim and shall include a copy of the relevant portion of any correspondence received from the Taxing Authority.
(b) Seller shall have the exclusive right to control, at its own expense, any audit, examination, contest, litigation or other proceeding by or against any Taxing Authority (a "") in respect of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for any taxable period that ends on or before the Closing Date; provided, however, that with respect to any Tax Proceeding solely in respect of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that would reasonably be expected to have an adverse impact that is material on Buyer and its Affiliates including the Company and its Subsidiaries after Closing, Seller shall consult with Buyer before taking any significant action in connection with such Tax Proceeding.
Tax Proceeding
 
(c) In the case of a Tax Proceeding for a Straddle Period of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, Buyer shall have the right to control, at its own expense, such Tax Proceeding; provided, however, that (i) Buyer shall provide Seller with a timely and reasonably detailed account of each phase of such Tax Proceeding, (ii) Buyer shall consult with Seller before taking any significant action in connection with such Tax Proceeding, (iii) Buyer shall defend such Tax Proceeding diligently and in good faith as if it were the only party in interest in connection with such Tax Proceeding, (iv) Seller shall be entitled to participate in such Tax Proceeding, at its own expense, and (v) Buyer shall not settle, compromise or abandon any such Tax Proceeding without obtaining the prior written consent of Seller, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
(d) Buyer shall have the exclusive right to control, at its own expense, any Tax Proceeding involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (other than any Tax Proceeding described in Section 7.6(b) or (c)); provided, however, that if such Tax Proceeding would reasonably be expected to have an adverse effect on Seller or any of its Affiliates that is material Buyer shall consult with Seller before taking any significant action in connection with such Tax Proceeding.
Section 7.7 . All liabilities and obligations between Seller or any of its Affiliates (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries), on the one hand, and the Company and its Subsidiaries, on the other hand, under any Tax sharing agreement in effect prior to the Closing Date (other than this Agreement) shall cease and terminate as of the Closing Date. After the Closing Date, no party shall have any rights or obligations under any such Tax sharing agreement.
Tax Sharing Agreements
Section 7.8 . Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, indemnification for Tax matters, including indemnification for Taxes and the procedures with respect thereto (but excluding indemnification for Taxes set forth in item 2 of Section 8.2(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, which shall be governed by Article VIII) shall be governed exclusively by this Article VII (and not by any provision of Article VIII). The indemnification provisions of this Article VII shall survive until the expiration of the relevant statutes of limitations plus an additional 60 days.
Coordination; Survival
Section 7.9 . Any and all sales, use, transfer, stamp, documentary, recording or similar Taxes imposed upon the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (collectively, "") shall be borne and paid in equal parts by Buyer and Seller, regardless of the Person liable for such Taxes under Applicable Law. The parties hereto shall reasonably cooperate to reduce or eliminate any potential Transfer Taxes and shall cooperate in the preparation and filing of any related Tax Returns.
Transfer Taxes
Transfer Taxes
Section 7.10 . Seller and Buyer agree that, except to the extent otherwise required pursuant to a "determination" (within the meaning of Section 1313(a) of the Code or any similar provision of state, local or foreign law), all indemnification payments made pursuant to this Agreement shall be treated by the parties as an adjustment to the Purchase Price, provided, however, that any such adjustment shall incorporate, reflect and be consistent with Section 7.1(e).
Treatment of Indemnity Payments
 
Section 8.1 . The respective representations and warranties of Seller and Buyer contained in this Agreement shall survive the Closing but shall expire on the 18-month anniversary of the Closing Date, except with respect to, and to the extent of, any claim of which written notice in accordance with Section 8.4 has been given in good faith by one party to the other prior to such expiration; provided, however, that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties set forth in (i) Section 2.1(b) (second and third sentences only) (Organization and Related Matters), Section 2.2 (Capitalization), Section 2.3(a) (Authority) and Section 2.7 (No Broker) (the "") and Section 3.2(a) (Authority) and Section 3.5 (No Broker) (the "") shall survive the Closing and continue in full force and effect indefinitely and (ii) Section 2.11 (a), (b) and (d)-(i) (Taxes) shall not survive the Closing. The respective covenants and agreements of Seller and Buyer contained in this Agreement (including the indemnification obligations set forth in this Article VIII) shall survive the Closing, provided that any such covenants and agreements that by their terms are to be performed prior to the Closing Date shall survive the Closing only until the first anniversary of the Closing, except to the extent governed by Section 7.8. The period from the Closing to the expiration, if any, of a representation or warranty hereunder shall be referred to with respect to a claim for indemnification thereunder as the "."
Survival of Representations and Warranties and Agreements
Designated Seller Representations
Designated Buyer Representations
Survival Period
Section 8.2 . (a) Subject to the provisions of this Article VIII, Seller shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Buyer and its officers, directors and employees and Affiliates (collectively, the "") from and after the Closing Date for the period set forth in Section 8.1 (including any extension thereof as expressly provided for in such Section) from and against any and all claims, costs, expenses, losses, damages, liabilities, awards, judgments, costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' and consultant fees and expenses) (subject to Section 8.6, "") actually incurred by the Buyer Indemnitees to the extent, directly or indirectly, relating to or caused by:
Indemnification by Seller
Buyer Indemnitees
Damages
(i) any breach of any of the representations and warranties (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any Excluded Seller Qualification) made by Seller herein other than any Designated Seller Representation or, subject to Section 8.2(b), any representation set forth in Section 2.11;
(ii) any breach of any Designated Seller Representations (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any Excluded Seller Qualification); or
(iii) any breach of any covenant or agreement made or to be performed by Seller pursuant to this Agreement (other than the breach of covenant or agreement in Article VII, it being understood that the sole remedy for any such breach being pursuant to Article VII).
(b) Subject to the provisions of Sections 8.4, 8.6 and 8.7 of this Article VIII and Sections 8.4 and 8.5 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, Seller shall indemnify, defend
 
and hold harmless the Buyer Indemnitees for any and all Damages in respect of the matters set forth in Section 8.2(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, provided that in no event shall any claim for Damages be asserted under both Section 8.2(a)(i) and this Section 8.2(b).
Section 8.3 . Subject to the provisions of this Article VIII, Buyer shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Seller and its officers, directors, and employees and Affiliates (collectively, the "") from and after the Closing Date for the period set forth in Section 8.1 (including any extension thereof as expressly provided for in such Section) from and against any and all Damages actually incurred by the Seller Indemnitees to the extent caused by:
Indemnification by Buyer
Seller Indemnitees
(i) any breach of any of the representations and warranties (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any Excluded Buyer Qualification) made by Buyer herein other than any Designated Buyer Representation;
(ii) any breach of any Designated Buyer Representations (such representations and warranties to be read for this purpose without reference to any Excluded Buyer Qualification); or
(iii) any breach of a covenant or agreement made or to be performed by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement (other than a breach of any such covenant or agreement in Article VII hereof, it being understood that the sole remedy for any such breach being pursuant to Article VII).
Section 8.4 . Subject to Section 8.4(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, which sets forth additional procedures in respect of matters that are subject to Section 8.2(b):
Indemnification Procedure
(a) Promptly after the incurrence of any Damages by the party seeking indemnification hereunder (the ""), including any claim by a third party described in Section 8.4(c) hereof that might give rise to indemnification hereunder, or the earlier discovery of any facts or circumstances that may result in an indemnification claim hereunder, the Indemnified Party shall deliver to the party from which indemnification is sought (the "") a certificate (the ""), which Claim Certificate shall be delivered within the relevant Survival Period, if any, and shall:
Indemnified Party
Indemnifying Party
Claim Certificate
(i) state that the Indemnified Party has paid or properly accrued Damages, or anticipates (specifying the events or occurrences giving rise to such anticipation) that it will incur liability for Damages for which such Indemnified Party is entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Agreement; and
(ii) specify in reasonable detail each individual item of Damages included in the amount so stated to the extent known, the date such item was paid or properly accrued (if applicable), the basis for any anticipated liability and the nature of the breach of representation or warranty or claim to which each such item is related and the computation of the amount, if reasonably capable of computation to which such Indemnified Party claims to be entitled hereunder;
 
provided, however, that any delay in delivery (except for any delivery outside of the relevant Survival Period, if any) of a Claim Certificate by an Indemnified Party as provided in this Section 8.4 or any defect in such Claim Certificate shall not relieve any Indemnifying Party of its obligations under Section 8.2 or Section 8.3, except to the extent, and only to the extent, that such failure prejudices the rights of such Indemnifying Party.
(b) Claims for Damages specified in any Claim Certificate with respect to which the parties agree in writing to be due, or which are finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be due, are hereinafter referred to, collectively, as "." Within 10 Business Days of the determination of the amount of any Agreed Claims, subject to the limitations of this Article VIII, the Indemnifying Party shall pay to the Indemnified Party an amount equal to the Agreed Claim by cashier's check or wire transfer to the bank account or accounts designated in writing by the Indemnified Party not less than one Business Day prior to such payment.
Agreed Claims
(c) Promptly after the assertion by any third party of any claim against any Indemnified Party that may result in the incurrence by such Indemnified Party of Damages for which such Indemnified Party would be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Agreement and within the relevant Survival Period, such Indemnified Party shall deliver to the Indemnifying Party a written notice describing in reasonable detail such claim and such Indemnifying Party may, at its option, assume the defense of the Indemnified Party against such claim (including the employment of counsel, who shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Indemnified Party) at such Indemnifying Party's expense. Any Indemnified Party shall have the right to employ separate counsel in any such action or claim and to participate in the defense thereof, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall not be at the expense of the Indemnifying Party. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Indemnifying Party shall not be entitled to assume such control, and shall be responsible for the fees and expenses of the Indemnified Party's counsel, if (i) the Indemnifying Party shall have failed, within 15 Business Days after having been notified by the Indemnified Party of the existence of such claim as provided in the preceding sentence, to assume the defense of such claim or to notify the Indemnified Party in writing that it shall assume the defense of such claim, (ii) the employment of such counsel has been specifically authorized in writing by the Indemnifying Party, (iii) the named parties to any such action (including any impleaded parties) include both such Indemnified Party and the Indemnifying Party and such Indemnified Party shall have been advised by counsel that there may be one or more legal defenses the assertion of which would be adverse to the interests of the Indemnified Party or (iv) the Indemnified Party shall have been advised in writing by counsel that the assumption of such defense by the Indemnifying Party would be inappropriate due to a conflict of interest (provided that the Indemnifying Party shall not be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one firm of counsel for all Indemnified Parties, other than local counsel). No Indemnifying Party shall be liable to indemnify any Indemnified Party for any settlement of any such action or claim effected without the consent of the Indemnifying Party, but if settled with the written consent of the Indemnifying Party, or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff in any such action, the Indemnifying Party shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnified Party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment, subject to the limitations set forth in this Article VIII. If the Indemnifying Party shall assume the defense of any claim in accordance with the provisions of this Section 8.4(c), the Indemnifying Party shall obtain the prior written consent of the Indemnified Party (which shall not be unreasonably withheld,
 
conditioned or delayed) before entering into any settlement of such claim if the settlement does not release the Indemnified Party from all liabilities and obligations with respect to such claim, the settlement is in excess of the maximum remaining liability set forth in Section 8.5 hereof or Section 8.5 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, as applicable, or the settlement imposes injunctive or other non-monetary equitable relief against the Indemnified Party. The Indemnified Party and the Indemnifying Party each agrees to fully cooperate in all matters covered by this Section 8.4(c), including, as required, the furnishing of books and records, personnel and witnesses and the execution of documents, in each case as necessary for any defense of such third party claim and at no cost to the other party (provided that any reasonable out-of-pockets expenses of the Indemnified Party incurred in connection with the foregoing shall be considered part of Damages hereunder).
(d) The parties hereto hereby consent to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any court in which a third party claim is brought against any Indemnified Party for purposes of any claim that such Indemnified Party may have under this Agreement with respect to such third party claim or the matters alleged therein, and agree that process may be served on any Indemnifying Party with respect to such third party claim by service of process delivered in the manner and to the address for such Indemnifying Party provided by Section 9.5 hereof.
Section 8.5 .
Limitations on Indemnification
(a) Except as set forth in Section 8.5(c), no claim for indemnification pursuant to Section 8.2(a)(i) or (iii) (with respect to Sections 4.1 and 4.6 only) or Section 8.3(i) or (iii) (with respect to Section 4.6 only) may be made by the Indemnified Parties until the aggregate amount of all such claims for which Damages are otherwise recoverable is in excess of $20,000,000 (the ""), after which the Indemnified Parties will be entitled to make claims for any Damages to the extent exceeding the Threshold Amount.
Threshold Amount
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, except Section 8.5(c) hereof, the aggregate liability for Damages or other claims for indemnification under Section 8.2(a)(i) or (iii) (with respect to Sections 4.1 and 4.6 only) or Section 8.3(i) or (iii) (with respect to Section 4.6 only) shall not exceed an aggregate amount equal to $250,000,000.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the limitations set forth in Section 8.5(a) and Section 8.5(b) shall not apply in the case of fraud or willful or intentional breach of a covenant or agreement set forth herein, and nothing in this Article VIII shall limit any rights any Person may have with respect to any claim for fraud or willful or intentional breach of a covenant or agreement set forth herein.
Section 8.6 . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no party shall be liable to any Indemnified Party for special, incidental, indirect, consequential, punitive or exemplary Damages as a result of any breach of this Agreement or other agreements referred to herein or of any private right of action that any party may have hereunder against another party hereto; provided that the foregoing shall not limit the right of any Indemnified Party to indemnification in accordance with the this Agreement with respect to any component of any claim, settlement, award or judgment against such party by any unaffiliated third party. For purposes of this Article VIII, "Damages" shall be
Punitive Damages; Certain Offsets
 
net of any insurance or other recoveries (net of any related deductible or expenses incurred in securing such recovery, any self-insurance and any increase in premiums resulting from such recovery) payable to the Indemnified Party or its Affiliates in connection with the facts giving rise to any right of indemnification hereunder. Any indemnification payment made pursuant to this Agreement shall be reduced by the amount of any net Tax benefit actually realized by the Indemnified Party through a reduction in Taxes otherwise due as a result of the Damages incurred or suffered by the Indemnified Party. The amount of the Damages arising out of any claim included as a liability in calculating Final Tangible Capital shall be calculated net of the amount so included.
Section 8.7 . After the Closing Date, this Article VIII shall provide the exclusive remedy for any breach of any representation or warranty contained herein, other than any claims with respect to Taxes (which are governed exclusively by Article VII, subject to Section 7.8), except in the case of common law fraud or willful or intentional breach relating to this Agreement or with respect to matters for which the remedy of specific performance, injunctive relief or other non-monetary equitable remedies are available.
Exclusive Remedy
Section 9.1 . This Agreement may not be amended, altered or modified except by written instrument executed by the Seller and Buyer. No waiver of any party to this Agreement will be effective unless it is in a writing signed by a duly authorized officer of the waiving party that makes express reference to the provision or provisions subject to such waiver. No waiver shall constitute a waiver of, or estoppel with respect to, any subsequent or other inaccuracy, breach or failure to strictly comply with the provisions of this Agreement.
Amendments; Waiver
Section 9.2 . This Agreement (including the Company Disclosure Schedule, the Buyer Disclosure Schedule, the Transition Services Agreement, the Continuing Relationship Agreement, the Confidentiality Agreement and any other Transaction Document) constitutes the entire agreement of the parties hereto, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, discussions, negotiations and communications, written and oral, among the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
Section 9.3 .
Interpretation
(a) When a reference is made in this Agreement to Articles, Sections, Schedules or Exhibits, such reference shall be to an Article of, Section of, Schedule to or Exhibit to this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. The table of contents and headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation." The phrases "the date of this Agreement," "the date hereof" and terms of similar import, unless the context otherwise requires, shall be deemed to refer to the date set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
 
(b) The inclusion of any information in any section of the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Buyer Disclosure Schedule or other document delivered by any of the parties pursuant to this Agreement shall not be deemed to be an admission or evidence of the materiality of such item, nor shall it establish a standard of materiality for any purpose whatsoever.
Section 9.4 . Any term or provision of this Agreement which is invalid or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to that jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity or unenforceability without rendering invalid or unenforceable the remaining terms and provisions of this Agreement or affecting the validity or enforceability of any of the terms or provisions of this Agreement in any other jurisdiction. If any provision of this Agreement is so broad as to be unenforceable, the provision shall be interpreted to be only so broad as is enforceable.
Severability
Section 9.5 . Unless otherwise provided herein, all notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed given if (a) delivered in person, (b) transmitted by telecopy (with electronic confirmation, provided that a copy of the notice or other communication is sent by express courier) or (c) delivered by an express courier, to the parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified by like notice):
Notices
If to Seller, to:
The PNC Financial Services Group, Inc.
One PNC Plaza
249 Fifth Avenue
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania 15222
Attention: Mergers & Acquisition Department
Fax: (412) 762-6238
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz
51 West 52nd Street
New York, NY 10019
Telecopy: (212) 403-2000
Attention: Lawrence S. Makow
If to Buyer, to:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, New York 10286
Telecopy: 212-635-1070
Attention: General Counsel
 
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
Reed Smith LLP
225 Fifth Avenue
Pittsburgh, PA 15222
Telecopy: 412-288-3063
Attention: Thomas Todd
Section 9.6 . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties and their respective successors and assigns and any transferee of all or substantially all of the assets of such party and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. This Agreement may not be assigned by any of the parties without the prior written consent of Buyer, in the case of any assignment by Seller, and Seller, in the case of any assignment by Buyer, except that Buyer may assign to one or more of its Subsidiaries the right to acquire the Company Common Stock or the stock of a Subsidiary of the Company; provided that such assignment would not delay or impede the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby; and provided, further, that no such assignment shall relieve Buyer of any obligation hereunder. Except as otherwise expressly set forth in Article VIII, no provision of this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to confer upon any entity or Person other than the parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns any right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement or any part hereof.
Binding Effect; Persons Benefiting; No Assignment
Section 9.7 . This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement, it being understood that all of the parties need not sign the same counterpart.
Counterparts
Section 9.8 . The parties hereby waive, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to trial by jury of any claim, demand, action, or cause of action (i) arising under this Agreement or (ii) in any way connected with or related or incidental to the dealings of the parties in respect of this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated hereby, in each case, whether now existing or hereafter arising, and whether in contract, tort, equity, or otherwise. The parties hereby further agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action, or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that the parties may file a copy of this Agreement with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
Waiver of Jury Trial
Section 9.9 . This Agreement, the legal relations between the parties and the adjudication and the enforcement thereof, shall be governed by and interpreted and construed in accordance with the substantive laws of the State of New York without regard to applicable choice of law provisions thereof. The parties hereto agree that, except as otherwise provided herein, any action, suit or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby shall be brought solely in any federal court located in New York, New York (or, to the extent that such court does not have jurisdiction, in any state court located in New York, New York).
Governing Law; Venue
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first above written.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
NEW YORK, February 2, 2010  BNY Mellon (NYSE: BK), the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today announced a definitive agreement to acquire PNC's Global Investment Servicing Inc. (GIS) business, a leading provider of custody, fund accounting, transfer agency and outsourcing solutions for asset managers and financial advisors. The acquisition will enhance BNY Mellon's leadership position supporting fund managers and financial advisors globally across several business lines while providing the potential for significant revenue and expense synergies.
The purchase price of $2.31 billion includes the purchase of $1.57 billion of stock and repayment of intercompany debt from PNC. BNY Mellon plans to raise between $700-$800 million in equity as part of the transaction. The all-cash acquisition, which will be accretive in the first year, is expected to close in the third quarter of 2010, subject to necessary regulatory approvals.
"This acquisition significantly strengthens our service offering and market share with asset managers and financial advisors, while delivering attractive returns to our shareholders," said Robert P. Kelly, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer. "We expect the transaction to accelerate our growth, deliver economies of scale and strengthen our leadership position for Asset Servicing and Pershing."
The addition of GIS's broad capabilities deepens BNY Mellon's product set, adds scale to its growth businesses and expands service to key client segments. The company will also raise its profile and increase market position in several areas as a result of this acquisition by:
 
Based in Wilmington, Del. with locations across the United States and Europe, GIS has approximately 4,500 employees. Stephen M. Wynne, current CEO of GIS, will remain in that role, reporting to Tim Keaney and Jim Palermo, co-heads of BNY Mellon Asset Servicing.
"GIS's management team and staff have built a truly impressive franchise with lasting client relationships. Our focus will be on providing outstanding service to GIS's clients and welcoming our new colleagues into BNY Mellon as we work together to deliver on the great potential this combination of businesses offers," said Gerald L. Hassell, BNY Mellon president.
For more than 30 years, GIS has been meeting client needs through innovation and an expanding array of investor, securities and information services. In recent years, it has developed leading positions to become the largest single-source provider to the U.S. mutual fund industry. GIS also is a premier servicer of the global investment industry with leading positions across its comprehensive set of products, which includes subaccounting, fund accounting/administration, custody, managed account services and alternative investment services.
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation [NYSE: BK]. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
Robert P. Kelly, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer, and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast regarding the company's acquisition of GIS at 9 a.m. EST on Tuesday, February 2, 2010. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information, including a related series of graphics that will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at 8 a.m. EST on February 2, 2010. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing +1 888 677 5383 (U.S.) and +1 210 838 9221 (International) Passcode: BNY Mellon, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning February 2 at approximately 11 a.m. EST through Friday, February 12, 2010 by dialing +1 866 373 9239 (U.S.) or +1 203 369 0285 (international). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
This press release contains statements relating to future results of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, aspects of the acquisition including impact on clients and shareholders, the effect on The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's profile, market share, increases in assets, and position in the market, plans to raise capital in connection with the acquisition, expected accretion and acceleration in growth and service levels, expectations with respect to revenue and expense synergies and shareholder returns and the expected closing date, as well as long-term strategies, plans for and other implications of the announced transaction. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to: changes in political and economic conditions; changes in global market values; success in gaining regulatory approvals when required; client retention rates; integrations of acquired businesses; and other risks and uncertainties detailed in reports filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of February 2, 2010, and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after February 2, 2010 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100216161441.txt.gz
TIME:20100216161441
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) On February 9, 2010, the Board of Directors of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") amended the By-Laws of the Corporation (the "By-Laws") to reflect certain changes effective immediately, as follows: (1) Section 8 of Article Three and Section 5 of Article Five were amended to delete references to the Integration Committee which ceased to exist after its meeting on June 8, 2009; (2) Section 2 of Article Five was amended to reflect that, in the absence of the Chairman, the Lead Director will chair Board meetings or shareholder meetings; (3) Section 3 and Section 4 of Article Five were amended to reflect minor grammatical changes; and (4) Section 4 of Article Five was further amended to reflect that the Lead Director's duties and responsibilities are set forth in the By-Laws in addition to the Corporate Governance Guidelines. A copy of the amendments to the By-Laws which are effective immediately are attached as Exhibit 3.1.
On February 9, 2010, the Board of Directors of the Corporation also approved an amendment, which will become effective on July 2, 2010, to Section 8 of Article One of the By-Laws to provide for a majority voting standard in uncontested elections of directors after July 1, 2010. A plurality voting standard will continue to apply in contested elections of directors after July 1, 2010. A copy of Article One, Section 8 of the By-Laws which will become effective July 2, 2010 is attached as Exhibit 3.2.
Item 9.01  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 8.
INTEGRATION COMMITTEE. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, until the Integration Date (as defined in Article Five), the Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members an Integration Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Integration Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Integration Committee.
[Intentionally omitted.]
Section 2. CHAIRMAN. Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the Board of Directors shall appoint one of its members to be Chairman. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date (as such terms are defined in Article Five), the Chairman shall be designated "Executive Chairman", shall be an officer of the Corporation, and the Chief Auditor (for administrative purposes only) shall report to the Executive Chairman. In addition, until the Succession Date, the Executive Chairman shall be in charge of the integration of the Corporation following the Merger (as defined in Article Five) and shall report to the Integration Committee with respect to such responsibilities. The Chairman shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall have and exercise such further powers as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or as may be provided by law. In the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman, the shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or the Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists and, in the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman and the , any other officer of the Corporation or Director designated by the Board of Directors (provided that if such absence or temporary disability occurs during the Specified Period, only by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors) shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists.
Chief Executive Officer
Lead Director
Chief Executive Officer
Lead Director
Section 3. COMPOSITION OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) During the period beginning on the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date, the Board of Directors shall of 18 Directors, of which 10 shall be Continuing BNY Directors and eight shall be Continuing Mellon Directors. Beginning on the Succession Date and during the remainder of the Specified Period, the Board of Directors shall of 16 Directors, of which nine shall be Continuing BNY Directors (one of whom shall be the President of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation) and seven shall be continuing Mellon Directors (one of whom shall be the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation). During the Specified Period, all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee and all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. During the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have the exclusive authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. During the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have the exclusive authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director.
be comprised
consist
be comprised
consist
(b) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing BNY Directors Committee, which shall of all the Continuing BNY Directors. The Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director and (ii) to nominate Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
be comprised
consist
(c) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing Mellon Directors Committee, which shall of all the Continuing Mellon Directors. The Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director and (ii) to nominate
be comprised
consist
 
Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
Section 4. LEAD DIRECTOR. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time, the ead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing BNY Director selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee. During the period beginning on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six month anniversary of the Effective Time, the ead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing Mellon Director selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. Thereafter, the ead Director shall be a Director selected by a majority of the entire Board of Directors. The Lead Director shall have such duties and responsibilities as may be set forth in the Corporation's Corporate Governance Guidelines from time to time.
l
L
l
L
l
L
these By-Laws and
Section 5.
INTEGRATION COMMITTEE. Until the end of the Specified Period or the date on which the Board of Directors determines to terminate the Integration Committee (which shall not be earlier than the Succession Date) (such termination date, the "Integration Date"), the Integration Committee shall be comprised of two Continuing Mellon Directors and two Continuing BNY Directors and a Continuing Mellon Director shall be the chair of such Committee. At the end of such period, the Integration Committee shall be disbanded.
[Intentionally omitted.]
 

Exhibit 3.2
Section 8. REQUIRED VOTE FOR DIRECTORS. Except as otherwise provided by these By-Laws, each director shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast with respect to that director's election at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present, provided that if, as of the record date of such meeting as initially announced, the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected at such meeting (a "Contested Election"), the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the votes cast. For purposes of this Section 8 of this Article One of these By-Laws, a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of votes cast "for" a director's election exceeds the number of votes cast "against" that director's election (with "abstentions" not counted as a vote cast either "for" or "against" that director's election).


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100310162049.txt.gz
TIME:20100310162049
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 8, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced an agreement to acquire BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BHF Asset Servicing") from BHF-BANK Altiengesellschaft and Sal. Oppenheim jr. & Cie, S.C.A. for EUR253 million (US$343 million), subject to regulatory approval. This transaction will include the purchase of BHF Asset Servicing's wholly-owned fund administration affiliate, Frankfurter Service Kapitalanlage-Gesellschaft mbH.
A copy of the press release, dated March 8, 2010 discussing this transaction is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FRANKFURT and NEW YORK, March 8, 2010  BNY Mellon, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, has agreed to acquire BHF Asset Servicing GmbH from BHF-BANK Aktiengesellschaft and Sal. Oppenheim jr. & Cie. S.C.A. for EUR253 million (US$343 million), subject to regulatory approvals. This transaction will include the purchase of BHF Asset Servicing's wholly-owned fund administration affiliate, Frankfurter Service Kapitalanlage-Gesellschaft mbH (FSKAG).
The transaction is expected to be immediately accretive to GAAP EPS, providing an IRR of between 17% and 19%. It is scheduled to close in the third quarter of 2010 and will be funded internally.
BHF Asset Servicing and FSKAG will become part of BNY Mellon's Asset Servicing business. The new combined German business will have EUR473 billion* (US$642 billion) in assets under custody and administration and a depotbanking volume of EUR120 billion (US$163 billion). BNY Mellon becomes the #2 provider by assets held in this key European market, the world's fourth largest economy. In addition, the acquisition expands BNY Mellon's existing capabilities to encompass the provision of German domestic custody and KAG fund administration.
Tim Keaney, Chairman of Europe at BNY Mellon and co-CEO of BNY Mellon Asset Servicing, said: "This transaction expands our capabilities and market share in one of the world's largest fund markets, positioning BNY Mellon at the forefront among securities servicing providers in Germany and creating a strong platform for growth across our businesses."
The new BNY Mellon Asset Servicing business in Germany will offer a full range of tailored solutions for investment companies, financial institutions and institutional investors. It will be headquartered in Frankfurt am Main and have 340 staff. It will be headed by Michelle Grundmann from BNY Mellon, and Juergen P. Frank and Christopher V. Friedrich from BHF Asset Servicing. They will report to Nadine Chakar, Head of Europe, Middle East & Africa (EMEA) at BNY Mellon Asset Servicing.
Juergen P. Frank, Spokesman of the Managing Board, BHF Asset Servicing, said: "Becoming a part of the world's leading asset servicing provider, whose scale, geographic reach and commitment to this business is second to none, is an extremely exciting proposition. It will provide many new opportunities for BHF Asset Servicing clients and staff."
Michelle Grundmann, Managing Director and Branch Head Frankfurt am Main, BNY Mellon, continued: "We've had a successful relationship with BHF-BANK for more than seven years and this transaction was the next logical step for our growing business, one that further underlines our long-term commitment to the German market. Continuity of personnel and service levels will remain our
 
 
number one priority. As the success of our own post-merger integration demonstrates, BNY Mellon possesses the expertise and resources necessary to ensure that we continue to offer clients the innovation and excellent service they have come to expect."
BNY Mellon has been serving clients in Germany since 1931. The company opened its first office in Frankfurt in 1972 and following this transaction will have 560 people in Germany. In addition to asset servicing, depotbanking and asset management, BNY Mellon is active in Germany in the areas of corporate trust, treasury services, depository receipts and client management. It has over 100 institutional relationships in Germany and offers regional coverage for 14 countries in the German speaking and Central Eastern and South Eastern European region.
A leading provider of local custody, depotbank and fund administration services to some of Germany's largest financial institutions and institutional investors, BHF Asset Servicing has EUR315 billion (US$427.5 billion) assets under custody and administration and a depotbanking volume of EUR94.4 billion (US$128 billion). FSKAG administers assets valued at EUR33.1 billion (US$44.9 billion).
*Includes 33.1 billion held by FSKAG
Notes to editors
BNY Mellon Asset Servicing offers clients worldwide a broad spectrum of specialized asset servicing capabilities, including custody and fund services, securities lending, performance and analytics, and execution services.
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services $12 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. Additional information is available at
www.bnymellon.com
This press release contains statements relating to future results of BNY Mellon that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, aspects of the acquisition including the effect on BNY Mellon's position in the market, the amount of volumes and assets under custody and administration and expected accretion as well as expectations with respect to personnel, service levels, sources of funding and the closing date, and long-term strategies, plans for and other implications of the announced transaction. These forward-looking statements, and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors contained in this press release, are based on assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). For additional information with respect to risks and other factors that could occur, see BNY Mellon's reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements speak only as of March 8, 2010, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after March 8, 2010 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100416162204.txt.gz
TIME:20100416162204
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At the Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the "Annual Meeting") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") on April 13, 2010, management proposals 1, 2, and 3 were approved. Shareholder proposals 4 and 5 were not approved. Shareholder proposal 6 was approved. The proposals below are described in detail in BNY Mellon's definitive proxy statement, dated March 15, 2010, for its Annual Meeting. Abstentions and broker non-votes were counted for purposes of determining whether a quorum was present, but were not treated as votes cast on a proposal. Therefore, broker non-votes and abstentions did not have the effect of a vote for or against the proposal and were not counted in determining the number of votes required for approval.
The results are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100420065945.txt.gz
TIME:20100420065945
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 20, 2010, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2010 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FIRST QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.49 OR $601 MILLION;
ASSET AND WEALTH MANAGEMENT FEES +13% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
CREDIT QUALITY TRENDS IMPROVING
STRONG CAPITAL GENERATION
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported first quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $601 million, or $0.49 per common share, compared with $363 million, or $0.31 per common share, in the first quarter of 2009 and $712 million, or $0.59 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009.
NEW YORK, April 20, 2010  
"The economic outlook is clearly improving as demonstrated by the performance of the equity and credit markets. Persistent low interest rates globally continue to be a challenge, but our focus on winning new business together with well-controlled expenses resulted in positive operating leverage," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"We continue to reinvest in our businesses, and during the quarter announced two important asset servicing acquisitions. Both are expected to be immediately accretive to earnings and close in the third quarter," added Mr. Kelly.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the first quarter of 2010 and are compared to the first quarter of 2009, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
First Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
The decreased to $35 million in the first quarter of 2010 compared with $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009. The decrease in the provision reflects improvements in our highest-risk asset classes. During the first quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses increased $10 million and net charge-offs totaled $25 million. Nonperforming assets totaled $459 million, a decrease of $91 million, or 17%, compared with Dec. 31, 2009 primarily due to repayments and charge-offs.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 29.0% in the first quarter of 2010. Excluding the impact of the litigation reserves, restructuring charges and M&I expenses, the effective tax rate was approximately 30.8% (Non-GAAP) in the first quarter of 2010.
effective tax rate
The improved to $189 million at March 31, 2010 from $705 million at Dec. 31, 2009, primarily due to improved credit spreads.
unrealized net of tax losses on our investment securities portfolio
 
3
 On April 20, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on May 11, 2010 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 30, 2010.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through March 31, 2010 and are available at (Investor RelationsFinancial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on April 20, 2010. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 20, 2010. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 20, 2010 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Tuesday, May 4, 2010 by dialing (800) 214-3608 (U.S.) or (402) 220-3754 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
Adoption of new accounting standard
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)" (Topic 810, ). At March 31, 2010, our balance sheet included $3.1 billion for the consolidation of certain asset management funds, seed capital investments and securitizations, including $394 million of Class A Notes of the Grantor Trust. The new statement increased our balance sheet by $2.7 billion, or approximately 1%, from year-end.
Consolidations
The consolidated asset management funds are disclosed separately on the balance sheet and the securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds ($52 million) and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds ($30 million). The net of these income statement line items ($22 million) was previously disclosed in the income statement as asset and wealth management revenue of $6 million and investment income of $16 million.
Investment securities portfolio
At March 31, 2010, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $55.5 billion. The unrealized pre-tax loss on our securities portfolio was $242 million at March 31, 2010 compared with $1.0 billion at Dec. 31, 2009 and $8.0 billion at March 31, 2009.
The following table presents the March 31, 2010 investment securities portfolio.
 
 
9
Nonperforming assets
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $91 million compared with Dec. 31, 2009. The decrease primarily resulted from repayments and charge-offs.
Discontinued operations
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB") located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. On Jan. 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the first quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $42 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans.
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $559 million, or $0.46 per common share, in the first quarter of 2010 compared with $322 million, or $0.28 per common share, in the first quarter of 2009 and $593 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible total assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for
 
10
investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures which exclude litigation reserves, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funds source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the segment results. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding litigation reserves in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors with the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interests related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business segment basis.
 
11
 
 
12
 
13
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the economic outlook, reinvestment in our businesses, intended acquisitions, including the expected impact on earnings and the timing of anticipated closing, and credit ratings of the RMBS in the Grantor Trust. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of April 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100426164122.txt.gz
TIME:20100426164122
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of investment securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, intangible amortization expenses, the FDIC special assessment; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages and the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of investment securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the segment results. The presentation of financial measures excluding litigation reserves in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain assets management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses.
In this earnings review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment securities gains (losses) and income from consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest.
Noninterest expense: Litigation reserves, M&I expenses, intangible amortization expense, FDIC special assessment and restructuring charges.
Earnings per share: Litigation reserves, M&I expenses, restructuring charges, preferred dividends, investment securities gains (losses) and discrete tax benefits.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FIRST QUARTER 2010 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 1Q10 vs. 4Q09 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ADOPTION OF NEW ACCOUNTING STANDARD
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)" (Topic 810, ). At March 31, 2010, our balance sheet included $3.1 billion for the consolidation of certain asset management funds, seed capital investments and securitizations, including $394 million of Class A Notes of the Grantor Trust. The new statement increased our balance sheet by $2.7 billion, or approximately 1%, from year-end.
Consolidations
The consolidated asset management funds are disclosed separately on the balance sheet and the securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds ($52 million) and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds ($30 million). The net of these income statement line items ($22 million) was previously disclosed in the income statement as asset and wealth management revenue ($6 million) and investment income ($16 million).
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2010, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $55.5 billion. The unrealized pre-tax loss on our securities portfolio was $242 million at March 31, 2010 compared with $1.0 billion at Dec. 31, 2009 and $8.0 billion at March 31, 2009.
The following table presents the March 31, 2010 investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING ACTIVITIES REVENUE
 
CAPITAL
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $91 million compared with Dec. 31, 2009. The decrease primarily resulted from repayments and charge-offs.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $35 million in the first quarter of 2010 compared with $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009. The decrease in the provision reflects a decrease in higher risk rated loans and nonperforming loans. During the first quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses increased $10 million and net charge-offs totaled $25 million.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
In the second quarter of 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB") located in Florida. It was determined that this business no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. On Jan. 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. This business was formerly included in the Other segment. In the first quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $42 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans.
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
See BNY Mellon's 2009 Annual Report for information on the accounting principles of our business segments. In addition, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the segment results.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations and related entities)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 1Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the economy, intended acquisitions, including the expected impact on earnings and the timing of anticipated closing, credit ratings of the RMBS in the Grantor Trust, statements with respect to the expected impact of BNY Mellon's portfolio restructuring on net interest revenue, as well as BNY Mellon's overall plans, strategies, goals, objectives, expectations, estimates and intentions. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings review speak only as of April 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 22

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or "BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity ("the merger").
The results prior to the consummation of the merger reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus segment data on the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds, seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Asset Management segment.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. The financial results for all periods were restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to the litigation reserves for several existing matters.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/ Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of the merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008 (minor amounts recorded in the fourth quarter of 2007, first and second quarters of 2008 and full year of 2009).
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
In business segments where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated April 20, 2010, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. During the first quarter of 2009, the financial results of the Execution business have been moved from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida; previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect all of these changes.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100514160540.txt.gz
TIME:20100514160540
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) On May 10, 2010, Ronald P. O'Hanley, a Vice Chairman of the Registrant, notified the Registrant of his decision to resign from that position and as an officer and/or director of any subsidiaries or affiliates of the Registrant. Mr. O'Hanley was an executive officer and was a named executive officer in the Registrant's 2010 proxy statement. Mr. O'Hanley will remain employed with the Registrant in a transition role through the date of his departure, which will be not later than August 8, 2010. A copy of a press release issued by the Registrant with respect to Mr. O'Hanley's resignation is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, May 10, 2010  BNY Mellon announced today that Jonathan Little and Mitchell Harris will co-head the company's asset management business on an interim basis following the departure of Ronald P. O'Hanley, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon Asset Management. Mr. O'Hanley is leaving to accept a new opportunity in the financial services industry.
Mr. Little is currently vice chairman of BNY Mellon Asset Management and represents Asset Management on BNY Mellon's Executive Committee. Mr. Harris is chairman of the Fixed Income, Cash and Currency Group of BNY Mellon Asset Management. Both will also continue in their current roles as they assume their interim responsibilities, reporting to BNY Mellon Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Robert P. Kelly.
The company will conduct a comprehensive search for a permanent head of the asset management business, considering internal and external candidates.
"Ron has provided outstanding leadership to our asset management business and we wish him the very best as he moves to a new leadership role in the industry," said Mr. Kelly. "We have a highly experienced management team across our multi-boutique asset management business. All of our boutiques are led by CEOs with the proven ability to deliver strong investment performance and superb client service for our clients around the globe. I'm pleased that we will have the benefit of Jon and Mitchell's leadership during this transition period. We will conduct a comprehensive search to find the very best person to ensure we continue to capitalize on the terrific growth prospects that lie ahead for our asset management business globally."
Mr. Little currently has responsibility for all of the corporation's non-U.S. asset management businesses, including joint ventures and subsidiary companies worldwide. He is a director of many of the firm's asset management boutiques, including Newton Investment Management Ltd, Pareto Investment Management, Walter Scott and Partners Ltd, EACM Advisors, Alcentra, Hamon Investment Group and Blackfriars Asset Management. He is Chairman of Insight Investment Management, a Director and former Chairman of BNY Mellon Asset Management International Ltd and WestLB Mellon Asset Management, and was formerly Chairman of The Dreyfus Corporation. Prior to joining the company in 2000, Mr. Little held key leadership roles at JP Morgan and Fidelity Investments.
As head of the Fixed Income, Cash and Currency Group, Mr. Harris oversees businesses with more than $500 billion in assets under management including Pareto, Standish Mellon Asset Management LLC, Alcentra and BNY Mellon Cash Investment Strategies. His prior roles include serving as chief executive officer of Standish and Pareto Partners. He remains the chairman of both. Prior to joining Pareto in 1993, Mr. Harris worked at Citibank for 14 years where his roles included managing the private bank business in Germany and Jersey (Channel Islands), and the London private bank for European marketing.
BNY Mellon ranks among the top 10 asset management firms in the U.S. and is also a global leader with more than $1.1 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon Asset Management is the umbrella organization for The Bank of New York Mellon's affiliated investment management firms and global distribution companies.
BNY Mellon has engaged Korn/Ferry International to assist in the search process.
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $22.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100607165504.txt.gz
TIME:20100607165504
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") entered into (i) a forward sale agreement dated June 3, 2010 (the "Forward Agreement") with Goldman, Sachs & Co. (the "Forward Purchaser") and (ii) an underwriting agreement dated June 3, 2010 (the "Underwriting Agreement") by and among the Company, Goldman, Sachs & Co., as forward purchaser, and Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Citigroup Global Markets Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters listed therein (the "Underwriters"), relating to the public offering of 25,925,925 shares of its common stock (par value $0.01 per share).
Pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, the Forward Purchaser will borrow and sell to the public through the underwriters shares of the Company's common stock. The Company will not receive any proceeds from the sale of its common stock until settlement of the Forward Agreement, which is expected to occur not later than five months from the date of this offering. The Company intends to use any proceeds that it receives upon settlement of the Forward Agreement to consummate its acquisition of PNC's Global Investment Servicing Inc. business or for general corporate purposes. Subject to certain exceptions, the Company has the right to elect physical, cash or net share settlement of the Forward Agreement.
The Underwriting Agreement and the Forward Agreement contain various representations, warranties and agreements by the Company, conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties and termination provisions. The description of the Underwriting Agreement and the Forward Agreement set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Underwriting Agreement and the Forward Agreement, which are filed as Exhibits 1.1 and 10.1 respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated by reference herein.
 
On June 3, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing the public offering described in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K. On June 4, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing it had priced the public offering. The Company's press releases are filed as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
As representatives (the "")
Representatives
of the several Underwriters named in Schedule I-A hereto,
c/o Goldman, Sachs & Co.
200 West Street
New York, New York 10282-2198
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation registered as a financial holding company and a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (the ""), and Goldman, Sachs & Co., in its capacity as a forward purchaser (the ""), at the request of the Company in connection with the Forward Agreement (as defined below), confirm their respective agreements, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, with the several Underwriters named in Schedule I-A hereto (the "") with respect to (a) the sale by the Forward Purchaser, and purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective number of shares of common stock (par value $0.01) of the Company (the "") set forth in Schedules I-B and I-A under the headings "Number of Borrowed Securities to Be Sold" and "Number of Borrowed Securities to Be Purchased," respectively (subject to reduction for any shares of Common Stock issued and sold by the Company pursuant to Section 3(d) hereof) (the ""), and (b) the purchase by the Underwriters and the sale by the Company of any shares of Common Stock pursuant to Section 3(d) hereof (the "" and, collectively with the Borrowed Securities, the "").
Company
Forward Purchaser
Underwriters
Common Stock
Borrowed Securities
Standby Securities
Securities
"" means the letter agreement dated the date hereof between the Company and the Forward Purchaser relating to the forward sale by the Company, subject to the Company's right to elect Physical Settlement, Cash Settlement or Net Share Settlement (as such terms are defined in the Forward Agreement), of a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of Securities to be borrowed and sold by the Forward Purchaser to the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement.
Forward Agreement
1. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) An "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-144261, 333-144261-01, 333-144261-02, 333-144261-03, 333-144261-04, 333-144261-05, 333-144261-06 and 333-144261-07) in respect of the Securities has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; such registration statement, and any post-effective amendment thereto, became effective on filing; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of such registration statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose has been initiated or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company (the base prospectus filed as part of such registration statement, in the form in which it has most recently been filed with the Commission on or prior to the date of this Agreement, is hereinafter called the ""; any preliminary prospectus (including any preliminary prospectus supplement) relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act is hereinafter called a ""; the various parts of such registration statement, including all exhibits thereto but excluding any Form T-1 and including any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities that is filed with the Commission and deemed by virtue of Rule 430B to be part of such registration statement, each as amended at the time such part of the registration statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the ""; the Basic Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as defined in Section 1(c) hereof), is hereinafter called the ""; the form of the final prospectus relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act in accordance with Section 6(a) hereof is hereinafter called the ""; any reference herein to the Basic Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act, as of the date of such prospectus; any reference to any amendment or supplement to the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and any documents filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), and incorporated therein, in each case after the date of the Basic Prospectus, such Preliminary Prospectus, or the Prospectus, as the case may be; any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the effective date of the Registration Statement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement; and any "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433 under the Act relating to the Securities is hereinafter called an "");
Act
Commission
Basic Prospectus
Preliminary Prospectus
Registration Statement
Pricing Prospectus
Prospectus
Exchange Act
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
(b) No order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been received by the Company, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the
 
circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(c) For the purposes of this Agreement, the "" is 8:30 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of this Agreement. The Pricing Prospectus, as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule II(a) hereto does not conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, and each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as supplemented by and taken together with the Pricing Prospectus as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to statements or omissions made in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
Applicable Time
provided
however
(d) The documents incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(e) The Registration Statement conforms, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, in the case of the Registration Statement, as of the applicable effective date as to each part of the Registration Statement, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and in the case of the Prospectus, as of the applicable filing date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be
 
stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(f) Except as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Prospectus, (i) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any transactions, not in the ordinary course of business, that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis and (ii) there has not been any material adverse effect on, or any development involving a prospective material adverse effect on, the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operation of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or adversely affect the compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder, other than, with respect to clause (ii), any such effect resulting from changes in the general economic or equity or debt market conditions in the United States or changes in the financial services industry in general and not specifically relating to the Company or its subsidiaries (a "");
Material Adverse Effect
(g) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(h) Each of The Bank of New York Mellon, BNY Mellon, N.A., Pershing Group, LLC, Dreyfus Corporation and MBC Investments Corporation (each, a "") has been duly incorporated, established or formed and is validly existing as a corporation, banking corporation or association, or other applicable type of entity, as applicable, in good standing (to the extent good standing is applicable in such jurisdiction) under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, establishment or formation, as applicable, and has the corporate, limited liability company or other organizational power and authority to own its properties and to conduct its business as and to the extent described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other applicable type of entity and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification, except where any failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the only "significant subsidiaries" of the Company, within the meaning assigned to such term in Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission, are The Bank of New York Mellon, Pershing Group, LLC, Dreyfus Corporation and MBC Investments Corporation;
Significant Subsidiary
(i) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company (including the
 
Borrowed Securities) has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable and conform to the description of the Securities contained in the Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended); and, except for directors' qualifying shares, all issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity;
(j) The unissued Standby Securities to be issued and sold by the Company to the Underwriters hereunder and the shares of Common Stock to be purchased by the Forward Purchaser from the Company pursuant to the Forward Agreement, whether pursuant to Physical Settlement or Net Share Settlement, as a result of the designation of an Early Valuation Date (as defined in the Forward Agreement) or otherwise, have been duly and validly authorized and reserved for issuance and, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein or in the Forward Agreement, as applicable, will be duly and validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable and will conform to the description of the Securities in the Prospectus and the issuance thereof will not be subject to any preemptive or similar rights;
(k) The Company has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Forward Agreement (collectively, the ""), and to perform its respective obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken.
Transaction Documents
(l) The Forward Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes or will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles relating to enforceability (collectively, the "").
Enforceability Exceptions
(m) The issue and sale of the Securities and the compliance by the Company with the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "") or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended (the "") or (iii) result in any violation of the provisions of any statute or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or any of their properties, except in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually
Certificate of Incorporation
By-Laws
 
or in aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any such court or governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents except (x) such as have been obtained under the Act and (y) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
FINRA
(n) The statements set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of Common Stock" and "Description of Capital Stock", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the common stock ($0.01 par value) or the preferred stock, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Certain United States Federal Tax Consequences to Non-U.S. Holders of Common Stock" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
(o) Each Transaction Document conforms in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus.
(p) Other than as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or of which any property of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is the subject, which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to the Company's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
(q) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities, including in connection with the settlement of the Forward Agreement or sales of any Standby Securities, and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "");
Investment Company Act
(r) (A) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus), and (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) under the Act) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 under the Act, the Company was a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; and (B) at the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Act) of the Securities, the Company was not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act;
 
(s) The Company maintains a system of internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or under their supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective and the Company is not aware of any material weaknesses in its internal control over financial reporting;
(t) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting; and
(u) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act; such disclosure controls and procedures have been designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company and its subsidiaries is made known to the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer by others within those entities; and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective.
2. . The Forward Purchaser represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties of the Forward Purchaser
(a) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Forward Purchaser and, at the Time of Delivery (as defined in Section 5), the Forward Purchaser will have full right, power and authority to sell, transfer and deliver the Borrowed Securities to be sold by the Forward Purchaser hereunder.
(b) The Forward Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Forward Purchaser and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Forward Purchaser, enforceable against the Forward Purchaser in accordance with its terms, except to the extent that enforceability thereof may be limited by the Enforceability Exceptions.
(c) The Forward Purchaser will, at the Time of Delivery, have the free and unqualified right to transfer the Borrowed Securities to be sold by the Forward Purchaser hereunder, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, charge, claim, equity or encumbrance of any kind; and upon delivery of such Borrowed Securities and payment of the purchase price therefor as herein contemplated, assuming each of the Underwriters has no notice of any adverse claim, each of the Underwriters will have the free and unqualified right to transfer the Borrowed Securities purchased by it from the Forward Purchaser, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, charge, claim, equity or encumbrance of any kind.
3. .
Purchase and Sale of Securities by the Underwriters
(a) On the basis of the representations and warranties herein set forth, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Forward Purchaser and the Company
 
(with respect to any Standby Securities sold pursuant to Section 3(d) hereof), severally and not jointly, agrees to sell to the Underwriters the number of Securities set forth opposite the name of the Forward Purchaser in Schedule I-B hereto under the heading "Number of Borrowed Securities to Be Sold," subject to adjustments in accordance with Section 3(d) hereof (to be adjusted by the Representatives so as to eliminate fractional shares), and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Forward Purchaser or from the Company (to the extent of any Standby Securities), at a purchase price per share of $26.1900 (the ""), the number of Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I-A hereto under the heading "Number of Borrowed Securities to Be Purchased."
Purchase Price
(b) If any of the conditions to effectiveness set forth in Section 3 of the Forward Agreement is not satisfied or waived on or prior to the Time of Delivery, the Forward Purchaser, in its sole judgment, may choose not to borrow and deliver for sale the Borrowed Securities to be sold by the Forward Purchaser to the Underwriters hereunder. In addition, in the event that the Forward Purchaser, in its sole judgment, is unable to borrow and deliver for sale under this Agreement all of the Borrowed Securities to be sold by the Forward Purchaser hereunder or if the Forward Purchaser, in its sole judgment, would entail a stock loan cost in excess of a rate equal to 200 basis points per annum, then the Forward Purchaser shall only be required to deliver for sale in respect of the Borrowed Securities the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock that the Forward Purchaser is able to so borrow at or below such total stock loan cost.
(c) If, pursuant to Section 3(b), the Forward Purchaser does not borrow and deliver for sale the number of Borrowed Securities deliverable by the Forward Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement, the Forward Purchaser will notify the Company of the number of shares of Common Stock not being delivered by the Forward Purchaser by no later than 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the first New York Business Day (as defined in Section 5) prior to the Time of Delivery.
(d) In the event that the Forward Purchaser elects pursuant to Section 3(b), or is otherwise entitled, not to deliver the Borrowed Securities to be sold by the Forward Purchaser hereunder, the Company shall issue and sell in whole but not in part a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of shares that the Forward Purchaser does not deliver. In connection with any such issuance and sale by the Company under this Section 3(d), the Representatives shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for a period not exceeding one New York Business Day (as defined in Section 5) in order to effect any required changes in any documents or arrangements.
(e) The Forward Purchaser shall not have any liability whatsoever for any Securities it does not deliver to the Underwriters or any other party if the Forward Purchaser elects pursuant to Section 3(b), or is otherwise entitled, not to deliver the Borrowed Securities.
4. . The Company and the Forward Purchaser understand that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representatives is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus.
The Offering
 
5. .
Settlement
(a) The Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in definitive form, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Forward Purchaser and the Company shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Forward Purchaser or the Company, as applicable, to the Representatives, through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company (""), for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account(s) specified by (i) in the case of any Borrowed Securities, the Forward Purchaser to the Representatives or (ii) in the case of any Standby Securities, the Company to the Representatives, in each case, at least forty-eight hours in advance. The certificates representing the Securities will be made available for checking and packaging at least twenty-four hours prior to the Time of Delivery with respect thereto at the office of DTC or its designated custodian (the "").
DTC
Designated Office
(b) The time and date of delivery of and payment for the Securities shall be 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on June 9, 2010 or such other time and date (i) in the case of the Borrowed Securities, as the Representatives, the Forward Purchaser and the Company may agree upon in writing or (ii) in the case of the Standby Securities, as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. Such time and date for delivery of the Securities is herein called the "".
Time of Delivery
(c) The documents to be delivered at the Time of Delivery by or on behalf of the parties hereto pursuant to Section 9 hereof, including the cross-receipt for the Securities and any additional documents requested by the Underwriters pursuant to Section 9(k) hereof, will be delivered at the offices of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, One Liberty Plaza, New York, New York 10006 (the ""), and the Securities will be delivered at the Designated Office, all at the Time of Delivery. A meeting will be held at the Closing Location at 4:00 p.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next preceding the Time of Delivery, at which meeting the final drafts of the documents to be delivered pursuant to the preceding sentence will be available for review by the parties hereto. For the purposes of Section 3 and of this Section 5, "" shall mean each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday which is not a day on which banking institutions in New York City are generally authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
Closing Location
New York Business Day
6. . The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser:
Covenants
(a) To prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commission's close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement; to make no further amendment or any supplement to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus prior to the Time of Delivery which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser promptly after reasonable notice thereof; to advise the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser, promptly
 
after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus has been filed; to file promptly all other material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities; to advise the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus in respect of the Securities, of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act, of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus or suspending any such qualification, to promptly use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order; and in the event of any such issuance of a notice of objection, promptly to take such steps including, without limitation, amending the Registration Statement or filing a new registration statement, at its own expense, as may be necessary to permit offers and sales of the Securities by the Underwriters (references herein to the Registration Statement shall include any such amendment or new registration statement);
(b) If required by Rule 430B(h) under the Act, to prepare a form of prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser and to file such form of prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than may be required by Rule 424(b) under the Act; and to make no further amendment or supplement to such form of prospectus which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser promptly after reasonable notice thereof;
(c) If by the third anniversary (the "") of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, any of the Securities remain unsold by the Underwriters, the Company will file, if it has not already done so and is eligible to do so, a new automatic shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives. If at the Renewal Deadline the Company is no longer eligible to file an automatic shelf registration statement, the Company will, if it has not already done so, file a new shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives and will use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to be declared effective within 180 days after the Renewal Deadline. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the expired registration statement relating to the Securities. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new automatic shelf registration statement or such new shelf registration statement, as the case may be;
Renewal Deadline
 
(d) Promptly from time to time to take such action as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives may reasonably request and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of the Securities, that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction;
provided
(e) Prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement and from time to time, to furnish the Underwriters with written and electronic copies of the Prospectus in New York City in such quantities as the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser may reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required at any time prior to the expiration of nine months after the time of issue of the Prospectus in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities and if at any such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser and to file such document and to prepare and furnish to each Underwriter and the Forward Purchaser and to any dealer in the Securities as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser may from time to time reasonably request of an amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance, (i) if such untrue statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein, at the expense of such Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser, as applicable, and (ii) in other cases, without charge to any such Underwriter, Forward Purchaser or dealer; and in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales of any of the Securities at any time nine months or more after the time of issue of the Prospectus, upon the request of the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser but at the expense of such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser, as applicable, to prepare and deliver to such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser, as applicable, as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser may request of an amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act;
(f) To make generally available to its securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158 under the Act);
 
(g) During the period beginning from the date hereof and continuing to and including the date 60 days after the date of the Prospectus, not to, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, directly or indirectly offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge, grant any option to purchase, make any short sale or otherwise dispose of any securities of the Company that in the judgment of the Representatives are substantially similar to the Securities, or any options or warrants to purchase any shares of common stock of the Company, or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for or that represent the right to receive shares of common stock of the Company, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, owned directly by the Company (including holding as a custodian) or with respect to which the Company has beneficial ownership within the rules and regulations of the Commission, except as contemplated by the Forward Agreement and except that (i) the Company may engage in any activity described in this Section 6(g) if and to the extent required by applicable law or by any notice, order or regulation of any regulatory authority which is binding upon the Company and (ii) the Company may issue or grant any securities (including restricted stock, restricted stock units and phantom stock), and options to acquire securities, of the Company to its employees and directors (including on a cashless exercise basis) pursuant to an employee benefit plan or director plan that exists as of the date hereof (including, without limitation, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan);
(h) To pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) under the Act and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) under the Act;
(i) To use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, if any, and the net proceeds from settlement of the Forward Agreement, if any, as applicable, in the manner specified in the Pricing Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds";
(j) To use its reasonable best efforts to list, subject to notice of issuance, the Standby Securities and the shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance in connection with the Physical Settlement or Net Share Settlement of the Forward Agreement, on the New York Stock Exchange (the ""); and
Exchange
(k) Upon request of any Underwriter, to furnish, or cause to be furnished, to such Underwriter an electronic version of the Company's trademarks, servicemarks and corporate logo for use on the website, if any, operated by such Underwriter for the purpose of facilitating the on-line offering of the Securities (the ""); , that the License shall be used solely for the purpose described above, is granted without any fee and may not be assigned or transferred.
License
provided, however
7. .
Free Writing Prospectuses
(a) The Company represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; each Underwriter represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a free
 
writing prospectus; any such free writing prospectus the use of which has been consented to by the Company or the Representatives, as applicable, is listed on Schedule II(a) hereto;
(b) The Company has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 under the Act applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission or retention where required and legending; and
(c) The Company agrees that if at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus any event occurred or occurs as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus would conflict with the information in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, the Company will give prompt notice thereof to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser and, if requested by the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser, will prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter and the Forward Purchaser an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or other document which will correct such conflict, statement or omission; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
provided
however
8. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Company's counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Securities under the Act and all other expenses (excluding the fees incurred by the counsel for the Underwriters) in connection with the preparation, printing, reproduction and filing of the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters, the Forward Purchaser and dealers; (ii) the cost of printing or producing any Agreement among Underwriters, the Transaction Documents, the Blue Sky Memorandum, closing documents (including any compilations thereof) and any other documents in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Securities; (iii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 6(c) hereof, including the fees and disbursements of counsels for the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky survey; (iv) all fees and expenses in connection with listing on the Exchange the Standby Securities and the shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance in connection with the Physical Settlement or Net Settlement of the Forward Agreement; (v) the cost of preparing the Securities; (vi) the cost and charges of any transfer agent or registrar; (vii) all fees and expenses incident to the transactions contemplated by the Forward Agreement (except for the avoidance of doubt such fees and expenses do not include the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Forward Purchaser); and (viii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, and Sections 10 and 13 hereof, the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their respective counsel, transfer taxes on resale of
Expenses
 
any of the Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
9. . The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder, as to the Securities to be delivered at the Time of Delivery, and the obligations of the Forward Purchaser to deliver and sell the Borrowed Securities to the Underwriters, shall be subject, in their discretion, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company herein are, at and as of the Time of Delivery, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
Conditions
(a) The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by the rules and regulations under the Act and in accordance with Section 6(a) hereof; all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated by the Commission and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act shall have been received; no stop order suspending or preventing the use of the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been initiated by the Commission; and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission shall have been complied with, or is being complied with, to the reasonable satisfaction of Representatives and the Forward Purchaser; FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of this Agreement;
(b) Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, shall have furnished to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser such written opinion or opinions, dated the Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to each of the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser, and such counsel shall have received such papers and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
(c) The chief securities counsel of the Company (or, at the Company's sole option, an external counsel reasonably acceptable to the Representatives, solely with respect to clause (ix) below) shall have furnished to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser such counsel's written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to each of the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser, to the effect that:
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus;
(ii) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Prospectus, and all of the issued shares of capital stock of the Company (including the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery) have been duly and validly authorized
 
and issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; and the Securities conform in all material respects to the description of the Securities in the Prospectus;
(iii) The unissued Standby Securities to be issued and sold by the Company to the Underwriters hereunder and the shares of Common Stock to be purchased by the Forward Purchaser pursuant to the Forward Agreement have been duly and validly authorized and reserved for issuance and, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein or in the Forward Agreement, as applicable, will be duly and validly issued and fully paid and non-assessable and will conform to the description of the Securities in the Prospectus and the issuance thereof will not be subject to any preemptive or similar rights;
(iv) The Company has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification or is subject to no material liability or disability by reason of the failure to be so qualified in any such jurisdiction except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect (such counsel being entitled to rely in respect of the opinion in this clause upon opinions of local counsel and in respect of matters of fact upon certificates of officers of the Company, that such counsel shall state that they believe that the Representatives, the Forward Purchaser and such counsel are justified in relying upon such opinions and certificates);
provided
(v) All of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended), and, except for directors' qualifying shares, is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity;
(vi) To such counsel's knowledge and other than as set forth in the Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or of which any property of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is the subject which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to such counsel's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
(vii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
(viii) The Forward Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
(ix) The issue and sale of the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery and the compliance by the Company with the Transaction Documents and the
 
consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (A) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust or loan agreement or other agreement or instrument known to such counsel to which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries is subject, (B) result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or the By-Laws or (C) result in the violation of any statute or any order, rule or regulation known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or any of their properties, in each case (A) and (C) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect;
(x) No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or other governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents except (A) such as have been obtained under the Act and (B) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by FINRA in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
(xi) The statements set forth in the Prospectus under the caption "Description of Common Stock" and "Description of Capital Stock", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the common stock ($0.01 par value) or the preferred stock, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Certain United States Federal Tax Consequences to Non-U.S. Holders of Common Stock" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
(xii) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities, including in connection with the settlement of the Forward Agreement or sales of any Standby Securities, and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act;
(xiii) The documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief), when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder; and such counsel has no reason to believe that any of such documents, when such documents became effective or were so filed, as the case may be, contained, in the case of a registration statement which became effective under the Act, an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein
 
or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or, in the case of other documents which were filed under the Act or the Exchange Act with the Commission, an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such documents were so filed, not misleading; and
(xiv) The Registration Statement, the Prospectus and any further amendments and supplements thereto, as applicable, made by the Company prior to the Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations thereunder; such counsel has no reason to believe (i) that, as of its effective date, the Registration Statement or any further amendment thereto made by the Company prior to the Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief), contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or (ii) that the Pricing Prospectus as of the Applicable Time (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; or (iii) that, as of its date or the Time of Delivery, the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Time of Delivery (other than the financial statements and related schedules and statistical information contained or required to be contained therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion or belief) contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and such counsel does not know of any amendment to the Registration Statement required to be filed or of any contracts or other documents of a character required to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or required to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus or required to be described in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus which are not filed or incorporated by reference or described as required.
In rendering such opinion, such counsel may rely as to matters of fact upon certificates of officers of the Company and its subsidiaries, that such counsel shall state that such counsel believes such counsel is justified in relying upon such certificates.
provided
(d) On the date of the Prospectus at a time prior to the execution of this Agreement, at 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the effective date of any post effective amendment to the Registration Statement filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement and also at the Time of Delivery, the independent accounting firm of the Company who has certified the financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus shall have furnished to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser a letter or
 
letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus;
(e) (i) Neither the Company nor any of the Significant Subsidiaries shall have sustained since the date of the latest audited financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus; and (ii) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Prospectus, there shall not have been any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries taken as a whole, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii), otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Prospectus or the effect of which is in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(f) On or after the Applicable Time (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Company's debt securities or preferred stock by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities or preferred stock;
(g) On or after the Applicable Time there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) a suspension or material limitation in trading in the Company's securities on the Exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in securities settlement or clearance services in the United States; (iv) the outbreak or escalation of hostilities involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war; or (v) the occurrence of any other calamity or crisis or any change in financial, political or economic conditions in the United States or elsewhere, if the effect of any such event specified in clause (iv) or (v) in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(h) The Company shall have complied with the provisions of Section 6(e) hereof with respect to the furnishing of prospectuses on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement;
 
(i) The Standby Securities to be delivered at the Time of Delivery and the shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance in connection with the Physical Settlement or Net Share Settlement of the Forward Agreement shall have been duly listed, subject to notice of issuance, on the Exchange;
(j) The Company has obtained and delivered to the Underwriters executed copies of an agreement from directors and certain executive officers of the Company, substantially to the effect set forth in Section 6(g) hereof in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives; and
(k) The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser at the Time of Delivery certificates of the Chief Financial Officer of the Company satisfactory to the Representatives and the Forward Purchaser (i) to the effect that (A) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of the Time of Delivery with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of the Time of Delivery and (B) the Company has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Time of Delivery, and (ii) as to such other matters as the Representatives or the Forward Purchaser may reasonably request.
10. . (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and the Forward Purchaser against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse each Underwriter and the Forward Purchaser for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
Indemnification and Contribution
provided
however
(b) Each Underwriter will indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Forward Purchaser against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or the Forward Purchaser may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration
 
Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein; and will reimburse the Company and the Forward Purchaser for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or the Forward Purchaser, as applicable, in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability except to the extent that it has been prejudiced in any material respect by such failure or from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect the settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action or claim in respect of which indemnification or contribution may be sought hereunder (whether or not the indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such action or claim) unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act, by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 10 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, from the offering of the
 
Securities. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above and such indemnifying party was prejudiced in a material respect by such failure, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company (which benefits shall include the proceeds to be received by the Company pursuant to the Forward Agreement assuming full Physical Settlement thereof), the Forward Purchaser and the Underwriters, in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company (which net proceeds shall include the proceeds to be received by the Company pursuant to the Forward Agreement assuming full Physical Settlement thereof), the total commissions or discounts received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus, and the spread received by the Forward Purchaser under the Forward Agreement, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Securities. The relative fault of the Company, the Forward Purchaser or the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company, the Forward Purchaser or the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company, the Forward Purchaser and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters, on the one hand, or the Forward Purchaser, on the other, were treated as a single entity, respectively, for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total public offering price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public and the spread received by the Forward Purchaser under the Forward Agreement exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 10 shall be in addition to any liability that the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters, under this Section 10 shall be in
 
addition to any liability that the Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and the Forward Purchaser and to each person, if any, who controls the Company or the Forward Purchaser within the meaning of the Act.
11. . (a) If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Securities which it has agreed to purchase hereunder at the Time of Delivery, the Representatives may in their discretion arrange for them or another party or other parties to purchase such Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty six hours after such default by any Underwriter the Representatives do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty six hours within which to procure another party or other parties satisfactory to the Representatives to purchase such Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed periods, the Representatives notify the Company that they have so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, or the Company notifies the Representatives that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, the Representatives, the Company or the Forward Purchaser shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for a period of not more than seven days, in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in the opinion of the Representatives may thereby be made necessary. The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall include any person substituted under this Section 11 with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to this Agreement with respect to such Securities.
Underwriter Defaults
(b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at the Time of Delivery, then the Company or the Forward Purchaser, as applicable, shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the number of shares which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder at the Time of Delivery and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the number of Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
(c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at the Time of Delivery, or if the Company or the Forward Purchaser, as applicable, shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then this Agreement shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter, the Company or the Forward Purchaser, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 8 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in
 
Section 10 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from any liability it may have to the Company, the Forward Purchaser or any non-defaulting Underwriter for its default.
12. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company, the several Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, the Forward Purchaser or any controlling person thereof, or the Company, or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Survival
13. . If this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 11 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser except as provided in Sections 8 and 10 hereof; but, if for any other reason, any Standby Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser for all out-of-pocket expenses approved in writing by the Representatives, including fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser in connection with the Transaction Documents and the offering of Securities contemplated hereby, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser except as provided in Sections 8 and 10 hereof.
Liabilities Upon Termination
14. . In all dealings hereunder, the Representatives shall act on behalf of each of the Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by the Representatives.
Notices, etc
All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the Representatives; if to the Forward Purchaser shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the Representatives; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement, Attention: Secretary; , , that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 10(c) hereof shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its Underwriters' Questionnaire, which address will be supplied to the Company by the Representatives upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
provided
however
In accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), the Underwriters are required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies their respective clients, including the Company, which information may include the name and address of their respective clients, as well as other information that will allow the Underwriters to properly identify their respective clients.
15. . This Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters, the Company and the Forward Purchaser and, to the extent
Parties to Agreement
 
provided in Sections 10 and 12 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company and each person who controls the Company, any Underwriter or the Forward Purchaser and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
16. . Time shall be of the essence of this Agreement. As used herein, the term "" shall mean any day when the Commission's office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
Time Is of the Essence
business day
17. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby are arm's-length commercial transactions among the Company, the several Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, (iii) none of the Underwriters or the Forward Purchaser has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter or Forward Purchaser has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) or any other obligation to the Company except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement and (iv) the Company has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters, the Forward Purchaser, or any of them, has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Underwriters Not Fiduciaries
18. . The Transaction Documents supersede all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) among the Company, the Underwriters, the Forward Purchaser, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Supercedes Prior Agreements
19.
. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
20. . Each of the Company, the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
21. . This Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
22. . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company is authorized to disclose to any persons the U.S. federal and state income tax treatment and tax structure of the potential transaction and all materials of any kind (including tax opinions and other tax analyses) provided to the Company relating to that treatment and structure, without the
Disclosures
 
Underwriters' imposing any limitation of any kind. However, any information relating to the tax treatment and tax structure shall remain confidential (and the foregoing sentence shall not apply) to the extent necessary to enable any person to comply with securities laws. For this purpose, "" is limited to any facts that may be relevant to that treatment.
tax structure
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon the acceptance hereof by the Representatives, on behalf of each of the Underwriters and the Forward Purchaser, this letter and such acceptance hereof shall constitute a binding agreement among each of the Underwriters, the Forward Purchaser and the Company. It is understood that the acceptance of this letter by the Representatives on behalf of each of the Underwriters is pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request, but without warranty on the part of the Representatives as to the authority of the signers thereof.
 
On behalf of each of the Underwriters
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
GOLDMAN, SACHS & CO. | 200 WEST STREET | NEW YORK, NEW YORK 10282-2198 | TEL: (212) 902-1000
Opening Transaction
 
Dear Sir(s):
The purpose of this communication (this "") is to set forth the terms and conditions of the above-referenced transaction entered into on the Trade Date specified below (the "") between Goldman, Sachs &Co. ("") and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (""). This communication constitutes a "Confirmation" as referred to in the ISDA Form specified below. This Confirmation is a confirmation for purposes of Rule 10b-10 promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "").
Confirmation
Transaction
GS&Co.
Counterparty
Exchange Act
 
This Confirmation shall supplement, form a part of and be subject to an agreement (the "") in the form of the 1992 ISDA Master Agreement (MulticurrencyCross Border) (the ""), as published by ISDA, as if GS&Co. and Counterparty had executed the ISDA Form on the date hereof (but without any Schedule except for (i) the election of Second Method and Loss and US Dollars ("") as the Termination Currency, and (ii) the election that the "Cross Default" provisions of Section 5(a)(vi) shall apply to Counterparty and GS&Co., provided that (x) the phrase "or becoming capable at such time of being declared" shall be deleted from clause (1) of such Section 5(a)(vi); and (y) the following language shall be added to the end thereof: "Notwithstanding the foregoing, a default under subsection (2) hereof shall not constitute an Event of Default if (i) the default was caused solely by error or omission of an administrative or operational nature; (ii) funds were available to enable the party to make the payment when due; and (iii) the payment is made within two Local Business Days of such party's receipt of written notice of its failure to pay." with "Specified Indebtedness" as defined in Section 14 of the Agreement and a "Threshold Amount" of USD50 million (or its equivalent in another currency)). All provisions contained in the Agreement are incorporated into and shall govern this Confirmation except as expressly modified below. This Confirmation evidences a complete and binding agreement between GS&Co. and Counterparty as to the terms of the Transaction and replaces any previous agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Agreement
ISDA Form
USD
The Transaction hereunder shall be the sole Transaction under the Agreement. If there exists any ISDA Master Agreement between GS&Co. or any of its affiliates, including The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (collectively, "") and Counterparty or any confirmation or other agreement between Goldman Sachs and Counterparty pursuant to which an ISDA Master Agreement is deemed to exist between Goldman Sachs and Counterparty, then notwithstanding anything to the contrary in such ISDA Master Agreement, such confirmation or
Goldman Sachs
agreement or any other agreement to which Goldman Sachs and Counterparty are parties, the Transaction shall not be considered a Transaction under, or otherwise governed by, such existing or deemed ISDA Master Agreement.
 
:
General Terms
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The effectiveness of this Confirmation and the Transaction shall be subject to the following conditions:
(a) the representations and warranties of Counterparty contained in the Underwriting Agreement dated the date hereof among Counterparty, GS&Co. and Citigroup Global Markets Inc. (the "") and any certificate delivered pursuant thereto by Counterparty shall be true and correct on the Effective Date as if made as of the Effective Date;
Underwriting Agreement
(b) Counterparty shall have performed all of the obligations required to be performed by it under the Underwriting Agreement on or prior to the Effective Date;
(c) all of the conditions set forth in Section 9 of the Underwriting Agreement shall have been satisfied;
(d) the Time of Delivery (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement) shall have occurred as provided in the Underwriting Agreement;
(e) all of the representations and warranties of Counterparty hereunder and under the Agreement shall be true and correct on the Effective Date as if made as of the Effective Date;
(f) Counterparty shall have performed all of the obligations required to be performed by it hereunder and under the Agreement on or prior to the Effective Date, including without limitation its obligations under Section 6 hereof; and
(g) Counterparty shall have delivered to GS&Co. an opinion of counsel in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to GS&Co. with respect to the due authorization, execution and delivery by the Counterparty of this Agreement and the absence of conflicts arising from the Counterparty's execution and delivery of this Agreement with contracts to which the Counterparty is a party or by which it is bound or laws applicable to the Counterparty, which may be included in the opinion delivered by Counterparty to GS&Co. under the Underwriting Agreement (as defined below) provided that such opinion contains a letter or statement that GS&Co. as counterparty to the Transaction may rely on such opinion or relevant sections thereof.
Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other provision of this Confirmation, if on or prior to 5:00 p.m, New York City time, on the first New York Business Day (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement) prior to the Time of Delivery, GS&Co., in its sole judgment, is unable to borrow and deliver for sale the Number of Shares or if, in GS&Co.'s sole judgment it would entail a stock loan cost of more than 200 basis points per annum with respect to all or any portion of the Number of Shares, the effectiveness of this Confirmation and the Transaction shall be limited to the number of Shares GS&Co. may borrow at a cost of not more than 200 basis points per annum.
 
 
(a) without limiting the generality of Section 13.1 of the Equity Definitions, it acknowledges that GS&Co. is not making any representations or warranties with respect to the treatment of the Transaction, including without limitation ASC Topic 260, Earnings Per Share, ASC Topic 815, Derivatives and Hedging, FASB Statements 128, 133, as amended, 149 or 150, EITF 00-19, 01-6, 03-6 or 07-5, ASC Topic 480, Distinguishing Liabilities from Equity, ASC 815-40, Derivatives and Hedging  Contracts in Entity's Own Equity (or any successor issue statements) or under the Financial Accounting Standards Board's Liabilities & Equity Project;
(b) it shall not take any action to reduce or decrease the number of authorized and unissued Shares below the sum of (i) the Number of Shares (ii) the total number of Shares issuable upon settlement (whether by net share settlement or otherwise) of any other transaction or agreement to which it is a party;
plus
(c) it will not repurchase any Shares if, immediately following such repurchase, the Number of Shares would be equal to or greater than 2.5% of the number of then-outstanding Shares and it will notify GS&Co. immediately upon the announcement or consummation of any repurchase of Shares in an amount greater than 0.5% of the number of then-outstanding Shares;
(d) it will not elect Cash Settlement or Net Share Settlement to create actual or apparent trading activity in the Shares (or any security convertible into or exchangeable for Shares) or to raise or depress or otherwise manipulate the price of the Shares (or any security convertible into or exchangeable for Shares) for the purpose of inducing the purchase or sale of such security by others;
(e) it is entering into this Confirmation and will provide any Settlement Notice in good faith and not as part of a plan or scheme to evade compliance with Rule 10b-5 or any other provision of the federal securities laws; it has not entered into or altered any hedging transaction relating to the Shares corresponding to or offsetting the Transaction; and it has consulted with its own advisors as to the legal aspects of its adoption and implementation of this Confirmation under Rule 10b5-1 under the Exchange Act ("");
Rule 10b5-1
(f) as of the Trade Date and as of the date of any payment or delivery by Counterparty or GS&Co. hereunder, it is not and will not be "insolvent" (as such term is defined under Section 101(32) of the Bankruptcy Code);
(g) it is not, and after giving effect to the transactions contemplated hereby will not be, required to register as an "investment company" as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended; and
(h) IT UNDERSTANDS THAT THE TRANSACTION IS SUBJECT TO COMPLEX RISKS WHICH MAY ARISE WITHOUT WARNING AND MAY AT TIMES BE VOLATILE AND THAT LOSSES MAY OCCUR QUICKLY AND IN UNANTICIPATED MAGNITUDE AND IS WILLING TO ACCEPT SUCH TERMS AND CONDITIONS AND ASSUME (FINANCIALLY AND OTHERWISE) SUCH RISKS.
 
(a) Counterparty acknowledges and agrees that any Shares delivered by Counterparty to GS&Co. on any Settlement Date or Net Share Settlement Date will be (i) newly issued, (ii) approved for listing or quotation on the Exchange, subject to official notice of issuance, and (iii) registered under the Exchange Act, and, when delivered by GS&Co. (or an affiliate of GS&Co.) to securities lenders from whom GS&Co. (or an affiliate of GS&Co.) borrowed Shares in connection with hedging its exposure to the Transaction, will be freely saleable without further registration or other restrictions under the Securities Act in the hands of those securities lenders. Accordingly, Counterparty agrees that any Shares so delivered will not bear a restrictive legend and will be deposited in, and the delivery thereof shall be effected through the facilities of, the Clearance System. In addition, Counterparty represents and
 
agrees that any such Shares shall be, upon such delivery, duly and validly authorized, issued and outstanding, fully paid and nonassessable, free of any lien, charge, claim or other encumbrance.
(b) Counterparty agrees that Counterparty shall not enter into or alter any hedging transaction relating to the Shares corresponding to or offsetting the Transaction. Without limiting the generality of the provisions set forth opposite the caption "Unwind Activities" in Section 2 of this Confirmation, Counterparty acknowledges that it has no right to, and agrees that it will not seek to, control or influence GS&Co.'s decision to make any "purchases or sales" (within the meaning of Rule 10b5-1(c)(1)(i)(B)(3)) under or in connection with the Transaction, including, without limitation, GS&Co.'s decision to enter into any hedging transactions.
(c) Counterparty acknowledges and agrees that any amendment, modification, waiver or termination of this Confirmation must be effected in accordance with the requirements for the amendment or termination of a "plan" as defined in Rule 10b5-1(c). Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any such amendment, modification, waiver or termination shall be made in good faith and not as part of a plan or scheme to evade the prohibitions of Rule 10b-5, and no such amendment, modification or waiver shall be made at any time at which Counterparty or any executive officer or director of Counterparty is aware of any material non-public information regarding Counterparty or the Shares.
(d) Counterparty shall promptly provide notice thereof to GS&Co. upon public announcement of any Extraordinary Event or Potential Adjustment Event.
(e) Neither Counterparty nor any of its "affiliated purchasers" (as defined by Rule 10b-18 under the Exchange Act ("")) shall take any action that would cause any purchases of Shares by GS&Co. or any of its affiliates in connection with any Cash Settlement or Net Share Settlement not to meet the requirements of the safe harbor provided by Rule 10b-18 if such purchases were made by Counterparty. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, during any Unwind Period, except with the prior written consent of GS&Co., Counterparty will not, and will cause its affiliated purchasers (as defined in Rule 10b-18) not to, directly or indirectly (including, without limitation, by means of a derivative instrument) purchase, offer to purchase, place any bid or limit order that would effect a purchase of, or announce or commence any tender offer relating to, any Shares (or equivalent interest, including a unit of beneficial interest in a trust or limited partnership or a depository share) or any security convertible into or exchangeable for the Shares.
Rule 10b-18
(f) Counterparty will not be subject to any "restricted period" (as such term is defined in Regulation M promulgated under the Exchange Act ("")) in respect of Shares or any "reference security" (as such term is defined in Regulation M) with respect to the Shares during any Unwind Period.
Regulation M
(g) Counterparty shall: (i) prior to the opening of trading in the Shares on any day on which Counterparty makes, or expects to be made, any public announcement (as defined in Rule 165(f) under the Securities Act) of any Merger Transaction, notify GS&Co. of such public announcement; (ii) promptly notify GS&Co. following any such announcement that such announcement has been made; (iii) promptly (but in any event prior to the next opening of the regular trading session on the Exchange) provide GS&Co. with written notice specifying (A) Counterparty's average daily Rule 10b-18 Purchases (as defined in Rule 10b-18) during the three full calendar months immediately preceding the Announcement Date that were not effected through GS&Co. or its affiliates and (B) the number of Shares purchased pursuant to the proviso in Rule 10b-18(b)(4) under the Exchange Act for the three full calendar months preceding the Announcement Date. Such written notice shall be deemed to be a certification by Counterparty to GS&Co. that such information is true and correct. In addition, Counterparty shall promptly notify GS&Co. of the earlier to occur of the completion of such transaction and the completion of the vote by target shareholders. Counterparty acknowledges that any such notice may result in a Regulatory Disruption, a Trading Condition or an Early Valuation or may effect the length of any ongoing Unwind Period. "" means any merger, acquisition or similar transaction involving a recapitalization as contemplated by Rule 10b-18(a)(13)(iv) under the Exchange Act.
Merger Transaction
 
 
 
 
(a) GS&Co. acknowledges and agrees that Counterparty's obligations under the Transaction are not secured by any collateral and that this Confirmation is not intended to convey to GS&Co. rights with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby that are senior to the claims of common stockholders in any U.S. bankruptcy proceedings of Counterparty; that nothing herein shall limit or shall be deemed to limit GS&Co.'s right to pursue remedies in the event of a breach by Counterparty of its obligations and agreements with respect to this Confirmation or the Agreement; further that nothing herein shall limit or shall be deemed to limit GS&Co.'s rights in respect of any transaction other than the Transaction.
provided
provided
(b) [Reserved]
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement or this Confirmation, in no event will Counterparty be required to deliver in the aggregate in respect of all Settlement Dates, Net Share Settlement Dates or other dates on which Shares are delivered in respect of any amount owed under this Agreement a number of Shares greater than 51,851,850 Shares (as adjusted for stock splits and similar events) (the ""). Counterparty represents and warrants to GS&Co. (which representation and warranty shall be deemed to be repeated on each day that the Transaction is outstanding) that the Capped Number is equal to or less than the number of authorized but unissued Shares that are not reserved for future issuance in connection with transactions in the Shares (other than the Transaction) on the date of the determination of the Capped Number (such Shares, the ""). In the event Counterparty shall not have delivered the full number of Shares otherwise deliverable as a result of this Section 8(c) (the resulting deficit, the ""), Counterparty shall be continually obligated to deliver Shares, from time to time until the full number of Deficit Shares have been delivered pursuant to this paragraph, when, and to the extent, that (A) Shares are repurchased, acquired or otherwise received by Counterparty or any of its subsidiaries after the Trade Date (whether or not in exchange for cash, fair value or any other consideration), (B) authorized and unissued Shares reserved for issuance in respect of other transactions prior to such date which prior to the relevant date become no longer so reserved and (C) Counterparty additionally authorizes any unissued Shares that are not reserved for other transactions (such events as set forth in clauses (A), (B) and (C) above, collectively, the ""). Counterparty shall promptly notify GS&Co. of the occurrence of any of the Share Issuance Events (including the number of Shares subject to clause (A), (B) or (C) and the corresponding number of Shares to be delivered) and, as promptly as reasonably practicable, deliver such Shares thereafter. Counterparty shall not, until Counterparty's obligations under the Transaction have been satisfied in full, use any Shares that become available for potential delivery to GS&Co. as a result of any Share Issuance Event for the settlement or satisfaction of any transaction or obligation other than the Transaction or reserve any such Shares for future issuance for any purpose other than to satisfy Counterparty's obligations to GS&Co. under the Transaction.
Capped Number
Available Shares
Deficit Shares
Share Issuance Events
(d) The parties intend for this Confirmation to constitute a "Contract" as described in the letter dated October 6, 2003 submitted on behalf of GS&Co. to Paula Dubberly of the staff of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") to which the Staff responded in an interpretive letter dated October 9, 2003.
Staff
(e) The parties intend for this contract (taking into account purchases of Shares in connection with any Cash Settlement or Net Share Settlement) to comply with the requirements of Rule 10b5-1(c)(1)(i)(A) under the
 
Exchange Act and for this Confirmation to constitute a binding contract or instruction satisfying the requirements of 10b5-1(c) and to be interpreted to comply with the requirements of Rule 10b5-1(c).
(f) Notwithstanding any provisions of the Agreement, all communications relating to the Transaction or the Agreement shall be transmitted exclusively through GS&Co. at 200 West Street, New York, New York 10282-2198, Telephone No. (212) 902-1981, Facsimile No. (212) 428-1980/1983.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) All parties to this Confirmation are giving up the right to sue each other in court, including the right to a trial by jury, except as provided by the rules of the arbitration forum in which a claim is filed.
(b) Arbitration awards are generally final and binding; a party's ability to have a court reverse or modify an arbitration award is very limited.
(c) The ability of the parties to obtain documents, witness statements and other discovery is generally more limited in arbitration than in court proceedings.
(d) The arbitrators do not have to explain the reason(s) for their award.
(e) The panel of arbitrators will typically include a minority of arbitrators who were or are affiliated with the securities industry, unless Counterparty is a member of the organization sponsoring the arbitration facility, in which case all arbitrators may be affiliated with the securities industry.
(f) The rules of some arbitration forums may impose time limits for bringing a claim in arbitration. In some cases, a claim that is ineligible for arbitration may be brought in court.
(g) The rules of the arbitration forum in which the claim is filed, and any amendments thereto, shall be incorporated into this Confirmation.
(h) Counterparty agrees that any and all controversies that may arise between Counterparty and GS&Co. out of or relating to the Agreement or any Transaction hereunder shall be determined by arbitration conducted before the FINRA Dispute Resolution ("FINRA-DR"), or, if the FINRA-DR declines to hear the matter, before the American Arbitration Association, in accordance with their arbitration rules then in force. The award of the arbitrator shall be final, and judgment upon the award rendered may be entered in any court, state or federal, having jurisdiction.
(i) No person shall bring a putative or certified class action to arbitration, nor seek to enforce any pre-dispute arbitration agreement against any person who has initiated in court a putative class action or who is a member of a putative class who has not opted out of the class with respect to any claims encompassed by the putative class action until: (i) the class certification is denied; (ii) the class is decertified; or (iii) Counterparty is excluded from the class by the court.
(j) Such forbearance to enforce an agreement to arbitrate shall not constitute a waiver of any rights under this Confirmation except to the extent stated herein.
 
 
Counterparty hereby agrees (a) to check this Confirmation carefully and immediately upon receipt so that errors or discrepancies can be promptly identified and rectified and (b) to confirm that the foregoing (in the exact form provided by GS&Co.) correctly sets forth the terms of the agreement between GS&Co. and Counterparty with respect to the Transaction, by manually signing this Confirmation or this page hereof as evidence of agreement to such terms and providing the other information requested herein and immediately returning an executed copy to Equity Derivatives Documentation Department, Facsimile No. 212-428-1980/83.
 
Agreed and accepted by:
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
 
ANNEX A
If Counterparty delivers Unregistered Settlement Shares pursuant to Section 12 above (a ""), then:
Private Placement Settlement
(a) all Unregistered Settlement Shares shall be delivered to GS&Co. (or any affiliate of GS&Co. designated by GS&Co.) pursuant to the exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act provided by Section 4(2) thereof;
(b) as of or prior to the date of delivery, GS&Co. and any potential purchaser of any such shares from GS&Co. (or any affiliate of GS&Co. designated by GS&Co.) identified by GS&Co. shall be afforded a commercially reasonable opportunity to conduct a due diligence investigation with respect to Counterparty customary in scope for private placements of equity securities (including, without limitation, the right to have made available to them for inspection all financial and other records, pertinent corporate documents and other information reasonably requested by them);
(c) as of the date of delivery, Counterparty shall enter into an agreement (a "") with GS&Co. (or any affiliate of GS&Co. designated by GS&Co.) in connection with the private placement of such shares by Counterparty to GS&Co. (or any such affiliate) and the private resale of such shares by GS&Co. (or any such affiliate), substantially similar to private placement purchase agreements customary for private placements of equity securities, in form and substance commercially reasonably satisfactory to GS&Co., which Private Placement Agreement shall include, without limitation, provisions substantially similar to those contained in such private placement purchase agreements and shall provide for the payment by Counterparty of all fees and expenses in connection with such resale, including all fees and expenses of counsel for GS&Co., and shall contain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements of Counterparty reasonably necessary or advisable to establish and maintain the availability of an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act for such resales, but shall not contain any conditions on Counterparty's ability to deliver Shares thereunder that are outside of Counterparty's control; and
Private Placement Agreement
(d) in connection with the private placement of such shares by Counterparty to GS&Co. (or any such affiliate) and the private resale of such shares by GS&Co. (or any such affiliate), Counterparty shall, if so requested by GS&Co., prepare, in cooperation with GS&Co., a private placement memorandum in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to GS&Co.
In the case of a Private Placement Settlement, GS&Co. shall, in its good faith discretion, adjust the amount of Unregistered Settlement Shares to be delivered to GS&Co. hereunder in a commercially reasonable manner to reflect the fact that such Unregistered Settlement Shares may not be freely returned to securities lenders by GS&Co. and may only be saleable by GS&Co. at a discount to reflect the lack of liquidity in Unregistered Settlement Shares.
If Counterparty delivers any Unregistered Settlement Shares in respect of the Transaction, Counterparty agrees that (i) such Shares may be transferred by and among GS&Co. and its affiliates and (ii) after the minimum "holding period" within the meaning of Rule 144(d) under the Securities Act has elapsed after the applicable Settlement Date, Counterparty shall promptly remove, or cause the transfer agent for the Shares to remove, any legends referring to any transfer restrictions from such Shares upon delivery by GS&Co. (or such affiliate of GS&Co.) to Counterparty or such transfer agent of seller's and broker's representation letters customarily delivered by GS&Co. or its affiliates in connection with resales of restricted securities pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act, each without any further requirement for the delivery of any certificate, consent, agreement, opinion of counsel, notice or any other document, any transfer tax stamps or payment of any other amount or any other action by GS&Co. (or such affiliate of GS&Co.).
ANNEX B
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY Mellon, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, today announced a proposed offering of $700 million of its common stock to the public. Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Citi will serve as joint book-running managers for the offering.
NEW YORK, June 3, 2010 
In connection with this offering, BNY Mellon expects to enter into a forward sale agreement with Goldman, Sachs & Co., whom we refer to as the forward purchaser. The forward purchaser or its affiliates will borrow and sell to the public through the underwriters shares of the company's common stock. The company will not receive any proceeds from the sale of its common stock until settlement of the forward sale agreement, which is expected to occur not later than five months from the date of this offering. The company intends to use any proceeds that it receives upon settlement of the forward sale agreement to consummate its acquisition of PNC's Global Investment Servicing Inc. business or for general corporate purposes.
BNY Mellon has filed a shelf registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and will file a prospectus supplement related to this offering. Prospective investors should read the registration statement (including the base prospectus), the prospectus supplement and other documents the company has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the company and the offering. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of any offer to buy the common stock of the company, nor shall there be any offer or sale of the common stock of the company in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful. The offering will be made only by means of a prospectus. Copies of the registration statement, the prospectus supplement and other documents that the company has filed with the SEC are available by visiting EDGAR on the SEC website at www.sec.gov. Additionally, the prospectus can be requested by contacting Goldman, Sachs & Co., Attention: Prospectus Department, 200 West Street, New York, NY 10282, telephone: 866-471-2526, fax: 212-902-9316, email: Prospectus-ny@ny.email.gs.com; or Citi, Brooklyn Army Terminal, 140 58th Street, 8th Floor, Brooklyn, NY 11220, telephone: 800-831-9146, email: batprospectusdept@citigroup.com.
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation [NYSE: BK]. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. As of March 31, 2010, it has $22.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services more than $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the company's control). Factors that could cause the company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 and the company's other filings with the SEC.

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
BNY Mellon, the global leader in asset management and securities servicing, announced it has priced a $700 million offering of 25.9 million shares of its common stock at $27.00 per share. The offering is expected to close on June 9, 2010. Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Citi are serving as joint book-running managers for the offering. BofA Merrill Lynch and Morgan Stanley are acting as co-managers for the offering.
NEW YORK, June 4, 2010 
In connection with this offering, BNY Mellon has entered into a forward sale agreement with Goldman, Sachs & Co., whom we refer to as the forward purchaser. The forward purchaser or its affiliates will borrow and sell to the public through the underwriters shares of the company's common stock. The company will not receive any proceeds from the sale of its common stock until settlement of the forward sale agreement, which is expected to occur not later than five months from the date of this offering. The company intends to use any proceeds that it receives upon settlement of the forward sale agreement to consummate its acquisition of PNC's Global Investment Servicing Inc. business or for general corporate purposes.
BNY Mellon has filed a shelf registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and will file a prospectus supplement related to this offering. Prospective investors should read the registration statement (including the base prospectus), the prospectus supplement and other documents the company has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the company and the offering. This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of any offer to buy the common stock of the company, nor shall there be any offer or sale of the common stock of the company in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful. The offering will be made only by means of a prospectus. Copies of the registration statement, the prospectus supplement and other documents that the company has filed with the SEC are available by visiting EDGAR on the SEC website at www.sec.gov. Additionally, the prospectus can be requested by contacting Goldman, Sachs & Co., Attention: Prospectus Department, 200 West Street, New York, NY 10282, telephone: 866-471-2526, fax: 212-902-9316, email: Prospectus-ny@ny.email.gs.com; or Citi, Brooklyn Army Terminal, 140 58th Street, 8th Floor, Brooklyn, NY 11220, telephone: 800-831-9146, email: batprospectusdept@citigroup.com.
BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation [NYSE: BK]. BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 34 countries and serving more than 100 markets. The company is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. As of March 31, 2010, it has $22.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration, $1.1 trillion in assets under management, services more than $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the company's control). Factors that could cause the company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 and the company's other filings with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100716171134.txt.gz
TIME:20100716171134
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") has notified executive officers who are currently parties to change in control severance agreements with the Corporation (including Robert P. Kelly, Thomas P. Gibbons, Gerald L. Hassell and Steven G. Elliott, who are named executive officers of the Corporation) of the Corporation's intent to terminate each such agreement, effective upon the expiration of the notice period required under each such agreement. In connection with such notification, certain executive officers are being offered the opportunity to voluntarily waive coverage under their change in control agreements, to acknowledge cancellation and/or clarification of certain other benefits and to commence participation under The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Severance Plan (described below).
.
Adoption of Severance Plan
In addition, on July 13, 2010, the Corporation adopted The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Severance Plan (the "Plan"), which provides severance benefits under certain circumstances to Plan participants, who are selected by the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board (the "HRCC"). The Corporation's executive officers (including the named executive officers identified above) will only be eligible to participate in the Plan if they agree to waive their existing change in control agreements, as described above, and they shall not be entitled to duplicative benefits.
Under the Plan, if an eligible participant is terminated by the Corporation without "cause" (as defined in the Plan), the participant is eligible to receive a severance payment equal to two times the participant's base salary for the year of termination (or, if greater, for the year before the year of termination), a pro-rata annual bonus for the year of termination, benefit continuation for two years and outplacement services for one year, provided the participant signs a release and waiver of claims in favor of the Corporation. If a participant's employment is terminated by the Corporation without cause or if the participant terminates his or her employment for "good reason" (as defined in the Plan) within two years following a "change in control" (as defined in the Plan), then instead of receiving the benefits described above, the participant is eligible to receive a severance payment equal to two times the sum of the participant's base salary and target annual bonus for the year of termination (or, if greater, for the year before the year of termination), a pro-rata target annual bonus for the year of termination, benefit continuation for two years and outplacement services for one year. If any payment under the Plan would cause a participant to become subject to the excise tax imposed under section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, then payments and benefits will be reduced to the amount that would not cause the participant to be subject to the excise tax if such a reduction would put the participant in a better after tax position than if the participant were to pay the tax.
Payments and benefits that are payable under the Plan would be reduced to the extent that the amount of such payments or benefits would exceed the amount permitted to be paid under the Corporation's Policy Regarding Shareholder Approval Of Future Senior Officer Severance Arrangements (as described below) and such amounts are not approved by the Corporation's shareholders in accordance with the Policy. The Corporation has determined that the Plan does not require shareholder approval under the terms of the Policy.
The foregoing descriptions of the Plan and notice letter are summaries and are qualified in their entirety by reference to the full text of the Plan and the form of notice letter. A copy of the Plan is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1. A copy of the form of notice letter is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.2.
 
 
The Policy applies only to future severance arrangements. Future severance arrangements do not include existing severance agreements, unless the severance agreement is modified in such a way as to materially increase benefits. The Board of Directors retains the right to amend the Policy and will promptly disclose any amendment.
The foregoing description of the Policy is a summary and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Policy. A copy of the Policy is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.3.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
1. . The purpose of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Severance Plan (the "") is to retain certain senior executives of the Corporation by reason of providing appropriate severance benefits and to ensure their continued dedication to their duties in connection with certain types of termination of employment after a Change in Control (as defined in Section 2(e) below).
Purpose
Plan
2. . As used in this Plan, the following terms shall have the respective meanings set forth below:
Definitions
(a) "" means the annual bonus awarded to a Participant by the Corporation from time to time.
Annual Incentive Award
(b) "" means the Participant's annual rate of base salary for the year in which the Participant's Date of Termination occurs (or, if greater, for the year before the year of termination).
Base Salary
(c) "" means the Board of Directors of the Corporation and, after a Change in Control, the "board of directors" of the Parent Corporation or Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, as defined for purposes of Section 2(e).
Board
(d) "" means any of the following with respect to a Participant:
Cause
(i) The Participant's continued failure, in a material way, to perform his or her responsibilities to the Corporation or a Subsidiary, demand for substantial performance has been given by the Board, any officer of the Corporation to whom the Participant reports or any higher level officer that specifically identifies how the Participant has not substantially performed his or her responsibilities; , , that following a Change in Control, in order to terminate a Participant's employment under this Section 2(d)(i), such failure must be determined to be willful. A Participant's failure to perform under this Section 2(d)(i) does not, however, include failure resulting from the Participant's incapacity due to mental or physical illness or injury or from any permitted leave required by law or any failure after the Participant gives notice of termination for Good Reason or the Corporation gives notice of termination other than for Cause or Disability.
after
provided
however
(ii) The Participant's violation of the Code of Conduct and Interpretative Guidance of the Corporation or any rule or regulation governing the conduct of the Corporation's business or the Participant's employment with the Corporation.
(iii) The Participant's conviction of, or plea of guilty or to, a crime (other than a minor traffic offense).
nolo contendere
(iv) The Participant being subject to the prohibitions of Section 19(a)(1) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or any similar statute, rule or regulation.
(v) The Participant's fraud or material dishonesty in connection with the business of the Corporation or any of its Subsidiaries, including but not limited to, the Participant taking actions or failing to take actions in a manner intending to result in personal gain at the expense of the Corporation or any of its Subsidiaries.
(vi) The Participant's breach of his or her fiduciary duties to the Corporation or any of its Subsidiaries.
For this definition, no act or omission by a Participant will be "willful" unless it is made by the Participant in bad faith or without a reasonable belief that such act or omission was in the best interests of the Corporation and its Subsidiaries and any act or omission by a Participant based on authority given pursuant to a resolution duly adopted by the Board or the HRCC, on the advice of counsel for the Corporation or on the instruction of any officer of the Corporation to whom the Participant reports or any higher level officer will be deemed made in good faith and in the best interests of the Corporation.
(e) "" means the occurrence of any one of the following events:
Change in Control
(i) During any period of not more than two (2) years, the Incumbent Directors no longer represent a majority of the Board. "" are (A) the members of the Board as of July 1, 2007 and (B) any individual who becomes a director subsequent to the date hereof whose appointment or nomination was approved by at least a majority of the Incumbent Directors then on the Board (either by specific vote or by approval, without prior written notice to the Board objecting to the nomination, of a proxy statement in which the member was named as nominee). However, the Incumbent Directors will not include anyone who becomes a member of the Board after the date hereof as a result of an actual or threatened election contest or proxy or consent solicitation on behalf of anyone other than the Board, including as a result of any appointment, nomination or other agreement intended to avoid or settle a contest or solicitation;
Incumbent Directors
(ii) There is a beneficial owner of securities entitled to 30% or more of the total voting power of the Corporation's then-outstanding securities in respect of the election of the Board (the ""), other than (A) the Corporation, any Subsidiary of it or any employee benefit plan or related trust sponsored or maintained by the Corporation or any Subsidiary of it; (B) any underwriter temporarily holding securities pursuant to an offering of them; (C) anyone who becomes a beneficial owner of that percentage of Voting Securities as a result of an Excluded Transaction (as defined in Section 2(e)(iii)); or (D) anyone who becomes a beneficial owner of that percentage of Voting Securities as a result of a transaction in which Voting Securities are acquired from the Corporation, if the transaction is approved by a majority of the Incumbent Directors in a resolution that expressly states that the transaction is not a Change in Control under this Section 2(e); or
Voting Securities
(iii) Consummation of a merger, consolidation, statutory share exchange or similar transaction (including an exchange offer combined with a merger or consolidation) involving the Corporation (a "") or a sale, lease or
Reorganization
 
other disposition (including by way of a series of transactions or by way of merger, consolidation, stock sale or similar transaction involving one or more subsidiaries) of all or substantially all of the Corporation's consolidated assets (a "") other than an Excluded Transaction. A Reorganization or Sale is an "" if immediately following it: (A) 50% or more of the total voting power of the Surviving Corporation's then-outstanding securities in respect of the election of directors (or similar officials in the case of a non-corporation) is represented by Voting Securities outstanding immediately before the Reorganization or Sale or by securities into which such Voting Securities were converted in the Reorganization or Sale; (B) there is no beneficial owner of securities entitled to 30% or more of the total voting power of the then-outstanding securities of the Surviving Corporation in respect of the election of directors (or similar officials in the case of a non-corporation); and (C) a majority of the board of directors of the Surviving Corporation (or similar officials in the case of a non-corporation) were Incumbent Directors at the time the Board approved the execution of the initial agreement providing for the Reorganization or Sale. The "" means in a Reorganization, the entity resulting from the Reorganization or in a Sale, the entity that has acquired all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation, except that, if there is a beneficial owner of securities entitled to 95% of the total voting power (in respect of the election of directors or similar officials in the case of a non-corporation) of the then-outstanding securities of the entity that would otherwise be the Surviving Corporation, then that beneficial owner will be the Surviving Corporation. (Any Reorganization or Sale which does not satisfy all of the criteria specified in (A), (B) and (C) shall be deemed a "").
Sale
Excluded Transaction
Surviving Corporation
Qualifying Transaction
(iv) the stockholders of the Corporation approve a plan of complete liquidation or dissolution of the Corporation.
(f) "" means the period of time beginning with a Change in Control and ending two (2) years following such Change in Control.
CIC Termination Period
(g) "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
(h) "" means The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
Corporation
(i) "" means (i) the effective date on which the Participant's employment by the Corporation terminates as specified in a prior written notice by the Corporation or the Participant, as the case may be, to the other, delivered pursuant to Section 8 or (ii) if the Participant's employment by the Corporation terminates by reason of death, the date of death of the Participant.
Date of Termination
(j) "" shall mean long-term disability under the terms of the Corporation's long-term disability plan, as then in effect.
Disability
(k) "" means the occurrence, following a Change in Control, of one or more of the following circumstances, without the Participant's prior written consent, and which circumstance(s) are not cured by the Corporation within thirty (30) days after receipt of a written notice from the Participant describing the circumstances that constitute Good Reason:
Good Reason
(i) any material and adverse change in the Participant's duties or responsibilities with the Corporation, except as required by law, rule or regulation;
 
(ii) any (1) reduction in the Participant's rate of annual base salary, or (2) material reduction in the Participant's overall aggregate annual compensation opportunities (including base salary, annual and long-term target incentive compensation opportunities). With respect to clause (2) above, the Participant acknowledges that a reduction in annual or long-term target incentive compensation opportunities does not constitute Good Reason hereunder so long as the reduction has resulted merely from a pay mix change determined in accordance with applicable opportunity guidelines or consensus market data or law, rule or regulation;
(iii) any requirement that the Participant be based at an office located outside of the country in which the Participant's office is located immediately prior to the Change in Control;
(iv) any other action or inaction by the Corporation (or a Successor) that constitutes a material breach of this Plan (including but not limited to the Corporation's failure to obtain from any Surviving Corporation the assent to this Agreement contemplated by Section 7 hereof).
If the Participant does not provide written notice to the Corporation within forty-five (45) days after the initial existence of an event constituting Good Reason has occurred and terminate employment within ten (10) business days following the end of the thirty (30) day cure period (if the event constituting Good Reason has not been cured during that period), that event will no longer constitute Good Reason. For purposes of clause (i) of Section 2(k)(ii) above, an immaterial or inadvertent reduction in a Participant's rate of annual base salary that is not taken in bad faith and that is remedied by the Corporation promptly after receipt of notice thereof given by the Participant shall not constitute Good Reason. The Participant's right to terminate employment for Good Reason shall not be affected by the Participant's incapacity due to mental or physical illness and the Participant's continued employment through the above-mentioned forty-five (45) day notice or thirty (30) day cure periods shall not constitute consent to, or a waiver of rights with respect to, any other event or condition constituting Good Reason.
(l) "" means the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board.
HRCC
(m) "" means an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under federal or state laws or a governmental department or agency.
Investigation
(n) "" means each of the senior executives of the Corporation, who is selected by the HRCC in its sole discretion for coverage by this Plan.
Participant
 
(o) "" means a termination of the Participant's employment with the Corporation (i) by the Corporation other than for Cause or (ii) by the Participant for Good Reason after a Change in Control. Termination of the Participant's employment on account of death, Disability, by the Corporation for Cause or by the Participant other than for Good Reason shall not be treated as a Qualifying Termination. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the death of the Participant after notice of termination for Good Reason or without Cause has been validly provided shall be deemed to be a Qualifying Termination.
Qualifying Termination
(p) "" means any corporation or other entity in which the Corporation has a direct or indirect ownership interest of 50% or more of the total combined voting power of the then outstanding securities or interests of such corporation or other entity entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (or members of any similar governing body) or in which the Corporation has the right to receive 50% or more of the distribution of profits or 50% of the assets or liquidation or dissolution.
Subsidiary
(q) "" means Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the final Treasury Regulations issued thereunder.
Section 409A
(r) "" means a Participant's target Annual Incentive Award for the year in which the Participant's Date of Termination occurs (or, if greater, for the year before the year of termination); , , that in the event no target Annual Incentive Award has been established for the Participant for either the year of termination or the year before the year of termination, "Target Annual Incentive Award" shall mean the average Annual Incentive Award paid to the Participant for the three most recent years before the year of termination.
Target Annual Incentive Award
provided
however
3. .
Payments Upon Termination of Employment
(a) . If during a period of time which is not a CIC Termination Period under the Plan, the employment of the Participant is terminated by the Corporation other than for Cause, then, subject to the Participant's execution of a Separation Agreement and Release substantially in the form attached to this Plan as Exhibit A (the "", which shall be provided to the Participant no later than five (5) days after the Date of Termination and must be executed by the Participant, become effective and not be revoked by the Participant by the sixtieth (60
Non-Change in Control Qualifying Termination
Separation Agreement and Release
)
th
) day following the Date of Termination, the Corporation shall provide to the Participant:
(i) a cash payment equal to the result of multiplying the Participant's Base Salary by 2.00; and
(ii) a cash payment equal to the Participant's actual Annual Incentive Award for the fiscal year in which the Participant's Date of Termination occurs, multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which shall be the number of days the Participant was employed by the Corporation during the fiscal year in which the Date of Termination occurred and the denominator of which is 365; such pro-rata Annual Incentive Award shall be paid on the same day as annual incentives for the
 
fiscal year in which the Participant's Date of Termination occurs are paid to other similarly situated executives of the Corporation, but in no event later than March 15
th
of the year following the year during which the Date of Termination occurred; and
(iii) for two years after Participant's Date of Termination, Participant, his or her spouse and his or her dependents will continue to be entitled to participate in the Corporation's group health plans in which the Participant participates immediately prior to his or her Date of Termination at the same rate as paid by similarly situated employees from time to time, that the Participant timely elects continuation coverage under Section 4980B(f) of the Code; and , , that to the extent that such health plan does not permit continuation of the Participant's or his or her spouse's or dependents' participation throughout such period, the Corporation shall provide the Participant, on the first business day of each calendar quarter, in advance, with an amount which is equal to the Company's cost of providing such benefits, less the applicable employee rate of participation; and
provided
provided
further
(iv) for a period of one (1) year following the Participant's Date of Termination, the Corporation shall make certain executive-level outplacement services available to the Participant, as provided by the outplacement providers with whom the Corporation has a relationship at the time of Participant's Date of Termination; and
The cash payment specified in paragraph (i) of this Section 3(a) shall be paid in equal installments in accordance with the Corporation's regular payroll practice over the two (2) year period following the Participant's Date of Termination, with such payments commencing on the Corporation payroll date immediately following the sixty-fifth (65th) day following the Date of Termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that a majority of the Incumbent Directors approves the resolution described in Section 2(e)(ii)(D) above that expressly states that a transaction is not a Change in Control under Section 2(e), but such transaction qualifies as a "change in control event" within the meaning of Treasury Regulation 1.409A-3(i)(5)(i), then the payment due under paragraph (i) of this Section 3(a), to the extent it shall become payable, shall be paid in a lump sum and shall be paid at the time set forth in the first sentence of the flush paragraph of Section 3(b) below.
(b) . If, during the CIC Termination Period, the employment of the Participant is terminated pursuant to a Qualifying Termination, then, subject to the Participant's execution of a Separation Agreement and Release substantially in the form attached to this Plan as Exhibit A, which shall be provided to the Participant no later than five (5) days after the Date of Termination and must be executed by the Participant, become effective and not be revoked by the Participant by the sixtieth (60
Post-Change in Control Qualifying Termination
th
) day following the Date of Termination, the Corporation shall provide to the Participant:
(i) a lump sum cash payment equal to the result of multiplying (A) the sum of (x) the Participant's Base Salary, plus (y) the Participant's Target Annual Incentive Award by (B) 2.00; and
 
(ii) a cash payment equal to the Participant's Target Annual Incentive Award for the fiscal year in which the Participant's Date of Termination occurs, multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which shall be the number of days the Participant was employed by the Corporation during the fiscal year in which the Date of Termination occurred and the denominator of which is 365; and
(iii) for two (2) years after Participant's Date of Termination, Participant, his or her spouse and his or her dependents will continue to be entitled to participate in the Corporation's group health plans in which the Participant participates immediately prior to his or her Date of Termination at the same rate as paid by similarly situated employees from time to time, that the Participant timely elects continuation coverage under Section 4980B(f) of the Code; and , , that to the extent that such health plan does not permit continuation of the Participant's or his or her spouse's or dependents' participation throughout such period, the Corporation shall provide the Participant, on the first business day of each calendar quarter, in advance, with an amount which is equal to the Company's cost of providing such benefits, less the applicable employee rate of participation; and
provided
provided
further
(iv) for a period of one (1) year following the Participant's Date of Termination, the Corporation shall make certain executive-level outplacement services available to the Participant, as provided by the outplacement providers with whom the Corporation has a relationship at the time of Participant's Date of Termination.
The cash payments specified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this Section 3(b) shall be paid on the sixty-fifth (65
th
) day (or the next following business day if the sixty-fifth (65th) day is not a business day) following the Date of Termination. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that the Change in Control does not qualify as a "change in control event" within the meaning of Treasury Regulation 1.409A-3(i)(5)(i), then the payments due under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this Section 3(b) shall be paid at the time and in the form as set forth in the flush paragraph of Section 3(a) above.
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided pursuant to this Plan, this Plan shall be construed and administered in a manner which avoids duplication of compensation and benefits which may be provided under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement or individual contract or under any statute, rule or regulation. In the event a Participant is covered by any other plan, program, policy, individually negotiated agreement or other arrangement, in effect as of his or her Date of Termination, that may duplicate the payments and benefits provided for in this Section 3, the HRCC is specifically empowered to reduce or eliminate the duplicative benefits provided for under the Plan.
 
4. . The Corporation shall withhold from all payments due to the Participant (or his beneficiary or estate) hereunder all taxes which, by applicable federal, state, local or other law, the Corporation is required to withhold therefrom.
Withholding Taxes
5. . If any contest or dispute shall arise under this Plan involving termination of a Participant's employment with the Corporation or involving the failure or refusal of the Corporation to perform fully in accordance with the terms hereof, each party shall be responsible for its own legal fees and related expenses, if any, incurred in connection with such contest or dispute; , , that, with respect to any contest or dispute arising after a Change in Control, in the event the Participant substantially prevails with respect to such contest or dispute, the Corporation shall reimburse the Participant on a current basis for all reasonable legal fees and related expenses incurred by the Participant in connection with such contest or dispute, which reimbursement shall be made within thirty (30) days after the date the Corporation receives the Participant's statement for such fees and expenses.
Expenses
provided
however
6. . Nothing in this Plan shall be deemed to entitle the Participant to continued employment with the Corporation or its Subsidiaries.
Scope of Plan
7. .
Successors; Binding Agreement
(a) This Plan shall not be terminated by any Reorganization or Sale. In the event of any Reorganization or Sale, the provisions of this Plan shall be binding upon the Surviving Corporation, and such Surviving Corporation shall be treated as the Corporation hereunder.
(b) The Corporation agrees that in connection with any Reorganization or Sale it will cause any successor entity to the Corporation unconditionally to assume all of the obligations of the Corporation hereunder. Failure of the Corporation to obtain such assumption prior to the effectiveness of any such Reorganization or Sale that constitutes a Change in Control, shall be a breach of this Plan and shall constitute Good Reason hereunder and shall entitle the Participant to compensation and other benefits from the Corporation in the same amount and on the same terms as the Participant would be entitled hereunder if the Participant's employment were terminated following a Change in Control by reason of a Qualifying Termination. For purposes of implementing the foregoing, the date on which any such Reorganization or Sale becomes effective shall be deemed the date Good Reason occurs, and shall be the Date of Termination if requested by a Participant.
(c) The benefits provided under this Plan shall inure to the benefit of and be enforceable by the Participant's personal or legal representatives, executors, administrators, successors, heirs, distributees, devisees and legatees. If the Participant shall die while any amounts would be payable to the Participant hereunder had the Participant continued to live, all such amounts, unless otherwise provided herein, shall be paid in accordance with the terms of this Plan to such person or persons appointed in writing by the Participant to receive such amounts or, if no person is so appointed, to the Participant's estate.
 
8. . (a) For purposes of this Plan, all notices and other communications required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered or five (5) days after deposit in the United States mail, certified and return receipt requested, postage prepaid and addressed as follows:
Notice
If to the Participant: the address listed as the Participant's address in the Corporation's personnel files.
If to the Corporation:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
Attention: General Counsel
One Wall Street
New York, NY, 10286
or to such other address as either party may have furnished to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt.
(b) A written notice of the Participant's Date of Termination by the Corporation or the Participant, as the case may be, to the other, shall (i) indicate the specific termination provision in this Plan relied upon, (ii) to the extent applicable, set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Participant's employment under the provision so indicated and (iii) specify the termination date (which date shall be not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty (40) days after the giving of such notice). The failure by the Participant or the Corporation to set forth in such notice any fact or circumstance which contributes to a showing of Good Reason or Cause shall not waive any right of the Participant or the Corporation hereunder or preclude the Participant or the Corporation from asserting such fact or circumstance in enforcing the Participant's or the Corporation's rights hereunder.
9. .
Full Settlement; Resolution of Disputes and Costs
(a) In no event shall the Participant be obligated to seek other employment or take other action by way of mitigation of the amounts payable to the Participant under any of the provisions of this Plan and, except as provided in the Separation Agreement and Release, such amounts shall not be reduced whether or not the Participant obtains other employment.
(b) Any dispute or controversy arising under or in connection with this Plan shall be settled exclusively by arbitration in New York by three arbitrators in accordance with the commercial arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association ("") then in effect. One arbitrator shall be selected by the Corporation, the other by the Participant and the third jointly by these arbitrators (or if they are unable to agree within thirty (30) days of the commencement of arbitration, the third arbitrator will be appointed by the AAA). Judgment may be entered on the arbitrators' award in any court having jurisdiction. Notwithstanding anything in this Plan to the contrary, any arbitration panel that adjudicates any dispute, controversy or claim arising between a Participant and the
AAA
 
Corporation, or any of their delegates or successors, in respect of a Participant's Qualifying Termination that occurs after a Change in Control, will apply a standard of review to any determinations made by such person. Such standard shall apply notwithstanding the grant of full discretion hereunder to any such person or characterization of any such decision by such person as final, binding or conclusive on any party.
de
novo
de
novo
10. . Employment with the Corporation for purposes of this Plan shall include employment with any Subsidiary.
Employment with Subsidiaries
11. . The respective obligations and benefits afforded to the Corporation and the Participant as provided in Section 3 (to the extent that payments or benefits are owed as a result of a termination of employment that occurs during the term of this Plan), 4, 5, 7(c) and 9 shall survive the termination of this Plan.
Survival
12. . EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THIS PLAN IS SUBJECT TO ERISA, THE INTERPRETATION, CONSTRUCTION AND PERFORMANCE OF THIS PLAN SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED AND ENFORCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT REGARD TO THE PRINCIPLE OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS, AND APPLICABLE FEDERAL LAWS. THE INVALIDITY OR UNENFORCEABILITY OF ANY PROVISION OF THIS PLAN SHALL NOT AFFECT THE VALIDITY OR ENFORCEABILITY OF ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS PLAN, WHICH OTHER PROVISIONS SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT.
GOVERNING LAW; VALIDITY
13. . The HRCC may amend or terminate the Plan at any time without the consent of the Participants; , , that Participants must be given at least twelve (12) months' notice of amendments that are adverse to the interests of the Participants (except that termination of a Participant's participation in the Plan may be made with three (3) months' notice) or planned termination of the Plan, and , , that any termination or amendments to the Plan that are adverse to the interests of any Participant and made in anticipation of a Change of Control shall give a Participant the right to enforce his or her rights pursuant to Section 15. Notwithstanding the foregoing, during the period commencing on a Change in Control and ending on the second anniversary of the Change in Control, the Plan may not be amended or terminated by the HRCC (or any successor committee thereto), any Participant's participation hereunder may not be terminated, and the Policy (as defined below) may not be amended by the Board, in each case, in any manner which is materially adverse to the interests of any Participant without the prior written consent of such Participant.
Amendment and Termination
provided
however
provided
further
14. . The Plan shall be administered by the HRCC (or any successor committee). The HRCC (or any successor committee) shall have the authority (i) to exercise all of the powers granted to it under the Plan, (ii) to construe, interpret and implement the Plan, (iii) to prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan, (iv) to make all determinations necessary or advisable in administration of the Plan, (v) to correct any defect, supply any omission and reconcile any inconsistency in the Plan, and (vi) to delegate its responsibilities and authority hereunder to a subcommittee of the HRCC. Actions of the Board or the HRCC (or any successor committee) shall be taken by a majority vote of its members.
Interpretation and Administration
 
15. . Participants may submit claims for benefits by giving notice to the Corporation pursuant to Section 8 of this Plan. If a Participant believes that he or she has not received coverage or benefits to which he or she is entitled under the Plan, the Participant may notify the HRCC in writing of a claim for coverage or benefits. If the claim for coverage or benefits is denied in whole or in part, the HRCC shall notify the applicant in writing of such denial within thirty (30) days (which may be extended to sixty (60) days under special circumstances), with such notice setting forth: (i) the specific reasons for the denial; (ii) the Plan provisions upon which the denial is based; (iii) any additional material or information necessary for the applicant to perfect his or her claim; and (iv) the procedures for requesting a review of the denial. Upon a denial of a claim by the HRCC, the Participant may: (i) request a review of the denial by the HRCC or, where review authority has been so delegated, by such other person or entity as may be designated by the HRCC for this purpose; (ii) review any Plan documents relevant to his or her claim; and (iii) submit issues and comments to the HRCC or its delegate that are relevant to the review. Any request for review must be made in writing and received by the HRCC or its delegate within sixty (60) days of the date the applicant received notice of the initial denial, unless special circumstances require an extension of time for processing. The HRCC or its delegate will make a written ruling on the applicant's request for review setting forth the reasons for the decision and the Plan provisions upon which the denial, if appropriate, is based. This written ruling shall be made within thirty (30) days of the date the HRCC or its delegate receives the applicant's request for review unless special circumstances require an extension of time for processing, in which case a decision will be rendered as soon as possible, but not later than sixty (60) days after receipt of the request for review. All extensions of time permitted by this Section 15 will be permitted at the sole discretion of the HRCC or its delegate. If the HRCC does not provide the Participant with written notice of the denial of his or her appeal, the Participant's claim shall be deemed denied.
Claims and Appeals
16. . This Plan is intended to be, and shall be interpreted as an unfunded employee welfare plan under Section 3(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("") and Section 2520.104-24 of the Department of Labor Regulations, maintained primarily for the purpose of providing employee welfare benefits, to the extent that it provides welfare benefits, and under Sections 201, 301 and 401 of ERISA, as a plan that is unfunded and maintained primarily for the purpose of providing deferred compensation, to the extent that it provides such compensation, in each case for a select group of management or highly compensated employees (i.e., a "top hat" plan).
Type of Plan
ERISA
17. . Benefits under the Plan may not be assigned by the Participant. The terms and conditions of the Plan shall be binding on the successors and assigns of the Corporation.
Nonassignability
 
18. .
Section 409A
(a) To the extent a Participant would otherwise be entitled to any payment or benefit that under this Plan, or any plan or arrangement of the Corporation or its affiliates, constitutes "deferred compensation" subject to Section 409A and that if paid or provided during the six (6) months beginning on the date of termination of a Participant's employment would be subject to the Section 409A additional tax because the Participant is a "specified employee" (within the meaning of Section 409A and as determined by the Corporation) the payment or benefit will be paid or provided (or will commence being paid or provided, as applicable) to the Participant on the earlier of the six (6) month anniversary of the Participant's date of termination or the Participant's death. In addition, any payment or benefit due upon a termination of the Participant's employment that represents a "deferral of compensation" within the meaning of Section 409A shall be paid or provided to the Participant only upon a "separation from service" as defined in Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(h). Each severance payment made under this Plan shall be deemed to be separate payments, and amounts payable under Section 3 of this Plan shall be deemed not to be a "deferral of compensation" subject to Section 409A to the extent provided in the exceptions in Treasury Regulation Sections 1.409A-1(b)(4) ("short-term deferrals") and (b)(9) ("separation pay plans," including the exception under subparagraph (iii)) and other applicable provisions of Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1 through A-6.
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Plan or elsewhere, any payment or benefit under this Plan or otherwise that is exempt from Section 409A pursuant to final Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(b)(9)(v)(A) or (C) shall be paid or provided to the Participant only to the extent that the expenses are not incurred, or the benefits are not provided, beyond the last day of the Participant's second taxable year following the Participant's taxable year in which the "separation from service" occurs; and provided further that such expenses are reimbursed no later than the last day of the Participant's third taxable year following the taxable year in which the Participant's "separation from service" occurs. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, to the extent any expense reimbursement or the provision of any in-kind benefit under this Plan is determined to be subject to Section 409A, the amount of any such expenses eligible for reimbursement, or the provision of any in-kind benefit, in one (1) calendar year shall not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement in any other taxable year (except for any lifetime or other aggregate limitation applicable to medical expenses), in no event shall any expenses be reimbursed after the last day of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the Participant incurred such expenses, and in no event shall any right to reimbursement or the provision of any in-kind benefit be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Plan or elsewhere, in the event that a Participant waives the provisions of another severance or change in control agreement or arrangement to participate in this Plan and such participation in this Plan is later determined to be a "substitution" (within the meaning of Section 409A) for the benefits under such agreement or arrangement, then any payment or benefit under this Plan that such Participant becomes entitled to receive during the remainder of the waived term of such agreement or arrangement shall be payable in accordance with the time and form of payment provisions of such agreement or arrangement.
19. . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, any payments or benefits payable to a Participant under this Plan shall be subject to reduction to the extent that such payment or benefit would exceed the amount
Certain Reductions; Recoupment
 
permitted to be paid under the Corporation's Policy Regarding Shareholder Approval of Future Senior Officer Severance Arrangements as in effect as of the date of termination or, if earlier, immediately prior to a Change in Control (the "Policy"), as in effect from time to time, and such amounts are not approved by, or are not submitted for the approval of, the Corporation's shareholders in accordance with such policy. Notwithstanding anything in this Plan to the contrary, in no event shall any payment or benefit under this Plan be paid, provided or accrued, if any such payment, provision or accrual would be in violation of applicable law, rule or regulation (""). In addition, to the extent that any provision of Applicable Law or any recoupment policy or practice of the Corporation as in effect from time to time requires any payments or benefits paid (or provided or to be paid or provided) to a Participant to be forfeited or recouped from the Participant, each such payment or benefit shall be subject to forfeiture or recoupment, as applicable, and such Participant's right to receive or retain each such payment or benefit shall terminate. Without limiting the foregoing, if the Corporation reasonably believes that a Participant engaged in fraud, or directly or indirectly caused or contributed to any financial restatement or other irregularity during the performance period to which a cash incentive award paid hereunder relates, the Corporation may require the Participant to repay some or all of such award within three (3) years after the award date.
Applicable Law
20. . The Plan shall be effective as of July 13, 2010.
Effective Date
 
(a) Anything in this Plan to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that (i) any payment, award, benefit or distribution (or any acceleration of any payment, award, benefit or distribution) by the Corporation (or any of its affiliated entities) or any entity which effectuates a Change in Control (or any of its affiliated entities) to or for the benefit of Executive (whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise) (the "") would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (the ""), and (ii) the reduction of the amounts payable to Executive under this Agreement to the maximum amount that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to the Excise Tax (the "") would provide the Executive with a greater after tax amount than if such amounts were not reduced, then the amounts payable to Executive under this Agreement shall be reduced (but not below zero) to the Safe Harbor Cap. The reduction of the amounts payable hereunder, if applicable, shall be made by reducing first the payments under paragraph (i) and then paragraph (ii) of Section 3(a) or Section 3(b), as applicable, unless an alternative method of reduction is elected by the Participant within thirty (30) days after first becoming eligible to participate in this Plan.
Payments
Excise Tax
Safe Harbor Cap
(b) All determinations required to be made under this Appendix A, including the reduction of the Payments to the Safe Harbor Cap and the assumptions to be utilized in arriving at such determinations, shall be made by a public accounting firm that is retained by the Corporation as of the date immediately prior to the Change in Control (the "") which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Corporation and the Participant within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt of notice from the Corporation or the Participant that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time as is requested by the Corporation (collectively, the ""). For the avoidance of doubt, the Accounting Firm may use the Option Redetermination amount in determining the reduction of the Payments to the Safe Harbor Cap. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event (i) the HRCC shall determine prior to the Change in Control that the Accounting Firm is precluded from performing such services under applicable auditor independence rules or (ii) the Audit Committee of the Board determines that it does not want the Accounting Firm to perform such services because of auditor independence concerns or (iii) the Accounting Firm is serving as accountant or auditor for the person(s) effecting the Change in Control, the HRCC shall appoint another nationally recognized public accounting firm to make the determinations required hereunder (which accounting firm shall then be referred to as the Accounting Firm hereunder). All fees and expenses of the Accounting Firm shall be borne solely by the Corporation, and the Corporation shall enter into any agreement reasonably requested by the Accounting Firm in connection with the performance of the services hereunder. If the Accounting Firm determines that no Excise Tax is payable by a Participant, it shall furnish the Participant with a written opinion to such effect, and to the effect that failure to report the Excise Tax, if any, on the Participant's applicable federal income tax return will not result in the imposition of a negligence or similar penalty. In the event the Accounting Firm determines that the Payments shall be reduced to the Safe Harbor Cap, it shall furnish the Participant with a written opinion to such effect. The Determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Corporation and the Participant.
Accounting Firm
Determination
In the event that the Corporation determines that the value of any accelerated vesting of stock options held by the Participant shall be redetermined within the context of Treasury Regulation 1.280G-1 Q/A 33 (the ""), the Participant shall (i) file with the Internal Revenue Service an amended federal income tax return that claims a refund of the overpayment of the Excise Tax attributable to such Option Redetermination and (ii) promptly pay the refunded Excise Tax to the Corporation; that the Corporation shall pay on a current basis all reasonable professional fees incurred in the preparation of the Participant's amended federal income tax return. In the event that amounts payable to the Participant under this Plan were reduced pursuant to paragraph (a) and subsequently the Participant determines there has been an Option Redetermination that reduces the value of the Payments attributable to such options, the Corporation shall pay to the Participant (on the first business day of the calendar month following the month the Option Redetermination is made) any amounts payable under this Plan that were not previously paid solely as a result of the second paragraph of Paragraph (a) up to the Safe Harbor Cap plus interest, from the date the Participant files the amended return as provided above, at the three (3) month Treasury Bill rate.
Option Redetermination
provided
 
[NOTE: The following Agreement is intended for use for US-based Participants. Non-US-based Participants will be subject to an Agreement in the form normally used in the relevant jurisdiction by the Corporation, the effect of which is substantially similar to this Exhibit A.]
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") and ("") agree as follows:
                                        
Executive
1. . Executive's employment with the Corporation will terminate effective .
Date of Termination
[Date]
2. . Executive agrees to make himself/herself reasonably available to the Corporation to respond to requests by the Corporation for information concerning litigation, regulatory inquiry or Investigation, involving facts or events relating to the Corporation that may be within his/her knowledge. Executive will cooperate fully with the Corporation in connection with any and all future litigation or regulatory proceedings brought by or against the Corporation to the extent the Corporation reasonably deems Executive's cooperation necessary. Executive will be entitled to reimbursement of reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (not including counsel fees) incurred in connection with fulfilling his/her obligations under this Section 2.
Cooperation
3. . In consideration of Executive's undertakings herein, the Corporation will pay an amount equal to $ in accordance with Section 3 of the Corporation's Executive Severance Plan (the ""), less required deductions (including, but not limited to, federal, state and local tax withholdings) as separation/severance pay (the ""). The Severance Payment will be paid in accordance with the Severance Plan. Payment of the Severance Payment is contingent upon the execution of this Agreement by Executive and Executive's compliance with all terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Severance Plan. Executive agrees that if this Agreement does not become effective, the Corporation shall not be required to make any further payments to Executive pursuant to this Agreement or the Severance Plan and shall be entitled to recover all payments already made by it (including interest thereon).
Severance Benefit
                    
Severance Plan
Severance Payment
4. . Executive represents that he/she has returned to the Corporation all property or information, including, without limitation, all reports, files, memos, plans, lists, or other records (whether electronically stored or not) belonging to the Corporation or its affiliates, including copies, extracts or other documents derived from such property or information. Executive will immediately forfeit all rights and benefits under this Agreement and the Severance Plan, including, without limitation, the right to receive or retain any Severance Payment if Executive, directly or indirectly (i) at any time discloses to any third party or entity any trade secrets or other proprietary or confidential information pertaining to the Corporation or any of its affiliates or uses such secrets or information without the prior written consent of the General Counsel of the Corporation; or; (ii) Executive breaches any of Executive's post termination obligations to the Corporation pursuant to an individual agreement, including but not limited to non-solicitation, confidentiality and/or non-competition
Confidential Information; Non-Solicitation; Non-Compete
restrictions (which are incorporated herein by reference); or (iii) to the extent that Executive does not have post termination non-solicitation, confidentiality and/or non-competition obligations in an individual agreement, during the twelve (12) month period after the Date of Termination (A) solicits, influences, encourages, induces, recruits or causes any employee of the Corporation or any person who was an employee of the Corporation within the six (6) month period before Executive's Date of Termination to resign from the Corporation or to apply for or accept employment with any Competitive Enterprise; or (B) solicits or attempt to solicit any of the Corporation's clients and/or customers for whom Executive or the Corporation performed services or actively solicited work from during the six (6) month period before Executive's Date of Termination, to transact business with a Competitive Enterprise or to reduce or refrain from doing any business with the Corporation or otherwise interferes with or damages any relationship between the Corporation and any such client or customers. For purposes of this Agreement, "" means any business enterprise that either (A) engages in any activity that competes anywhere with any activity that the Corporation or its affiliates is then engaged in or (B) holds a 5% or greater equity, voting or profit participation interest in any enterprise that engages in such a competitive activity and were within the scope of Executive's responsibilities within the twelve (12) months preceding Executive's termination of employment.
Competitive Enterprise
Nothing in this Agreement shall prevent or prohibit Executive or the Corporation from responding to an order, subpoena, other legal process or regulatory inquiry directed to them or from providing information to or making a filing with a governmental or regulatory body. Executive agrees that upon learning of any order, subpoena or other legal process seeking information that would otherwise be prohibited from disclosure under this Agreement, he/she will promptly notify the Corporation, in writing, directed to the Corporation's General Counsel. In the event disclosure is so required, Executive agrees not to oppose any action by the Corporation to seek or obtain a protective order or other appropriate remedy.
5. Executive hereby represents that he/she has not filed any action, complaint, charge, grievance or arbitration against the Corporation or any of its affiliates in connection with any matters relating, directly or indirectly, to his/her employment, and covenants and agrees not to file any such action, complaint or arbitration or commence any other judicial or arbitral proceedings against the Corporation or any of its affiliates with respect to events occurring prior to the termination of his/her employment with the Corporation or any affiliates thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing contained in this Agreement shall prevent Executive from filing a charge or lawsuit challenging the validity of the waiver and release contained herein under OWBPA with respect to claims under ADEA or filing a charge of discrimination with, or participate in, an investigation or proceeding conducted by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (""), but Executive will not be entitled to any monetary or other relief from the EEOC or from any court as a result of litigation brought on the basis of or in connection with such charge, except if, and to the extent that, the release and waiver contained in this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable (in which event, Corporation will be entitled to restitution or set off for the amounts paid to Executive hereunder as and to the extent determined by the court).
EEOC
 
6. . Effective on , the Corporation will cease all health benefit coverage and other benefit coverage for Executive.
Effective Date
[Date]
7. . Effective as of the Effective Date, and in return for the consideration set forth above, Executive agrees not to sue or file any action, claim, or lawsuit against the Corporation, agrees not to pursue, seek to recover or recover any alleged damages, seek to obtain or obtain any other form of relief or remedy with respect to, and cause the dismissal or withdrawal of, any lawsuit, action, claim, or charge against the Corporation, and Executive agrees to waive all claims and release and forever discharge the Corporation, its officers, directors, subsidiaries, affiliates, parents, attorneys, shareholders and employees from any claims, demands, actions, causes of action or liabilities for compensatory damages or any other relief or remedy, and obligations of any kind or nature whatsoever, based on any matter, cause or thing, relating in any way, directly or indirectly, to his/her employment, from the beginning of time through the Effective Date of this Agreement, whether known or unknown, fixed or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, and whether arising from tort, statute, or contract, including, but not limited to, any claims arising under or pursuant to the [California Fair Employment and Housing Act,] Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil Rights Act of 1871, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Americans with Disabilities Act, the Rehabilitation Act, the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, the Occupational Safety & Health Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act of 1990 (""), the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, Section 806 of the Corporate and Criminal Fraud Accountability Act of 2002, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (""), New York State Labor Law, New York State Human Rights Law, New York Human Rights Law, and any other state, federal, city, county or local statute, rule, regulation, ordinance or order, or the national or local law of any foreign country, any claim for future consideration for employment with the Corporation, any claims for attorneys' fees and costs and any employment rights or entitlement law, and any claims for wrongful discharge, intentional infliction of emotional distress, defamation, libel or slander, payment of wages, outrageous behavior, breach of contract or any duty allegedly owed to Executive, discrimination based upon race, color, ethnicity, sex, age, national origin, religion, disability, sexual orientation, or another unlawful criterion or circumstance, and any other theory of recovery. It is the intention of the parties to make this release as broad and as general as the law permits.
General Release
OWBPA
ADEA
Executive acknowledges that he/she is aware of, has read, has had explained to him/her by his/her attorneys, understands and expressly waives any and all rights he/she has or may have under Section 1542 of the California Civil Code, which provides as follows:
[
"A general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his/her favor at the time of executing the release, which if known by him must have materially affected his/her settlement with the debtor."
]
8. Executive acknowledges that he/she may later discover facts different from or in addition to those which he/she knows or believes to be true now, and he/she agrees that, in such event, this Agreement shall nevertheless remain effective in all respects, notwithstanding such different or additional facts or the discovery of those facts.
 
9. This Agreement may not be introduced in any legal or administrative proceeding, or other similar forum, except one concerning a breach of this Agreement or the Severance Plan.
10. Executive acknowledges that Executive has made an independent investigation of the facts, and does not rely on any statement or representation of the Corporation in entering into this Agreement, other than those set forth herein.
11. Executive agrees that, without limiting the Corporation's remedies, should he/she commence, continue, join in, or in any other manner attempt to assert any claim released in connection herewith, or otherwise violate in a material fashion any of the terms of this Agreement, the Corporation shall not be required to make any further payments to the Executive pursuant to this Agreement or the Severance Plan and shall be entitled to recover all payments already made by it (including interest thereon), in addition to all damages, attorneys' fees and costs the Corporation incurs in connection with Executive's breach of this Agreement. Executive further agrees that the Corporation shall be entitled to the repayments and recovery of damages described above without waiver of or prejudice to the release granted by him/her in connection with this Agreement, and that his/her violation or breach of any provision of this Agreement shall forever release and discharge the Corporation from the performance of its obligations arising from the Agreement.
12. Executive has been advised and acknowledges that he/she has been given [twenty-one (21) [forty-five (45)] days to sign this Agreement, he/she has seven (7) days following his/her signing of this Agreement to revoke and cancel the terms and conditions contained herein, and the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall not become effective or enforceable until the revocation period has expired (the "").
Effective Date
13. Executive acknowledges that Executive has been advised hereby to consult with, and has consulted with, an attorney of his/her choice prior to signing this Agreement.
14. Executive acknowledges that Executive has fully read this Agreement, understands the contents of this Agreement, and agrees to its terms and conditions of his/her own free will, knowingly and voluntarily, and without any duress or coercion.
15. Executive understands that this Agreement includes a final general release and restrictive covenants related to confidentiality, non-solicitation and non-competition (including any confidentiality, non-solicitation and/or non-competition restrictions contained in an individual agreement between Executive and the Corporation, which are incorporated herein by reference), and that Executive can make no further claims against the Corporation or the persons listed in Section 7 of this Agreement relating in any way, directly or indirectly, to his/her employment. Executive also understands that this Agreement precludes Executive from recovering any damages or other relief as a result of any lawsuit, grievance, charge or claim brought on Executive's behalf against the Corporation or the persons listed in Section 7 of this Agreement.
16. Executive acknowledges that Executive is receiving adequate consideration (that is in addition to what Executive is otherwise entitled to) for signing this Agreement.
 
17. This Agreement and the Severance Plan constitute the complete understanding between Executive and the Corporation regarding the subject matter hereof and thereof. No other promises or agreements regarding the subject matter hereof and thereof will be binding unless signed by Executive and the Corporation.
18. Executive and the Corporation agree that all notices or other communications required or permitted to be given under the terms of this Agreement shall be given in accordance with Section 9 of the Severance Plan.
19. Executive and the Corporation agree that any disputes relating to any matters covered under the terms of this Agreement shall be resolved in accordance with Section 10 of the Severance Plan.
20. By entering into this Agreement, the Corporation does not admit and specifically denies any liability, wrongdoing or violation of any law, statute, regulation or policy, and it is expressly understood and agreed that this Agreement is being entered into solely for the purpose of amicably resolving all matters of any kind whatsoever between Executive and the Corporation.
21. In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
22. The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive any termination of this Agreement to the extent necessary for the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
23. Unless expressly specified elsewhere in this Agreement, this Agreement shall be governed by and construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without reference to the principles of conflict of law.
24. This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts.
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
July , 2010
    
Name Address
Dear :
                    
As you know, we have established The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Severance Plan ("Executive Severance Plan"). The Executive Severance Plan is designed to put eligible senior executives on a level playing field with respect to change in control and severance pay and benefit protection, and is intended to replace the various legacy and individually negotiated agreements we now have.
[For Named Executive Officers With a Change In Control Agreement From Mellon Financial Corporation
As part of the process of rolling out the new Executive Severance Plan, this letter provides you with three (3) years written notice of the cancellation by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation of your [DATE] "Change in Control" Agreement entered into with Mellon Financial Corporation, as amended (the "Agreement"). The effective date of the termination will be [DATE]; provided that, in accordance with the Agreement, if a Change in Control (as defined therein) occurs during the term of the Agreement, the Agreement will continue in effect for a period of three years after such Change in Control.
OR
For Named Executive Officers With a Change In Control Agreement From The Bank of New York Company, Inc.
As part of the process of rolling out the new Executive Severance Plan, this letter provides written notice that The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation will not extend your [DATE} "Change in Control" agreement with The Bank of New York Company, Inc., as amended ("Change in Control Agreement"), beyond December 31, 2010. In accordance with the Agreement, in the event a Change in Control, as defined in the Agreement, occurs on or prior to December 31, 2010, the Agreement will continue in effect for a period of 24 months after such Change in Control.]
If you would like to participate in the new Executive Severance Plan you will be required to waive any coverage and all rights and benefits that may be available to you under your existing Change in Control Agreement[, and agree to the additional items set forth on Appendix A to this letter]. You will not be included as a participant in the Executive Severance Plan, either now or in the future, unless you waive such coverage and such other rights and benefits under the Agreement (as well as the [three (3) year] [any] notice period for canceling the Agreement) [and agree as set forth on Appendix A], at this time. If you so agree, please sign both copies of this letter indicating your agreement, while keeping one copy of this letter for yourself and returning the other signed copy to me. You must return a signed copy of the letter to me on or before August 12, 2010 in order to become eligible to participate in our new Executive Severance Plan. Your eligibility to participate in the Executive Severance Plan would commence as of August 12, 2010, at which time your Change in Control Agreement would also terminate. A signature transmitted by facsimile will be deemed an original signature (Fax ).
            
Please feel free to contact me if you have any questions.
Sincerely yours,
By signing below I agree to terminate my Change in Control Agreement and waive any coverage and all rights and benefits available to me under such Agreement, acknowledge and agree that no payments or benefits are vested, due or owed under my Change in Control Agreement [and further agree to the terms set forth on Appendix A to this letter]:
 

Exhibit 99.3
Exhibit A
It is the Policy of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") that BNY Mellon shall not, subject to the terms and conditions set forth below, enter into or adopt a Future Severance Arrangement with a Senior Officer that provides for Additional Severance Benefits in an amount exceeding 2.99 times the sum of the Senior Officer's annual base salary and target bonus for the year of termination or, if greater, for the year before termination (the ""), unless such Future Severance Agreement is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes cast at an annual or special meeting of the shareholders of BNY Mellon at which a quorum is present. For this purpose, the amount of salary and target bonus shall be determined without regard to whether any such amount is currently payable or is deferred, and without regard to the form of payment (e.g., in cash, equity or other property). For purposes of determining the Severance Benefit Limitation above, in the event no target bonus has been established for a Senior Officer for either the year of termination or the year before termination, target bonus shall be determined based on the average annual bonus paid to a Senior Officer for the three most recent years before the year of termination.
Severance Benefits Limitation
For purposes of this Policy the following terms shall have the following meanings:
means (i) severance amounts that would be payable in cash to a Senior Officer, including payments in lieu of medical benefits and amounts paid for any tax gross-ups such as reimbursement of excise taxes in connection with the Internal Revenue Code Sections 280G and 4999, due to termination of employment, and (ii) special benefits or perquisites provided to a Senior Officer at the time of such Senior Officer's termination of employment, including the estimated value of future consulting fees and the present value of additional age and service credited for benefit accrual under any pension or retirement plan. The term "Additional Severance Benefits" includes both lump-sum payments and the estimated present value of any periodic payments made or special benefits or perquisites provided following the date of termination of such Senior Officer's employment.
"Additional Severance Benefits"
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "Additional Severance Benefits" shall not include (a) the value of any accelerated vesting or delivery of any equity-based award or non-qualified deferred compensation amounts outstanding as of the date of termination, (b) compensation and benefits (including pension and retirement benefits) earned, accrued or otherwise provided for services rendered through the date of termination (other than any such compensation or benefits awarded at the time of and in connection with the Senior Officer's termination of employment), including any pro-rated annual incentive for the year of termination, (c) the value of any medical benefits provided upon or following termination of employment, (d) amounts paid for post-termination covenants (such as covenants not to compete or not to solicit employees or customers); (e) any
payment that the Board of Directors of BNY Mellon (the "Board") or a committee thereof determines in good faith to be a reasonable payment in settlement of any claim made or threatened against BNY Mellon; and (f) any payments (including reimbursement of expenses and legal fees) pursuant to any charter provision, contract, policy or other arrangement providing for indemnification.
means a compensatory plan, contract or arrangement between BNY Mellon (or one of its subsidiaries) and a Senior Officer or applicable to a Senior Officer or a severance plan, contract or arrangement between BNY Mellon (or one of its subsidiaries) and a Senior Officer or applicable to a Senior Officer related to the termination of employment with BNY Mellon (or one of its subsidiaries), in either case, entered into or made effective after the effective date of this Policy. "Future Severance Arrangement" includes any modification, renewal or extension of any such plan, contract or arrangement that is in effect as of the effective date of this Policy which materially increases Benefits. "Future Severance Arrangement" does not include any compensatory plan, contract or arrangement or any severance plan, contract or arrangement as to which BNY Mellon (or one of its subsidiaries) becomes a party or becomes obligated (including by operation of law) after the effective date of this Policy pursuant to or in connection with an acquisition or merger; , that any modification, renewal or extension of any such plan, contract or arrangement after the date of such acquisition or merger which materially increases Benefits shall be a "Future Severance Arrangement".
"Future Severance Arrangement"
provided
"" means a person who is an executive officer of BNY Mellon from time to time, including a person who becomes an executive officer at the time of execution or effectiveness of a Future Severance Agreement.
Senior Officer
The Board delegates to the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board full authority to make determinations regarding the interpretation of the provisions of this Policy, in its sole discretion, including, without limitation, the determination of the value of any noncash items, as well as the present value of any cash or non-cash benefits payable over a period of time.
In the event that a Future Severance Arrangement does not require shareholder approval under this Policy at the time it is entered into or becomes effective, but the Benefits payable to a Senior Officer under such Future Severance Arrangement (as determined at the time of termination of employment) would exceed the Severance Benefits Limitation, BNY Mellon shall seek shareholder approval of the payment of that portion of the Benefits in excess of the Severance Benefits Limitation at the next annual or special meeting of shareholders and shall not pay such excess amount unless approved by shareholders. BNY Mellon shall have no obligation to call a special meeting of shareholders to vote on such matter.
The Board shall have the right to amend, waive or cancel this Policy at any time in its sole discretion. Any such action shall be promptly disclosed by BNY Mellon.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100720065846.txt.gz
TIME:20100720065846
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 20, 2010, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2010 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, /, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS SECOND QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.55 OR $668 MILLION VS. $0.23 OR $267 MILLION IN THE SECOND QUARTER OF 2009
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported second quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $668 million, or $0.55 per common share, compared with $267 million, or $0.23 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009 and $601 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the first quarter of 2010.
NEW YORK, July 20, 2010 
"Our focus on winning new business and providing exceptional client service resulted in solid growth in securities servicing fees and continued long-term asset inflows for our asset and wealth management businesses. Our conservative risk profile is reflected in our excellent credit quality and strong capital generation," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"We continue to invest in our businesses. We just completed our Global Investment Servicing acquisition and expect to close on the acquisition of BHF's German asset servicing operation in August. In addition, we received regulatory approval for the opening of our asset management joint venture in Shanghai, expanded our asset management licensing in Korea, and announced our agreement to acquire a wealth management firm in Toronto," added Mr. Kelly.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2010 and are compared to the second quarter of 2009, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for detailed business segment information.
Second Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
The decreased to $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 compared with $35 million in the first quarter of 2010. During the second quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses increased $7 million and net charge-offs totaled $13 million.Nonperforming assets at June 30, 2010 totaled $406 million, a decrease of $53 million, or 12%, compared with March 31, 2010 primarily due to repayments.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
The was 30.2% in the second quarter of 2010.
effective tax rate
The was $114 million at June 30, 2010 compared with an unrealized net of tax loss of $191 million at March 31, 2010. The improvement in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was due to tightening credit spreads and a decline in interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our investment securities portfolio
 
 
3
 On July 20, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 10, 2010 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 30, 2010.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $21.8 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.0 trillion in assets under management, services $11.6 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through June 30, 2010 and are available at (Investor RelationsFinancial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on July 20, 2010. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on July 20, 2010. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 20, 2010 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Tuesday, Aug. 3, 2010 by dialing (866) 360-7726 (U.S.) or (203) 369-0178 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
Nonperforming assets
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $53 million compared with March 31, 2010. The decrease primarily resulted from repayments by financial institutions, partially offset by the addition of other residential mortgages.
Discontinued operations
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), its national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Release are presented on a continuing operations basis. This business, which was previously reported in the Other segment, no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In the second quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $10 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans held for sale.
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $658 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the second quarter of 2010 compared with $176 million, or $0.15 per common share, in the second quarter of 2009 and $559 million, or $0.46 per common share, in the first quarter of 2010.
Regulatory Reform
In July 2010, Congress enacted regulatory reform legislation known as the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, which the President is expected to sign into law on July 21, 2010. This new law broadly affects the financial services industry by establishing a framework for systemic risk oversight, creating a resolution authority, mandating higher capital and liquidity requirements, requiring banks to pay increased fees to regulatory agencies and containing numerous other provisions aimed at strengthening the sound operation of the financial services sector. Many aspects of the law are subject to further rulemaking and will take effect over several years, making it difficult to anticipate the overall financial impact to BNY Mellon or across the industry.
 
9
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible total assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses, the FDIC special assessment and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as benefit of tax settlement. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors with the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interests related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the benefit of tax settlements permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
 
10
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business segment basis.
 
 
 
 
 
N/A  Not applicable,
 
11
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
12
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the economic outlook, reinvestment in our businesses, intended acquisitions and joint ventures, including the expected impact on earnings and the timing of anticipated closing, and our preliminary assessment of the impact of regulatory reform legislation. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this earnings release speak only as of July 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100726163242.txt.gz
TIME:20100726163242
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net investment securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, intangible amortization expenses, the FDIC special assessment, special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages and the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net investment securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these sectors is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. Management of the investment securities portfolio is a shared service contained in the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the segment results. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain assets management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
Revenue: Investment securities gains (losses) and income from consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest.
Noninterest expense: Special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, M&I expenses, intangible amortization expense, FDIC special assessment and restructuring charges.
Earnings per share: Special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, M&I expenses, restructuring charges, preferred dividends, net investment securities gains (losses) and discrete tax benefits.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SECOND QUARTER 2010 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 2Q10 vs. 1Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
- Long-term inflows $12 billion in 2Q10
- Short-term outflows $17 billion in 2Q10
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONS OF CONSOLIDATED ASSET MANAGEMENT FUNDS
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167 (ASC 810). Adoption of this new standard resulted in an increase in consolidated total assets on our balance sheet at June 30, 2010 of $13.4 billion, or an increase of approximately 6% from Dec. 31, 2009.
We also separately disclosed the following on the income statement.
 
These line items were previously disclosed on the income statement as:
 
REGULATORY REFORM
In July 2010, Congress enacted regulatory reform legislation known as the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, which the President is expected to sign into law on July 21, 2010. This new law broadly affects the financial services industry by establishing a framework for systemic risk oversight, creating a resolution authority, mandating higher capital and liquidity requirements, requiring banks to pay increased fees to regulatory agencies and containing numerous other provisions aimed at strengthening the sound operation of the financial services sector. Many aspects of the law are subject to further rulemaking and will take effect over several years, making it difficult to anticipate the overall financial impact to BNY Mellon or across the industry.
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At June 30, 2010, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $53.5 billion. The unrealized pre-tax gain on our securities portfolio was $292 million at June 30, 2010 compared with an unrealized pre-tax loss of $247 million at March 31, 2010 and an unrealized pre-tax loss of $7.7 billion at June 30, 2009.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING ACTIVITIES REVENUE
 
CAPITAL
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $53 million compared with March 31, 2010. The decrease primarily resulted from repayments by financial institutions, partially offset by the addition of other residential mortgages.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 compared with $35 million in the first quarter of 2010. During the second quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses increased $7 million and net charge-offs totaled $13 million.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), its national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Review are presented on a continuing operations basis. This business, which was previously reported in the Other segment, no longer fit our strategic focus on our asset management and securities servicing businesses. In the second quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $10 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans held for sale.
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
See BNY Mellon's 2009 Annual Report for information on the accounting principles of our business segments. In addition, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the segment results.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations and related entities)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 2Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, expectations with respect to the economic outlook, reinvestment in our businesses, intended acquisitions and joint ventures and the timing of anticipated closing, the anticipated settlement of the forward sale agreement, credit ratings of the RMBS in the Grantor Trust and our preliminary assessment of the impact of regulatory reform legislation. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of July 20, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity ("the merger").
The results prior to the consummation of the merger reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business segment results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the segment trends data versus segment data on the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Asset Management segment.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. The financial results for all periods were restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing segment.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/ Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008, and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009.
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Merger & integration/Intangible amortization expenses  Both expense categories increased beginning in the second/third quarters of 2007 as a result of the merger.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008. Minor amounts were recorded in other periods.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any segment.
Average Assets:
In business segments where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business segment basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated July 20, 2010, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ASSET SERVICING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
ISSUER SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
CLEARING SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
TREASURY SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
OTHER - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management segment to the Other segment.
During the first quarter of 2009, the financial results of the Execution business have been moved from the Clearing Services segment to the Other segment. On June 30, 2009, we adopted
discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida; previously, the financial results were included in the Other segment. On January 15, 2010,
we completed the sale of MUNB. Historical segment results have been restated to reflect all of these changes.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20100817160634.txt.gz
TIME:20100817160634
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e) .
Waiver of Existing Change in Control Agreements
Effective as of August 12, 2010, each of Robert P. Kelly, Thomas P. Gibbons, Gerald L. Hassell and Steven G. Elliott, who are named executive officers of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (i) agreed to waive the remaining term of their change in control severance agreements with BNY Mellon and (ii) commenced participation in BNY Mellon's Executive Severance Plan, which is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to the Form 8-K filed by BNY Mellon on July 16, 2010.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20101018161041.txt.gz
TIME:20101018161041
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03  AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR BYLAWS; CHANGE IN FISCAL YEAR.
On October 12, 2010, the Board of Directors of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") amended the By-Laws of the Corporation (the "By-Laws") to delete provisions which expired on July 1, 2010, which was the third anniversary of the merger of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and Mellon Financial Corporation, and to make certain conforming amendments. The amended provisions are as follows: Section 11 of Article One; Sections 2, 4, 5 and 11 of Article Two; Sections 2 through 7 and 9 of Article Three; Sections 1 through 3, 9 and 10 of Article Four; and Sections 1 through 4, 6 and 7 of Article Five. A copy of the amendments to the By-Laws are attached as Exhibit 3.1.
Item 9.01  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 11. NOTICE OF BUSINESS TO BE PRESENTED AT STOCKHOLDER MEETINGS.
(a) . The proposal of business to be considered by the stockholders at an annual meeting of stockholders may be made (x) pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting, (y) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (z) by any stockholder of the Corporation who was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this Section 11, who is entitled to vote at the meeting and who has complied with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 11. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to clause (z) of the preceding sentence, such business must be a proper matter for stockholder action and the stockholder must have given timely notice in compliance with the following requirements in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation:
Annual Meetings of Stockholders
(i) To be timely, a stockholder's notice given pursuant to this Section 11 must be received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation, addressed to the Secretary, not less than 90 calendar days or more than 120 calendar days before the anniversary date of the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, if the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented has been changed by more than 30 calendar days from the date of the most recent previous annual meeting, a stockholder's notice shall be considered timely if so received by the Corporation (A) on or before the later of (1) 120 calendar days before the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented or (2) 30 calendar days following the first public announcement by the Corporation of the date of such annual meeting and (B) not later than 15 calendar days prior to the scheduled mailing date of the Corporation's proxy materials for such annual meeting. In no event shall the public announcement of an
;
provided that the first such anniversary date occurring after the effective date of these By-Laws shall be deemed to be March 10, 2008
.
Section 2. NUMBER. Board of Directors shall consist of such number of Directors as shall be fixed from time to time by a majority vote of the Board of Directors.
Except as otherwise provided in Article Five, the
The
entire
Section 4. NOMINATION. Nominations for the election of Directors may be made by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof or any officer of the Corporation to whom the Board of Directors or such committee shall have delegated such authority. Upon proper notice given to the Corporation, nominations may also be made by any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of Directors. Written notice of a stockholder's intent to make a nomination or nominations for Director must be given to the Corporation either by United States mail or personal delivery to the Secretary of the Corporation (i) in the case of an annual meeting, not less than 90 calendar days or more than 120 calendar days before the anniversary date of the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting and (ii) in the case of a special meeting at which directors are to be elected, not later than the close of business on the tenth calendar day following the earlier of the day on which notice of the date of the meeting was mailed and the day on which public announcement of the date of the meeting was made. Notwithstanding clause (i) of the preceding sentence, if the date of the annual meeting at which Directors are to be elected has been changed by more than 30 calendar days from the date of the most recent previous annual meeting, a stockholder's notice of intent to make a nomination or nominations for Director shall be considered timely if so received by the Corporation (A) on or before the later of (x) 120 calendar days before the date of the annual meeting at which such business is to be presented or (y) 30 calendar days following the first public announcement by the Corporation of the date of such annual meeting and (B) not later than 15 calendar days prior to the scheduled mailing date of the Corporation's proxy materials for such annual meeting. The notice must include: (1) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination and a representation that the stockholder is and will at the time of the annual meeting be a holder of record of Common Stock entitled to vote at such annual meeting and that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to make the nomination or nominations set forth in the notice, (2) the name and address of the person or persons to be nominated for election as Director and such other information regarding the proposed nominee or nominees as would be required to be included in a proxy
;
provided that the first such anniversary date occurring after the effective date of these By-Laws shall be deemed to be March 10, 2008
statement filed pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission, (3) a description of all arrangements or undertakings between the stockholder and each proposed nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nomination or nominations are to be made by the stockholder and (4) a consent signed by each of the proposed nominees agreeing to serve as a Director if so elected. The Board of Directors will be under no obligation to recommend a proposed nominee, even though the notice as set forth above has been given.
Section 5. VACANCIES. vacancy on the Board of Directors resulting from death, resignation, disqualification or removal from office or other cause, as well as any vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of Directors which occurs between annual meetings of the stockholders at which Directors are elected, shall be filled only by a majority vote of the remaining Directors then in office, whether or not a quorum, except that those vacancies resulting from removal from office by a vote of the stockholders may be filled by a vote of the stockholders at the same meeting at which such removal occurs. The Directors chosen to fill vacancies shall hold office for a term expiring at the end of the next annual meeting of stockholders. No decrease in the number of Directors constituting the Board of Directors shall shorten the term of any incumbent Director.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, any
Any
Section 11. QUORUM; BOARD ACTION. A majority of the Board of Directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting. Unless otherwise provided by law, by these By-Laws or in the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, any action of the Board may be taken upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors present at a duly convened meeting or upon the unanimous written consent of all Directors. In case at any meeting of the Board of Directors a quorum shall not be present, a majority of the members of the Board of Directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time until a quorum shall be present.
entire
(as defined in Article Five)
Section 2. EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members an Executive Committee which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors during the intervals between the meetings thereof. All acts done and powers conferred by the Executive Committee shall be deemed to be, and may be certified as being, done by or conferred under authority of the Board of Directors.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 3. AUDIT COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, an Audit Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Audit Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Audit Committee.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 4. CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND NOMINATING COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, a Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
functions specified in the Charter of the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee.
Section 5. HUMAN RESOURCES AND COMPENSATION COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, none of whom shall be an officer of the Corporation, a Human Resources and Compensation Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Human Resources and Compensation Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Human Resources and Compensation Committee.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 6. RISK COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, a Risk Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Risk Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Risk Committee.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 7. CORPORATE SOCIAL RESPONSIBILITY COMMITTEE. Board of Directors shall appoint from among its members, a Corporate Social Responsibility Committee, which, so far as may be permitted by law and except as specifically limited by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 1 of this Article Three, shall have all the powers and responsibilities and shall perform the functions specified in the Charter of the Corporate Social Responsibility Committee, as approved by the Board of Directors, and in any supplemental statement that the Board of Directors may adopt with regards to the functions of the Corporate Social Responsibility Committee.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 9. TERM; VACANCIES. committee members appointed by the Board of Directors shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors; and (b) the Board of Directors may fill any committee vacancy.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five: (a) 
all
(
a) All
Section 1. CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER. Board of Directors shall appoint a Chief Executive Officer. The Chief Executive Officer shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation, shall report directly to the Board of Directors and shall be responsible for the general management of the affairs of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and of any committee thereof are carried into effect. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general executive powers concerning all the operations and business of the Corporation and shall have and exercise such further powers and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or as may be provided by law, and he or she may delegate to any other officer such executive and other powers and duties as he or she deems advisable.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 2. CHAIRMAN. Board of Directors shall appoint one of its members to be Chairman. The Chairman shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall have and exercise such further powers as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or as may be provided by law. In the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman, the Lead Director shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or the Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists and, in the event of the absence or temporary disability of the Chairman and the Lead Director, any other officer of the Corporation or Director designated by the Board of Directors shall preside at the applicable meetings of the stockholders and/or Board of Directors during which such absence or disability exists.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
. During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date (as such terms are defined in Article Five), the Chairman shall be designated "Executive Chairman", shall be an officer of the Corporation, and the Chief Auditor (for administrative purposes only) shall report to the Executive Chairman. In addition, until the Succession Date, the Executive Chairman shall be in charge of the integration of the Corporation following the Merger (as defined in Article Five) and shall report to the Integration Committee with respect to such responsibilities
(provided that if such absence or temporary disability occurs during the Specified Period, only by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors)
Section 3. PRESIDENT. Board of Directors shall appoint a President. The President shall have and exercise such powers
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
and duties as may be conferred upon, or assigned to, him or her by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer or as may be provided by law.
Section 9. TENURE OF OFFICE. Chief Executive Officer, the Chairman and the President shall each hold office for the year for which the Board of Directors was elected and until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until his or her earlier death, resignation, disqualification or removal. All other officers and employees shall hold office at the pleasure of the appropriate appointing authority. Board of Directors may remove any officer with or without cause at any time.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, in particular subsection 2(b) of Article Five, the
The
Section 10. COMPENSATION. Board of Directors shall fix the compensation of those officers appointed pursuant to Sections 1, 2, 3 and 7 of this Article Four and of any other officers of the Corporation or any officers of any subsidiary of the Corporation that the Board of Directors shall deem appropriate, and it may award additional compensation to any officer or employee of the Corporation or any officer of any subsidiary for any year or years based upon the performance of that person during any such period, the success of the operations of the Corporation or any subsidiary thereof during any such period or any other reason that the Board of Directors shall deem appropriate. Unless the Board of Directors shall otherwise direct, the Chief Executive Officer or his or her delegate shall fix the compensation of all other officers or employees of the Corporation or any subsidiary thereof.
Subject to the provisions of Article Five, the
The
Section 1.
DEFINITIONS.
The following definitions shall apply to this Article Five and otherwise as applicable in these By-Laws:
(a) "BNY" means The Bank of New York Company, Inc., a
New York
corporation.
(b) "Continuing BNY Directors" shall mean the Directors as of the Effective Time who
were
nominated to be Directors by the Board of Directors of BNY prior to the Effective Time and additional Directors who take office after the Effective Time who are nominated by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee pursuant to Section 3(a) of this Article Five.
(c) "Continuing BNY Directors Committee" shall mean the committee established by Section 3(b) of this Article Five.
(d) "Continuing Mellon Directors" shall mean the Directors as of the Effective Time who were nominated to be Directors by the Board of Directors of Mellon prior to the Effective Time and additional Directors who take office after the Effective Time who are nominated by a majority of the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee pursuant to Section 3(a) of this Article Five.
(e) "Continuing Mellon Directors Committee" shall mean the committee established by Section 3(c) of this Article Five.
(f) "Effective Time" has the meaning specified in the Merger Agreement.
(g) "entire Board of Directors" means the total number of Directors which the Corporation would have if there were no vacancies;
provided
, that with respect to any provisions of these By-Laws requiring the unanimous affirmative vote of the entire Board of Directors, "entire Board of Directors" shall mean all the Directors of the Corporation then in office.
(h) "Mellon" means Mellon Financial Corporation, a
Pennsylvania
corporation.
(i) "Merger" has the meaning specified in the Merger Agreement.
(j) "Merger Agreement" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of December 3, 2006, by and between Mellon and BNY (as the same may be amended from time to time).
(k) "Specified Period" shall mean the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six-month anniversary of the Effective Time.
(l) "Succession Date" has the meaning specified in Section 2(a) of this Article Five.
Section 2.
CHAIRMAN SUCCESSION; CEO AND PRESIDENT.
(a) Effective as of the Effective Time, Mr. Thomas Renyi shall become and serve as Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors, Mr. Robert Kelly shall become and serve as Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation and Mr. Gerald Hassell shall become and serve as President of the Corporation.
Mr.
Robert Kelly shall be the successor to Mr. Thomas Renyi as Chairman of the Board of Directors, with such succession to become effective on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time or any such earlier date as of which Mr. Thomas Renyi ceases for any reason to serve in the position of Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors (the date of succession, the "Succession Date").
(b) During the Specified Period, any removal of, or failure to reelect (if such person is willing to serve), any of the individuals serving in the capacities set forth in subsection 2(a) above, any failure to appoint or elect Mr. Robert Kelly as Chairman of the Board of Directors on the Succession Date, any amendment or modification to or termination of any employment or similar agreement with any of Messrs. Thomas Renyi, Robert Kelly or Gerald Hassell in effect as of the Effective Time, or any modification to any of their respective duties, authority or reporting relationships as set forth in Article Four, shall require the affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors. In the event that during the Specified Period any of the individuals set forth in subsection 2(a) above shall be unable (whether by reason of death, permanent disability, retirement or otherwise) or unwilling to continue in such office, other than as expressly set forth in subsection 2(a) with respect to the succession of Mr. Robert Kelly as Chairman of the Board of Directors on the Succession Date, the vacancy created thereby shall be filled only by the affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors.
Section 3.
COMPOSITION OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS.
(a) During the period beginning on the Effective Time and ending on the Succession Date, the Board of Directors shall consist of 18 Directors, of which 10 shall be Continuing BNY Directors and eight shall be Continuing Mellon Directors. Beginning on the Succession Date and during the remainder of the Specified Period, the Board of Directors shall consist of 16 Directors, of which nine shall be Continuing BNY Directors (one of whom shall be the President of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation) and seven shall be continuing Mellon Directors (one of whom shall be the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, if he or she is then a member of the Board of Directors, and the remainder of whom shall consist of Directors who are not officers of the Corporation). During the Specified Period, all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee and all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director shall be filled by a nominee selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. During the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have the exclusive authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. During the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have the exclusive
authority to nominate, on behalf of the Board of Directors, Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director.
Section 1.
[Intentionally omitted.]
(b) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing BNY Directors Committee, which shall consist of all the Continuing BNY Directors. The Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing BNY Director and (ii) to nominate Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing BNY Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing BNY Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
Section 2.
[Intentionally omitted.]
(c) The Board of Directors shall constitute a Continuing Mellon Directors Committee, which shall consist of all the Continuing Mellon Directors. The Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall have all the power and may exercise all the authority of the Board of Directors to (i) fill all vacancies on the Board of Directors created by the cessation of service of a Continuing Mellon Director and (ii) to nominate Directors for election at each annual meeting, or at any special meeting at which Directors are to be elected, to fill each seat previously held by a Continuing Mellon Director. At the end of the Specified Period, the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee shall be automatically disbanded.
Section 3.
[Intentionally omitted.]
Section 4.
LEAD DIRECTOR.
During the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time, the Lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing BNY Director selected by the Continuing BNY Directors Committee. During the period beginning on the eighteen-month anniversary of the Effective Time and ending on the thirty-six month anniversary of the Effective Time, the Lead Director of the Corporation shall be a Continuing Mellon Director selected by the Continuing Mellon Directors Committee. Thereafter, the Lead Director shall be a Director selected by a majority of the entire Board of Directors. The Lead Director shall have such duties and responsibilities as may be set forth in these By-Laws and the Corporation's Corporate Governance Guidelines from time to time.
Section 4.
[Intentionally omitted.]
Section 6. CORPORATE NAME: During the period beginning and ending on the Board of Directors shall not recommend for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, or otherwise approve or effect, any change to the name of the Corporation without the unanimous affirmative vote of the Board of Directors.
at the Effective Time
July 1, 2007
the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time
,
July
1, 2012,
entire
Section 7. AMENDMENTS. the provisions of Section 6 of this Article Five may be modified, amended or repealed, and any By-Law provision or other resolution inconsistent with Section 6 may be adopted, or any such modification, amendment, repeal or inconsistent By-Law provisions or other resolutions recommended for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, only by the unanimous affirmative vote of the Board of Directors. In the event of any inconsistency between any other provision of these By-Laws and any provision of this Article Five, the provisions of this Article Five shall control.
During the Specified Period, the provisions of this Article Five (other than Section 6) and Section 1 of Article One, Section 9 of Article Two and Section 1 of Article Three may be modified, amended or repealed, and any By-Law provision or other resolution inconsistent with this Article Five (other than Section 6) or Section 1 of Article One, Section 9 of Article Two or Section 1 of Article Three may be adopted, or any such modification, amendment, repeal or inconsistent By-Law provisions or other resolutions recommended for adoption by the stockholders of the Corporation, only by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the entire Board of Directors. Prior to the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time
,
Prior
to July 1, 2012,
entire


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20101019071944.txt.gz
TIME:20101019071944
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 19, 2010, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2010 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.51 INCLUDING $0.04 OF M&I AND RESTRUCTURING EXPENSES
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported third quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $625 million, or $0.51 per common share, compared with a loss of $2,439 million, or $2.04 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009 and income of $668 million, or $0.55 per common share, in the second quarter of 2010.
NEW YORK, Oct. 19, 2010 
"During the quarter, we successfully completed the GIS and BHF Asset Servicing acquisitions. The acquisitions, combined with the underlying resilience of our business model, helped to offset weakness in the capital markets. The strength of our balance sheet and meaningful capital generation position us well to meet the proposed new capital standards," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
 
1
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2010 and are compared to the third quarter of 2009, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Third Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
The was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010 compared with a charge of $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 and a charge of $147 million in the third quarter of 2009. The decrease in the provision year-over-year and sequentially reflects a decline of 26% in criticized assets in the third quarter of 2010.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 26.4% on a GAAP basis and 27.3% on an operating basis (Non-GAAP) in the third quarter of 2010 reflecting a discrete benefit of approximately $0.02 per common share, largely driven by a change in state and local tax laws.
effective tax rate
The was $319 million at Sept. 30, 2010 compared with $114 million at June 30, 2010. The improvement in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was due to the decline in interest rates and the tightening of credit spreads.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
3
The sequential decrease in the capital ratios primarily reflects the Acquisitions, partially offset by the issuance of $677 million (25.9 million shares) of common equity via a forward sale agreement that settled in mid-September 2010 and earnings retention. The Acquisitions, net of the equity raise, reduced the Tier 1 and Tier 1 common ratios by approximately 185 basis points and the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio by approximately 100 basis points.
 On Oct. 19, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 9, 2010 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 29, 2010.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $24.4 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.14 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Sept. 30, 2010 and are available at (Investor RelationsFinancial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on Oct. 19, 2010. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (210) 838-9221 (International) Passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on Oct. 19, 2010. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Oct. 19, 2010 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Tuesday, Nov. 2, 2010 by dialing (866) 479-2460 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1535 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
4
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
5
 
 
6
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
7
 
 
8
Discontinued operations
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), its national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Release are presented on a continuing operations basis. In the third quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $3 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans held for sale.
Consolidated net income (loss) applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $622 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010 compared with a net loss of $2,458 million, or $2.05 per common share, in the third quarter of 2009 and net income of $658 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the second quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, the FDIC special assessment, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and intangible amortization expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue
 
9
and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions.
Excluding the benefit of tax settlements permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors with the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interests related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
10
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
11
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
12
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, our ability to meet the proposed new capital standards. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Oct. 19, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20101022161533.txt.gz
TIME:20101022161533
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations, is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, intangible amortization expenses, special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages and the benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of GIS and BAS in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net investment securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain assets management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
THIRD QUARTER 2010 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 3Q10 vs. 2Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
OPERATIONS OF CONSOLIDATED ASSET MANAGEMENT FUNDS
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted ASC 810 (SFAS No. 167). Adoption of this standard resulted in an increase in consolidated total assets on our balance sheet at Sept. 30, 2010 of $14.5 billion, or approximately 7% from Dec. 31, 2009.
We also separately disclosed the following on the income statement.
 
These line items were previously disclosed on the income statement as:
 
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING REVENUE
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Sept. 30, 2010, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $62 billion. The unrealized pre-tax gain on our total securities portfolio was $643 million at Sept. 30, 2010 compared with $292 million at June 30, 2010 and an unrealized pre-tax loss of $1.4 billion at Sept. 30, 2009.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
CAPITAL
 
The sequential decrease in the capital ratios primarily resulted from the Acquisitions, partially offset by the issuance of $677 million (25.9 million shares) of common equity via a forward sale agreement that settled in mid-September 2010 and earnings retention. The Acquisitions, net of the equity raise, reduced the Tier 1 and Tier 1 common ratios by approximately 185 basis points and the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio by approximately 100 basis points.
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010 compared with a charge of $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 and a charge of $147 million in the third quarter of 2009. The decrease in the provision year-over-year and sequentially reflects a decline of 26% in criticized assets during the third quarter of 2010. During the third quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses decreased $37 million and net charge-offs totaled $15 million.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), its national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Review are presented on a continuing operations basis. In the third quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $3 million primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained loans held for sale.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
See BNY Mellon's 2009 Annual Report for information on the accounting principles of our businesses. In addition, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(provides asset management services through a number of asset management companies to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations and related entities)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
N/A  Not applicable.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 3Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(a)    On a regulatory basis.
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010, and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Oct. 19, 2010 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
On July 1, 2007, The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("The Bank of New York") and Mellon Financial Corporation ("Mellon") merged with and into The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("The Bank of New York Mellon" or " BNY Mellon"), with BNY Mellon being the surviving entity ("the merger").
The results prior to the consummation of the merger reflect the sum of The Bank of New York and Mellon's historical results, but do not include the pro forma impact of purchase accounting adjustments. Combined results for the periods prior to the merger (1Q07, 2Q07) are presented on a pre-tax basis only. Average common equity and average goodwill/intangibles are not disclosed for the periods prior to the merger due to the impact of the merger on these line items. The business results are presented on a pre-tax basis for all periods and reflect actions taken to report consistent transfer pricing and cost allocation methodologies as well as intercompany eliminations between The Bank of New York and Mellon.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Asset Servicing, Clearing Services and Treasury Services businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Asset Servicing business.
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Asset Management business.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other business. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. The financial results for all periods were restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services business to the Other business. Historical business results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management business to the Other business. Historical results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On December 20, 2007, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the ABN AMRO Mellon joint venture. The financial results are included in the Asset Servicing business.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/ Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the fourth quarter of 2007, full year of 2008, and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009 and third quarter of 2010
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008. Minor amounts were recorded in other periods.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated October 19, 2010, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ASSET SERVICING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ISSUER SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
CLEARING SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
TREASURY SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.); the financial results have been moved from the Wealth Management business to the Other business. During the first quarter of 2009, the financial results of the Execution business have been moved from the Clearing Services business to the Other business. On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida; previously, the financial results were included in the Other business. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. Historical business results have been restated to reflect all of these changes.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20101209160646.txt.gz
TIME:20101209160646
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 9, 2010, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 2.500% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "Fixed Rate Notes") and (ii) $100,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2013 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 2.500% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "Fixed Rate Notes") and (ii) $100,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2013 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated December 2, 2010 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Terms Agreement dated December 2, 2010 relating to the Fixed Rate Notes and a Terms Agreement dated December 2, 2010 relating to the Floating Rate Notes (each a "Terms Agreement" and together, the "Terms Agreements"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreements, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110119072841.txt.gz
TIME:20110119072841
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2010 and fourth quarter 2010. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.55 INCLUDING $0.04 OF M&I AND RESTRUCTURING EXPENSES
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $690 million, or $0.55 per common share, compared with $712 million, or $0.59 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009 and $625 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010.
NEW YORK, Jan. 19, 2011 
"We delivered 12% growth in fee revenue this quarter, reflecting improving markets, the underlying strength of our business model and continued investment in our businesses. Asset quality was exceptionally strong throughout the year and our regulatory capital ratios grew, reflecting our strong capital generation. I would like to thank our staff for all that they have accomplished for our clients and shareholders during the past year," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
Net income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders totaled $2.584 billion, or $2.11 per common share, for the full-year 2010 compared to a net loss of $1.097 billion, or $0.93 per common share, for the full-year 2009. Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, for the full-year 2010 totaled $2.518 billion, or $2.05 per common share, compared to a net loss of $1.367 billion, or $1.16 per common share, for the full-year 2009.
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2010 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2009, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Fourth Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The was a credit of $22 million in the fourth quarter of 2010 compared with a charge of $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009 and a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010. The credit in the provision in the fourth quarter of 2010 primarily reflects the repayment of a loan to an asset manager that had previously filed for bankruptcy. The decrease in the provision compared with the fourth quarter of 2009 reflects a reduction in criticized assets. Criticized assets decreased 32% in the fourth quarter of 2010 and 66% in the full-year 2010.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The on a continuing operations basis was 27.3% in the fourth quarter of 2010, 26.4% in the third quarter of 2010 and 28.3% in full-year 2010.
effective tax rate
The was $150 million at Dec. 31, 2010 compared with $311 million at Sept. 30, 2010. The decline in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by higher interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
The increase in the capital ratios sequentially primarily resulted from earnings retention and lower risk-weighted assets. The increase from Dec. 31, 2009 primarily reflects earnings retention, the third quarter 2010 common equity issuance of $677 million and lower risk-weighted assets, partially offset by the impact of the Acquisitions.
 On Jan. 19, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 9, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 31, 2011.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.0 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.17 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental financial trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Dec. 31, 2010 and are available at (Investor Relations - Financial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EST on Jan. 19, 2011. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EST on Jan. 19, 2011. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 19, 2011 at approximately 2 p.m. EST through Feb. 1, 2011 by dialing (866) 479-2460 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1535 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Discontinued operations
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), a national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Release are presented on a continuing operations basis. In the fourth quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $11 million, primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained MUNB loans held for sale.
Consolidated net income (loss) applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $679 million, or $0.54 per common share in the fourth quarter of 2010, compared with $593 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009 and net income of $622 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, the FDIC special assessment, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions which were consummated in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY
 
Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions.
Excluding the benefit of tax settlements permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors with the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interests related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements on expectations with respect to settlement with the Internal Revenue Service. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, our ability to meet the proposed new capital standards. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Jan. 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110121161058.txt.gz
TIME:20110121161058
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2010 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 4Q10 vs. 3Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION TREND
 
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT FLOWS
 
COMPOSITION OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT
 
MARKET INDICES
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONS OF CONSOLIDATED ASSET MANAGEMENT FUNDS
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted ASC 810 (SFAS No. 167). Adoption of this standard resulted in an increase in consolidated total assets on our balance sheet at Dec. 31, 2010 of $14.6 billion, or approximately 7% from Dec. 31, 2009.
We also separately disclosed the following on the income statement.
 
These line items were previously disclosed on the income statement as:
 
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING REVENUE
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Dec. 31, 2010, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $66.4 billion. The unrealized pre-tax gain on our total securities portfolio was $353 million at Dec. 31, 2010 compared with $629 million at Sept. 30, 2010 and an unrealized pre-tax loss of $1.0 billion at Dec. 31, 2009. The Grantor Trust established in December 2009 was unwound in December 2010. The investment securities previously included in the Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At Dec. 31, 2010, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $578 million.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
 
The increase in the capital ratios sequentially primarily resulted from earnings retention and lower risk-weighted assets. The increase from Dec. 31, 2009 primarily reflects earnings retention, the third quarter 2010 common equity issuance of $677 million and lower risk-weighted assets, partially offset by the impact of the Acquisitions.
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in the fourth quarter of 2010 compared with a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010 and a charge of $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009. The credit in the provision in the fourth quarter of 2010 primarily reflects the repayment of a loan to an asset manager that had previously filed for bankruptcy. The decrease in the provision compared with the fourth quarter of 2009 also reflects a reduction in criticized assets. Criticized assets decreased 32% in the fourth quarter of 2010 and 66% in the full-year 2010. During the fourth quarter of 2010, the total allowance for credit losses decreased $37 million and net charge-offs totaled $15 million.
DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), a national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Review are presented on a continuing operations basis. In the fourth quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $11 million, primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained MUNB loans held for sale.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
See BNY Mellon's 2009 Annual Report for information on the accounting principles of our businesses. In addition, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides asset management services through various asset management boutiques to institutional and individual investors)
ASSET MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations and related entities)
WEALTH MANAGEMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services and broker-dealer services to corporate and public retirement funds, foundations and endowments and global financial institutions)
ASSET SERVICING
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services to corporations and institutions)
ISSUER SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides clearing, financing and custody services for broker-dealers and registered investment advisors)
CLEARING SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides treasury services, global payment services, working capital solutions, capital markets business and large corporate banking)
TREASURY SERVICES
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER
 
N/A  Not applicable.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds and expense measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, amortization of intangible assets expenses, special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of GIS and BAS in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain assets management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding the discrete tax benefits related to a tax loss on mortgages permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
In this Earnings Review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis. Below is a listing of certain financial measures which have been impacted by the exclusion and/or adjustment of certain items.
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 4Q10 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
(a)    On a regulatory basis using Tier 1 capital as determined under BASEL I guidelines.
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements on expectations with respect to settlement with the Internal Revenue Service and the statements regarding expectations of revenue and expenses related to a large global wealth management firm. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010, and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Jan. 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Asset Servicing, Clearing Services and Treasury Services businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Asset Servicing business.
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment and other income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Asset Management business.
On June 30, 2009, we adopted discontinued operations accounting for Mellon United National Bank (MUNB) located in Miami, Florida. Previously, the financial results were included in the Other business. On January 15, 2010, we completed the sale of MUNB. The financial results for all periods were restated.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
During the first quarter of 2009, we moved the financial results of the Execution business from the Clearing Services business to the Other business. Historical business results have been restated to reflect these changes.
On June 3, 2008, we completed the sale of Mellon 1st Business Bank, National Association (N.A.). We moved the financial results from the Wealth Management business to the Other business. Historical results have been restated to reflect these changes.
The following items have impacted the reporting of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the full year of 2008 and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009 and third quarter of 2010
SILO/LILO/Tax settlement charges  Incurred charges in the second and third quarters of 2008, while the second quarter of 2009 contains the benefit of final tax settlements.
Support agreement charges  Recorded a $163 million pre-tax charge in the fourth quarter of 2008 and a $726 million pre-tax charge in the third quarter of 2008. Minor amounts were recorded in other periods.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated January 19, 2011, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ASSET MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
WEALTH MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ASSET SERVICING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
ISSUER SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
CLEARING SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
TREASURY SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110125142742.txt.gz
TIME:20110125142742
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2010 and fourth quarter 2010. The Registrant previously furnished the press release as Exhibit 99.1 to a Current Report on Form 8-K, dated January 19, 2011, pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K. A version of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER CONTINUING EPS OF $0.55 INCLUDING $0.04 OF M&I AND RESTRUCTURING EXPENSES
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $690 million, or $0.55 per common share, compared with $712 million, or $0.59 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009 and $625 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010.
NEW YORK, Jan. 19, 2011 
Net income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders totaled $2.584 billion, or $2.11 per common share, for the full-year 2010 compared to a net loss of $1.097 billion, or $0.93 per common share, for the full-year 2009. Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, for the full-year 2010 totaled $2.518 billion, or $2.05 per common share, compared to a net loss of $1.367 billion, or $1.16 per common share, for the full-year 2009.
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2010 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2009, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Fourth Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The was a credit of $22 million in the fourth quarter of 2010 compared with a charge of $65 million in the fourth quarter of 2009 and a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010. The credit in the provision in the fourth quarter of 2010 primarily reflects the repayment of a loan to an asset manager that had previously filed for bankruptcy. The decrease in the provision compared with the fourth quarter of 2009 reflects a reduction in criticized assets. Criticized assets decreased 32% in the fourth quarter of 2010 and 66% in the full-year 2010.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The on a continuing operations basis was 27.3% in the fourth quarter of 2010, 26.4% in the third quarter of 2010 and 28.3% in full-year 2010.
effective tax rate
The was $150 million at Dec. 31, 2010 compared with $311 million at Sept. 30, 2010. The decline in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by higher interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
The increase in the capital ratios sequentially primarily resulted from earnings retention and lower risk-weighted assets. The increase from Dec. 31, 2009 primarily reflects earnings retention, the third quarter 2010 common equity issuance of $677 million and lower risk-weighted assets, partially offset by the impact of the Acquisitions.
 On Jan. 19, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.09 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 9, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 31, 2011.
Declaration of quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, providing superior asset management and wealth management, asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services and treasury services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.0 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.17 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Discontinued operations
On Jan. 15, 2010, BNY Mellon sold Mellon United National Bank ("MUNB"), a national bank subsidiary located in Florida. We have applied discontinued operations accounting to this business. The income statements for all periods in this Earnings Release are presented on a continuing operations basis. In the fourth quarter of 2010, we recorded an after-tax loss on discontinued operations of $11 million, primarily reflecting lower of cost or market write-downs on the retained MUNB loans held for sale.
Consolidated net income (loss) applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations
Net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, totaled $679 million, or $0.54 per common share in the fourth quarter of 2010, compared with $593 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2009 and net income of $622 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 capital ratio which is utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated asset management funds; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, the FDIC special assessment, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses; and measures which utilize net income excluding tax items such as benefit of tax settlements. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where valuation or other accounting/regulatory requirements require charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions which were consummated in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Asset and Wealth Management and Institutional Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY
 
Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions.
Excluding the benefit of tax settlements permits investors to calculate the tax impact of BNY Mellon's primary businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors with the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated asset management funds, net of noncontrolling interests related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements on expectations with respect to settlement with the Internal Revenue Service. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, our ability to meet the proposed new capital standards. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this earnings release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Jan. 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110201160842.txt.gz
TIME:20110201160842
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 1, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 1.500% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "3-Year Notes"), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 4.150% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "10-Year Notes") and (iii) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the 3-Year Notes and the 10-Year Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.500% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the ""), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.150% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "") and (iii) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "", and together with the 3-Year Notes and the 10-Year Notes, the ""), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated January 25, 2011 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated January 25, 2011 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
3-Year Notes
10 Year Notes
Floating Rate Notes
Notes
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110214160634.txt.gz
TIME:20110214160634
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) On February 8, 2011, Dr. Robert Mehrabian notified The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") of his intention to retire from the Board of Directors of the Corporation at the upcoming Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on April 12, 2011 and that he would not be standing for re-election to the Board.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110308165841.txt.gz
TIME:20110308165841
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e) On March 2, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") and Mr. Robert P. Kelly, the Corporation's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, agreed to freeze the level of Mr. Kelly's supplemental executive retirement plan benefits. As amended, the benefits Mr. Kelly may receive under the supplemental plan will be limited to the amount calculated on the basis of his employment through 2012; accordingly, Mr. Kelly will not receive credit for service under the plan after 2012. Furthermore, the Corporation and Mr. Kelly agreed that the total amount of benefits that Mr. Kelly would receive under the plan would be reduced by 5%, assuming benefits commence on or after age 60, which is the earliest age at which unreduced benefits are payable. The actual amounts payable will depend on a number of factors, including Mr. Kelly's future salary and bonus amounts through 2012 and his future service with the Corporation.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110322164836.txt.gz
TIME:20110322164836
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 18, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued a press release that the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System did not object to its comprehensive capital plan. On March 22, 2011, the Company issued a press release that its Board of Directors authorized an increase in the quarterly dividend from the current nine cents per share of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock") to 13 cents per share of Common Stock, and approved an increase to the current share repurchase program authorization, that brings the total number of shares of Common Stock available for repurchase to 46.8 million. The Company's press releases are filed as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, March 18, 2011 BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today confirmed that the Federal Reserve did not object to its comprehensive capital plan, which provides for second quarter capital actions, including a dividend increase and share repurchases.
"We are pleased that, after a review of our capital plan, the Fed has no objection to the execution of our plan to return capital to our shareholders by increasing our dividend and resuming our share repurchase program," said Robert P. Kelly, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.0 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.17 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, BNY Mellon's business and capital plans. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
NEW YORK, March 22, 2011 BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced a 44 percent increase in its quarterly dividend and plans to repurchase up to $1.3 billion worth of shares through the end of 2011.
The board of directors authorized an increase in the quarterly dividend from the current nine cents per share of BNY Mellon common stock to 13 cents per share, which is payable on May 10, 2011, to holders of record as of the close of business on April 29, 2011.
Additionally, the board of directors approved an increase to the current share repurchase program authorization that brings the total common shares available for repurchase to nearly 47 million shares, which represents approximately four percent of common shares outstanding. This action was done in anticipation of BNY Mellon's plans to repurchase up to $1.3 billion worth of shares of outstanding common stock in 2011.
"Following last week's notification by the Fed on our capital plan, the board agreed today that our first capital priority will be to reward our shareholders by increasing the dividend and resuming our share repurchase program. Even with these actions, we expect to exceed the Tier I common Basel III requirement by the end of this year. Our strong balance sheet and significant capital generation should continue to provide us with the flexibility to pursue the opportunities for growth that our business model affords, as well as return capital to our shareholders," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.0 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.17 trillion in assets under management, services $12.0 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, BNY Mellon's expectations with respect to the repurchase of shares of outstanding common stock. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110415161247.txt.gz
TIME:20110415161247
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.02. DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR CERTAIN OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF CERTAIN OFFICERS; COMPENSATORY ARRANGEMENTS OF CERTAIN OFFICERS.
(e) At the Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the "Annual Meeting") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") on April 12, 2011, BNY Mellon's stockholders approved the amended and restated The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan and the amended and restated The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Incentive Compensation Plan (the "Plans"). The Plans are filed as Exhibit 10.1 and Exhibit 10.2 respectively hereto (incorporated by reference to Appendix A and Appendix B respectively to BNY Mellon's Proxy Statement, dated March 11, 2011 filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission) and the terms and descriptions of the Plans included in such Proxy Statement are incorporated into this Item 5.02 by reference.
ITEM 5.07. SUBMISSION OF MATTERS TO A VOTE OF SECURITY HOLDERS.
At the Annual Meeting on April 12, 2011, each nominee for director was elected by a majority of votes cast. Management proposals 2, 4, 5, and 6 were approved. With respect to management proposal 3, the advisory (non-binding) vote regarding the frequency of a stockholder advisory vote on executive compensation, one year received the favorable majority of the votes cast. Stockholder proposal 7 was not approved. The proposals below are described in detail in BNY Mellon's Proxy Statement, dated March 11, 2011 filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Abstentions and broker non-votes are counted for purposes of determining whether a quorum is present, but are not treated as votes cast on a proposal. Therefore, broker non-votes and abstentions did not have the effect of a vote for or against a proposal and were not counted in determining the number of votes required for approval.
The results are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 9.01.   FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110419065041.txt.gz
TIME:20110419065041
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On April 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2011 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS OF $625 MILLION OR $0.50 PER SHARE
VERSUS FIRST QUARTER 2010:
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported first quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $625 million, or $0.50 per common share, compared with net income from continuing operations applicable to common shareholders of $601 million, or $0.49 per common share, in the first quarter of 2010 and $690 million, or $0.55 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2010.
NEW YORK, April 19, 2011 
"Over the past year, unlike many, we continued to grow revenue and earnings despite the challenging environment, and did so with a clean balance sheet. Sequentially, revenue was lower due to seasonality, as were expenses despite higher litigation costs," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"A fundamental strength of our business model is the ability to rapidly grow capital and generate a high return on it. Specifically, in the first quarter of 2011, our capital grew at an annualized rate of 28 percent and we generated a 21 percent return on it. Over time this provides us with superior flexibility to invest in our businesses and return capital to our shareholders," added Mr. Kelly.
 
 
Note:    See supplemental information beginning on page 9 for the calculation of the Tier 1 common ratio and return on Tier 1 common.
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the first quarter of 2011 and are compared to the first quarter of 2010, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
First Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
There was no in the first quarter of 2011, compared with a charge of $35 million in the first quarter of 2010 and a credit of $22 million in the fourth quarter of 2010.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
The was 29.3% in the first quarter of 2011, and on a continuing operations basis, was 29.1% in the first quarter of 2010 and 27.3% in the fourth quarter of 2010.
effective tax rate
The was $279 million at March 31, 2011 compared with $150 million at Dec. 31, 2010. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by narrowing credit spreads on non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities ("RMBS").
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
We continued our strong capital generation in 1Q11. Our Tier 1 common equity increased $798 million, or 7%, compared with Dec. 31, 2010, primarily driven by earnings retention.
 On March 22, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share, an increase of 44% from the prior period. This cash dividend is payable on May 10, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 29, 2011.
Quarterly dividend
 
Organization of our businesses
In the first quarter of 2011, BNY Mellon realigned its internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on its two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. The realignment reflects management's current approach to assessing performance and decisions regarding resource allocations. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in the Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. The following are the changes to the income statement:
 
 
All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations. See the Earnings Review for additional information on our businesses.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.5 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.2 trillion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through March 31, 2011 and are available at (Investor Relations - Financial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on April 19, 2011. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information. Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 19, 2011. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 19, 2011 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Tuesday, May 3, 2011 by dialing (866) 479-2460 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1535 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $625 million, or $0.50 per common share, in the first quarter of 2011, compared with net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, of $679 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2010 and $559 million, or $0.46 per common share, in the first quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions which were consummated in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent
 
with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) On a regulatory basis using Tier 1 capital as determined under Basel I guidelines.
(b) Preliminary.
 
(a) Annualized.
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements on our ability to grow and generate a high rate of return on capital and our flexibility in our businesses. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of April 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110420171814.txt.gz
TIME:20110420171814
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
ORGANIZATION OF OUR BUSINESSES
In the first quarter of 2011, BNY Mellon realigned its internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on its two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. The realignment reflects management's current approach to assessing performance and decisions regarding resource allocations. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in the Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. The following are the changes to the income statement:
 
 
All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations.
Also, in the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach to transfer pricing domestic deposits. All prior period business results have been restated to reflect this revision. This revision did not impact the consolidated results.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FIRST QUARTER 2011 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 1Q11 vs. 1Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOREIGN EXCHANGE AND OTHER TRADING REVENUE
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/A - Not applicable.
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2011, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $66.4 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $569 million at March 31, 2011 compared with a pre-tax net gain of $353 million at Dec. 31, 2010 and an unrealized pre-tax net loss of $247 million at March 31, 2010. The investment securities previously included in the former Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At March 31, 2011, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $823 million.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
CAPITAL
 
We continued our strong capital generation in 1Q11. Our Tier 1 common equity increased $798 million, or 7%, compared with Dec. 31, 2010, primarily driven by earnings retention.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
There was no provision for credit losses recorded in the first quarter of 2011, compared with a charge of $35 million in the first quarter of 2010 and a credit of $22 million in the fourth quarter of 2010. During the first quarter of 2011, the total allowance for credit losses decreased $17 million and net charge-offs totaled $17 million.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
(provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments)
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services, as well as clearing services and global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions)
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SEGMENT
 
N/A  Not applicable.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that adds additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income.
BNY Mellon has provided the measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains and expense measures excluding items, such as merger and integration ("M&I") expenses, amortization of intangible assets expenses and special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures which exclude some or all of these items are also presented. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain asset management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions which were consummated in the third quarter of 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction, and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other group of businesses. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. With regards to higher yields related to the restructured investment securities portfolio, client deposits serve as the primary funding source for our investment securities portfolio and we typically allocate all interest revenue to the businesses generating the deposits. Accordingly, the higher yield related to the restructured investment securities portfolio has been included in the results of our businesses. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain assets management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with prior
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, gives investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of April 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 20

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment and other income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Investment Management business.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
In the first quarter of 2011, we realigned our internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. Investment management and performance fees consist of the former asset and wealth management fee revenue and Investment services fees consist of the former securities servicing fees, including asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services, as well as treasury services fee revenue. All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations.
In the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach to transfer pricing domestic deposits. All prior period business results have been restated to reflect this revision. The revision did not impact consolidated results.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the full year of 2008 and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009 and third quarter of 2010.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
Certain reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated April 19th, 2011, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
n/mnot meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110616163939.txt.gz
TIME:20110616163939
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A is being filed as an amendment (the "Amendment") to the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") on April 15, 2011 (the "Original 8-K"). The Original 8-K was filed to report, among other things, the results of the matters submitted to a vote at the Annual Meeting of Stockholders of the Corporation held on April 12, 2011 (the "Annual Meeting"). The sole purpose of this Amendment is to disclose the Corporation's decision regarding the frequency of the stockholder advisory (non-binding) vote on executive compensation. No other changes are being made to the Original 8-K.
ITEM 5.07. SUBMISSION OF MATTERS TO A VOTE OF SECURITY HOLDERS.
As previously reported in the Original 8-K, with respect to the advisory vote regarding the frequency of a stockholder advisory vote on executive compensation, one year received the majority of the votes cast.
 
In light of the voting results and other factors, the Board of Directors of the Corporation has determined, as was recommended with respect to this proposal by the Board of Directors in the proxy statement for the Annual Meeting, to provide stockholders with an annual advisory vote on executive compensation at each Annual Meeting of Stockholders, until the Board of Directors decides to hold the next stockholder advisory vote on the frequency of the advisory stockholder vote on executive compensation, which shall be no later than the Corporation's Annual Meeting of Stockholders in 2017.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110719063956.txt.gz
TIME:20110719063956
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On July 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2011 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS OF $735 MILLION OR $0.59 PER SHARE
VERSUS SECOND QUARTER 2010:
 
 
 
GENERATED $803 MILLION OF TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY IN 2Q11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported second quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $735 million, or $0.59 per common share, compared with net income applicable to common shareholders of $658 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the second quarter of 2010 and net income applicable to common shareholders of $625 million, or $0.50 per common share, in the first quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, July 19, 2011 
"Fees and net interest revenue grew nicely over both the prior year and quarter, leading to EPS growth of 9% and 18%, respectively. Expense growth remained high due in part to legal and regulatory costs. We are taking additional actions to reduce expenses," said Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"Our balance sheet remains very strong, deposits grew substantially and our capital ratios rose after our dividend increase and stock repurchases," added Mr. Kelly.
 
 
Note:    See Supplemental information on pages 9 through 12 for the Tier 1 common ratio, return on Tier 1 common and the Tier 1 common equity generated in 2Q11.
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2011 and are compared to the second quarter of 2010, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Second Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
There was no losses in the second quarter of 2011 compared with a charge of $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 and no provision in the first quarter of 2011.
provision for credit
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 26.9% in the second quarter of 2011, compared with 30.2% on a continuing operations basis in the second quarter of 2010, and 29.3% in the first quarter of 2011. The lower tax rate in the second quarter of 2011 was due primarily to the impact of the consolidated investment management funds. Adjusted for the impact of the consolidated investment management funds, the effective tax rate on an operating basis (non-GAAP) was 30.0% in the second quarter of 2011, compared with 30.8% in the second quarter of 2010 and 30.2% in the first quarter of 2011. See the Supplemental information section beginning on page 9.
effective tax rate
The was $408 million at June 30, 2011 compared with $279 million at March 31, 2011. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by a decline in interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
We generated $803 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the second quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
In the second quarter of 2011, we increased our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio by approximately 45 basis points, reflecting our strong capital generation and improving risk-weighted assets mix. Given the strength of our balance sheet and ability to rapidly grow capital, we do not anticipate accelerating our timeline to meet the proposed Basel III capital guidelines.
 On July 19, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 9, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 29, 2011.
Quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through June 30, 2011 and are available at (Investor Relations - Financial Reports).
www.bnymellon.com
Conference Call Data
Robert P. Kelly, chairman and chief executive officer; Gerald L. Hassell, president; and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on July 19, 2011. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (international), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on July 19, 2011. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 19, 2011 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Tuesday, Aug. 2, 2011 by dialing (866) 479-2460 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1535 (international). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $735 million, or $0.59 per diluted common share, in the second quarter of 2011 compared with $625 million, or $0.50 per diluted common share, in the first quarter of 2011 and net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, of $658 million, or $0.54 per diluted common share, in the second quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio permits investors the ability to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions in 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds, permits
 
investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents investment management fee revenue excluding performance fees.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding the reduction of expenses and our estimate of our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio, as well as our plans to meet proposed Basel III capital guidelines. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of July 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110721092217.txt.gz
TIME:20110721092217
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2011 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. The Registrant previously furnished the press release as Exhibit 99.1 to a Current Report on Form 8-K, dated July 19, 2011, pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K.
A version of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, http://www.bnymellon.com/, shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
 
Our Liquidity and Credit Ratings
Our ability to access capital markets on favorable terms, or at all, is partially dependent on our credit ratings. On June 2, 2011, Moody's Investors Service announced that the rating outlook on the deposit, senior debt, and senior subordinated debt ratings of the Registrant has been changed to negative from stable, due to Moody's reassessment of its systemic support assumptions and the impact of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act thereon. On July 18, 2011, Moody's announced that it placed the supported ratings of the Registrant and another bank and their subsidiaries under review for possible downgrade. The July 18 announcement stated that the action was directly related to Moody's placing the U.S. government's Aaa rating on review for possible downgrade on July 13, 2011 and that the action does not reflect a change to Moody's opinion of the Registrant's standalone financial strength. Copies of Moody's announcements described in this paragraph can be obtained from its website at http://www.moodys.com. However, the reference to Moody's website in the immediately preceding sentence shall not be deemed to incorporate the contents of the website into this Form 8-K.
Entry into a Definitive Agreement
On July 20, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing the execution of a definitive agreement to sell a majority of its equity stake in ConvergEx Group to funds advised by CVC Capital Partners in an all cash transaction expected to close in the early fall. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS OF $735 MILLION OR $0.59 PER SHARE
VERSUS SECOND QUARTER 2010:
 
 
 
 
 
 
GENERATED $803 MILLION OF TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY IN 2Q11
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported second quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $735 million, or $0.59 per common share, compared with net income applicable to common shareholders of $658 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the second quarter of 2010 and net income applicable to common shareholders of $625 million, or $0.50 per common share, in the first quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, July 19, 2011 
 
 
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2011 and are compared to the second quarter of 2010, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Second Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
There was no losses in the second quarter of 2011 compared with a charge of $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 and no provision in the first quarter of 2011.
provision for credit
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
The was 26.9% in the second quarter of 2011, compared with 30.2% on a continuing operations basis in the second quarter of 2010, and 29.3% in the first quarter of 2011. The lower tax rate in the second quarter of 2011 was due primarily to the impact of the consolidated investment management funds. Adjusted for the impact of the consolidated investment management funds, the effective tax rate on an operating basis (non-GAAP) was 30.0% in the second quarter of 2011, compared with 30.8% in the second quarter of 2010 and 30.2% in the first quarter of 2011. See the Supplemental information section beginning on page 9.
effective tax rate
The was $408 million at June 30, 2011 compared with $279 million at March 31, 2011. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by a decline in interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
We generated $803 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the second quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
In the second quarter of 2011, we increased our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio by approximately 45 basis points, reflecting our strong capital generation and improving risk-weighted assets mix. Given the strength of our balance sheet and ability to rapidly grow capital, we do not anticipate accelerating our timeline to meet the proposed Basel III capital guidelines.
 On July 19, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 9, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 29, 2011.
Quarterly dividend
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at .
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Consolidated net income applicable to common shareholders
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $735 million, or $0.59 per diluted common share, in the second quarter of 2011 compared with $625 million, or $0.50 per diluted common share, in the first quarter of 2011 and net income applicable to common shareholders, including discontinued operations, of $658 million, or $0.54 per diluted common share, in the second quarter of 2010.
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio permits investors the ability to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains; and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions in 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds, permits
 
investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents investment management fee revenue excluding performance fees.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding the reduction of expenses and our estimate of our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio, as well as our plans to meet proposed Basel III capital guidelines. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of July 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
NEW YORK, July 20, 2011  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, has agreed to sell a majority of its equity stake in ConvergEx Group as part of a definitive agreement for ConvergEx Group to be acquired by funds advised by CVC Capital Partners, a leading global private equity firm, in an all cash transaction expected to close in the early fall.
BNY Mellon agreed to sell the majority of its holding in ConvergEx Group while remaining a minority shareholder. Upon closing, the transaction is expected to enhance BNY Mellon's capital position, adding approximately 15 basis points to the company's Basel III Tier1 Common Equity.
"This transaction will provide a meaningful boost to our strong capital position and enable us to benefit from the ongoing growth of ConvergEx Group as one of the leaders in providing software and technology solutions to asset managers and financial intermediaries globally," said Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer of BNY Mellon. "We look forward to working with CVC and management to support ConvergEx as it enters its next phase of growth."
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available at and through Twitter @bnymellon.
www.bnymellon.com
This press release contains statements relating to future results of BNY Mellon that are considered "forward-looking statements," which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language and relate to, among other things, aspects of the transaction including the enhancement of BNY Mellon's capital ratios, the generation of capital, the anticipated closing date and other implications of the announced transaction. These forward-looking statements are based on current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). For additional information with respect to risks and other factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, see the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this press release speak only as of July 20, 2011, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110722161450.txt.gz
TIME:20110722161450
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SECOND QUARTER 2011 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 2Q11 vs. 2Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 1Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $222 million compared with $220 million in the second quarter of 2010 and $198 million in the first quarter of 2011. In the second quarter of 2011, foreign exchange revenue totaled $184 million, a decrease of 25% year-over-year and an increase of 6% (unannualized) sequentially. The year-over-year decrease reflects lower volatility partially offset by higher volumes. The increase sequentially primarily reflects higher volatility. Other trading revenue was $38 million in the second quarter of 2011, an increase of $64 million compared with the second quarter of 2010 and $13 million compared with the first quarter of 2011. Both increases were driven by higher fixed income trading revenue. Additionally, the second quarter of 2010 included negative credit valuation adjustments ("CVA") related to derivatives.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
 
We generated $803 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in 2Q11, primarily driven by earnings retention.
In 2Q11, we increased our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio by approximately 45 basis points, reflecting our strong capital generation and improving risk-weighted assets mix. Given the strength of our balance sheet and ability to rapidly grow capital, we do not anticipate accelerating our timeline to meet the proposed Basel III capital guidelines.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At June 30, 2011, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $68.6 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $770 million at June 30, 2011 compared with a pre-tax net gain of $569 million at March 31, 2011 and an unrealized pre-tax net gain of $292 million at June 30, 2010. Total paydowns of sub-investment grade securities were approximately $330 million in the second quarter of 2011. The investment securities previously included in the former Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At June 30, 2011, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $601 million. Reflecting improved performance, the commercial mortgage-backed and credit card securities were moved out of the Watch list in the second quarter of 2011.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
There was no provision for credit losses in the second quarter of 2011, compared with a charge of $20 million in the second quarter of 2010 and no provision in the first quarter of 2011. During the second quarter of 2011, the total allowance for credit losses decreased $19 million driven by net charge-offs.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
In the first quarter of 2011, BNY Mellon realigned its internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on its two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Also in the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach which adjusts our transfer pricing methodology to better reflect the value of certain domestic deposits. All prior period business results were restated. There was no impact to the consolidated results.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments)
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services, as well as clearing services and global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions)
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations is a measure of capital strength that provides additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III tier 1 common equity ratio permits investors the ability to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains; and expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the Acquisitions in 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains, BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, certain amounts are presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents investment management fee revenue excluding performance fees.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 2Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements made regarding our estimates of our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio, as well as our plans to meet proposed Basel III capital guidelines. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of July 19, 2011, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 22

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
In the first quarter of 2011, we realigned our internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. Investment management and performance fees consist of the former asset and wealth management fee revenue and Investment services fees consist of the former securities servicing fees, including asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services, as well as treasury services fee revenue. All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations.
In the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach to transfer pricing domestic deposits. All prior period business results have been restated to reflect this revision. The revision did not impact consolidated results.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On Jan. 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment and other income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Investment Management business.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/Investment Write-downs  Impacted total revenue levels in the full year of 2008 and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges  Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009 and third quarter of 2010.
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
Certain reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated July 19, 2011, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT  10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
n/mnot meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110728165134.txt.gz
TIME:20110728165134
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 28, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 2.300% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "Fixed Rate Notes") and (ii) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 2.300% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "Fixed Rate Notes") and (ii) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated July 21, 2011 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated July 21, 2011 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110810135838.txt.gz
TIME:20110810135838
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 10, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "company") issued a press release outlining expense reduction plans impacting approximately 1,500 positions or approximately 3 percent of the company's global workforce of 48,900. A copy of this press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1. The company expects to lessen any impact of the reduction of current staff by taking advantage of natural turnover, implementing an immediate hiring freeze across much of the company and reducing the use of temporary workers, consultants and contractors. Related to these actions, the company plans to take a restructuring charge that is expected to be more than offset by a gain on the previously-announced sale of the company's interest in ConvergEx. The closing of the ConvergEx transaction and the restructuring charge are expected to occur in the second half of 2011.
The information presented in this Current Report on Form 8-K may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the company's expectations with respect to its expense reduction initiative. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the company's control). Factors that could cause the company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and the company's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, August 10, 2011  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, announced today expense reductions impacting approximately 1,500 positions or approximately 3 percent of the company's global workforce of 48,900. The company expects to lessen any impact of the reductions on current staff by taking advantage of natural turnover, implementing an immediate hiring freeze across much of the company and reducing the use of temporary workers, consultants and contractors. These initiatives are in addition to ongoing operational and technology efficiency efforts.
"Over recent quarters, BNY Mellon has succeeded in building positive revenue momentum. However, expenses have been growing unsustainably faster. We expect our natural turnover and immediate hiring freeze will reduce the impact on existing staff," said Robert P. Kelly, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com and through Twitter @bnymellon.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, BNY Mellon's expectations with respect to its expense reduction initiative. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110902162159.txt.gz
TIME:20110902162159
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b)(c) On August 31, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant") elected Gerald L. Hassell to succeed Robert P. Kelly as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of the Registrant, effective as of Mr. Kelly's resignation as an officer and director of the Registrant on August 31, 2011.
The Registrant entered into a letter agreement with Mr. Kelly with respect to the terms of his resignation. The letter agreement provides that Mr. Kelly will receive the benefits to which he is contractually entitled on a termination other than for cause. Mr. Kelly's contractual arrangements include the following: severance of $2 million; a pro rata bonus opportunity (the prorated target value is $4 million, although the ultimate value will be based on performance determined after year-end); vesting of certain equity awards for past service (based on the August 31, 2011 closing price, restricted stock vested is valued at about $11.2 million and alloptionswere out of the money). Mr. Kelly also continues to be entitled to a vested supplemental pensionannuity (valued at about $16.6 million based on current interest rates and assumptions). The letter agreement with Mr. Kelly is attached as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. These benefits will result in a charge of approximately $22 million in the third quarter, a substantial portion of which is an acceleration of future expenses.
Mr. Hassell, 59, will continue to serve as President and as a director of the Registrant. Mr. Hassell has served as the Registrant's President since the merger of The Bank of New York Company, Inc. ("BNY Co.") and Mellon Financial Corporation into the Registrant on July 1, 2007. Prior to the merger, Mr. Hassell served as President and a director of BNY Co. Since joining BNY Co.'s Management Development Program more than three decades ago, Mr. Hassell has held a number of key leadership positions within the company in securities servicing, corporate banking, credit, strategic planning and administration services.
A copy of the press release announcing the event described above is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
August 31, 2011
Robert P. Kelly
Dear Bob:
The Board of Directors of the Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "") appreciates your efforts and contributions as Chairman and CEO of the Corporation over the past four years and accepts your resignation as Chairman and CEO. This letter memorializes the terms of your resignation and sets forth the transition arrangements to which you are entitled to under the Corporation's plans.
Corporation
 
This letter will serve as an acceptance of your resignation as an officer and director of the Corporation and as an officer and/or director of any of its affiliated companies.
Your resignation will be treated for purposes of the Plan and, to the extent beneficial to you, your outstanding equity-based awards as a termination without cause, effective immediately. For the avoidance of doubt, the Corporation confirms that neither the Board nor senior management is currently aware of any circumstance that would constitute a basis for Cause. In addition, you confirm that your resignation as a director is not as a result of a disagreement that you have with the Corporation on any matter related to its operations, policies or practices.
 
In accordance with Section 1 of this letter, subject to your execution and non-revocation of the Release and compliance with all other terms and conditions of the Release and, to the extent relevant, the Plan, (1) the Corporation will pay the amounts and provide the benefits you are entitled to receive on a termination by the Corporation other than for Cause under the Plan as specified in the Release, and (2) effective as of your date of termination, your outstanding option, restricted stock, restricted stock unit and other equity-based awards will vest, become free of restrictions and/or become exercisable to the extent provided for in, and subject to the terms of, the applicable plan and award agreement after giving effect to Section 1. (On your request, the Board will reasonably and promptly consider any company-specific waiver from any post-employment restrictive covenants contained in any equity award agreement.) You will also be paid the supplemental executive retirement plan benefits in accordance with the terms and conditions of your Employment Letter (the "SERP"). The attached Schedule I details each of the preceding benefits.
In accordance with the Corporation's practices, you will be paid any accrued and unpaid base salary through your last day of employment and accrued and unused vacation pay. Any unreimbursed business expenses will be reimbursed consistent with the terms of the Corporation's policy applicable to you while employed. These accrued obligations will be paid within thirty days of your last day of employment. You will also be entitled to all other amounts or benefits required to be paid or provided or which you are eligible to receive under the terms of the Corporation's welfare, retirement and deferred compensation plans and programs (other than the SERP). The Corporation will pay for the reasonable legal fees and disbursements incurred by you in negotiating this letter and related documents (not to exceed $35,000).
 
(a) . As used in this letter, "" means The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Executive Severance Plan, effective July 13, 2010; "" means the Letter Agreement, dated January 30, 2006, between you and the Corporation, as amended on December 22, 2006, October 24, 2008, December 15, 2008 and March 1, 2011; and "" means the Separation Agreement and Release attached hereto as Exhibit 1. Other capitalized terms used but not defined in this letter are used with the meaning assigned them in the Plan.
Defined Terms
Plan
Employment Letter
Release
(b) . This letter will be governed by and construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without reference to the principles of conflict of law. This letter, the Release and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between you and the Corporation regarding the subject matter hereof and thereof and supersede any earlier agreement, written or oral, with respect thereto. You and Corporation agree that any disputes relating to any matters under the terms of this letter shall be resolved in accordance with Section 9 of the Plan.
Governing Law
To indicate your agreement with the foregoing, please sign and return this letter, which will become a binding agreement on our receipt.
 
Schedule I
 
Schedule I (con't)
 
- Exercisable for 2 years from Payroll Separation Date (PSD).
2/2007
- All shares vested. Exercisable for 2 years from PSD.
7/2007
- Shares exercisable for 3 years from PSD, for
2008 - 2011
              options exercisable on PSD. Unvested shares as of PSD forfeited.
For illustrative purposes only. Plan documents control. Assumptions include actual termination date.
 
 
Exhibit 1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "") and Robert P. Kelly ("") agree as follows:
Corporation
Executive
Executive's employment with the Corporation will terminate effective August 31, 2011 (the "").
1.
Date of Termination
.
Date of Termination
. Executive agrees to make himself reasonably available to the Corporation to respond to requests by the Corporation for information concerning litigation, regulatory inquiry or Investigation, involving facts or events relating to the Corporation that may be within his knowledge. Executive will cooperate fully with the Corporation in connection with any and all future litigation or regulatory proceedings brought by or against the Corporation to the extent the Corporation reasonably deems Executive's cooperation necessary. Executive will be entitled to reimbursement of reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including counsel fees) incurred in connection with fulfilling his obligations under this Section 2.
2.
Cooperation
. In consideration of Executive's undertakings herein, the Corporation will make payments and provide benefits in accordance with Section 3(a) of the Corporation's Executive Severance Plan (the "") for a termination by the Corporation other than for Cause, less required deductions (including, but not limited to, federal, state and local tax withholdings) and provide for the equity award treatment set forth in the Letter Agreement, dated August 31, 2011, between the Corporation and the Executive and Schedule I thereto (the ""). The preceding payments and benefits are collectively referred in this Agreement as the "".
3.
Severance Benefit
Severance Plan
Letter Agreement
Severance Payment
The Severance Payment will be paid in accordance with the Severance Plan or the Letter Agreement, as applicable. (For purposes of Section 3(a)(ii) of the Plan, the Board has determined the individual component of your annual incentive will be appropriately calculated based on having achieved the target level of performance and the corporate component of your annual incentive will be calculated on the same basis as is applicable to the Corporation's senior executives.) Provision of the Severance Payment is contingent upon the execution of this Agreement by Executive and Executive's compliance with all terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Severance Plan. Executive agrees that if this Agreement does not become effective, the Corporation shall not be required to make any further Severance Payments to Executive pursuant to this Agreement, the Severance Plan or the Letter Agreement and shall be entitled to recover all Severance Payments already made by it (including interest thereon) pursuant thereto.
. Executive represents that he has returned to the Corporation all property or information, including, without limitation, all reports, files, memos, plans, lists, or other records (whether electronically stored or not) belonging to the Corporation or its affiliates, including copies, extracts or other documents derived from such property or information. Executive will immediately forfeit all rights to Severance Payments under this Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Severance Plan if Executive, directly or indirectly (i) at any time discloses to any third party or entity any trade secrets or other proprietary or confidential information pertaining to the Corporation or any of its affiliates or uses such secrets or information without the prior written consent of the General Counsel of the Corporation; or; (ii) Executive breaches any of Executive's post termination obligations to the Corporation pursuant to an individual agreement, including but not limited to non-solicitation, confidentiality and/or non-competition restrictions (which are incorporated herein by reference); or (iii) to the extent that Executive does not have post termination non-solicitation, confidentiality and/or non-competition obligations in an individual agreement, during the twelve (12) month period after the Date of Termination (A) solicits, influences, encourages, induces, recruits or causes any employee of the Corporation or any person who was an employee of the Corporation within the six (6) month period before Executive's Date of Termination to resign from the Corporation or to apply for or accept employment with any Competitive Enterprise; or (B) solicits or attempt to solicit any of the Corporation's clients and/or customers for whom Executive or the Corporation performed services or actively solicited work from during the six (6) month period before Executive's Date of Termination, to transact business with a Competitive Enterprise or to reduce or refrain from doing any business with the Corporation or otherwise interferes with or damages any relationship between the Corporation and any such client or customers. For purposes of this Agreement, "Competitive Enterprise" means any business enterprise that either (A) engages in any activity that competes anywhere with any activity that the Corporation or its affiliates is then engaged in or (B) holds a 5% or greater equity, voting or profit participation interest in any enterprise that engages in such a competitive activity and were within the scope of Executive's responsibilities within the twelve (12) months preceding Executive's termination of employment.
4.
Confidential Information; Non-Solicitation; Non-Compete
The Corporation agrees that it and its executive officers and directors will not defame or disparage or otherwise make, or authorize the making of, any communication that is intended or may reasonably be expected to harm the reputation, business or prospects of Executive, and Executive agrees that he will not defame or disparage or otherwise make, or authorize the making of, any communication that is intended or may reasonably be expected to harm the reputation, business or prospects of the Corporation, its affiliated companies or any of their respective directors or executive officers. The Corporation and Executive
have agreed on a the press release, which will be the only press release by either party with respect to Executive's resignation and the matters subject to the Agreement and neither the Corporation nor Executive will schedule or hold any press conference or similar proceeding with respect to Executive's resignation or the matters subject to this Agreement.
Nothing in this Agreement shall prevent or prohibit Executive or the Corporation from responding to an order, subpoena, other legal process or regulatory inquiry directed to them or from providing information to or making a filing with a governmental or regulatory body. Executive agrees that upon learning of any order, subpoena or other legal process seeking information that would otherwise be prohibited from disclosure under this Agreement, he will promptly notify the Corporation, in writing, directed to the Corporation's General Counsel. In the event disclosure is so required, Executive agrees not to oppose any action by the Corporation to seek or obtain a protective order or other appropriate remedy.
Executive hereby represents that he has not filed any action, complaint, charge, grievance or arbitration against the Corporation or any of its affiliates in connection with any matters relating, directly or indirectly, to his employment, and covenants and agrees not to file any such action, complaint or arbitration or commence any other judicial or arbitral proceedings against the Corporation or any of its affiliates with respect to events occurring prior to the termination of his employment with the Corporation or any affiliates thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing contained in this Agreement shall prevent Executive from filing a charge or lawsuit challenging the validity of the waiver and release contained herein under OWBPA with respect to claims under ADEA or filing a charge of discrimination with, or participate in, an investigation or proceeding conducted by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (""), but Executive will not be entitled to any monetary or other relief from the EEOC or from any court as a result of litigation brought on the basis of or in connection with such charge, except if, and to the extent that, the release and waiver contained in this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable (in which event, Corporation will be entitled to restitution or set off for the amounts paid to Executive hereunder as and to the extent determined by the court).
5.
EEOC
. Effective as of the Effective Date, and in return for the consideration set forth above, Executive agrees not to sue or file any action, claim, or lawsuit against the Corporation, agrees not to pursue, seek to recover or recover any alleged damages, seek to obtain or obtain any other form of relief or remedy with respect to, and cause the dismissal or withdrawal of, any lawsuit, action, claim, or charge against the Corporation, and Executive agrees to waive all claims and release and forever discharge the Corporation, its officers, directors, subsidiaries, affiliates, parents, attorneys, shareholders and employees from any claims, demands, actions, causes of action or liabilities for compensatory damages or any other relief or remedy, and obligations of any kind or nature whatsoever, based on any matter, cause or thing, relating in any way, directly or
6.
General Release
indirectly, to his employment, from the beginning of time through the Effective Date of this Agreement, whether known or unknown, fixed or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, and whether arising from tort, statute, or contract, including, but not limited to, any claims arising under or pursuant to Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil Rights Act of 1871, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Americans with Disabilities Act, the Rehabilitation Act, the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, the Occupational Safety & Health Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act of 1990 (""), the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, Section 806 of the Corporate and Criminal Fraud Accountability Act of 2002, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (""), New York State Labor Law, New York State Human Rights Law, New York Human Rights Law, and any other state, federal, city, county or local statute, rule, regulation, ordinance or order, or the national or local law of any foreign country, any claim for future consideration for employment with the Corporation, any claims for attorneys' fees and costs and any employment rights or entitlement law, and any claims for wrongful discharge, intentional infliction of emotional distress, defamation, libel or slander, payment of wages, outrageous behavior, breach of contract or any duty allegedly owed to Executive, discrimination based upon race, color, ethnicity, sex, age, national origin, religion, disability, sexual orientation, or another unlawful criterion or circumstance, and any other theory of recovery; , , that this Section 6 shall not release (a) any claim for breach of this Agreement, the Severance Plan or the Letter Agreement, (b) any claim for accrued benefits to which Executive is entitled under the Corporation's retirement, deferred compensation, and welfare benefit plans and programs (including the SERP as agreed in the Letter Agreement), (c) Executive's rights as a stockholder of the Corporation or (d) any rights for indemnification or contribution under the Corporation's certificate of incorporation or by-laws or equivalent governing documents of the Corporation and its affiliates, the law of the State of Delaware, any indemnification agreement between Executive and the Corporation or any rights to insurance coverage under any directors' and officers' liability insurance or fiduciary insurance policy. It is the intention of the parties to make this release as broad and as general as the law permits (subject to the preceding proviso).
OWBPA
ADEA
provided
however
Executive acknowledges that he may later discover facts different from or in addition to those which he knows or believes to be true now, and he agrees that, in such event, this Agreement shall nevertheless remain effective in all respects, notwithstanding such different or additional facts or the discovery of those facts.
7.
This Agreement may not be introduced in any legal or administrative proceeding, or other similar forum, except one concerning a breach of this Agreement or the Severance Plan.
8.
Executive acknowledges that Executive has made an independent investigation of the facts, and does not rely on any statement or representation of the Corporation in entering into this Agreement or the Letter Agreement, other than those set forth herein or therein.
9.
Executive agrees that, without limiting the Corporation's remedies, should he commence, continue, join in, or in any other manner attempt to assert any claim released in connection herewith, or otherwise violate in a material fashion any obligation in this Agreement , the Corporation shall not be required to make any further Severance Payments to the Executive pursuant to this Agreement, the Letter Agreement or the Severance Plan and shall be entitled to recover all Severance Payments already made by it thereunder (including interest thereon), in addition to all damages, attorneys' fees and costs the Corporation incurs in connection with Executive's breach of this Agreement or the Letter Agreement. Executive further agrees that the Corporation shall be entitled to the repayments and recovery of damages described above without waiver of or prejudice to the release granted by him in connection with this Agreement, and that his violation or breach of any obligation of this Agreement shall forever release and discharge the Corporation from the performance of its obligations arising from this Agreement.
10.
Executive has been advised and acknowledges that he has been given twenty-one (21) days to sign this Agreement, he has seven (7) days following his signing of this Agreement to revoke and cancel the terms and conditions contained herein, and the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall not become effective or enforceable until the revocation period has expired (the "").
11.
Effective Date
Executive acknowledges that Executive has been advised hereby to consult with, and has consulted with, an attorney of his choice prior to signing this Agreement.
12.
Executive acknowledges that Executive has fully read this Agreement, understands the contents of this Agreement, and agrees to its terms and conditions of his own free will, knowingly and voluntarily, and without any duress or coercion.
13.
Executive understands that this Agreement includes a final general release and restrictive covenants related to confidentiality and non-solicitation, and that Executive can make no further claims against the Corporation or the persons listed in Section 6 of this Agreement relating in any way, directly or indirectly, to his employment or termination of his employment. Executive also understands that this Agreement precludes Executive from recovering any damages or other relief as a result of any lawsuit, grievance, charge or claim brought on Executive's behalf against the Corporation or the persons listed in Section 6 of this Agreement.
14.
Executive acknowledges that Executive is receiving adequate consideration (that is in addition to what Executive is otherwise entitled to) for signing this Agreement.
15.
This Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Severance Plan constitute the complete understanding between Executive and the Corporation regarding the subject matter hereof and thereof. No other promises or agreements regarding the subject matter hereof and thereof will be binding unless signed by Executive and the Corporation.
16.
Executive and the Corporation agree that all notices or other communications required or permitted to be given under the terms of this Agreement shall be given in accordance with Section 8 of the Severance Plan.
17.
Executive and the Corporation agree that any disputes relating to any matters covered under the terms of this Agreement or the Letter Agreement shall be resolved in accordance with Section 9 of the Severance Plan.
18.
By entering into this Agreement and the Letter Agreement, the Corporation does not admit and specifically denies any liability, wrongdoing or violation of any law, statute, regulation or policy, and it is expressly understood and agreed that this Agreement and the Letter Agreement are being entered into solely for the purpose of amicably resolving all matters of any kind whatsoever between Executive and the Corporation.
19.
In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
20.
The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive any termination of this Agreement to the extent necessary for the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
21.
Unless expressly specified elsewhere in this Agreement, this Agreement shall be governed by and construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without reference to the principles of conflict of law.
22.
This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts.
23.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Executive has signed this Agreement on this of , 2011.
        
                    
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
New York  August 31, 2011  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced that Gerald L. Hassell, BNY Mellon's president and a board member since 1998, has been appointed chairman and chief executive officer of the company, effective immediately. Hassell also continues as BNY Mellon's president. Robert P. Kelly has stepped down as chairman, chief executive officer and director by mutual agreement with the board of directors, due to differences in approach to managing the company.
"Gerald is ideally positioned to guide BNY Mellon through the next phase of its growth and to bring it to its full potential," said Wesley W. von Schack, lead director of BNY Mellon. "Over the course of his more than three-decade tenure with BNY Mellon and its predecessor company, The Bank of New York, Gerald has led nearly every major division of the company, has been a key decision maker on every major business action, executive hire and promotion in the merged company, and has served on its board of directors. He brings a broad and deep knowledge of our operations, our clients, our industry and our culture to his new roles. As the executive currently overseeing our investment services business and our global client management function, and given his extensive and long-standing relationships with investment management clients, Gerald is exceptionally well-suited to ensure BNY Mellon maintains and strengthens its role as a global market leader," von Schack continued.
"I am pleased to accept these new roles and am excited about the strong growth prospects for our company," said Hassell. "When we help clients succeed we drive value for our shareholders. I look forward to working with our outstanding management team and employees to capitalize on BNY Mellon's extensive opportunities."
"We are grateful to Bob Kelly for his leadership and the contributions he made to the company during his tenure as CEO," said von Schack. "He played a key role in the integration of The Bank of New York and Mellon Financial following the merger and helped navigate the company through the financial crisis, securing its position as the world's leading provider of investment management and investment services. Bob Kelly is a person of the highest integrity and we wish him the best in his future pursuits."
"It has been an honor to serve BNY Mellon, its management team and its employees during the past four years," said Kelly. "We have navigated tremendously difficult markets and built one of the world's premier financial institutions. I am confident that under Gerald's leadership of the firm's strong management team, BNY Mellon will continue to flourish going forward."
Background on Gerald L. Hassell
Since joining The Bank of New York's management development program more than three decades ago, Gerald Hassell has had direct management responsibility for the company's broad range of investment services businesses, including asset servicing and issuer, broker-dealer, treasury and clearing services. He also oversees client management across the company's global businesses, as well as operations and technology. He was named to The Bank of New York's executive committee in 1994, and named president and elected to its Board of Directors in 1998.
Mr. Hassell holds an MBA in finance from the New York University Stern School of Business and a BA in economics from Duke University.
Mr. Hassell is also on the Board of Directors of Comcast Corporation. Until recently he chaired the Board of Visitors of The Fuqua School of Business at Duke University and now serves on the Board of Trustees of Duke University. In addition he is on the Board of Visitors of Columbia University Medical Center and the boards of the New York Philharmonic, the Economic Club of New York and the National September 11 Memorial & Museum. He is also a member of The Financial Services Roundtable and Financial Services Forum and is Vice Chairman of Big Brothers Big Sisters of New York.
About BNY Mellon
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.7 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at www.bnymellon.com.
 
The Abernathy MacGregor Group
Tom Johnson
212-371-5999


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20110923162806.txt.gz
TIME:20110923162806
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On September 23, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 3.55% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 3.55% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "Notes"), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated September 16, 2011 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated September 16, 2011 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States and the laws of the State of New York and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20111019070139.txt.gz
TIME:20111019070139
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On October 19, 2011, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2011 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER EARNINGS OF $651 MILLION OR $0.53 PER SHARE
VERSUS THIRD QUARTER 2010:
 
 
NET LONG-TERM INFLOWS OF $4 BILLION IN ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT IN 3Q11
GENERATED $718 MILLION OF TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY IN 3Q11
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported third quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $651 million, or $0.53 per common share, compared with $622 million, or $0.51 per common share, in the third quarter of 2010 and $735 million, or $0.59 per common share, in the second quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, October 19, 2011 
"Year-over-year, we achieved revenue and earnings growth as we benefited from new business wins, net long-term asset flows and increased deposits," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon. "We also delivered positive operating leverage despite higher legal and severance costs, and generated a 22 percent return on tangible common equity for the quarter." "In a challenging environment, our employees are doing an outstanding job providing our clients with the highest levels of service, winning new business, maximizing efficiency, and mitigating risk. We will continue to invest in our businesses to support our clients and the communities we serve while keeping a sharp focus on near-term earnings performance," added Mr. Hassell.
 
 
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the third quarter of 2011 and are compared to the third quarter of 2010, all information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Third Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2011 compared with a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010 and no provision in the second quarter of 2011. The credit in the provision in the third quarter of 2011 primarily resulted from an improvement in the loan portfolio and a decline in criticized assets both year-over-year and sequentially.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 29.7% in the third quarter of 2011, compared with 26.4% on a continuing operations basis in the third quarter of 2010, and 26.9% in the second quarter of 2011. Adjusted for the impact of the consolidated investment management funds, the effective tax rate on an operating basis (Non-GAAP) was 29.0% in the third quarter of 2011, compared with 28.2% in the third quarter of 2010 and 30.0% in the second quarter of 2011. See the Supplemental information section beginning on page 9.
effective tax rate
The was $461 million at Sept. 30, 2011 compared with $408 million at June 30, 2011. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by a decline in interest rates.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
We generated $718 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the third quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 6.6% at Sept. 30, 2011, unchanged from June 30, 2011. The ratio was impacted by increased share repurchases due in part to market conditions during the third quarter of 2011 and higher risk-weighted assets primarily driven by balance sheet growth.
 On Oct. 19, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 9, 2011 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 31, 2011.
Quarterly dividend
 
 
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.9 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.2 trillion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.6 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at and through Twitter@bnymellon.
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Sept. 30, 2011 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on Oct. 19, 2011. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (international), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on Oct. 19, 2011. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Oct. 19, 2011 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Wednesday, Nov. 2, 2011 by dialing (866) 479-2460 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1535 (international). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be eliminated as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon, which will be eliminated as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio permits investors the ability to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses); and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY
 
Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Release, net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
 
 
The following table presents investment management fee revenue excluding performance fees.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
Income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our intention to invest in our businesses to support our clients and the communities we serve while keeping a sharp focus on near-term earnings performance. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Oct. 19, 2011 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20111020172245.txt.gz
TIME:20111020172245
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
THIRD QUARTER 2011 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 3Q11 vs. 3Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $194 million compared with $146 million in the third quarter of 2010 and $222 million in the second quarter of 2011. In the third quarter of 2011, foreign exchange revenue totaled $221 million, an increase of 38% year-over-year and 20% (unannualized) sequentially. Both increases resulted from increased volatility. The year-over-year increase also reflects higher volumes, while sequentially, volumes were steady. Other trading revenue was a loss of $27 million in the third quarter of 2011 compared with a loss of $14 million in the third quarter of 2010 and revenue of $38 million in the second quarter of 2011. The decreases were driven by the $40 million net impact of wider credit spreads on the credit valuation adjustment ("CVA"), recorded in the third quarter of 2011.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
 
We generated $718 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the third quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 6.6% at Sept. 30, 2011, unchanged from June 30, 2011. The ratio was impacted by increased share repurchases due in part to market conditions during the third quarter of 2011 and higher risk-weighted assets primarily driven by balance sheet growth.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Sept. 30, 2011, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $76.5 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $863 million at Sept. 30, 2011 compared with an unrealized pre-tax net gain of $770 million at June 30, 2011 and an unrealized pre-tax net gain of $629 million at Sept. 30, 2010. Total paydowns of sub-investment grade securities were approximately $300 million in the third quarter of 2011. The investment securities previously included in the former Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At Sept. 30, 2011, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $334 million.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2011 compared with a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2010 and no provision in the second quarter of 2011. The credit in the provision in the third quarter of 2011 primarily resulted from an improvement in the loan portfolio and a decline in criticized assets both year-over-year and sequentially. During the third quarter of 2011, the total allowance for credit losses decreased $37 million driven by the credit to the provision recorded in the third quarter of 2011 and $15 million of net charge-offs.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
In the first quarter of 2011, BNY Mellon realigned its internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on its two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Also in the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach which adjusts our transfer pricing methodology to better reflect the value of certain domestic deposits. All prior period business results were restated. There was no impact to the consolidated results.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments)
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and shareowner services, as well as clearing services and global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions)
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
(primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items)
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be eliminated as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. This ratio is also informative to investors in BNY Mellon's common stock because, unlike the Tier 1 capital ratio, it excludes trust preferred securities issued by BNY Mellon, which will be eliminated as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III tier 1 common equity ratio permits investors the ability to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses); and expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to migrating positions to global growth centers and the elimination of certain positions. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
The following table presents investment management fee revenue excluding performance fees.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 3Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Oct. 19, 2011, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 22

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
In the first quarter of 2011, we realigned our internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. Investment management and performance fees consist of the former asset and wealth management fee revenue and Investment services fees consist of the former securities servicing fees, including asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services, as well as treasury services fee revenue. All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations.
In the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach to transfer pricing domestic deposits. All prior period business results have been restated to reflect this revision. The revision did not impact consolidated results.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain asset management funds and seed capital investments are now disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available for sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated asset management funds; previously these were disclosed as asset and wealth management revenue and investment and other income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Investment Management business.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/Investment Write-downs - Impacted total revenue levels in the full year of 2008 and full year of 2009. `
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Global efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009 and third quarter of 2010
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
Certain reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated October 19, 2011, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS PRELIMINARY
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20111123160933.txt.gz
TIME:20111123160933
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 23, 2011, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 2.400% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2017 (the "5-Year Notes"), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 1.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "3-Year Notes") and (iii) $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "Floating Rate Notes" and, together with the 5-Year Notes and the 3-Year Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 2.400% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2017 (the "5-Year Notes"), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "3-Year Notes") and (iii) $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2014 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and together with the 5-Year Notes and the 3-Year Notes, the "Notes"), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated November 17, 2011 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated November 17, 2011 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20111223090408.txt.gz
TIME:20111223090408
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 23, 2011, ConvergEx Group ("ConvergEx") issued a press release announcing that ConvergEx and CVC Capital Partners ("CVC") have mutually agreed to terminate their pending transaction, pursuant to which ConvergEx would have been acquired by funds advised by CVC. A subsidiary of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation had agreed to sell a majority of the equity stake owned by the subsidiary in ConvergEx to funds advised by CVC as part of the transaction.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120118063536.txt.gz
TIME:20120118063536
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On January 18, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2011 and fourth quarter 2011. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS OF $505 MILLION OR $0.42 PER SHARE INCLUDING:
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $505 million, or $0.42 per common share, compared with $679 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2010 and $651 million, or $0.53 per common share, in the third quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, Jan. 18, 2012 
"I am pleased with the meaningful progress we made in improving our capital position and reducing operating expenses. Our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 7.1% at the end of the quarter, and we continued to generate strong returns on tangible common equity. It was a challenging revenue quarter, as general uncertainty in the financial markets resulted in lower-than-normal levels of client activity. Our results were also impacted by seasonality in our Depositary Receipts business. We remained focused on driving our operational excellence initiatives and managing our expense base lower to offset weak market conditions," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"I want to thank our 49,000 professionals across the company for their continued commitment to improve our results and help our clients succeed in a difficult global economy," said Mr. Hassell.
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $2.516 billion, or $2.03 per common share, for the full-year 2011 compared with $2.518 billion, or $2.05 per common share, for the full-year 2010.
 
 
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2011 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2010. The fourth quarter 2010 information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Fourth Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The was $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 compared with a credit of $22 million in both the fourth quarter of 2010 and the third quarter of 2011. The provision in the fourth quarter of 2011 primarily resulted from a broker-dealer customer that filed for bankruptcy in the fourth quarter of 2011.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
The was 30.6% in the fourth quarter of 2011, compared with 27.3% on a continuing operations basis in the fourth quarter of 2010, and 29.7% in the third quarter of 2011. The effective tax rate in the fourth quarter of 2011 was negatively impacted by non-tax deductible goodwill associated with the disposition of Shareowner Services which was largely offset by a more favorable mix of foreign and domestic income.
effective tax rate
The was $420 million at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with $461 million at Sept. 30, 2011. The decrease in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by a lower valuation of non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
N/A  Not applicable.
We generated $571 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the fourth quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio (Non-GAAP) was 7.1% at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with 6.5% at Sept. 30, 2011. The improvement in the ratio was driven by lower risk-weighted assets and a reduction in goodwill and intangible assets.
 On Jan. 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 7, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 30, 2012.
Quarterly dividend
 
 
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.8 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.26 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at and through Twitter@bnymellon.
www.bnymellon.com
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Dec. 31, 2011 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EST on Jan. 18, 2012. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (international), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to . The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EST on Jan. 18, 2012. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 18, 2012 at approximately 2 p.m. EST through Wednesday, Feb. 1, 2012 by dialing (866) 490-2547 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1702 (international). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at for the same time period.
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this press release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be phased out as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses); and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio.
The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to our operational efficiency initiatives and migrating positions to global growth centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully phased-in basis.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010, our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Jan. 18, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120120161356.txt.gz
TIME:20120120161356
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2011 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 4Q11 vs. 4Q10 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M - Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $228 million compared with $258 million in the fourth quarter of 2010 and $200 million in the third quarter of 2011. In the fourth quarter of 2011, foreign exchange revenue totaled $183 million, a decrease of 11% year-over-year and 17% (unannualized) sequentially. Both decreases resulted from lower volumes. The year-over-year decrease was partially offset by higher volatility, while sequentially, volatility decreased. Other trading revenue was $45 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 compared with revenue of $52 million in the fourth quarter of 2010 and a loss of $21 million in the third quarter of 2011. The sequential increase was primarily driven by a lower credit valuation adjustment.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
We generated $571 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the fourth quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio (Non-GAAP) was 7.1% at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with 6.5% at Sept. 30, 2011. The improvement in the ratio was driven by lower risk-weighted assets and a reduction in goodwill and intangible assets.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Dec. 31, 2011, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $81.7 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $793 million at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with $863 million at Sept. 30, 2011 and $353 million at Dec. 31, 2010. During the fourth quarter of 2011, we received $296 million of paydowns and sold approximately $250 million of sub-investment grade securities. The investment securities previously included in the former Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At Dec. 31, 2011, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $177 million.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 compared with a credit of $22 million in both the fourth quarter of 2010 and third quarter of 2011. The provision in the fourth quarter of 2011 primarily resulted from a broker-dealer customer that filed for bankruptcy in 4Q11.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
In the first quarter of 2011, BNY Mellon realigned its internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on its two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Also in the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach which adjusts our transfer pricing methodology to better reflect the value of certain domestic deposits. All prior period business results were restated. There was no impact to the consolidated results.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be phased out as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses); and expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio.
The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to our operational efficiency initiatives and migrating positions to global growth centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased-in basis.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 4Q11 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010, our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2011 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Jan. 18, 2012, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 22

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On December 31, 2011, we completed the sale of Shareowner Services. The financial results for Shareowner Services are included in the Investment Services business. In the first quarter of 2011, we realigned our internal reporting structure and business presentation to focus on two principal businesses, Investment Management and Investment Services. Investment Management includes the former Asset Management and Wealth Management businesses. Investment Services includes the former Asset Servicing, Issuer Services and Clearing Services businesses as well as the Cash Management business previously included in the Treasury Services business. The credit-related activities previously included in Treasury Services business, are now included in the Other segment. Accordingly, the income statement has been changed to reflect this realignment. Investment management and performance fees consist of the former asset and wealth management fee revenue and Investment services fees consist of the former securities servicing fees, including asset servicing, issuer services, clearing services, as well as treasury services fee revenue. All prior periods have been reclassified. The reclassifications did not affect the results of operations.
In the first quarter of 2011, we revised the net interest revenue for our businesses to reflect a new approach to transfer pricing domestic deposits. All prior period business results have been restated to reflect this revision. The revision did not impact consolidated results.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
On November 2, 2009, we completed the acquisition of Insight Asset Management ("Insight") based in London. The financial results for Insight are included in the Investment Management business.
On January 1, 2009, we adopted FAS 160, which resulted in a reclassification of minority interest to equity from other liabilities on the balance sheet and to noncontrolling interest from other expense on the income statement.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Investment Securities Portfolio restructuring/Investment Write-downs - Impacted total revenue levels in the full year of 2008 and full year of 2009.
The TARP preferred dividends and related redemption premium impacted the fourth quarter of 2008 and the first and second quarters of 2009.
The FDIC Special Assessment of all depository institutions impacted the second quarter of 2009.
Expense efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in the fourth quarters of 2008 and 2009, third quarter of 2010 and fourth quarter of 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
Certain reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current periods presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated January 18, 2012, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS -12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS12 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120213091856.txt.gz
TIME:20120213091856
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On January 18, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2011 and fourth quarter 2011. The Registrant previously furnished the press release as Exhibit 99.1 to a Current Report on Form 8-K, dated January 18, 2012, pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K. A version of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS OF $505 MILLION OR $0.42 PER SHARE INCLUDING:
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $505 million, or $0.42 per common share, compared with $679 million, or $0.54 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2010 and $651 million, or $0.53 per common share, in the third quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, Jan. 18, 2012 
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $2.516 billion, or $2.03 per common share, for the full-year 2011 compared with $2.518 billion, or $2.05 per common share, for the full-year 2010.
 
 
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the fourth quarter of 2011 and are compared to the fourth quarter of 2010. The fourth quarter 2010 information is reported on a continuing operations basis and sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
Fourth Quarter Results -
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The was $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 compared with a credit of $22 million in both the fourth quarter of 2010 and the third quarter of 2011. The provision in the fourth quarter of 2011 primarily resulted from a broker-dealer customer that filed for bankruptcy in the fourth quarter of 2011.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
The was 30.6% in the fourth quarter of 2011, compared with 27.3% on a continuing operations basis in the fourth quarter of 2010, and 29.7% in the third quarter of 2011. The effective tax rate in the fourth quarter of 2011 was negatively impacted by non-tax deductible goodwill associated with the disposition of Shareowner Services which was largely offset by a more favorable mix of foreign and domestic income.
effective tax rate
The was $420 million at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with $461 million at Sept. 30, 2011. The decrease in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by a lower valuation of non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities.
unrealized net of tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
N/A  Not applicable.
We generated $571 million of Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the fourth quarter of 2011, primarily driven by earnings retention.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio (Non-GAAP) was 7.1% at Dec. 31, 2011 compared with 6.5% at Sept. 30, 2011. The improvement in the ratio was driven by lower risk-weighted assets and a reduction in goodwill and intangible assets.
 On Jan. 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 7, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 30, 2012.
Quarterly dividend
 
 
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $25.8 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.26 trillion in assets under management, services $11.8 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available at and through Twitter@bnymellon.
www.bnymellon.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this press release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be phased out as Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses); and expense measures which exclude special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010, restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to situations where accounting rules require certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010 and the merger with Mellon Financial Corporation in 2007. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased, typically after approximately three years. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio.
The presentation of financial measures excluding special litigation reserves taken in the first quarter of 2010 provides investors the ability to view performance metrics on the basis that management views results. The presentation of income of consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds, permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with how management views the business. Restructuring charges relate to our operational efficiency initiatives and migrating positions to global growth centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully phased-in basis.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2010, our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Jan. 18, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120217165943.txt.gz
TIME:20120217165943
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) On February 13, 2012, Mr. John P. Surma notified The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Corporation") of his intention to retire from the Board of Directors of the Corporation at the upcoming Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on April 10, 2012 and that he would not be standing for re-election to the Board.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120221170450.txt.gz
TIME:20120221170450
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 21, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 3.55% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "10-Year Notes"), which form a single issue with the $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 10-Year Notes originally issued on September 23, 2011, and (ii) $750,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 1.20% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "3-Year Notes" and, together with the 10-Year Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
February 21, 2012
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 3.55% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2021 (the "10-Year Notes") and (ii) $750,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.20% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "3-Year Notes", and together with the 10-Year Notes, the "Notes"), pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated February 13, 2012 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated February 13, 2012 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120412105522.txt.gz
TIME:20120412105522
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.07. SUBMISSION OF MATTERS TO A VOTE OF SECURITY HOLDERS.
At the Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the "Annual Meeting") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") on April 10, 2012, each nominee for director was elected by a majority of votes cast. Management proposals 2 and 3 were approved. Stockholder proposals 4 and 5 were not approved. The proposals below are described in detail in BNY Mellon's definitive proxy statement, dated March 9, 2012, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Abstentions and broker non-votes were counted for purposes of determining whether a quorum was present, but were not treated as votes cast on a proposal. Therefore, broker non-votes and abstentions did not have the effect of a vote for or against the proposal and were not counted in determining the number of votes required for approval.
The results are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* Abstentions and broker non-votes are not counted as votes cast.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120418065359.txt.gz
TIME:20120418065359
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 18, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2012. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS OF $619 MILLION OR $0.52 PER SHARE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported first quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $619 million, or $0.52 per common share, compared with $625 million, or $0.50 per common share, in the first quarter of 2011 and $505 million, or $0.42 per common share, in the fourth quarter of 2011.
NEW YORK, April 18, 2012 
"We enjoyed solid sequential growth in investment management and services fees, as we benefited from new business wins and improved equity values. We are seeing the early results of our operational excellence initiatives as we generated significant positive operating leverage relative to the fourth quarter," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"We are pleased with our performance on the recent regulatory stress test. The results reflect the strength of our business model, the excellent quality of our balance sheet and our continuing ability to return capital to our shareholders while maintaining a very strong capital position," added Mr. Hassell.
 
Note: See "Supplemental information" on pages 9 through 12 for the calculation of the Non-GAAP measures of the return on tangible common equity and the estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the first quarter of 2012 and are compared to the first quarter of 2011. Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses. Unless otherwise noted, the results for 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
First Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The year-over-year decrease in the net interest margin (FTE) was primarily driven by increased client deposits nearly half of which were invested in liquid, lower-yielding assets. The sequential increase in the net interest margin (FTE) reflects increased investments in high quality investment securities and a decrease in lower yielding interest-bearing deposits with banks.
The was $5 million in the first quarter of 2012 compared with $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 and no provision in the first quarter of 2011.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
The was 28.7% in the first quarter of 2012, compared with 29.3% in the first quarter of 2011 and 30.6% in the fourth quarter of 2011.
effective tax rate
The was $1.2 billion at March 31, 2012 compared with $793 million at Dec. 31, 2011. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio was driven by higher asset-backed securities prices.
unrealized pre-tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
We generated $680 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the first quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP was 7.6% at March 31, 2012 compared with 7.1% at Dec. 31, 2011 and 6.1% at March 31, 2011. The sequential improvement in the ratio was driven by an increase in the value of our investment securities portfolio, earnings retention and lower risk-weighted assets, partially offset by share repurchases.
 On April 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on May 8, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 30, 2012.
Quarterly dividend
 
 
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.6 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through March 31, 2012 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on April 18, 2012. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (international), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 18, 2012. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 18, 2012 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Wednesday, May 2, 2012 by dialing (888) 554-3823 (U.S.) or (203) 369-3738 (international). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be phased out of Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds; and expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global growth centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expense on a basis consistent with how management views the business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased in basis.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our operational excellence initiatives and our ability to return capital to shareholders. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of April 18, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120423163424.txt.gz
TIME:20120423163424
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 18, 2012, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for first quarter 2012 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on April 18, 2012, a Quarterly Earnings Review and Financial Trends information. The Quarterly Earnings Review is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and the Financial Trends information is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this report. Both exhibits are "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and are not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to this report contain information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FIRST QUARTER 2012 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
 
KEY POINTS (comparisons are unannualized 1Q12 vs. 4Q11 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation. Unless otherwise noted, the results for 2011 include Shareowner Services.
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
N/M-Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $191 million compared with $198 million in the first quarter of 2011 and $228 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. In the first quarter of 2012, foreign exchange revenue totaled $136 million, a decrease of 21% year-over-year and 26% (unannualized) sequentially. The year-over-year decrease reflects lower volumes and volatility, while sequentially, volumes were unchanged and volatility decreased 20%. Other trading revenue was $55 million in the first quarter of 2012 compared with $25 million in the first quarter of 2011 and $45 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. Both increases were primarily driven by higher fixed income trading.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
 
We generated $680 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the first quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP was 7.6% at March 31, 2012 compared with 7.1% at Dec. 31, 2011 and 6.1% at March 31, 2011. The sequential improvement in the ratio was driven by an increase in the value of our investment securities portfolio, earnings retention and lower risk-weighted assets, partially offset by share repurchases.
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2012, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $88.2 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $1.2 billion at March 31, 2012 compared with $793 million at Dec. 31, 2011. During the first quarter of 2012, we received $229 million of paydowns and sold approximately $23 million of sub-investment grade securities. The investment securities previously included in the former Grantor Trust were marked down to approximately 60% of face value in 2009. At March 31, 2012, these securities were trading above adjusted amortized cost with a total unrealized pre-tax gain of $364 million.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was $5 million in the first quarter of 2012 compared with $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 and no provision in the first quarter of 2011.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
On Dec. 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items. Results in 2011 include the Shareowner Services business.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes trust preferred securities, which will be phased out of Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of net securities gains (losses) and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds; and expense measures which exclude restructuring charges, M&I expenses and amortization of intangible assets expenses. Return on equity and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. Operating margin measures also exclude noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period to period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions, or where we have incurred charges unrelated to operational initiatives. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. With regards to the exclusion of net securities gains (losses), BNY Mellon's primary businesses are Investment Management and Investment Services. The management of these businesses is evaluated on the basis of the ability of these businesses to generate fee and net interest revenue and to control expenses, and not on the results of BNY Mellon's investment securities portfolio. The investment securities portfolio is managed within the Other segment. The primary objective of the investment securities portfolio is to generate net interest revenue from the liquidity generated by BNY Mellon's processing businesses. BNY Mellon does not generally originate or trade the securities in the investment securities portfolio. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global growth centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business.
The presentation of income (loss) of consolidated investment management funds, net of net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased-in basis.
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
The following tables present fee and other revenue and noninterest expense excluding Shareowner Services.
 
 
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 1Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our operational excellence initiatives. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of April 18, 2012, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Expense efficiency restructuring chargesRecorded charges in 2010 and 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period's presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information  Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated April 18, 2012, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS-9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS9 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER-9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
 
 
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 9 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120516163643.txt.gz
TIME:20120516163643
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 10, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") entered into a Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement (the "Agreement") with Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC (collectively, the "selling securityholders"), in connection with the purchase by the selling securityholders of $500,100,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Senior Notes due 2017 (the "Notes").
Under the Agreement, the selling securityholders have agreed to purchase the Notes from the Company on or about May 21, 2012 and to pay for the Notes by delivering $500,100,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Remarketable 6.044% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2043 that the selling securityholders have agreed to purchase from Mellon Capital IV in a remarketing transaction. The Agreement provides that the selling securityholders may, by written notice to the Company, offer the Notes to the public in a secondary public offering. Each of the selling securityholders delivered a public offer notice to the Company on May 10, 2012.
The Agreement contains certain representations, warranties and agreements of the Company, conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties, and termination provisions. Under the terms of the Agreement, the Company agreed to indemnify the selling securityholders against certain specified types of liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to contribute to payments the selling securityholders may be required to make in respect of these liabilities and to reimburse the selling securityholders for certain expenses. In the ordinary course of business the selling securityholders or their respective affiliates have engaged and may in the future engage in various general financing and banking transactions with the Company and its affiliates from time to time for which they have received or will receive customary fees and expenses.
The above summary of the Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by the Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. This Current Report on Form 8-K is being filed for the purpose of filing Exhibit 99.1 as an exhibit to the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) (the "Registration Statement") and such exhibit is hereby incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
A copy of the opinion of Arlie R. Nogay relating to the legality of the issuance and sale of the Notes is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 5.1. Exhibits 5.1 and 23.1 of this Current Report on Form 8-K are hereby incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), of $500,100,000 aggregate principal amount of Senior Notes due 2017 (the "Notes") of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), to be issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, as amended by a Supplemental Indenture dated as of June 29, 2007 (so amended, the "Indenture"), between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee, and to be sold by the several selling securityholders (the "Selling Securityholders") named in a Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement, dated May 10, 2012 (the "Purchase Agreement"), among the Company and the Selling Securityholders, in accordance with the Purchase Agreement, I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against delivery by the Selling Securityholders of $500,100,000 principal amount of Remarketable 6.044% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2043 of the Company in accordance with the Purchase Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated May 10, 2012 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 

Exhibit 99.1
EXECUTION VERSION
May 10, 2012
To the Purchasers
named in Schedule B hereto
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), proposes to issue and sell to the purchasers named in Schedule B hereto (the "") $500,100,000 aggregate principal amount of Senior Notes due 2017 of the Company (the ""). The Senior Notes are to be issued under the indenture identified in Schedule A hereto (the ""), with Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company) as the trustee (the "").
Company
Purchasers
Senior Notes
Senior Notes Indenture
Senior Notes Trustee
1. Subject to the terms and conditions and in reliance upon the representations and warranties herein set forth, the Company agrees to issue and sell to each Purchaser, and each Purchaser agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, the principal amount of the Senior Notes set forth opposite such Purchaser's name in Schedule B hereto in exchange for receipt from such Purchaser of the principal amount of Remarketable 6.044% Junior Subordinated Notes due 2043 of the Company (the "") set forth opposite such Purchaser's name in Schedule B hereto. The Junior Notes were issued pursuant to the Junior Subordinated Indenture, dated as of December 3, 1996 (the ""), between Mellon Bank Corporation, as Issuer, and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as Trustee (in such capacity, and including any successor-in-interest, the ""), as supplemented by a Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 19, 2007 (the ""), among Mellon Financial Corporation, as Issuer, The Bank of New York, as Junior Notes Indenture Trustee, and Manufacturers and Traders Trust Company, as Series Trustee (in such capacity, and including any successor-in-interest, the ""). Pursuant to the Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2007, among Mellon Financial Corporation, as Issuer, the Company, as Successor Issuer, the Junior Notes Indenture Trustee, U.S. Bank National Association and the Junior Notes Series Trustee, the Company assumed the obligations of Mellon Financial Corporation under the Junior Notes Base Indenture, the Second Junior Notes Supplemental Indenture and the Junior Notes. Each Purchaser represents and warrants to the Company that it is an accredited investor as defined in Regulation D under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "").
Purchase and Sale.
Junior Notes
Junior Notes Base Indenture
Junior Notes Indenture Trustee
Second Junior Notes Supplemental Indenture
Junior Notes Series Trustee
Act
The Company understands that each Purchaser may retain or sell the Senior Notes from time to time in its absolute discretion. If a Purchaser provides a written notice in the form set forth in Schedule C hereto that such Purchaser proposes to make a public offering of the Senior Notes (a ""), then the provisions set forth in Annex A to Schedule C shall apply with respect to such Purchaser. Each Purchaser represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Company that any sale or other disposition of the Senior Notes shall be made only pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Act, as contemplated by the provisions set forth in Annex A to Schedule C.
Public Offer Notice
2. Delivery of, and payment for, the Senior Notes shall be made at the office, on the date and at the time specified in Schedule A hereto (such date and time of delivery and payment for the Senior Notes being herein called the ""). Payment for the Senior Notes to be purchased on the Closing Date shall be made by the Purchasers' tender of the Junior Notes to the Company. Delivery of the Senior Notes to be purchased on the Closing Date shall be made to the Purchasers, with any transfer taxes payable in connection with the sale of such Senior Notes to the Purchasers duly paid by the Company, against delivery by the Purchasers of the Junior Notes. Delivery of the Senior Notes will be made through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("") unless the Purchasers shall otherwise instruct.
Delivery and Payment. 
Closing Date
DTC
3. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties
(a) The Company has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
(b) The Senior Notes Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 and (assuming the Senior Notes Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Senior Notes Trustee) constitutes a valid and legally binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles (the "").
Enforceability Exceptions
(c) The Senior Notes have been duly authorized by the Company for issuance and sale pursuant to this Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement (the "") and, when issued, authenticated and delivered pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement and of the Senior Notes Indenture against delivery of the Junior Notes as provided in this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, the Senior Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company entitled to the benefits provided by the Senior Notes Indenture, subject to the Enforceability Exceptions.
Senior Notes Purchase Agreement
(d) This Senior Notes Purchase Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(e) The execution and delivery of this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, the issue and sale of the Senior Notes and the compliance by the Company with all of the provisions of the Senior Notes, the Senior Notes Indenture and this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein will not conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries pursuant to the terms of any indenture, contract, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject, except as would not result in a material adverse change in the financial condition, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise or adversely affect the compliance by the Company with its obligations under this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, the Senior Notes Indenture or the Senior Notes or the validity of the Senior Notes (a ""), nor will such action violate (i) the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws, as amended, or (ii) except as would not result in a Material Adverse Change, any statute or any order, rule or regulation of any
Material Adverse Change
 
court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its properties. No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or any such regulatory authority or other governmental agency or body is required for the issue and sale of the Senior Notes or the consummation of the other transactions contemplated by this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement or the Senior Notes Indenture, except as may be required under the Act, the Exchange Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such consents, approvals, authorizations, registrations or qualifications as may be required under state securities or blue sky laws in connection with the purchase of the Senior Notes by the purchasers.
4. The Company agrees with each Purchaser that:
Agreements.
(a) The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, which, for the avoidance of doubt, shall not include fees of any counsel to the Purchasers.
(b) The Company will cooperate with the Purchasers and use all commercially reasonable efforts to permit the Senior Notes to be eligible for clearance and settlement through DTC, including its direct and indirect participants, the Euroclear System and Clearstream Banking S.A., as applicable.
5. The obligations of the Purchasers to purchase the Senior Notes shall be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company contained herein as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date, to the accuracy of the statements of the Company made in any certificates pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions:
Conditions to the Obligations of the Purchasers.
(a) The Company shall have furnished to the Purchasers the opinion of Arlie R. Nogay, Chief Securities Counsel for the Company, dated the Closing Date, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A.
(b) The Purchasers shall have received from their counsel such opinion or opinions, dated the Closing Date, with respect to the issuance and sale of the Senior Notes, the Senior Notes Indenture and other related matters as the Purchasers may reasonably require, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as it requests for the purpose of enabling it to pass upon such matters.
(c) The Company shall have furnished to the Purchasers a certificate of the Company, signed by any Senior Vice President or Executive Vice President of the Company, dated the Closing Date, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B.
(d) At or prior to the Closing Date, the Purchasers shall be in possession of the Junior Notes.
If (i) any of the conditions specified in this Section 5 shall not have been fulfilled when and as provided in this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, or (ii) any of the opinions and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement shall not be reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Purchasers and its counsel, this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement and all obligations of the Purchasers hereunder may be cancelled on, or at any time prior to, the Closing Date by the Purchasers. Notice of such cancellation shall be given to the Company in writing or by telephone or facsimile confirmed in writing.
 
6. If the sale of the Senior Notes provided for herein is not consummated because any condition to the obligations of the Purchasers set forth in Section 5 hereof is not satisfied, or because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company to perform any agreement herein or comply with any provision hereof, the Company will reimburse the Purchasers upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel) that shall have been incurred by it in connection with the proposed purchase and sale of the Senior Notes.
Reimbursement of Purchasers' Expenses.
7. The respective agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company or its officers set forth in or made pursuant to this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Purchasers or any of its officers, directors or controlling persons, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Senior Notes.
Representations and Agreements to Survive. 
8. Unless otherwise provided herein, all notices required under the terms and provisions hereof shall be in writing, either delivered by hand, by mail or by facsimile or electronic mail and confirmed to the recipient, and any such notice shall be effective when received: if sent to the Purchasers, at the address specified in Schedule A hereto; or if sent to the Company, at One Wall Street, New York, New York, 10286, Attention: Treasurer, Facsimile: (212) 459-1019, E-mail: Scott.Freidenrich@BNYMellon.com.
Notices.
9. This Senior Notes Purchase Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
Successors. 
10. The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Senior Notes pursuant to this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Purchasers and any affiliate through which any Purchaser may be acting, on the other, (b) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each Purchaser is acting solely as principal and not as agent or fiduciary of the Company, (c) no Purchaser has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Purchaser has advised or are currently advising the Company on other matters) or any other obligation to the Company except the obligations expressly set forth in this Senior Notes Purchase Agreement, (d) the Purchasers may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) the Company has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it has deemed appropriate. The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Purchasers have rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owe a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company, in connection with such transactions or the process leading thereto.
No Fiduciary Duty. 
11. This Senior Notes Purchase Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) among the Company and the Purchasers, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration.
12. This Senior Notes Purchase Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Applicable Law.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall represent a binding agreement among the Company and the Purchasers.
 
The foregoing Senior Notes Purchase Agreement is hereby confirmed
and accepted.
Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement dated May 10, 2012
 
Title, Purchase Price and Description of the Senior Notes:
 
 
 
 
 
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, New York, 10286
Attention: Treasurer
 
To Whom it may Concern:
Reference is made to the Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement, dated May 10, 2012 (the ""), among The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the ""), Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC.
Senior Notes Purchase Agreement
Company
This notice by the undersigned (the "") constitutes a Public Offer Notice in accordance with Section 1 of the Senior Notes Purchase Agreement. The Selling Securityholder intends to make a public offering of the Senior Notes as soon after the execution hereof as in the judgment of the Selling Securityholder is advisable, and initially offer the Senior Notes on the terms set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (each as defined in Annex A hereto). In accordance with Section 1 of the Agreement, the provisions of Annex A hereto shall apply to such public offering of the Senior Notes. For the purposes of this notice, including Annex A hereto, the "" shall be     :    [A.M.][P.M.], New York City time,                 , 20    , the "" shall be 10:00 A.M., New York City Time,                 , 20    , and all deliveries required to be made on the Resale Closing Date shall be made at the offices of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, One Liberty Plaza, New York NY 10006.
Selling Securityholder
Senior Notes Purchase
Applicable Time
Resale Closing Date
 
 
Annex A
Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Senior Notes Purchase Agreement.
1. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with the Selling Securityholder that:
Representations and Warranties
(a) An "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") on Form S-3 (File Nos. 333-167832, 333-167832-01, 333-167832-02, 333-167832-03, 333-167832-04 and 333-167832-05) in respect of the Senior Notes has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") not earlier than three years prior to the date of the Public Offering Notice. Such registration statement, and any post-effective amendment thereto, became effective on filing. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of such registration statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose has been initiated or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information with respect to such registration statement has been complied with, and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company. The Senior Notes Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "). The base prospectus filed as part of such registration statement, in the form in which it has most recently been filed with the Commission on or prior to the date of the Public Offer Notice, is hereinafter called the ""; any preliminary prospectus (including any preliminary prospectus supplement) relating to the Senior Notes filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act is hereinafter called a ""; the various parts of such registration statement, including all exhibits thereto but excluding any Form T-1 and including any prospectus supplement relating to the Senior Notes that is filed with the Commission and deemed by virtue of Rule 430B to be part of such registration statement, each as amended at the time such part of the registration statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the ""; the Basic Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as that term is defined in the Public Offer Notice), is hereinafter called the ""; the Pricing Prospectus, together with the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 2(i) hereof, is hereinafter called the ""; the form of the final prospectus relating to the Senior Notes filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act in accordance with Section 2(a) hereof is hereinafter called the ""; any reference herein to the Basic Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act, as of the date of such prospectus; any reference to any amendment or supplement to the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, any prospectus supplement relating to the Senior Notes filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and any documents filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), and incorporated therein, in each case after the date of the Basic Prospectus, such Preliminary Prospectus, or the Prospectus, as the case may be; any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the effective date of the Registration Statement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement; and
Act
Commission
"Trust Indenture Act
Basic Prospectus
Preliminary Prospectus
Registration Statement
Pricing Prospectus
Pricing Disclosure Package
Prospectus
Exchange Act
 
any "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433 under the Act relating to the Senior Notes is hereinafter called an "".
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
(b) No order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been received by the Company, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein.
provided
however
(c) The Pricing Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus does not conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, and each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as supplemented by and taken together with the Pricing Disclosure Package as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to statements or omissions made in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein.
provided
however
(d) The documents incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein.
provided
however
(e) The Registration Statement conforms, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act, the Trust Indenture Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, in the case of the Registration Statement, as of the applicable effective date as to each part of the Registration Statement, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and in the case of the Prospectus, as of the applicable filing date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit
 
to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein.
provided
however
(f) (A) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus), and (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) under the Act) made any offer relating to the Senior Notes in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 under the Act, the Company was a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; and (B) at the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Act) of the Senior Notes, the Company was not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act.
(g) The resale of the Senior Notes as contemplated by the Senior Notes Purchase Agreement and the compliance by the Company with all of the provisions of, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated in, the Securities Purchase and Registration Rights Agreement with respect to such resale will not conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries pursuant to the terms of any indenture, contract, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement, note, lease or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject, except as would not result in a Material Adverse Change, nor will such action violate (i) the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws, as amended, or (ii) expect as would not result in a Material Adverse Change, any statute or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its properties. No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or any such regulatory authority or other governmental agency or body is required for the resale of the Senior Notes, except as may be required under the Act, the Exchange Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such consents, approvals, authorizations, registrations or qualifications as may be required under state securities or blue sky laws in connection with the resale of the Senior Notes by the purchasers.
(h) The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and the Pricing Disclosure Package fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and has been prepared in all material respects in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
2. . The Company agrees with the Selling Securityholder:
Agreements
(a) To prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Selling Securityholder and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commission's close of business on the second SEC business day following the delivery of the Public Offer Notice; to make no further amendment or any supplement to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus prior to the Resale Closing Date which shall be reasonably
 
disapproved by the Selling Securityholder promptly after reasonable notice thereof; to advise the Selling Securityholder, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus has been filed; to file promptly all other material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Senior Notes; to advise the Selling Securityholder, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus in respect of the Senior Notes, of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any posteffective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act, of the suspension of the qualification of the Senior Notes for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus or suspending any such qualification, to promptly use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order; and in the event of any such issuance of a notice of objection, promptly to take such steps including, without limitation, amending the Registration Statement or filing a new registration statement, at its own expense, as may be necessary to permit offers and sales of the Senior Notes by the Selling Securityholder (references herein to the Registration Statement shall include any such amendment or new registration statement).
(b) If required by Rule 430B(h) under the Act, to prepare a form of prospectus in a form approved by the Selling Securityholder and to file such form of prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than may be required by Rule 424(b) under the Act; and to make no further amendment or supplement to such form of prospectus which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Selling Securityholder promptly after reasonable notice thereof.
(c) If by the third anniversary (the "") of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, any of the Senior Notes remain unsold by the Selling Securityholder, to file, if it has not already done so and is eligible to do so, a new automatic shelf registration statement relating to the Senior Notes, in a form satisfactory to the Selling Securityholder. If at the Renewal Deadline the Company is no longer eligible to file an automatic shelf registration statement, the Company shall, if it has not already done so, file a new shelf registration statement relating to the Senior Notes, in a form satisfactory to the Selling Securityholder and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to be declared effective within 180 days after the Renewal Deadline. The Company shall take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the resale of the Senior Notes to continue as contemplated in the expired registration statement relating to the Senior Notes. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new automatic shelf registration statement or such new shelf registration statement, as the case may be.
Renewal Deadline
(d) Promptly from time to time to take such action as the Selling Securityholder may reasonably request to qualify the Senior Notes for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Selling Securityholder may reasonably request and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long
 
as may be necessary to complete the distribution of the Senior Notes, that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction.
provided
(e) Prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the business day next succeeding the date of the Public Offer Notice and from time to time, to furnish the Selling Securityholder with written and electronic copies of the Prospectus in New York City in such quantities as the Selling Securityholder may reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required at any time prior to the expiration of nine months after the time of issue of the Prospectus in connection with the offering or sale of the Senior Notes and if at any such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Selling Securityholder and to file such document and to prepare and furnish to the Selling Securityholder and to any dealer in the Senior Notes as many written and electronic copies as the Selling Securityholder may from time to time reasonably request of an amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance, (i) if such untrue statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein, at the expense of the Selling Securityholder, and (ii) in other cases, without charge to the Selling Securityholder; and in case the Selling Securityholder is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales of any of the Senior Notes at any time nine months or more after the time of issue of the Prospectus, upon the Selling Securityholder's request but at the expense of the Selling Securityholder, to prepare and deliver to the Selling Securityholder as many written and electronic copies as the Selling Securityholder may request of an amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act.
(f) To make generally available to its securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158 under the Act).
(g) Until the business day following the Resale Closing Date or such earlier time as the Selling Securityholder may notify the Company, not to, without the consent of the Selling Securityholder, offer or sell, or announce the offering of, any debt securities that are substantially similar to the Senior Notes (other than commercial paper) and are covered by the Registration Statement or any other registration statement filed under the Act, except that the Company may engage in any activity described in this Section 2(g) if and to the extent required by applicable law or by any notice, order or regulation of any regulatory authority which is binding upon the Company.
 
(h) To pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Senior Notes within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) under the Act and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) under the Act.
(i) To prepare a final term sheet in a form approved by the Selling Securityholder and to file such term sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Act within the time required by such Rule. Any such final term sheet shall be an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(j) Without the prior consent of the Selling Securityholder, not to make any offer relating to the Senior Notes that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act (a ""). The Company shall comply with the requirements of Rule 433 under the Act applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission or retention where required and legending. The Company agrees that if at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus any event occurred or occurs as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus would conflict with the information in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, the Company shall give prompt notice thereof to the Selling Securityholder and, if requested by the Selling Securityholder, shall prepare and furnish without charge to the Selling Securityholder an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or other document which will correct such conflict, statement or omission; , , that the agreement in this Section 2(j) shall not apply to any statements or omissions in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein.
Free Writing Prospectus
provided
however
(k) To pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Company's counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Senior Notes under the Act and all other expenses (excluding the fees incurred by any counsel for the Selling Securityholder) in connection with the preparation, printing, reproduction and filing of the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Selling Securityholder; (ii) the cost of printing or producing the Blue Sky Memorandum, closing documents (including any compilations thereof) and any other documents in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Senior Notes; (iii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Senior Notes for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 2(d) hereof, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Selling Securityholder in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky survey; (iv) the cost of preparing the Senior Notes; (v) any fees charged by rating agencies for the rating of the Senior Notes; (vi) the fees and expenses of the Senior Notes Trustee and any agent of the Senior Notes Trustee and the fees and disbursement of counsel for the Senior Notes Trustee in connection with the Senior Notes Indenture and the Senior Notes; and (vii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section 2(k). It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section 2(k) and Section 5 hereof, the Selling Securityholder shall pay all of its own costs and expenses, including the fees of any of its counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the Senior Notes by it, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
 
3. .
Conditions to the Resale of the Senior Notes
The resale of the Senior Notes pursuant to this Annex A shall be subject, in the discretion of the Selling Securityholder, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company herein are, at and as of the date of the Public Offering Notice, as of the date of the effectiveness of any amendment to the Registration Statement filed, and the Resale Closing Date, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
(a) The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by the rules and regulations under the Act and in accordance with Section 2(a) hereof; all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, including any Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule I to this Annex A, shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated by the Commission and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act shall have been received; no stop order suspending or preventing the use of the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been initiated by the Commission; and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission shall have been complied with, or is being complied with, to the reasonable satisfaction of the Selling Securityholder; the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of this Annex A.
FINRA
(b) (i) The Company shall have furnished to the Selling Securityholder a letter, dated the Resale Closing Date, of Arlie R. Nogay, Chief Securities Counsel for the Company, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A to this Annex A.
(ii) Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, as special tax counsel to the Company, shall have furnished to the Selling Securityholder an opinion, dated the Resale Closing Date, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B to this Annex A.
(c) The Company shall have furnished to the Selling Securityholder a certificate of the Company, signed by any Senior Vice President or Executive Vice President of the Company, dated the Resale Closing Date, in the form attached as Exhibit B to the Senior Notes Purchase Agreement.
(d) On each of the date of the Public Offer Notice and the Resale Closing Date, KPMG LLP shall have furnished to the Selling Securityholder a letter, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit C to this Annex A, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
(e) (i) Neither the Company nor the Significant Subsidiary shall have sustained since the date of the latest audited financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Disclosure Package any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or
 
contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package; and (ii) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Disclosure Package, there shall not have been any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiary taken as a whole, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii), otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package or the effect of which is in the judgment of the Selling Securityholder after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the marketing and resale of the Senior Notes on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus. For purposes of this Section 3(e), the "" shall mean The Bank of New York Mellon.
Significant Subsidiary
4. If the resale of the Senior Notes provided for herein is not consummated because any condition to the obligations of the Selling Securityholder set forth in Section 3 hereof is not satisfied or because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company to perform any agreement herein or comply with any provision hereof, the Company will reimburse the Selling Securityholder upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses, including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Selling Securityholder in connection with the proposed resale of the Senior Notes, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to the Selling Securityholder except as provided in Section 5 hereof.
Reimbursement of Selling Securityholder's Expenses.
5.
Indemnification and Contribution.
(a) The Company shall indemnify and hold harmless the Selling Securityholder against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which the Selling Securityholder may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and shall reimburse the Selling Securityholder for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Selling Securityholder in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein. For purposes of this Section 5 and Sections 1 and 2 herein, (i) the names of the Selling Securityholders and (ii) the statements set forth in the sixth paragraph under the caption "Plan of Distribution" in the Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus constitute the only information furnished by or on behalf of the Selling Securityholder to the Company expressly for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
provided
however
(b) The Selling Securityholder shall indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject,
 
under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Selling Securityholder expressly for use therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Selling Securityholder may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability except to the extent that it has been prejudiced in any material respect by such failure or from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect the settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action or claim in respect of which indemnification or contribution may be sought hereunder (whether or not the indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such action or claim) unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act, by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 5 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Selling Securityholder on the other from the offering of the Senior Notes. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c)
 
above and such indemnifying party was prejudiced in a material respect by such failure, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits referred to in the immediately preceding sentence but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Selling Securityholder on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Selling Securityholder on the other shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or the Selling Securityholder on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), the Selling Securityholder shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the difference between the aggregate proceeds from the sale of the Senior Notes sold by it and the purchase price paid by such Selling Securityholder for the Junior Notes tendered in exchange for such Senior Notes in accordance with Section 1 of the Senior Notes Purchase Agreement. The Company and the Selling Securityholder agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), the Selling Securityholder shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total public offering price at which the Senior Notes offered by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which the Selling Securityholder has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 5 shall be in addition to any liability that the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls the Selling Securityholder within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Selling Securityholder, under this Section 5 shall be in addition to any liability that the Selling Securityholder may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
6.  The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the Selling Securityholder, as set forth herein or made by them pursuant hereto, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of the Selling Securityholder or any controlling person of the Selling Securityholder, or the Company, or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive the resale of the Senior Notes. The provisions of Sections 4 and 5 hereof shall survive the termination or cancellation of this Annex A.
Survival.
7. This Annex A shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Selling Securityholder, the Company and, to the extent provided in Sections 5
Parties to Agreement. 
 
and 6 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company and each person who controls the Company or the Selling Securityholder, and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Annex. No purchaser of any of the Senior Notes from the Selling Securityholder shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
8. As used herein, the term "SEC business day" shall mean any day when the Commission's office in Washington, D.C. is normally open for business, and the term "business day" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or other day on which banking institutions in The City of New York are authorized or required by law, regulation or executive order to close.
Business Day.
9. .
Selling Securityholder Representations and Agreements
In the event that the offer or sale of the Senior Notes by the Selling Securityholder in a jurisdiction requires any action on the part of the Company in or with respect to such jurisdiction, the Selling Securityholder represents and agrees that it will (i) inform the Company that the Company is required to take such action prior to the time such action is required to be taken, and (ii) cooperate with and assist the Company in complying with such requirements. The Selling Securityholder agrees that it will, to the best of its knowledge and belief, comply with all applicable securities laws and regulations in force in any jurisdiction in which it purchases, offers, sells or delivers the Senior Notes or possesses or distributes the Prospectus, any Free Writing Prospectus or any other offering material relating to the Senior Notes, and will obtain any required consent, approval or permission for its purchase, offer, sale or delivery of the Senior Notes under the laws and regulations in force in any jurisdiction to which it is subject or in which it makes any such purchases, offers, sales or deliveries. In particular, the Selling Securityholder acknowledges, represents and agrees as set forth in the eleventh through eighteenth paragraphs inclusive of the section entitled "Plan of Distribution" beginning on page S-15 of the Prospectus. Further, the Selling Securityholder represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Company, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Senior Notes that would constitute a Free Writing Prospectus; any such Free Writing Prospectus the use of which has been consented to by the Company is listed on Schedule I to this Annex A.
 
Final Term Sheet dated May 10, 2012.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120706084153.txt.gz
TIME:20120706084153
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 5, 2012, BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon, affiliates of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (collectively "BNY Mellon") entered into a Stipulation of Settlement (the "Settlement Agreement") related to a previously disclosed putative class action lawsuit pending in federal court in Oklahoma and initiated by CompSource Oklahoma concerning losses in connection with the investment of securities lending collateral in Sigma Finance Inc. ("Sigma"). The Settlement Agreement is subject to court approval.
Under the terms of the Settlement Agreement, BNY Mellon will make a payment of $280 million for a full and complete release of all Sigma-related claims that were made or could have been brought against it or its affiliates by members of the alleged class (the "Class"). BNY Mellon may enter into additional settlements relating to losses in connection with Sigma investments incurred by securities lending clients not included in the Class or who opt out of the Settlement Agreement.
Copies of the Settlement Agreement and the press release announcing the settlement are attached as Exhibits 10.1 and 99.1, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K, and are incorporated herein by reference. The description of the Settlement Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Settlement Agreement.
 
BNY Mellon recorded an after-tax charge in the second quarter of 2012 of approximately $210 million ($350 million pre-tax) primarily related to claims involving Sigma investments, referenced in Item 1.01 above.
In addition, BNY Mellon has performed a preliminary review of the recent notices of proposed rulemaking and the final rule released by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation on June 7, 2012 on the implementation of new risk-based capital rules. As a result of its preliminary review, BNY Mellon estimates that the impact of the new rules, on a fully implemented basis, will be to increase BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio by over 100 basis points. The Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as of March 31, 2012 was 7.6%. The expected increase is primarily due to the estimated reduction in risk-weighted assets related to BNY Mellon's securities portfolio.
The information presented in this Current Report on Form 8-K may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 and in BNY Mellon's other
subsequent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this Form 8-K speak only as of July 6, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update the information in this Form 8-K to reflect events or circumstances that arise after that date or reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events, except as required by federal securities laws.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
This Stipulation of Settlement is entered into between and among, through their respective undersigned counsel: (i) defendants BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon, and (ii) Named Plaintiffs on behalf of themselves and the Class (defined ). The Stipulation is intended by the Settling Parties to fully, finally and forever resolve, discharge and settle the Action and the claims asserted therein, upon and subject to the terms and conditions hereof, including, but not limited to the approval of the Court. Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Paragraph 1, below.
infra
WHEREAS:
A. Plaintiff CompSource initiated this action on December 19, 2008, with the filing of the Class Action Complaint against BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, asserting claims for breach of contract, negligence and breach of fiduciary duty for losses suffered in the securities lending program operated by Defendants when Sigma Finance Inc. and Sigma Finance Corp. defaulted.
B. During discovery in this case, the Settling Parties produced and/or reviewed nearly five million pages of documents: in total, 4,625,451 pages were produced by Defendants, 286,436 by Named Plaintiffs, and approximately 52,000 by third parties. The Settling Parties, through their attorneys, took or defended a total of 58 depositions, 12 of which took place over multiple days. These depositions took place in seven different states across the country: New York, Texas, California, Maryland, Oklahoma, Pennsylvania, and Missouri. These depositions resulted in 16,396 pages of recorded testimony and the inclusion of 1,734 exhibits.
C. On January 30, 2009, BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation filed (1) a Motion to Dismiss the Complaint Pursuant to Rule 12(b)(2) and 12(b)(6), and (2) a Motion to Transfer Venue to the Western District of Pennsylvania Pursuant to 28 U.S.C.  1404(a). On July 31, 2009, after oppositions and replies, the Court denied BNY Mellon's Motion for Dismissal and, on April 28, 2009, the Court denied BNY Mellon's Motion to Transfer.
D. On March 12, 2009, CompSource filed a Motion to Appoint Nix, Patterson & Roach, LLP Interim Counsel Pursuant to Federal Rule of Civil Procedure 23(g)(3), which was granted on March 13, 2009. On August 14, 2009, BNY Mellon, N.A. filed its Answer and
Affirmative Defenses. On August 25, 2009, the Court entered the Joint Discovery and Scheduling Plan No. 1.
E. On February 1, 2010, BNY Mellon, N.A. filed a Motion for Summary Judgment Based on Plaintiff's Lack of Capacity to Sue in Federal Court, which was denied on August 2, 2010. On August 16, 2010, BNY Mellon, N.A. filed a Motion to Amend the Court's Order Denying Defendant's Motion for Summary Judgment so that BNY Mellon, N.A. could seek appellate review of the Court's order, which was denied on January 31, 2011.
F. On February 26, 2010, BNY Mellon, N.A., along with several other BNY Mellon entities, filed a Motion for Transfer of Actions to the Southern District of New York Pursuant to 28 U.S.C. 1407 for Coordinated or Consolidated Pretrial Proceedings. BNY Mellon sought transfer and consolidation of this action, along with three other actions pending in different districts across the country (Western District of Washington, Southern District of New York, and Central District of California). Shortly thereafter, BNY Mellon filed a Motion for Protective Order and Motion to Stay Proceedings Pending a Transfer Decision by the Judicial Panel on Multi-District Litigation ("JPMDL"). Plaintiffs in the four affected cases, including CompSource, opposed the transfer. On May 27, 2010, the JPMDL convened a hearing session in Chicago, Illinois. On June 7, 2010, the JPMDL entered an Order Denying Transfer.
G. On July 7, 2010, Plaintiffs filed the First Amended Class Action Complaint ("FAC"). The FAC did not add any new claims but added a named plaintiffthe Board of Trustees of the Electrical Workers Local No. 26 Pension Trust Fund; named an additional defendantThe Bank of New York Mellon; and provided additional factual detail regarding Plaintiffs' claims. BNY Mellon filed a Motion to Dismiss the FAC on August 4, 2010, which the Court denied on January 31, 2011. On July 15, 2010, the Court entered the Discovery
Coordination Protocol, which applied to this Action and , N.A., No. 09-CV-618 (RSL) (W.D. Wash.), and ordered the parties in each action to coordinate discovery in good faith in order to eliminate duplicative efforts. Plaintiffs filed the Second Amended Class Action Complaint on February 8, 2011 ("SAC"), which added two named plaintiffsThe Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Foundation and The Children's Hospital of Philadelphia. On March 4, 2011, BNY Mellon filed its Answer to the SAC.
Regence BlueShield, et al. v. BNY Mellon Bank
H. On March 18, 2011, BNY Mellon filed a motion seeking leave to file a third-party complaint against Asset Consulting Group LLC and the Board of Managers of CompSource. After the filing of a response and reply, the Court denied this motion on November 21, 2011.
I. On August 26, 2011, Named Plaintiffs filed their Motion and Memorandum of Law in Support of Class Certification. On November 8, 2011, BNY Mellon filed its Opposition to Plaintiffs' Motion for Class Certification. On December 23, 2011, Named Plaintiffs filed their Reply Brief in Further Support of their Motion for Class Certification. On April 16, 2012, Named Plaintiffs filed a Notice of Supplemental Authorities. On December 5, 2011, the parties filed a Joint Motion for Status Conference and Hearing.
J. Interim Class Counsel (defined ) have conducted an extensive investigation relating to the claims and the underlying events and transactions alleged in the Complaint. Interim Class Counsel have analyzed evidence adduced during their investigations and in discovery and have researched the applicable law with respect to the claims of Named Plaintiffs and the Class against BNY Mellon, as well as the potential defenses thereto. On June 30, 2011, all fact discovery (, non-expert discovery) related to both class certification and merits issues closed in this case.
infra
i.e.
K. Based upon their investigation, research and completion of discovery, Interim Class Counsel have concluded that the terms and conditions of this Stipulation are fair, reasonable and adequate to Named Plaintiffs and the Class, and in their best interests. Named Plaintiffs agreed to settle the claims asserted in the Action pursuant to this Stipulation, after considering (i) the substantial benefits that Named Plaintiffs and Class Members will receive from resolution of the Action, (ii) the risks of litigation, and (iii) the desirability of permitting the Settlement to be consummated as provided by the terms of this Stipulation.
L. BNY Mellon has denied and continues to deny that it has committed any act or omission giving rise to any liability or violation of law, and is entering into this Settlement solely to eliminate the burden, expense, and distraction of further litigation. Neither the Settlement nor any of its terms shall in any way be construed or deemed to be evidence of, or an admission or concession on the part of BNY Mellon with respect to, any fact or matter alleged in the Action or claim of fault or liability or wrongdoing or damage whatsoever, or any infirmity in the claims, defenses, or third-party claims that BNY Mellon has, or could have, asserted.
NOW THEREFORE, it is hereby STIPULATED AND AGREED, by and among the Settling Parties, through their respective attorneys, subject to approval of the Court pursuant to Rule 23(e) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, without admission of any liability or wrongdoing, and in consideration of the benefits flowing to the parties as set forth herein, that all Settled Claims shall be fully, finally and forever compromised, settled, released, and discharged and the Action shall be dismissed with prejudice, upon and subject to the following terms and conditions:
1. As used in this Stipulation, the following terms shall have the meanings specified below. In the event of any inconsistency between any definition set forth below and any definition in any other document related to the Settlement, the definition below shall control:
(a) "Action" means the action captioned , Case No. CIV 08-469-KEW, United States District Court, Eastern District of Oklahoma
CompSource Oklahoma, Board of Trustees of the Electrical Workers Local No. 26 Pension Trust Fund, in its capacity as a fiduciary of the Electrical Workers Local No. 26 Pension Trust Fund, Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Foundation and Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, individually and in its capacity as fiduciary of the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Defined Benefit Master Trust v. BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon
(b) "Authorized Recipient" means (i) a Domestic Authorized Recipient or (ii) a Foreign Authorized Recipient.
(c) "BNY Mellon" means BNY Mellon, N.A. and The Bank of New York Mellon.
(d) "BNY Mellon's Counsel" means Boies, Schiller & Flexner, LLP.
(e) "BNY Mellon Releasees" means BNY Mellon, its past or present or future parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, successors and predecessors, and other individuals or entities in which any of the foregoing entities has or had or will have a majority interest or which is or was or will be related to or affiliated with any of the foregoing entities; and the respective officers, directors, agents, fiduciaries, trustees, employees, attorneys, advisors, investment advisors, auditors, accountants, insurers, sponsors, settlors, successors, and assigns of all such entities and individuals.
(f) "Case Contribution Awards" means those awards ordered by the Court, if any, to the Named Plaintiffs for their time and participation in this Action.
(g) "Class" or "Settlement Class" means (i) all clients of BNY Mellon's securities lending business that, as of October 1, 2008, held medium term notes issued either by Sigma Finance Inc. or Sigma Finance Corp. through such client's participation in a collective investment pool, (ii) the Texas Permanent School Fund, and (iii) The William and Flora Hewlett Foundation.
Excluded from the foregoing definition are (i) participants in the Mellon Capital Fund, (ii) The Regence Group Retirement Plan, Regence Blue Cross Blue Shield of Oregon, Regence Blue Cross Blue Shield of Utah, Regence Blue Shield, Regence Blue Shield of Idaho, Regence HMO Oregon, Asuris Northwest Health, Commencement Bay Life Insurance Company, Healthwise and Regence Life and Health Insurance Company ("Regence"), (iii) Pacific Select Funds, (iv) The Bank of Korea, (v) AP1, (vi) The Bank of Colombia, and (vii) Achmea Schadeverzekeringen N.V., Achmea Verzekeringsholding N.V., Achmea P & L Insurance, Stichting Achmea Zorgverzekeringen Beleggingen ("Achmea").
(h) "Class Distribution Order" means an order entered by the Court authorizing and directing that the Net Settlement Fund be distributed, in whole or in part, to Authorized Recipients.
(i) "Class Member" means (i) a Domestic Class Member or (ii) a Foreign Class Member who submits a timely and valid Election.
(j) "Class Member Releasees" means Named Plaintiffs, any or all Class Members, and any or all of their respective past or present or future subsidiaries,
affiliates, successors and predecessors, and other individuals or entities in which any of the foregoing entities has or had or will have a majority interest or which is or was or will be related to or affiliated with any of the foregoing entities; and the respective officers, directors, agents, fiduciaries, trustees, employees, attorneys, advisors, investment advisors, auditors, accountants, insurers, sponsors, settlors, successors, and assigns of all such entities and individuals.
(k) "Class Sigma Exposure" means the aggregate principal amount of Sigma Notes held by all potential members of the Class as of October 1, 2008.
(l) "Complaint" means the operative complaint in the Action.
(m) "CompSource" means CompSource Oklahoma.
(n) "Court" means the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Oklahoma.
(o) "Defendant(s)" means BNY Mellon.
(p) "Domestic Authorized Recipient" means a Domestic Class Member who does not submit a timely Request for Exclusion.
(q) "Domestic Class Member" means a member of the Class whose securities lending agreement with BNY Mellon is/was governed by the law of a state of the United States of America.
(r) "Effective Date" means the first date by which all of the events and conditions specified in paragraph 35 of this Stipulation have been met, have been waived, or have occurred, as set forth in that paragraph.
(s) "Election" means the Election To Participate in Settlement Benefits and Release (substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B-1) that a Foreign Class
Member must complete and timely submit in accordance with the Preliminary Approval Order to be eligible to share in a distribution of the Net Settlement Fund.
(t) "Escrow Account" means an interest-bearing escrow account maintained by the Escrow Agent.
(u) "Escrow Agent" means the escrow agent appointed and approved by the Court.
(v) "Escrow Agreement" means the agreement(s) between Interim Class Counsel and the Escrow Agent, and approved by the Court, setting forth the terms under which the Escrow Agent shall maintain the Escrow Account in accordance with this Stipulation, the terms of which shall be subject to BNY Mellon's reasonable consent.
(w) "Final" when referring to the Judgment means the later of: (i) if there is an appeal from the Judgment, the date of final affirmance on appeal and the expiration of the time for any further judicial review whether by appeal, reconsideration, or a petition for a writ of certiorari and, if a writ of certiorari is granted, the date of final affirmance of the Judgment following review pursuant to the grant; or (ii) the expiration of the time for the filing or noticing of any appeal from the Judgment. No appeal or proceeding seeking judicial review pertaining solely to (a) Court approval of the Plan of Allocation; and/or (b) the Court's award of attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards, costs or expenses shall affect whether the Judgment becomes Final or the timing thereof.
(x) "Final Approval Hearing" means the hearing set by the Court under Rule 23(e) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure to consider final approval of the Settlement.
(y) "Foreign Authorized Recipient" means a Foreign Class Member who submits a timely and valid Election.
(z) "Foreign Class Member" means a member of the Class whose securities lending agreements with BNY Mellon is/was governed by the law of a country other than the law of the Unites States of America or one of its states.
(aa) "Gross Settlement Fund" means the Settlement Amount plus accrued interest, if any.
(bb) "Including" means including but not limited to.
(cc) "Interim Class Counsel" means Nix, Patterson & Roach, LLP.
(dd) "Judgment" means an order of judgment and dismissal, substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit C, to be entered by the Court.
(ee) "Litigation Expenses" means the reasonable costs and expenses incurred by Plaintiffs' Counsel in commencing and prosecuting the Action.
(ff) "Named Plaintiffs" means CompSource Oklahoma, Board of Trustees of the Electrical Workers Local No. 26 Pension Trust Fund, in its capacity as a fiduciary of the Electrical Workers Local No. 26 Pension Trust Fund, Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Foundation and Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, individually and in its capacity as fiduciary of the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Defined Benefit Master Trust.
(gg) "Net Settlement Fund" means the Gross Settlement Fund less any: (i) Taxes; (ii) Notice and Administration Costs; (iii) Litigation Expenses awarded by the Court; (iv) Case Contribution Awards awarded by the Court; (v) attorneys' fees awarded by the Court; and (vi) other Court-approved deductions.
(hh) "Notice" means the Notice of Pendency of Class Action and Proposed Settlement, Final Approval Hearing, and Motion for Attorneys' Fees and Reimbursement of Litigation Expenses (substantially in the forms attached hereto as Exhibit B).
(ii) "Notice and Administration Costs" means the costs, fees and expenses that are incurred by the Settlement Administrator in connection with (i) providing notice to the Class; and (ii) administering the Claims process. For the avoidance of doubt, "Notice and Administration Costs" includes all Notice Costs.
(jj) "Notice Costs" means the costs of providing notice to the Class.
(kk) "Plaintiffs" means Named Plaintiffs and the Class.
(ll) "Plaintiffs' Counsel" means Interim Class Counsel and all other counsel who, at the direction and under the supervision of Interim Class Counsel and Named Plaintiffs, represent the Named Plaintiffs and Class Members in the Action.
(mm) "Plan of Allocation" means the proposed plan of allocation of the Net Settlement Fund.
(nn) "Preliminary Approval Order" means the order (substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A) to be entered by the Court preliminarily approving the Settlement and directing that Notice be provided to the Class as set forth therein.
(oo) "Request for Exclusion" means any request for exclusion from the Class pursuant to Rule 23(e)(4) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.
(pp) "Settled Claims" means any claims (including "Unknown Claims"), debts, demands, rights, or causes of action or liabilities whatsoever (including but not limited to any claim for damages, interest, lost earnings or profits, attorneys' fees, litigation expenses, and/or other costs), whether based on federal, state, foreign, statutory, or
common law or otherwise, in tort or in contract, whether fixed or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated, at law or in equity, matured or unmatured, whether asserted in a class or individual capacity, that (i) arise from the nucleus of operative facts alleged in the Complaint in the Action that were or could have been asserted in the Action; and (ii) arise from, or that in any manner relate to, any direct or indirect investment by BNY Mellon in Sigma on behalf of any Class Member.
Notwithstanding the foregoing or anything else herein, the term "Settled Claims" does not include:
 
 
 
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing or anything else herein, "Settled Claims" does not include and the Settlement shall not release any claim in the actions entitled:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(qq) "Settlement" means this Stipulation of Settlement and the settlement contained herein.
(rr) "Settlement Administrator" means the Settlement Administrator appointed and approved by the Court.
(ss) "Settlement Amount" means the total amount of $280,000,000 in cash. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Stipulation, under no circumstances shall
the total to be paid by BNY Mellon pursuant to this Stipulation exceed the Settlement Amount.
(tt) "Settling Parties" means (i) BNY Mellon, and (ii) Named Plaintiffs on behalf of themselves and the Class Members.
(uu) "Sigma" means Sigma Finance, Inc. and Sigma Finance Corp., collectively.
(vv) "Sigma Collateral Deficiency" means the unrealized (, unfunded) losses incurred on the reinvestment of cash collateral in Sigma securities attributable to each member of the Class, if any, as of the Effective Date. BNY Mellon will provide the amount of each Class Member's Sigma Collateral Deficiency, if any, to Interim Class Counsel in accordance with paragraph 33.
pro rata
i.e.
(ww) "Sigma Notes" means the medium-term notes issued by Sigma Finance Inc. and/or Sigma Finance Corp. with (i) a maturity date of October 30, 2008, CUSIP number 8265QOXC1, (ii) a maturity date of October 30, 2008, CUSIP number 8265QOXD9, (iii) a maturity date of November 14, 2008, CUSIP number 8265QOXF4, (iv) a maturity date of November 14, 2008, CUSIP number 8265QOXG2, (v) a maturity date of January 22, 2009, CUSIP number 8265QOVQ2, (vi) a maturity date of March 9, 2009, CUSIP number LF8851853, and (vii) a maturity date of March 12, 2009, CUSIP number 8265QOWE8.
(xx) "Stipulation" means this Stipulation of Settlement.
(yy) "Taxes" means: (i) all federal, state and/or local taxes of any kind on any income earned by the Gross Settlement Fund; and (ii) the reasonable expenses and costs incurred in determining the amount of, and paying, any taxes owed by the Gross
Settlement Fund (including, without limitation, reasonable expenses of tax attorneys and accountants).
(zz) "Unknown Claims" means any and all Settled Claims that any releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his, her or its favor at the time this Stipulation is executed, approved, or becomes effective, which if known by it might have affected its settlement and release of such claims, or might have affected its decision to enter into or not to object to this Settlement or not to exclude itself from the Class. The Settling Parties acknowledge that they may hereafter discover facts or legal theories or authorities in addition to or different from those that they now believe to be true. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Settling Parties stipulate and agree that, upon the Effective Date, they and all other releasing parties hereunder shall expressly waive, and each shall be deemed to have waived, and by operation of the Judgment shall have expressly waived, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all provisions, rights and benefits conferred by Cal. Civ. Code  1542, and any law of any state or territory of the United States, or principle of common law, or the law of any foreign jurisdiction, that is similar, comparable or equivalent to Cal. Civ. Code  1542, which provides:
A general release does not extend to claims, which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release, which if known by him or her must have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor.
The release of Unknown Claims, as set forth in this Stipulation, was separately bargained for and is a material element of the Settlement.
2. Upon the Effective Date, Named Plaintiffs and each Class Member, on behalf of themselves and their respective trustees, administrators, officers, directors, agents, beneficiaries,
settlors, sponsors, participants, successors, and assigns, individually and collectively, (a) shall be deemed by operation of law to have fully, finally and forever released, relinquished, waived, discharged and dismissed any and all Settled Claims against the BNY Mellon Releasees; (b) shall be enjoined from asserting or prosecuting any Settled Claims; and (c) agree and covenant not to sue any of the BNY Mellon Releasees on the basis of any Settled Claims or to assist any third party in commencing or maintaining any suit related to any Settled Claims.
3. Upon the Effective Date, BNY Mellon, on behalf of itself and its officers, directors, agents, successors and assigns, individually and collectively, (a) shall be deemed by operation of law to have fully, finally and forever released, relinquished, waived, discharged and dismissed any and all Settled Claims against the Class Member Releasees; (b) shall be enjoined from asserting or prosecuting any Settled Claims; and (c) agrees and covenants not to sue any of the Class Member Releasees on the basis of any Settled Claims or to assist any third party in commencing or maintaining any suit related to any Settled Claims.
4. In consideration of the Settlement, BNY Mellon shall pay or cause to be paid the Settlement Amount in cash into the Escrow Account within ten (10) business days after the later of (i) entry of the Preliminary Approval Order, and (ii) the provision by Named Plaintiffs to BNY Mellon of information necessary to effectuate a transfer of funds, including wiring instructions to include the bank name and ABA routing number, account name and number, and a signed W-9 reflecting a valid taxpayer identification number for the qualified settlement fund in which the Escrow Account has been established.
5. This Settlement Amount is an all-in settlement number, meaning that it includes all attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards, Litigation Expenses, Notice and Administration Costs, Taxes, and costs of any kind incurred by Named Plaintiffs in connection with the resolution of this matter, if any.
6. Other than the obligation of BNY Mellon to pay or cause to be paid the Settlement Amount into the Escrow Account pursuant to paragraph 4, BNY Mellon shall have no obligation to make any payment into the Escrow Account or to any Class Member or any other person or entity pursuant to this Stipulation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Stipulation, under no circumstances shall the total to be paid by BNY Mellon pursuant to this Stipulation exceed the Settlement Amount.
7. Within seven (7) business days after this Stipulation is executed, Named Plaintiffs shall move on notice to BNY Mellon for entry of a Preliminary Approval Order substantially in the form annexed hereto as Exhibit A, preliminary certifying the Class for purposes of effectuating the Settlement, preliminarily approving the Settlement, directing that Notice be provided to the Class as set forth therein, and scheduling a Final Approval Hearing.
8. All objections to the Settlement and application for attorneys' fees must be filed with the Court and served on counsel for the Settling Parties by the date set by the Court in the Preliminary Approval Order and specified in the Notice, which shall require that objections must be filed with the Court and served on counsel for the Settling Parties at least twenty eight (28) calendar days prior to the Final Approval Hearing, unless such deadline is extended by Order of the Court.
9. No later than thirty five (35) calendar days prior to the Final Approval Hearing, and unless the Settlement has otherwise been terminated pursuant to this Stipulation, Named Plaintiffs shall move for (a) final approval of the Settlement pursuant to Rule 23(e) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure; (b) entry of a Judgment substantially in the form annexed as Exhibit C; and (c) approval of the Plan of Allocation.
10. As soon as reasonably practicable, but in no event later than one year after the Effective Date, Interim Class Counsel will apply to the Court, on notice to BNY Mellon and Named Plaintiffs, for a Class Distribution Order: (i) approving the Settlement Administrator's determinations concerning the timeliness and validity of Election forms; (ii) approving payment of any outstanding administration fees and expenses associated with the administration of the Settlement from the Escrow Account; and (iii) directing payment of the Net Settlement Fund to Authorized Recipients from the Escrow Account after the Effective Date. No payments shall be made to Authorized Recipients from the Net Settlement Fund before the Class Distribution Order is entered. The Class Distribution Order shall not authorize any payments to Authorized Recipients prior to the Effective Date.
11. The Settling Parties shall cooperate and take all reasonable steps necessary to obtain preliminary and final approval of the Settlement and entry of the Preliminary Approval Order and the Judgment; that nothing in this paragraph shall (a) obligate BNY Mellon to incur any expenses or make any payments in excess of the Settlement Amount; or (b) waive or abridge any party's right to terminate the Stipulation pursuant to the terms hereof.
provided, however,
12. Except as otherwise provided herein, the Gross Settlement Fund shall be used to pay any: (i) Taxes; (ii) Notice and Administration Costs pursuant to the terms of paragraph 17
below and as otherwise approved by the Court; (iii) Case Contribution Awards approved by the Court; (iv) attorneys' fees awarded by the Court; (v) Litigation Expenses awarded by the Court; and (vi) other Court-approved deductions.
13. Except as provided herein or pursuant to orders of the Court, the Gross Settlement Fund shall remain in the Escrow Account prior to the Effective Date. All funds held by the Escrow Agent shall be deemed to be in the custody of the Court and shall remain subject to the jurisdiction of the Court until such time as the funds shall be distributed or returned pursuant to the terms of this Stipulation and/or further order of the Court. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing between BNY Mellon and Named Plaintiffs, the Escrow Agent shall invest any funds in excess of U.S. $100,000 in United States Treasury Bills having maturities of ninety (90) days or less, or money market mutual funds comprised of investments secured by the full faith and credit of the United States Government, or an account fully insured by the United States Government Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC). Any funds held in escrow in an amount of less than U.S. $100,000 may be held in an interest-bearing account insured by the FDIC or money market mutual funds comprised of investments secured by the full faith and credit of the United States Government or fully insured by the United States Government. All risks related to the investment of the Gross Settlement Fund shall be borne by the Gross Settlement Fund.
14. The Settling Parties agree that the Gross Settlement Fund is intended to be a qualified settlement fund within the meaning of Treasury Regulation  1.468B-1 and that Interim Class Counsel, as administrator of the Settlement Fund within the meaning of Treasury Regulation  1.468B-2(k)(3), shall be solely responsible for filing or causing to be filed all informational and other tax returns as may be necessary or appropriate (including, without limitation, the returns described in Treasury Regulation  1.468B-2(k)) for the Gross Settlement
Fund. Such returns shall be consistent with this paragraph and in all events shall reflect that all taxes on the income earned on the Gross Settlement Fund shall be paid out of the Gross Settlement Fund as provided by paragraph 15 below. Interim Class Counsel shall also be solely responsible for causing payment to be made from the Gross Settlement Fund of any Taxes owed with respect to the Gross Settlement Fund. Interim Class Counsel, as administrator of the Gross Settlement Fund within the meaning of Treasury Regulation 1.468B-2(k)(3), shall timely make such elections as are necessary or advisable to carry out this paragraph, including, as necessary, making a "relation back election," as described in Treasury Regulation  1.468B-1(j), to cause the qualified settlement fund to come into existence at the earliest allowable date, and shall take or cause to be taken all actions as may be necessary or appropriate in connection therewith.
15. All Taxes shall be paid out of the Gross Settlement Fund, and shall be timely paid by the Escrow Agent pursuant to the disbursement instructions set forth in the Escrow Agreement, and without prior Order of the Court. Any tax returns prepared for the Gross Settlement Fund (as well as the election set forth therein) shall be consistent with the previous paragraph and in all events shall reflect that all Taxes (including any interest or penalties) on the income earned by the Gross Settlement Fund shall be paid out of the Gross Settlement Fund as provided herein. The Gross Settlement Fund shall indemnify and hold all BNY Mellon Releasees harmless for any Taxes and related expenses of any kind whatsoever (including without limitation, taxes payable by reason of any such indemnification). BNY Mellon shall notify the Escrow Agent promptly if it receives any notice of any claim for Taxes relating to the Gross Settlement Fund.
16. Upon the Effective Date, except as otherwise provided in paragraph 32 herein, BNY Mellon will not have any right to the return of the Gross Settlement Fund or any portion thereof.
17. Following entry of the Preliminary Approval Order, Interim Class Counsel may pay from the Escrow Account without further approval from BNY Mellon or further order of the Court reasonable Notice Costs. In the event that the Settlement is terminated pursuant to the terms of this Stipulation, all Notice Costs actually paid or incurred will not be returned or repaid to BNY Mellon. Prior to final approval of the Settlement, the amount that may be paid for Notice Costs without further approval from BNY Mellon or further order of the Court pursuant to this paragraph may not exceed $100,000 dollars.
18. Except as provided in paragraphs 32 and 33, the BNY Mellon Releasees shall have no responsibility for, interest in, or liability whatsoever with respect to the maintenance, investment or distribution of the Gross Settlement Fund, the establishment or maintenance of the Escrow Account, the terms or administration of the Plan of Allocation or of any plan of allocation, the determination, administration, or calculation of Claims, the payment or withholding of Taxes, the distribution or disbursement of the Net Settlement Fund, the administration of the Settlement, or any other expenses or losses in connection with such matters. Without limiting the foregoing, the Gross Settlement Fund shall be the sole source of Taxes, Notice and Administration Costs, attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards and Litigation Expenses, and there shall be no recourse against BNY Mellon for any such expenses.
19. No later than thirty five (35) calendar days prior to the Final Approval Hearing, Interim Class Counsel may apply to the Court for a collective award of attorneys' fees to
Plaintiffs' Counsel, Case Contribution Awards, and for reimbursement of Litigation Expenses. BNY Mellon shall take no position with respect to the amount of attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards or Litigation Expenses, or to whether the Court should make any or all such awards. The BNY Mellon Releasees shall have no responsibility for and shall take no position with respect to the allocation among Plaintiffs' Counsel, and/or any other person or entity who may assert some claim thereto, of any award of attorneys' fees or Litigation Expenses that the Court may make in the Action.
20. Any attorneys' fees and Litigation Expenses that are awarded by the Court shall be paid to Interim Class Counsel with the Court's approval from the Escrow Account, immediately upon award (but in no event before the entry of the Judgment), notwithstanding the existence of any timely filed objections thereto, or potential for appeal therefrom, or collateral attack on the Settlement or any part thereof; , that Interim Class Counsel shall make appropriate refunds or repayments into the Escrow Account, plus accrued interest at the same net rate as is earned by the Gross Settlement Fund, if the Settlement is terminated pursuant to the terms of this Stipulation or if, as a result of any appeal or further proceedings on remand, or successful collateral attack, the award of attorneys' fees and/or Litigation Expenses is reduced or reversed. Interim Class Counsel shall make the appropriate refund or repayment in full no later than fourteen (14) business days after receiving notice of the termination of the Settlement or notice of any reduction of the award of attorneys' fees and/or Litigation Expenses.
provided, however
21. Any Case Contribution Awards that are awarded by the Court, if any, shall be paid to Named Plaintiffs with the Court's approval from the Escrow Account, on or after the Effective Date.
22. An award of attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards and/or Litigation Expenses is not a necessary term of this Stipulation and is not a condition of this Stipulation. No decision by the Court or any court on any application for an award of attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards or Litigation Expenses shall affect the validity or finality of the Settlement. Named Plaintiffs and Interim Class Counsel may not cancel or terminate the Stipulation or the Settlement based on this Court's or any appellate court's ruling with respect to attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards and/or Litigation Expenses.
23. The Settlement Administrator shall administer the Settlement under Interim Class Counsel's supervision in accordance with this Stipulation and subject to the jurisdiction of the Court. BNY Mellon and BNY Mellon's Counsel shall cooperate in the administration of the Settlement to the extent reasonably necessary to effectuate its terms, except that BNY Mellon shall have no obligation to incur any expenses or make any payments other than as provided in paragraphs 4 and 33.
24. The Net Settlement Fund shall be distributed to Authorized Recipients according to the Plan of Allocation or according to such other plan of allocation as the Court approves. Subject to paragraphs 32 and 33, the BNY Mellon Releasees shall have no responsibility or liability whatsoever for allocation of the Net Settlement Fund, and BNY Mellon shall take no position with respect to the Plan of Allocation.
25. The allocation of the Net Settlement Fund among Authorized Recipients is a matter separate and apart from the proposed Settlement between the Settling Parties, and any decision by the Court concerning the Plan of Allocation shall not affect the validity or finality of the Settlement. Named Plaintiffs may not terminate the Stipulation or the Settlement based on
this Court's or any court's ruling with respect to the Plan of Allocation or any plan of allocation in the Action.
26. Interim Class Counsel shall cause the Settlement Administrator to mail the Notice, and Election as required, to all Class Members at the address of each such person or entity as set forth in the records of BNY Mellon in the manner and within the time set forth in the Preliminary Approval Order. In the event any of the Class Member's initial mailings are returned, the Settlement Administrator shall use all reasonable secondary efforts ( second mailing, telephone call and email) to deliver the Notice, and Election as required, to such Class Members.
e.g.,
27. All Foreign Class Member's Elections must be received by the date set by the Court in the Preliminary Approval Order and specified in the Notice, which shall require that Elections must be received at least twenty eight (28) calendar days prior to the Final Approval Hearing, unless such deadline is extended by Order of the Court; that, with the consent of Interim Class Counsel, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, an otherwise valid Election may be considered timely if it is submitted no later than thirty (30) days after the Court enters Judgment.
provided, however,
28. All Requests for Exclusion must be received by the date set by the Court in the Preliminary Approval Order and specified in the Notice, which shall require that Requests for Exclusion must be received at least twenty eight (28) calendar days prior to the Final Approval Hearing, unless such deadline is extended by Order of the Court.
29. Each Class Member shall be deemed to have submitted to the jurisdiction of the Court with respect to the Settlement, including, but not limited to, the releases provided for herein and in the Judgment.
30. Payment pursuant to the Class Distribution Order shall be final and conclusive against any and all Class Members, and all such Class Members shall be bound by all of the terms of this Stipulation and the Settlement, including the terms of the Judgment and the releases provided for herein and therein.
31. No person or entity shall have any claim against Class Member Releasees, Plaintiffs' Counsel, the BNY Mellon Releasees, or BNY Mellon's Counsel based on the administration of the Settlement, including, without limitation, the processing of claims and distributions made in accordance with this Stipulation, the Settlement, the Plan of Allocation, and/or the Class Distribution Order.
32. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Stipulation, insofar as any Class Member maintains a Sigma Collateral Deficiency, the amount of the Net Settlement Fund to which that Class Member is entitled pursuant to the Class Distribution Order shall be distributed to BNY Mellon to the extent of the Sigma Collateral Deficiency, and BNY Mellon will apply a credit in the same amount to that Class Member's Sigma Collateral Deficiency. Nothing in this Stipulation shall be construed to release any Class Member's obligation to fund the remainder of its Sigma Collateral Deficiency, if any, or to return any collateral to third-party borrowers.
33. No later than seven (7) business days after the Court has entered the Preliminary Approval Order, BNY Mellon shall provide information to Interim Class Counsel, on a confidential basis, showing, to the best of BNY Mellon's then-current knowledge, information and belief: (i) each Class Member's share of the Class Sigma Exposure (expressed as a dollar amount), (ii) a list of the Class Members that maintain a Sigma Collateral Deficiency, (iii) the amount of the Sigma Collateral Deficiency maintained by each such Class Member, and
pro rata
(iv) all information necessary to effectuate a transfer of funds to BNY Mellon, for purposes of crediting any Class Member's Sigma Collateral Deficiency.
34. Within ten (10) business days of: (a) the Court's entry of an order expressly declining to enter the Preliminary Approval Order in any material respect; (b) the Court's refusal to approve this Stipulation or any material part of it; (c) the Court's declining to enter the Judgment in any material respect; or (d) the date upon which the Judgment is modified or reversed in any material respect and such modification or reversal becomes Final, Named Plaintiffs and BNY Mellon shall each have the right to terminate the Settlement and this Stipulation, by providing written notice to the other of an election to do so; that any decision, ruling, or order solely with respect to an application for attorneys' fees, Case Contribution Awards or Litigation Expenses, or to any plan of allocation shall not be grounds for termination.
provided, however,
35. The Effective Date of the settlement shall be the first business day on which all of the following shall have occurred or been waived:
 
 
 
 
36. If BNY Mellon exercises its right to terminate the Settlement pursuant to paragraph 37 herein or BNY Mellon or Named Plaintiffs exercise their respective rights to terminate the Settlement pursuant to paragraph 34:
 
 
 
 
 
37. If a certain portion of the persons or entities that (a) would otherwise be Domestic Class Members exclude themselves from the Class by submitting a Request for Exclusion or (b) would otherwise be Foreign Class Members do not submit a timely and valid Election, that portion being specified in a separate supplemental agreement between Named Plaintiffs and BNY Mellon ("Supplemental Agreement"), then BNY Mellon shall have the option to terminate its participation in this Stipulation and the Settlement, pursuant to the terms set forth in the Supplemental Agreement.
38. Copies of any Request for Exclusion and/or Election received by the Settlement Administrator (or other person designated to receive exclusion requests) shall be provided to Interim Class Counsel and BNY Mellon's Counsel within one (1) business day of receipt thereof. If the threshold set forth in the Supplemental Agreement regarding BNY Mellon's option to terminate is reached, BNY Mellon shall have until ten (10) business days prior to the Final Approval Hearing to inform Interim Class Counsel, in writing, that it elects to exercise its option to terminate the Settlement; that in no event shall BNY Mellon be afforded less than five (5) business days from the receipt by BNY Mellon of the last timely submitted Request for Exclusion and/or Election to exercise its option to terminate the Settlement, and the Settling Parties shall jointly request an adjournment of the Final Approval Hearing to effectuate this provision if necessary.
provided, however,
39. Except as otherwise provided herein, in the event the Settlement is terminated, the Settlement shall be without prejudice, and none of the terms shall be effective or enforceable and the fact and terms of the Settlement shall not be admissible in any trial of the Action or in any
other litigation or proceeding, and, except as otherwise expressly provided, this Stipulation shall be null and void and shall have no further force or effect, and the Settling Parties and members of the Class shall proceed in all respects as if this Stipulation and any related orders had not been entered.
40. Whether or not the Settlement is approved by the Court, and whether or not the Settlement is consummated, the fact and terms of this Stipulation, including exhibits, all negotiations, discussions, drafts and proceedings in connection with the Settlement, and any act performed or document signed in connection with the Settlement:
(a) shall not be admissible in any action or proceeding for any reason, other than an action to enforce the terms hereof; and
(b) is not, and shall not be deemed, described, construed, offered or received as evidence of any presumption, concession, or admission by any person or entity of the truth of any fact alleged in the Action; the validity or invalidity of any claim or defense that was or could have been asserted in the Action or in any litigation; the amount of damages, if any, that would have been recoverable in the Action; or any liability, negligence, fault, or wrongdoing of any person or entity.
41. All of the following exhibits attached hereto are hereby incorporated by reference as though fully set forth herein: proposed Preliminary Approval Order, Notice, Election and proposed Judgment.
42. The Settling Parties intend this Settlement to be a final and complete resolution of all disputes asserted or that could be asserted with respect to the Settled Claims. Accordingly,
the Settling Parties agree not to assert in any forum that the Action was brought by Named Plaintiffs or Plaintiffs' Counsel, or defended by BNY Mellon or BNY Mellon's Counsel, in bad faith or without a reasonable basis. The Settling Parties agree that the amount paid and the other terms of this Settlement were negotiated at arm's length and in good faith, including in connection with several mediations conducted by the Honorable Layn R. Phillips, and reflect a settlement that was reached voluntarily after consultation with experienced legal counsel. The Settling Parties shall assert no claims of any violation of Rule 11 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, or any other law or rule governing litigation conduct, relating to the maintenance, defense or settlement of the Action.
43. This Stipulation, including the exhibits to this Stipulation and the Supplemental Agreement, may not be modified or amended, nor may any of its provisions be waived, except by a writing signed by all parties. Any condition in this Stipulation may be waived by the party entitled to enforce the condition in a writing signed by that party or its counsel. The waiver by any party of any breach of this Stipulation by any other party shall not be deemed a waiver of the breach by any other party, or a waiver of any other prior or subsequent breach of this Stipulation by that party or any other party. Without further order of the Court, the parties may agree to reasonable extensions of time to carry out any of the provisions of this Stipulation.
44. The headings herein are used for the purpose of convenience only and are not meant to have legal effect.
45. This Stipulation, its exhibits and the Supplemental Agreement constitute the entire agreement among the Settling Parties concerning this Settlement, and no representations, warranties or inducements have been made by any Settling Party concerning this Stipulation and its exhibits other than those contained and memorialized in such documents.
46. Nothing in this Stipulation is intended, or shall be construed, to affect any rights or obligations of any person or entity that is a client of BNY Mellon's securities lending program other than the Class Members.
47. This Stipulation may be executed in one or more original, e-mailed and/or faxed counterparts. All executed counterparts and each of them shall be deemed to be one and the same instrument.
48. This Stipulation shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the successors, trustees, and assigns of the parties hereto. The Stipulation and the obligations hereunder may not be assigned without the express written consent of the Settling Parties.
49. All disputes and proceedings with respect to the administration of the Settlement and the determination of all controversies relating thereto, including disputed questions of law and fact with respect to the timeliness, validity and amounts of Claims, shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Court, except as provided by paragraph 50. The Settling Parties waive any right to trial by jury of any dispute arising under or relating to this Stipulation or the Settlement.
50. If any disputes between the Settling Parties arise out of the finalization of the Stipulation or the Settlement itself, those disputes will be resolved by Layn R. Phillips first by way of expedited telephonic mediation and, if those efforts are unsuccessful, then by way of final, binding, non-appealable resolution.
51. This Stipulation shall not be construed more strictly against one Settling Party than another merely by virtue of the fact that it, or any part of it, may have been prepared by counsel for one of the Settling Parties, it being recognized that it is the result of arm's-length negotiations between the Settling Parties and all Settling Parties have contributed substantially and materially to the preparation of this Stipulation.
52. All counsel and any other person executing this Stipulation and any of the exhibits hereto, or any related Settlement documents, warrant and represent that they have the full authority to do so and that they have the authority to take appropriate action required or permitted to be taken pursuant to the Stipulation to effectuate its terms. The Settling Parties each represent and warrant that they hold the claims being released in the Settlement and that they have full authority to release such claims.
53. The Settling Parties stipulate and agree that all litigation activity in the Action, except that contemplated herein and in the Preliminary Approval Order, the Notice, and the Judgment, shall be stayed and all hearings, deadlines, and other proceedings in the Action, except a preliminary approval hearing (if any) and the Final Approval Hearing, shall be taken off calendar.
54. If any party is required to give notice to the other parties under this Stipulation, such notice shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon receipt by hand delivery, facsimile transmission or electronic mail to the recipients in the signature block below.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Stipulation to be executed, by their duly authorized attorneys as of July 5, 2012.
 

Exhibit 99.1
BNY Mellon today announced that on July 5, 2012 it entered into a settlement agreement related to a previously disclosed class action lawsuit pending in federal court in Oklahoma and initiated by CompSource Oklahoma concerning losses in connection with the investment of securities lending collateral in Sigma Finance Inc. ("Sigma"). The settlement agreement is subject to court approval.
NEW YORK, July 6, 2012 
The company recorded an after-tax charge in the second quarter of 2012 of approximately $210 million ($350 million pre-tax) primarily related to claims involving Sigma investments. This charge includes in part the expected payment of $280 million settling the Sigma-related class action.
Separately, the company noted that, after a preliminary review of the recently released Basel III rulemaking, it estimates that the impact of the new rules will be to increase its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio by over 100 basis points. The Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as of March 31, 2012 was 7.6%. The expected increase is primarily due to the estimated reduction in risk-weighted assets related to the company's securities portfolio.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.6 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.9 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, the company's expectations with respect to its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the company's control). Factors that could cause the company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 and in the company's other subsequent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of July 6, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update the information contained in this press release to reflect events or circumstances that arise after that date or reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events, except as required by federal securities laws.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120718063909.txt.gz
TIME:20120718063909
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 18, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for second quarter 2012. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS OF $466 MILLION OR $0.39 PER COMMON SHARE
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT AND PERFORMANCE FEES +7% AND INVESTMENT SERVICES FEES +2%, SEQUENTIALLY
NET LONG-TERM INFLOWS IN ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT OF $26 BILLION IN 2Q12
RECORD LEVEL OF ASSETS UNDER CUSTODY/ADMINISTRATION OF $27.1 TRILLION, +2% SEQUENTIALLY
RETURN ON TANGIBLE COMMON EQUITY 15.7%
REPURCHASED 12.2 MILLION COMMON SHARES FOR $286 MILLION IN 2Q12
ESTIMATED BASEL III TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY RATIO 8.7%
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported second quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $466 million, or $0.39 per common share including the previously announced litigation charge of $212 million (after-tax) or $0.18 per common share, compared with $735 million, or $0.59 per common share, in the second quarter of 2011 and $619 million, or $0.52 per common share, in the first quarter of 2012.
NEW YORK, July 18, 2012 
"We continue to grow investment management and investment services fees reflecting the strength of our business model. We are delivering on our operational excellence initiatives, investing for future growth and positioning our businesses to deliver the full breadth of our global capabilities. Our strengthened capital positions us as a preferred counterparty, and provides us greater flexibility for ongoing investment while continuing to return capital to shareholders," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"Also in the second quarter, we were able to put significant litigation behind us with no material impact on our capital," added Mr. Hassell.
 
 
Unless otherwise noted, all comments begin with the results of the second quarter of 2012 and are compared to the second quarter of 2011. Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
Second Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The year-over-year decrease in the net interest margin (FTE) was primarily driven by increased client deposits which were invested in lower-yielding assets reflecting the current market environment. The sequential decrease in the net interest margin (FTE) reflects the impact of narrower spreads and lower accretion.
The was a credit of $19 million in the second quarter of 2012 primarily resulting from a decline in the expected loss related to a broker-dealer customer that previously filed for bankruptcy, as well as improvements in the mortgage portfolio. There was no provision in the second quarter of 2011 and a provision of $5 million in the first quarter of 2012.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 15.8% in the second quarter of 2012 and includes a reduction in the tax rate of approximately 9% related to the litigation charge. The operating tax rate  Non-GAAP in the second quarter of 2012 was 26.1% and includes an increased benefit of certain tax credits. The effective tax rate was 26.9% in the second quarter of 2011 and 28.7% in the first quarter of 2012. See "Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures" beginning on page 11 for additional information.
effective tax rate
The was $1.4 billion at June 30, 2012 compared with $1.2 billion at March 31, 2012. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio primarily reflects a decline in market interest rates.
unrealized pre-tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
We generated $527 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the second quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 8.7% at June 30, 2012 based on the NPRs and final market risk rule. The increase in the ratio from 7.6% at March 31, 2012, which was calculated under prior Basel III guidance and the proposed market risk rule, was primarily due to the reduction in risk-weighted assets related to the treatment of sub-investment grade securities. This benefit was partially offset by the treatment of investment grade securitizations and financial institution exposure, as well as balance sheet growth in the second quarter.
 On July 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Aug. 7, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on July 30, 2012. On July 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation also declared a dividend for the period from June 20, 2012 through Sept. 19, 2012 of $1,000 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock (liquidation preference of $100,000 per share) ("the Series A Preferred Stock"), payable on Sept. 20, 2012. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the Sept. 20, 2012 dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock to the holders of record as of the close of business on Sept. 5, 2012 of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities.
Dividends
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $27.1 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.3 trillion in assets under management, services $11.5 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through June 30, 2012 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
 
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on July 18, 2012. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on July 18, 2012. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning July 18, 2012 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Wednesday, Aug. 1, 2012 by dialing (866) 376-2451 (U.S.) or (203) 369- 0301 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Capital
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased in basis.
 
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. The tangible common shareholders' equity ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of and noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011; and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expense on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
The following table presents a reconciliation of the tax rate from an effective rate to an operating rate for the second quarter of 2012.
 
 
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our estimated capital ratios and our ability to continue to grow investment management and investment services fees, grow in the future, deliver the full breadth of our global capabilities, provide flexibility for ongoing investment and return capital to shareholders. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of July 18, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120723161016.txt.gz
TIME:20120723161016
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 18, 2012, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for second quarter 2012 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on July 18, 2012, a Quarterly Earnings Review and Financial Trends information. The Quarterly Earnings Review is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and the Financial Trends information is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this report. Both exhibits are "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and are not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to this report contain information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
SECOND QUARTER 2012 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
(comparisons are unannualized 2Q12 vs. 1Q12 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $180 million compared with $222 million in the second quarter of 2011 and $191 million in the first quarter of 2012. In the second quarter of 2012, foreign exchange revenue totaled $157 million, a decrease of 15% year-over-year and an increase of 15% (unannualized) sequentially. The year-over-year decrease reflects lower volatility and volumes, while the sequential increase primarily resulted from higher volumes. Other trading revenue was $23 million in the second quarter of 2012 compared with $38 million in the second quarter of 2011 and $55 million in the first quarter of 2012. Both decreases were primarily driven by lower fixed income trading.
 
 
Investment and other income totaled $48 million compared with $145 million in the second quarter of 2011 and $139 million in the first quarter of 2012. The year-over-year decrease primarily resulted from lower asset-related gains and equity investment revenue. Sequentially, the decline primarily resulted from lower leasing gains, seed capital gains and equity investment revenue.
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONAL EXCELLENCE INITIATIVES UPDATE
 
 
Accomplishments
Business Operations
 
 
 
 
Technology
 
 
 
Corporate Services
 
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
The following table presents our capital ratios.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased-in basis.
 
 
We generated $527 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the second quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 8.7% at June 30, 2012 based on the NPRs and final market risk rule. The increase in the ratio from 7.6% at March 31, 2012, which was calculated under prior Basel III guidance and the proposed market risk rule, was primarily due to the reduction in risk-weighted assets related to treatment of sub-investment grade securities. This benefit was partially offset by the treatment of investment grade securitizations and financial institution exposure, as well as balance sheet growth in the second quarter.
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At June 30, 2012, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $93.0 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $1.4 billion at June 30, 2012 compared with $1.2 billion at March 31, 2012. During the second quarter of 2012, we received $246 million of paydowns and sold approximately $24 million of sub-investment grade securities.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $19 million in the second quarter of 2012 primarily resulting from a decline in the expected loss related to a broker-dealer customer that previously filed for bankruptcy, as well as improvements in the mortgage portfolio. There was no provision in the second quarter of 2011 and a charge of $5 million in the first quarter of 2012.
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items. Results in 2011 include the Shareowner Services business.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. The tangible common shareholders' equity ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31 201l; and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges and amortization of intangible assets and direct expense related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
The presentation of income (loss) from consolidated investment management funds, net of net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
The following table presents a reconciliation of the tax rate from an effective rate to an operating rate for the second quarter of 2012.
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
 
 
Page - 23
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
The following tables present fee and other revenue and noninterest expense excluding Shareowner Services.
 
 
 
 
Page - 24
BNY Mellon 2Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our estimated capital ratios and our operational excellence initiatives, including targeted savings by the end of 2012. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of July 18, 2012, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 25

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Expense efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in 2010 and 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period's presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated July 18, 2012, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: See pages 3 through 6 for additional details of revenue/expense items impacting continuing operations.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 10 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 10 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 10 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
 
n/m - not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 10 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120814161039.txt.gz
TIME:20120814161039
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Effective as of July 18, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant") has declared a dividend for the period from June 20, 2012 through Sept. 19, 2012 (the "Dividend Period") of $1,022.22 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock (liquidation preference of $100,000 per share) ("the Series A Preferred Stock"), payable on Sept. 20, 2012. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the Sept. 20, 2012 dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock to the holders of record as of the close of business on Sept. 5, 2012 of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities. This statement supersedes the prior statement indicating that the dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock for the Dividend Period would be $1,000 per share made in the earnings release and furnished with a Current Report on Form 8-K on July 18, 2012.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20120918161954.txt.gz
TIME:20120918161954
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Upon the scheduled issuance of the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share, par value $0.01 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock"), of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") on September 19, 2012, the ability of the Company to declare or pay dividends on, or purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, shares of its common stock or any shares of the Company that rank junior to the Series C Preferred Stock will be subject to certain restrictions in the event that the Company does not declare and pay (or set aside) dividends on the Series C Preferred Stock for the last preceding dividend period. The terms of the Series C Preferred Stock, including such restrictions, are more fully described in the Certificate of Designations (as defined in Item 5.03 below), a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On September 13, 2012, the Company filed a Certificate of Designations (the "Certificate of Designations") with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware to establish the preferences, limitations and relative rights of the Series C Preferred Stock. The Certificate of Designations became effective upon filing, and a copy is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On September 12, 2012, the Company entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC, as representatives of the several underwriters listed therein (the "Underwriters"), relating to the public offering (the "Offering") of 22,000,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of the Series C Preferred Stock and granted the Underwriters an option to purchase up to an additional 3,300,000 Depositary Shares to cover over-allotments, if any. The Underwriting Agreement contains various representations, warranties and agreements by the Company, conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties and termination provisions. The description of the Underwriting Agreement set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Underwriting Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. This Current Report on Form 8-K is being filed for the purpose of filing Exhibit 1.1 as an exhibit to the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) (the "Registration Statement") and such exhibit is incorporated herein by reference into the Registration Statement.
A copy of the opinion of Craig T. Beazer, Chief Securities Counsel of the Company, relating to the legality of the issuance and sale of Series C Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares is attached as Exhibit 5.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. Exhibits 5.1 and 23.1 of this Current Report on Form 8-K are incorporated herein by reference into the Registration Statement.
The Deposit Agreement, dated as of September 17, 2012 (the "Deposit Agreement"), by and among the Company, Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depositary receipts described therein, relating to the Depositary Shares is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The form of certificate representing the Series C Preferred Stock and the form of depositary receipt representing the Depositary Shares are being filed and included as Exhibit A and Exhibit B, respectively, to the Deposit Agreement and are incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
EXECUTION VERSION
September 12, 2012
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated
BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC
As representatives (the "")
Representatives
of the several Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto,
c/o Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated
One Bryant Park
New York, New York 10036
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation registered as a financial holding company and a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (the ""), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, to issue and sell 22,000,000 depositary shares (the ""), each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock (the "") of the Company (such number of Depositary Shares, the ""), to the several Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ""), for whom you are acting as representatives. The Company also proposes to grant the Underwriters an option to purchase additional Depositary Shares solely to cover over-allotments (the "" and, together with the Underwritten Securities, the ""). The Preferred Stock shall have the rights, powers and preferences set forth in the certificate of designations to be dated on or about September 18, 2012 relating thereto (the ""). The shares of Preferred Stock represented by the Securities are to be deposited by the Company against delivery of depositary receipts evidencing the Securities (the "") that are to be issued by Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary (the ""), under a Deposit Agreement, to be dated on or about September 19, 2012 (the ""), among the Company, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts issued thereunder.
Company
Depositary Shares
Preferred Stock
Underwritten Securities
Underwriters
Option Securities
Securities
Certificate of Designations
Depositary Receipts
Depositary
Deposit Agreement
1. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) An "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) in respect of the Securities has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; such registration statement, and any post-effective amendment thereto, became effective on filing; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of such registration statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose has been initiated or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, any request on the part of the Commission for additional information with respect to such registration statement has been complied with, and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company (the base prospectus filed as part of such registration statement, in the form in which it has most recently been filed with the Commission on or prior to the date of this Agreement, is hereinafter called the ""; any preliminary prospectus (including any preliminary prospectus supplement) relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act is hereinafter called a ""; the various parts of such registration statement, including all exhibits thereto but excluding any Form T-1 and including any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities that is filed with the Commission and deemed by virtue of Rule 430B to be part of such registration statement, each as amended at the time such part of the registration statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the ""; the Basic Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as defined in Section 1(c) hereof), is hereinafter called the ""; the Pricing Prospectus, together with the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5(i) hereof, is hereinafter called the ""; the form of the final prospectus relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof is hereinafter called the ""; any reference herein to the Basic Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act, as of the date of such prospectus; any reference to any amendment or supplement to the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and any documents filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), and incorporated therein, in each case after the date of the Basic Prospectus, such Preliminary Prospectus, or the Prospectus, as the case may be; any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the effective date of the Registration Statement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement; and any "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433 under the Act relating to the Securities is hereinafter called an "");
Act
Commission
Basic Prospectus
Preliminary Prospectus
Registration Statement
Pricing Prospectus
Pricing Disclosure Package
Prospectus
Exchange Act
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
(b) No order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been received by the Company, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission
 
thereunder, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(c) For the purposes of this Agreement, the "" is 3:35 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of this Agreement. The Pricing Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule II(a) hereto does not conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, and each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as supplemented by and taken together with the Pricing Disclosure Package as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to statements or omissions made in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
Applicable Time
provided
however
(d) The documents incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(e) The Registration Statement conforms, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, in the case of the Registration Statement, as of the applicable effective date as to each part of the Registration Statement, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and in the case of the Prospectus, as of the applicable filing date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be
 
stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(f) Except as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Disclosure Package, (i) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any transactions, not in the ordinary course of business, that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis and (ii) there has not been any material adverse effect on, or any development involving a prospective material adverse effect on, the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operation of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or adversely affect the compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder, other than, with respect to clause (ii), any such effect resulting from changes in the general economic or equity or debt market conditions in the United States or changes in the financial services industry in general and not specifically relating to the Company or its subsidiaries (a "");
Material Adverse Effect
(g) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(h) The Bank of New York Mellon (the "") has been duly incorporated, established or formed and is validly existing as a corporation, banking corporation or association, or other applicable type of entity, as applicable, in good standing (to the extent good standing is applicable in such jurisdiction) under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, establishment or formation, as applicable, and has the corporate, limited liability company or other organizational power and authority to own its properties and to conduct its business as and to the extent described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other applicable type of entity and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification, except where any failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the only "significant subsidiary" of the Company, within the meaning assigned to such term in Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission, is The Bank of New York Mellon;
Significant Subsidiary
(i) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company (including the Preferred Stock) has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable
 
and conforms to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended, and in the case of each of its New York state chartered banks, as provided in New York Banking Law Section 114); except for directors' qualifying shares, all issued and outstanding capital stock of the Significant Subsidiary is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity; and except as set forth or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of or ownership interest in the Company are outstanding and the issuance of the shares of Preferred Stock relating to the Securities will not be subject to any preemptive or similar rights;
(j) The Company has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement (collectively, the ""), and to perform its respective obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents; the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken; and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company;
Transaction Documents
(k) The Certificate of Designations has been duly and validly authorized by the Company;
(l) The Deposit Agreement has been duly authorized and, prior to the First Time of Delivery, will have been executed and delivered by the Company; assuming the Deposit Agreement is duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Depositary, at each Time of Delivery, the Deposit Agreement will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles relating to enforceability, and except as to the indemnity and contribution provisions therein to the extent any such provision is, in the opinion of the Commission, against public policy as expressed in the Act;
(m) Six thousand three hundred twenty-five (6,325) shares of the Preferred Stock have been duly and validly authorized by the Company, and, when the Underwritten Securities or any Option Securities, as the case may be, are issued and delivered to and paid for by the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement, the shares of Preferred Stock deposited with the Depositary under the Deposit Agreement with respect to the Underwritten Securities or any such Option Securities, respectively, will be fully paid and nonassessable; assuming due execution and delivery of the Depositary Receipts and the Deposit Agreement by the Depositary, each Depositary Share will be duly and validly issued and will entitle the holder thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement;
 
(n) The issue and sale of the Securities and the compliance by the Company with the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "") or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended (the "") or (iii) result in any violation of the provisions of any statute or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or the Significant Subsidiary or any of their properties (each, a ""), except in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually or in aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any such Governmental Entity is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents except (x) such as have been obtained under the Act and (y) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
Certificate of Incorporation
By-Laws
Governmental Entity
FINRA
(o) The statements set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the captions "Description of Preferred Stock", "Description of Depositary Shares", "Description of the Series C Preferred Stock" and "Description of the Depositary Shares", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Preferred Stock or the Depositary Shares, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Material United States Federal Income Tax Considerations" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
(p) Each Transaction Document conforms in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus.
(q) Other than as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is a party or of which any property of the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is the subject, which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to the Company's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
(r) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "");
Investment Company Act
 
(s) (A) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus), and (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) under the Act) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 under the Act, the Company was a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; and (B) at the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Act) of the Securities, the Company was not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act;
(t) The Company maintains a system of internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or under their supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective and the Company is not aware of any material weaknesses in its internal control over financial reporting;
(u) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting;
(v) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act; such disclosure controls and procedures have been designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company and its subsidiaries is made known to the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer by others within those entities; and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective;
(w) The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and the Pricing Disclosure Package fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and has been prepared in all material respects in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto;
(x) The Company has not taken, directly or indirectly (except through any Underwriter or any affiliate thereof, as to which no representation is made), any action designed to or that would constitute or that would reasonably be expected to cause or result in, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities;
(y) None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate, in each case acting on behalf of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such persons of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (the "") except where such violation would not,
FCPA
 
individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole; and the Company and its subsidiaries have instituted and maintain policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance with the FCPA in all material respects;
(z) To the knowledge of the Company, the operations of the Company and its subsidiaries are currently in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all jurisdictions in which the Company and its subsidiaries conduct their businesses, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any Governmental Entity (collectively, the ""); and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any Governmental Entity involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened; and
Money Laundering Laws
(aa) None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or representative of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is an individual or entity ("") currently the subject of any sanctions ("") administered or enforced by the United States Government, including, without limitation, the U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control (""); and the Company will not directly or knowingly and indirectly use the proceeds of the sale of the Securities, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiaries, joint venture partners or other Person, to fund any activities of or business with any Person, or in any country or territory, that is currently the subject of Sanctions.
Person
Sanctions
OFAC
2. .
Purchase and Sale of Securities by the Underwriters
(a) On the basis of the representations and warranties herein set forth, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at a purchase price per Underwritten Security of $24.2125 (in the case of Underwritten Securities sold to retail investors) or $24.75 (in the case of Underwritten Securities sold to institutional investors) (the ""), the number of Underwritten Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto under the heading "Number of Underwritten Securities to Be Purchased" (or such number of Underwritten Securities increased as set forth in Section 10 hereof).
Purchase Price
(b) On the basis of the representations and warranties herein set forth, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby agrees to grant an option to the several Underwriters to purchase, severally and not jointly, up to 3,300,000 Option Securities at the same Purchase Price per Security as the Underwriters shall pay for the Underwritten Securities solely to cover over-allotments. Said option may be exercised in whole or in part at any time or from time to time on or before the 30th day after the date of the Prospectus, upon written or facsimile notice by the Representatives to the Company setting forth the number of Option Securities as to which the several Underwriters are exercising the option and the date on which delivery and payment shall occur, which shall not be less than three
 
Business Days after the date of the notice of exercise. The number of Option Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter shall be the same percentage of the total number of Option Securities to be purchased by the several Underwriters as such Underwriter is purchasing of the Underwritten Securities, subject to such adjustments as the Representatives, in their absolute discretion, shall make to eliminate any fractional shares.
3. . The Company understands that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representatives is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus.
The Offering
4. .
Settlement
(a) The Underwritten Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in book-entry only form represented by one or more Depositary Receipts deposited with The Depository Trust Company ("") and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Company shall be delivered by the Company to the Representatives, through the facilities of DTC, for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the Purchase Price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account(s) specified by the Company to the Representatives at least forty-eight hours in advance. The Depositary Receipts will be made available for checking and packaging at least twenty-four hours prior to the Time of Delivery with respect thereto at the office of DTC or its designated custodian (the "").
DTC
Designated Office
(b) The time and date of delivery of and payment for the Securities shall be, with respect to the Underwritten Securities, 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on September 19, 2012 or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing, and, with respect to the Option Securities, 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date specified by the Representatives in the written notice given by the Representatives of the Underwriters' election to purchase such Option Securities, or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. Such time and date for delivery of the Underwritten Securities is herein called the "", each such time and date for delivery of the Option Securities, if not the First Time of Delivery, is herein called a "", and each such time and date for delivery is herein called a "".
First Time of Delivery
Second Time of Delivery
Time of Delivery
(c) The documents to be delivered at a Time of Delivery by or on behalf of the parties hereto pursuant to Section 8 hereof, including the cross-receipt for the Securities and any additional documents requested by the Underwriters pursuant to Section 8(n) hereof, will be delivered at the offices of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, One Liberty Plaza, New York, New York 10006 (the "), and the Underwritten Securities or Option Securities, as the case may be, will be delivered at the Designated Office, all at the respective Time of Delivery. A meeting will be held at the Closing Location at 4:00 p.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next preceding such Time of Delivery, at which meeting the final drafts of the documents to be delivered pursuant to the preceding sentence will be available for review by the parties hereto. For the purposes of Section 2 and of this Section 4, " shall mean each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday which is not a day on which banking institutions in New York City are generally authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
"
Closing Location
"New York
Business Day
 
5. . The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters:
Covenants
(a) To prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commission's close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement; to make no further amendment or any supplement to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus prior to a Time of Delivery which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives promptly after reasonable notice thereof; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus has been filed; to file promptly all other material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus in respect of the Securities, of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act, of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus or suspending any such qualification, to promptly use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order; and in the event of any such issuance of a notice of objection, promptly to take such steps including, without limitation, amending the Registration Statement or filing a new registration statement, at its own expense, as may be necessary to permit offers and sales of the Securities by the Underwriters (references herein to the Registration Statement shall include any such amendment or new registration statement);
(b) If required by Rule 430B(h) under the Act, to prepare a form of prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such form of prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than may be required by Rule 424(b) under the Act; and to make no further amendment or supplement to such form of prospectus which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives promptly after reasonable notice thereof;
 
(c) If by the third anniversary (the "") of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, any of the Securities remain unsold by the Underwriters, the Company will file, if it has not already done so and is eligible to do so, a new automatic shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives. If at the Renewal Deadline the Company is no longer eligible to file an automatic shelf registration statement, the Company will, if it has not already done so, file a new shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives and will use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to be declared effective within 180 days after the Renewal Deadline. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the expired registration statement relating to the Securities. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new automatic shelf registration statement or such new shelf registration statement, as the case may be;
Renewal Deadline
(d) Promptly from time to time to take such action as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives may reasonably request and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of the Securities, that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction;
provided
(e) Prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement and from time to time, to furnish the Underwriters with written and electronic copies of the Prospectus in New York City in such quantities as the Representatives may reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required at any time prior to the expiration of nine months after the time of issue of the Prospectus in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities and if at any such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Representatives and to file such document and to prepare and furnish to each Underwriter and to any dealer in the Securities as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of an amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance, (i) if such untrue statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein, at the expense of such Underwriter and (ii) in other cases, without charge to any such Underwriter or dealer; and in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales of any of the Securities at any time nine months or more after the time of issue of the Prospectus, upon the request of the Representatives but at the expense of such Underwriter to prepare and deliver to such Underwriter as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives may request of an amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act;
 
(f) To make generally available to its securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158 under the Act);
(g) During the period beginning from the date hereof and continuing to and including the date 30 days after the date of the Prospectus, not to, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, directly or indirectly offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge, sell or grant any option, right or warrant to purchase, make any short sale or otherwise dispose of any securities of the Company that in the judgment of the Representatives are substantially similar to the Securities or any securities convertible into, or exchangeable for, such securities, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, owned directly by the Company (including holding as a custodian) or with respect to which the Company has beneficial ownership within the rules and regulations of the Commission, except that (i) the Company may engage in any activity described in this Section 5(g) if and to the extent required by applicable law or by any notice, order or regulation of any regulatory authority which is binding upon the Company and (ii) the Company may issue or grant any securities (including restricted stock, restricted stock units and phantom stock), and options to acquire securities, of the Company to its employees and directors (including on a cashless exercise basis) pursuant to an employee benefit plan or director plan that exists as of the date hereof (including, without limitation, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan);
(h) To pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) under the Act and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) under the Act;
(i) To prepare a final term sheet in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such term sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Act within the time required by such Rule. Any such final term sheet shall be an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(j) To use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, if any, in the manner specified in the Pricing Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds";
(k) To use its reasonable best efforts to list, subject to notice of issuance, the Securities on the New York Stock Exchange (the ""); and
Exchange
(l) Upon request of any Underwriter, to furnish, or cause to be furnished, to such Underwriter an electronic version of the Company's trademarks, servicemarks and corporate logo for use on the website, if any, operated by such Underwriter for the purpose of facilitating the on-line offering of the Securities (the ""); , that the License shall be used solely for the purpose described above, is granted without any fee and may not be assigned or transferred.
License
provided, however
 
6. .
Free Writing Prospectuses
(a) The Company represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; each Underwriter represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a free writing prospectus; any such free writing prospectus the use of which has been consented to by the Company or the Representatives, as applicable, is listed on Schedule II(a) hereto;
(b) The Company has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 under the Act applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission or retention where required and legending; and
(c) The Company agrees that if at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus any event occurred or occurs as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus would conflict with the information in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, the Company will give prompt notice thereof to the Representatives and, if requested by the Representatives, will prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or other document which will correct such conflict, statement or omission; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
provided
however
7. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Company's counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Securities under the Act and all other expenses (excluding the fees incurred by the counsel for the Underwriters) in connection with the preparation, printing, reproduction and filing of the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers; (ii) the cost of printing or producing any Agreement among Underwriters, the Transaction Documents, the Blue Sky Memorandum, closing documents (including any compilations thereof) and any other documents in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Securities; (iii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 5(c) hereof, including the fees and disbursements of counsels for the Underwriters in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky survey, up to a maximum of $10,000 in the aggregate; (iv) all fees and expenses in connection with listing the Securities on the Exchange ; (v) the cost of preparing the Securities; (vi) the cost and
Expenses
 
charges of any transfer agent or registrar; (vii) the fees and expenses of the Depositary in connection with the deposit of the Preferred Stock and the offering of the Securities; and (viii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, and Sections 9 and 12 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their respective counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
8. . The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder, as to the Securities to be delivered at a Time of Delivery shall be subject, in the discretion of the Representatives, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company herein are, at and as of the Time of Delivery, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
Conditions
(a) The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by the rules and regulations under the Act and in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof; all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated by the Commission and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act shall have been received; no stop order suspending or preventing the use of the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been initiated by the Commission; and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission shall have been complied with, or is being complied with, to the reasonable satisfaction of Representatives; FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of this Agreement;
(b) Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, shall have furnished to the Representatives such written opinion or opinions, dated the Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to each of the Representatives, and such counsel shall have received such papers and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
(c) The chief securities counsel of the Company shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsel's written opinion and letter, dated the Time of Delivery, in the forms attached hereto as Exhibits A-1 and A-2, respectively;
(d) On the date of the Prospectus at a time prior to the execution of this Agreement, at 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the effective date of any post effective amendment to the Registration Statement filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement and also at the Time of Delivery, the independent accounting firm of the Company who has certified the financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries included or incorporated by reference in
 
the Prospectus shall have furnished to the Representatives a letter or letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus;
(e) (i) Neither the Company nor the Significant Subsidiary shall have sustained since the date of the latest audited financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Disclosure Package any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package; and (ii) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Disclosure Package, there shall not have been any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiary taken as a whole, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii), otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package or the effect of which is in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(f) On or after the Applicable Time (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Company's debt securities or preferred stock by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities or preferred stock;
(g) On or after the Applicable Time there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the Exchange; (ii) a suspension or material limitation in trading in the Company's securities on the Exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in securities settlement or clearance services in the United States; (iv) the outbreak or escalation of hostilities involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war; or (v) the occurrence of any other calamity or crisis or any change in financial, political or economic conditions in the United States or elsewhere, if the effect of any such event specified in clause (iv) or (v) in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at such Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(h) The Company shall have complied with the provisions of Section 5(e) hereof with respect to the furnishing of prospectuses on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement;
 
(i) The Certificate of Designations shall have been duly filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware;
(j) The Representatives shall have received from the Depositary a copy of the certificate evidencing the deposit of the shares of Preferred Stock underlying the Securities delivered at the Time of Delivery;
(k) The Securities shall have been approved, subject to notice of issuance, for listing on the Exchange; and
(l) The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives at the Time of Delivery certificate of the Chief Financial Officer or the Treasurer of the Company satisfactory to the Representatives (i) to the effect that (A) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of the Time of Delivery with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of the Time of Delivery and (B) the Company has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Time of Delivery, and (ii) as to such other matters as the Representatives Purchaser may reasonably request.
9. . (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and any affiliate of such Underwriter that is acting as a selling agent of such Underwriter in connection with the distribution of the Securities against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
Indemnification and Contribution
provided
however
 
(b) Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Underwriter may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability except to the extent that it has been prejudiced in any material respect by such failure or from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect the settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action or claim in respect of which indemnification or contribution may be sought hereunder (whether or not the indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such action or claim) unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act, by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 9 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then
 
each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, from the offering of the Securities. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above and such indemnifying party was prejudiced in a material respect by such failure, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Underwriters, in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total commissions or discounts received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Securities. The relative fault of the Company or the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as a single entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total public offering price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters, under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
 
10. . (a) If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Securities which it has agreed to purchase hereunder at a Time of Delivery, the Representatives may in their discretion arrange for them or another party or other parties to purchase such Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty-six hours after such default by any Underwriter the Representatives do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty-six hours within which to procure another party or other parties satisfactory to the Representatives to purchase such Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed periods, the Representatives notify the Company that they have so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, or the Company notifies the Representatives that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for a period of not more than seven days, in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in the opinion of the Representatives may thereby be made necessary. The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall include any person substituted under this Section 10 with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to this Agreement with respect to such Securities.
Underwriter Defaults
(b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at the Time of Delivery, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the number of shares which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder at the Time of Delivery and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the number of Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
(c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at the Time of Delivery, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then this Agreement shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 7 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in Section 9 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from any liability it may have to the Company or any non-defaulting Underwriter for its default.
 
11. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or the Company, or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Survival
12. . If this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 10 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof; but, if for any other reason, any Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket expenses approved in writing by the Representatives, including fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in connection with the Transaction Documents and the offering of Securities contemplated hereby, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof.
Liabilities Upon Termination
13. . In all dealings hereunder, the Representatives shall act on behalf of each of the Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by the Representatives.
Notices, etc
All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the Representatives; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement, Attention: Secretary; , , that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 9(c) hereof shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its Underwriters' Questionnaire, which address will be supplied to the Company by the Representatives upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
provided
however
In accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), the Underwriters are required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies their respective clients, including the Company, which information may include the name and address of their respective clients, as well as other information that will allow the Underwriters to properly identify their respective clients.
14. . This Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters and the Company and, to the extent provided in Sections 9 and 11 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company or any Underwriter and each person who controls the Company or any Underwriter and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties to Agreement
15. . Time shall be of the essence of this Agreement. As used herein, the term "" shall mean any day when the Commission's office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
Time Is of the Essence
business day
 
16. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby are arm's-length commercial transactions among the Company and the several Underwriters, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Underwriters is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, (iii) none of the Underwriters has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) or any other obligation to the Company except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (iv) the Underwriters may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from the Company and (v) the Company has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters, or any of them, has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Underwriters Not Fiduciaries
17. . The Transaction Documents supersede all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) among the Company and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Supercedes Prior Agreements
18. . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
19. . Each of the Company and the Underwriters hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
20. . This Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
21. . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company is authorized to disclose to any persons the U.S. federal and state income tax treatment and tax structure of the potential transaction and all materials of any kind (including tax opinions and other tax analyses) provided to the Company relating to that treatment and structure, without the Underwriters' imposing any limitation of any kind. However, any information relating to the tax treatment and tax structure shall remain confidential (and the foregoing sentence shall not apply) to the extent necessary to enable any person to comply with securities laws. For this purpose, "" is limited to any facts that may be relevant to that treatment.
Disclosures
tax structure
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon the acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request, but without warranty on your part as to the authority of the signers thereof.
 
On behalf of each of the Underwriters
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
DEPOSIT AGREEMENT, dated as of September 17, 2012, among (i) THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation; (ii) COMPUTERSHARE SHAREOWNER SERVICES LLC, a New Jersey limited liability company (""); and (iii) the holders from time to time of the Receipts described herein.
Computershare
WHEREAS, it is desired to provide, as hereinafter set forth in this Deposit Agreement, for the deposit of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock of the Corporation from time to time with the Depositary for the purposes set forth in this Deposit Agreement and for the issuance hereunder of Receipts evidencing Depositary Shares in respect of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock so deposited; and
WHEREAS, the Receipts are to be substantially in the form of Exhibit B attached hereto, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided in this Deposit Agreement;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Section 1.1. Definitions
.
The following definitions shall for all purposes, unless otherwise indicated, apply to the respective terms used in this Deposit Agreement:
"" shall mean, with respect to any person or entity, any person or entity directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, such other person or entity. For the purpose of this definition, "controlling," "controlled by" or "under common control with" mean the ownership, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the operation or management and policies of a person or entity, whether through the ownership or control of voting interests, by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
"" shall mean the relevant Certificate of Designations filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware establishing the Series C Preferred Stock as a series of preferred stock of the Corporation.
Certificate of Designations
"" shall mean The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation, and its successors.
Corporation
"" shall mean this Deposit Agreement, as amended or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof.
Deposit Agreement
"" shall mean Computershare and any successor as Depositary hereunder.
Depositary
"" shall mean the depositary shares, each representing one-four thousandth (1/4000
Depositary Shares
th
) of one share of the Series C Preferred Stock, and evidenced by a Receipt.
"" shall mean an agent appointed by the Depositary pursuant to Section 7.5.
Depositary's Agent
"" shall mean the office of the Depositary at which at any particular time its depositary receipt business shall be administered, which at the date of this Deposit Agreement is located at 480 Washington Blvd., 29
Depositary's Office
th
Floor, Jersey City, NJ 07310.
"" shall mean The Depositary Trust Company.
DTC
"" shall mean with respect to any Global Registered Receipt:
Exchange Event
(1) (A) the Global Receipt Depository which is the Holder of such Global Registered Receipt notifies the Corporation that it is no longer willing or able to properly discharge its responsibilities under any Letter of Representations or that it is no longer eligible or in good standing under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and (B) the Corporation has not appointed a qualified successor Global Receipt Depository within ninety (90) calendar days after the Corporation received such notice, or
(2) the Corporation in its sole discretion notifies the Depositary in writing that the Receipts or portion thereof issued or issuable in the form of one or more Global Registered Receipts shall no longer be represented by such Global Registered Receipt.
"" shall mean, with respect to any Receipt issued hereunder, DTC or such other entity designated as Global Receipt Depository by the Corporation in or pursuant to this Deposit Agreement, which entity must be, to the extent required by any applicable law or regulation, a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Global Receipt Depository
"" shall mean a global registered Receipt registered in the name of a nominee of DTC.
Global Registered Receipt
"" shall mean any applicable agreement among the Corporation, the Depositary and a Global Receipt Depository with respect to such Global Receipt Depository's rights and obligations with respect to any Global Registered Receipt, as the same may be amended, supplemented, restated or otherwise modified from time to time and any successor agreement thereto.
Letter of Representations
"" shall mean any natural person, partnership, joint venture, firm, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, unincorporated association, trust or other entity, and shall include any successor (by merger or otherwise) of the foregoing.
Person
 
"" shall mean one of the depositary receipts issued hereunder, substantially in the form set forth as Exhibit B hereto, whether in definitive or temporary form, and evidencing the number of Depositary Shares with respect to shares of the Series C Preferred Stock held of record by the Record Holder of such Depositary Shares.
Receipt
"" or "" as applied to a Receipt shall mean the Person in whose name such Receipt is registered on the books of the Depositary maintained for such purpose.
Record Holder
Holder
"" shall mean the Depositary or such other successor bank or trust company which shall be appointed by the Corporation to register ownership and transfers of Receipts as herein provided and if a successor Registrar shall be so appointed, references herein to "the books" of or maintained by the Depository shall be deemed, as applicable, to refer as well to the register maintained by such Registrar for such purpose.
Registrar
"" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Securities Act
"" shall mean the shares of the Corporation's Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, $100,000 liquidation preference per share, designated in the Certificate of Designations.
Series C Preferred Stock
"" shall mean the Depositary or such other successor bank or trust company which shall be appointed by the Corporation to transfer the Receipts or the deposited shares of Series C Preferred Stock, as the case may be, as herein provided.
Transfer Agent
Section 2.1. Form and Transfer of Receipts.
The definitive Receipts shall be substantially in the form set forth in Exhibit B attached to this Deposit Agreement, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided (but which do not affect the rights, duties, obligations or immunities of the Depositary as set forth in this Deposit Agreement without the Depositary's consent) and shall be engraved or otherwise prepared so as to comply with applicable rules of the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. Pending the preparation of definitive Receipts, the Depositary, upon the written order of the Corporation, delivered in compliance with Section 2.2, shall be authorized and instructed to, and shall execute and deliver temporary Receipts which may be printed, lithographed, typewritten, mimeographed or otherwise substantially of the tenor of the definitive Receipts in lieu of which they are issued and with such appropriate insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as the Persons executing such Receipts may determine, as evidenced by their execution of such Receipts. If temporary Receipts are issued, the Corporation and the Depositary will cause definitive Receipts to be prepared without unreasonable delay. After the preparation of definitive Receipts, the temporary Receipts shall be exchangeable for definitive Receipts upon surrender of the temporary Receipts at an office described in the penultimate paragraph of Section 2.2, without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for
 
cancellation of any one or more temporary Receipts, the Depositary is hereby authorized and instructed to, and shall execute and deliver in exchange therefor definitive Receipts representing the same number of Depositary Shares as represented by the surrendered temporary Receipt or Receipts registered in the name (and only in the name) of the holder of the temporary Receipt(s); provided that, the Depositary has been provided with all necessary information that it may request in order to execute and deliver such definitive Receipts. Such exchange shall be made at the Corporation's expense and without any charge therefor. Until so exchanged, the temporary Receipts shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Deposit Agreement, and with respect to the Series C Preferred Stock, as definitive Receipts.
Any Receipt to be executed by the Depositary pursuant to this Deposit Agreement shall be executed by the Depositary by the manual or facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of the Depositary. No Receipt shall be entitled to any benefits under this Deposit Agreement or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless it shall have been executed manually or by the facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of the Depositary or, if a Registrar for the Receipts (other than the Depositary) shall have been appointed, by manual or facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of such Registrar. The Depositary shall record on its books each Receipt so signed and delivered as hereinafter provided.
Receipts shall be in denominations of any number of whole Depositary Shares. All Receipts shall be dated the date of their issuance.
Receipts may be endorsed with or have incorporated in the text thereof such legends or recitals or changes not inconsistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, all as may be required by the Depositary and approved by the Corporation or required to comply with any applicable law or any regulation thereunder or with the rules and regulations of any securities exchange upon which the Series C Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts may be listed or to conform with any usage with respect thereto, or to indicate any special limitations or restrictions to which any particular Receipt is subject (but which do not affect the rights, duties, obligations or immunities of the Depositary as set forth in this Deposit Agreement without the Depositary's consent).
Title to Depositary Shares evidenced by a Receipt which is properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer, shall be transferable by delivery of such Receipt with the same effect as if such Receipt were a negotiable instrument; , , that until transfer of any particular Receipt shall be registered on the books of the Depositary as provided in Section 2.3, the Depositary may, notwithstanding any notice to the contrary, treat the Record Holder thereof at such time as the absolute owner thereof for the purpose of determining the Person entitled to distributions of dividends or other distributions or to any notice provided for in this Deposit Agreement and for all other purposes.
provided
however
Section 2.2. Deposit of the Series C Preferred Stock; Execution and Delivery of Receipts in Respect Thereof.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation may from time to time deposit shares of the Series C Preferred Stock under this Deposit Agreement by delivery to the Depositary of a certificate or certificates for such shares of the
 
Series C Preferred Stock to be deposited, properly endorsed or accompanied, if required by the Depositary, by a duly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Depositary, together with (i) all such certifications as may be required by the Depositary pursuant to this Deposit Agreement and (ii) an instruction letter from the Corporation authorizing the Depositary to register such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock in book-entry form, each in form satisfactory to the Depositary, together with all such certifications as may be required by the Depositary in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, and together with a written order of the Corporation directing the Depositary to execute and deliver to, or upon the written order of, the Person or Persons stated in such order a Receipt or Receipts evidencing in the aggregate the number of Depositary Shares representing such deposited shares of the Series C Preferred Stock.
The shares of the Series C Preferred Stock that is deposited shall be held by the Depositary at the Depositary's Office or at such other place or places as the Depositary shall determine. The Depositary shall not lend any shares of the Series C Preferred Stock deposited hereunder.
Upon receipt by the Depositary of a certificate or certificates for shares of the Series C Preferred Stock deposited in accordance with the provisions of this Section 2.2, together with the other documents required as above specified, and upon recordation of the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock on the books of the Corporation (or its duly appointed transfer agent) in the name of the Depositary or its nominee, the Depositary, subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, shall execute and deliver to or upon the order of the Person or Persons named in the written order delivered to the Depositary referred to in the first paragraph of this Section 2.2, a Receipt or Receipts evidencing in the aggregate the number of Depositary Shares representing the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock so deposited and registered in such name or names as may be requested by such Person or Persons. The Depositary shall execute and deliver such Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or such other offices, if any, as the Depositary may designate. Delivery at other offices shall be at the risk and expense of the Person requesting such delivery.
Section 2.3. Registration of Transfer of Receipts.
The Corporation hereby appoints Computershare as the Registrar and Transfer Agent for the Receipts and Computershare hereby accept such appointment, subject to the express terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement (and no implied terms or conditions) and, as such, shall register on its books from time to time transfers of Receipts upon any surrender thereof by the Holder in person or by duly authorized attorney, properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement, including a guarantee of the signature thereon by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Transfer Agent (a ""), together with evidence of the payment of any taxes or charges as may be required by law. Thereupon, the Depositary shall execute a new Receipt or Receipts evidencing the same aggregate number of Depositary Shares as those evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered and deliver such new Receipt or Receipts to or upon the order of the Person entitled thereto. With respect to the appointment of the Depositary as Registrar and Transfer Agent in respect of the Receipts, the Depositary, in its respective capacities under such appointments, shall be entitled to the same
Signature Guarantee
 
rights, indemnities, immunities and benefits as the Depositary hereunder as if explicitly named in each such provision, and shall provide the services listed in Exhibit C hereto, in the performance of its duties in such respective capacities. Any references to the Depositary herein shall, to the extent applicable, mean the Depositary as the Transfer Agent and Registrar.
Section 2.4. Split-ups and Combinations of Receipts; Surrender of Receipts and Withdrawal of the Series C Preferred Stock.
Upon surrender of a Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or at such other offices as it may designate for the purpose of effecting a split-up or combination of such Receipt or Receipts, and the receipt by the Depositary of all other necessary information and documents, and subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall execute a new Receipt or Receipts in the authorized denomination or denominations requested, evidencing the aggregate number of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered, and shall deliver such new Receipt or Receipts to or upon the order of the Holder of the Receipt or Receipts so surrendered.
Any Holder of a Receipt or Receipts may withdraw the number of whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented thereby by surrendering such Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or at such other offices as the Depositary may designate for such withdrawals; provided, however, that a Holder of Receipt or Receipts may not withdraw such whole shares of Series C Preferred Stock (or money and other property, if any, represented thereby) which has previously been called for redemption. After such surrender and upon the receipt of written instructions from the Holder of such Receipt or Receipts, without unreasonable delay (provided the Corporation has provided the Depositary with all necessary documentation), the Depositary shall deliver to such Holder, or to the Person or Persons designated by such Holder as hereinafter provided, the number of whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented by the Receipt or Receipts so surrendered for withdrawal, but Holders of such whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock will not thereafter be entitled to deposit such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock hereunder or to receive a Receipt evidencing Depositary Shares therefor. Delivery of such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and such money and other property being withdrawn may be made by the delivery of such certificates, documents of title and other instruments as the Depositary may deem appropriate, which, if required by the Depositary, shall be properly endorsed or accompanied by proper instruments of transfer. If a Receipt delivered by the Holder to the Depositary in connection with such withdrawal shall evidence a number of Depositary Shares in excess of the number of Depositary Shares representing the number of whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock to be withdrawn, the Depositary shall at the same time, in addition to such number of whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and such money and other property, if any, to be so withdrawn, deliver to such Holder, or subject to Section 2.3 upon his order, a new Receipt evidencing such excess number of Depositary Shares.
In no event will fractional shares of the Series C Preferred Stock (or any cash payment in lieu thereof) be delivered by the Depositary. Delivery of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and money and other property, if any, being withdrawn may be made by the delivery of such certificates, documents of title and other instruments as the Depositary may deem appropriate.
 
If shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the money and other property, if any, being withdrawn are to be delivered to a Person or Persons other than the Record Holder of the related Receipt or Receipts being surrendered for withdrawal of such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock, such Holder shall execute and deliver to the Depositary a written order so directing the Depositary and the Depositary may require that the Receipt or Receipts surrendered by such Holder for withdrawal of such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock be properly endorsed in blank or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer in blank.
Delivery of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the money and other property, if any, represented by Receipts surrendered for withdrawal shall be made by the Depositary at the Depositary's Office, except that, at the request, risk and expense of the Holder surrendering such Receipt or Receipts and for the account of the Holder thereof, such delivery may be made at such other place as may be designated by such Holder.
Section 2.5. Limitations on Execution and Delivery, Transfer, Surrender and Exchange of Receipts.
As a condition precedent to the execution and delivery, registration of transfer, split-up, combination, surrender or exchange of any Receipt, the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents or the Corporation may require (i) payment to it of a sum sufficient for the payment (or, in the event that the Depositary or the Corporation shall have made such payment, the reimbursement to it) of any charges, taxes or expenses payable by the Holder of a Receipt pursuant to Section 5.7 (including any such tax or charge with respect to the shares of Series C Preferred Stock being deposited or withdrawn or any charges or expense pursuant to Section 3.2), (ii) the production of evidence satisfactory to it as to the identity and genuineness of any signature (which evidence may include a Signature Guarantee), and (iii) any other reasonable evidence of authority that may be required by the Depositary, and may also require compliance with such regulations, if any, as the Depositary or the Corporation may establish consistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement and/or applicable law.
The deposit of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock may be refused, the delivery of Receipts against shares of the Series C Preferred Stock may be suspended, the registration of transfer of Receipts may be refused and the registration of transfer, surrender or exchange of outstanding Receipts may be suspended (i) during any period when the register of stockholders of the Corporation is closed or (ii) if any such action is deemed necessary or advisable by the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents or the Corporation at any time or from time to time because of any requirement of law or of any government or governmental body or commission or under any provision of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 2.6. Lost Receipts, etc.
In case any Receipt shall be mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen, the Depositary in its discretion may execute and deliver a Receipt of like form and tenor in exchange and substitution for such mutilated Receipt, or in lieu of and in substitution for such destroyed, lost or stolen Receipt, only upon (i) the filing by the Holder thereof with the Depositary of evidence satisfactory to the Depositary of such destruction or loss or theft of such Receipt, of the authenticity thereof and of his or her ownership thereof; and (ii) the Holder thereof furnishing of
 
the Depositary with indemnification satisfactory to the Depositary. Such Holder shall also comply with such other reasonable regulations and pay such other reasonable charges as the Depositary may prescribe and as required by Section 8-405 of the Uniform Commercial Code in effect in the State of New York.
Section 2.7. Cancellation and Destruction of Surrendered Receipts.
All Receipts surrendered to the Depositary or any Depositary's Agent shall be cancelled by the Depositary. Except as prohibited by applicable law or regulation, the Depositary is authorized and directed to destroy all Receipts so cancelled.
Section 2.8. Redemption of the Series C Preferred Stock.
Whenever the Corporation shall be permitted and shall elect to redeem shares of the Series C Preferred Stock in accordance with the terms of the Certificate of Designations, it shall (unless otherwise agreed to in writing with the Depositary) give or cause to be given to the Depositary, not less than thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days prior to the Redemption Date (as defined below), notice of the date of such proposed redemption of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and of the number of such shares held by the Depositary to be so redeemed and the applicable redemption price, which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from the Corporation stating that such redemption of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock is in accordance with the provisions of the Certificate of Designations. On the date of such redemption, that the Corporation shall then have paid or caused to be paid in full to the Depositary the redemption price of $100,000 per share of the Series C Preferred Stock to be redeemed, plus an amount equal to any declared and unpaid dividends thereon to the date fixed for redemption to be redeemed, in accordance with the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, the Depositary shall redeem the number of Depositary Shares representing such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock. The Depositary shall, if requested in writing and provided with all necessary information, mail the notice of the Corporation's redemption of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the proposed simultaneous redemption of the number of Depositary Shares representing such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock to be redeemed by first-class mail, postage prepaid, at the respective last addresses as they appear on the records of the Depositary, or transmit by such other method approved by the Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, in either case not less than thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days prior to the date fixed for redemption of such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares (the ""), to the Record Holders of the Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares to be so redeemed at the addresses of such Holders as they appear on the records of the Depositary; but neither failure to mail or transmit any such notice of redemption of Depositary Shares to one or more such Holders nor any defect in any notice of redemption of Depositary Shares to one or more such Holders shall affect the sufficiency of the proceedings for redemption as to the other Holders. Each such notice shall be prepared by the Corporation and shall state: (i) the Redemption Date; (ii) the number of Depositary Shares to be redeemed and, if less than all the Depositary Shares held by any such Holder are to be redeemed, the number of such Depositary Shares held by such Holder to be so redeemed; (iii) the redemption price; (iv) the place or places where Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price; and (v) that dividends in respect of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Shares to be redeemed will cease to accrue on such
provided
Redemption Date
 
Redemption Date. In case less than all the outstanding Depositary Shares are to be redeemed, the Depositary Shares to be so redeemed shall be selected either pro rata or by lot or in such other manner as the Corporation may determine to be fair and equitable (which determination the Corporation will promptly notify the Depositary in writing).
Notice having been mailed or transmitted by the Depositary as aforesaid, from and after the Redemption Date (unless the Corporation shall have failed to provide the funds necessary to redeem shares of the Series C Preferred Stock evidenced by the Depositary Shares called for redemption) (i) all dividends on the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock so called for Redemption shall cease to accrue from and after such date; (ii) the Depositary Shares being redeemed from such proceeds shall be deemed no longer to be outstanding; (iii) all rights of the Holders of Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares (except the right to receive the redemption price) shall, to the extent of such Depositary Shares, cease and terminate; and (iv) upon surrender in accordance with such redemption notice of the Receipts evidencing any such Depositary Shares called for redemption (properly endorsed or assigned for transfer, if the Depositary or applicable law shall so require), such Depositary Shares shall be redeemed by the Depositary at a redemption price per Depositary Share equal to one-four thousandth (1/4000
th
) of the redemption price per share of the Series C Preferred Stock so redeemed plus all money and other property, if any, represented by such Depositary Shares, including all amounts paid by the Corporation in respect of dividends which on the Redemption Date have been declared on the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock to be so redeemed and have not therefore been paid.
If fewer than all of the Depositary Shares evidenced by a Receipt are called for redemption, the Depositary will deliver to the Holder of such Receipt upon its surrender to the Depositary, together with the redemption payment, a new Receipt evidencing the Depositary Shares evidenced by such prior Receipt and not called for redemption.
Section 2.9. Receipts Issuable in Global Registered Form.
If the Corporation shall determine in a writing delivered to the Depositary that the Receipts are to be issued in whole or in part in the form of one or more Global Registered Receipts, then the Depositary shall, if instructed and provided with all necessary information, in accordance with the other provisions of this Deposit Agreement, execute and deliver one or more Global Registered Receipts evidencing the Receipts of such Series, which (i) shall represent, and shall be denominated in an amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of, the Receipts to be represented by such Global Registered Receipt or Receipts and (ii) shall be registered in the name of the Global Receipt Depository therefor or its nominee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Deposit Agreement to the contrary, unless otherwise provided in the Global Registered Receipt, a Global Registered Receipt may only be transferred in whole and only by the applicable Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt to a nominee of such Global Receipt Depository, or by a nominee of such Global Receipt Depository to such Global Receipt Depository or another nominee of such Global Receipt Depository, or by such Global Receipt Depository or any such nominee to a successor Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt selected or approved by the Corporation or to a nominee of such successor Global Receipt Depository. Except as provided below, owners solely of beneficial interests in a Global Registered Receipt shall not be
 
entitled to receive physical delivery of the Receipts represented by such Global Registered Receipt. Neither any such beneficial owner nor any direct or indirect participant of a Global Receipt Depository shall have any rights under this Deposit Agreement with respect to any Global Registered Receipt held on their behalf by a Global Receipt Depository and such Global Receipt Depository may be treated by the Corporation, the Depositary and any director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation or the Depositary as the Holder of such Global Registered Receipt for all purposes whatsoever. Unless and until definitive Receipts are delivered to the owners of the beneficial interests in a Global Registered Receipt, (1) the applicable Global Receipt Depository will make bookentry transfers among its participants and receive and transmit all payments and distributions in respect of the Global Registered Receipts to such participants, in each case, in accordance with its applicable procedures and arrangements, and (2) whenever any notice, payment or other communication to the holders of Global Registered Receipts is required under this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation and the Depositary shall give all such notices, payments and communications specified herein to be given to such holders to the applicable Global Receipt Depository.
If an Exchange Event has occurred with respect to any Global Registered Receipt, then, in any such event, the Depositary shall, upon receipt of a written order from the Corporation authorizing and directing the Depositary to execute and deliver the individual definitive registered Receipts in exchange for such Global Registered Receipt, execute and deliver, individual definitive registered Receipts, in authorized denominations and of like tenor and terms in an aggregate principal amount equal to the principal amount of the Global Registered Receipt in exchange for such Global Registered Receipt. The Depositary shall have no duties, obligations or liability under this paragraph unless and until such written order have been received by the Depositary.
Definitive registered Receipts issued in exchange for a Global Registered Receipt pursuant to this Section shall be registered in such names and in such authorized denominations as the Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt, pursuant to instructions from its participants, shall instruct the Depositary in writing. The Depositary shall deliver such Receipts to the Persons in whose names such Receipts are so registered.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Deposit Agreement, should the Corporation determine that the Receipts should be issued as a Global Registered Receipt, the parties hereto shall comply with the terms of each Letter of Representations.
Section 3.1. Filing Proofs, Certificates and Other Information.
Any Holder of a Receipt may be required from time to time to file such proof of residence, or other matters or other information, to execute such certificates and to make such representations and warranties as the Depositary or the Corporation may reasonably deem necessary or proper. The Depositary or the Corporation may withhold the delivery, or delay the registration of transfer or redemption, of any Receipt or the withdrawal of shares of the Series C
 
Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares and evidenced by a Receipt or the distribution of any dividend or other distribution or the sale of any rights or of the proceeds thereof until such proof or other information is filed or such certificates are executed or such representations and warranties are made.
Section 3.2. Payment of Taxes or Other Governmental Charges.
Holders of Receipts shall be obligated to make payments to the Depositary of certain charges and expenses, as provided in Section 5.7. Registration of transfer of any Receipt or any withdrawal of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and all money or other property, if any, represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt may be refused until any such payment due is made, and any dividends, interest payments or other distributions may be withheld or any part of or all shares of the Series C Preferred Stock or other property represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt and not theretofore sold may be sold for the account of the Holder thereof (after attempting by reasonable means to notify such Holder prior to such sale), and such dividends, interest payments or other distributions or the proceeds of any such sale may be applied to any payment of such charges or expenses, the Holder of such Receipt remaining liable for any deficiency.
Section 3.3. Warranty as to the Series C Preferred Stock.
The Corporation hereby represents and warrants that shares of the Series C Preferred Stock, when issued, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. Such representation and warranty shall survive the deposit of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the issuance of the related Receipts.
Section 3.4. Warranty as to Receipts.
The Corporation hereby represents and warrants that the Receipts, when issued, will represent legal and valid interests in shares of the Series C Preferred Stock. Such representation and warranty shall survive the deposit of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the issuance of the Receipts.
Section 4.1. Cash Distributions.
Whenever the Depositary shall receive any cash dividend or other cash distribution on the Series C Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2 and, if received, in accordance with written instructions from the Corporation, distribute to Record Holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 such amounts of such dividend or distribution as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts held by such Holders; , , that in case the Corporation or the Depositary shall be required to withhold and shall withhold from any cash dividend or other cash distribution in respect of the Series C Preferred Stock an amount on account of taxes, the amount made available for distribution or distributed in respect of Depositary Shares shall be reduced accordingly. The Depositary shall distribute or
provided
however
 
make available for distribution, as the case may be and, if received, in accordance with the Corporation's written instructions, only such amount, however, as can be distributed without attributing to any Holder of Receipts a fraction of one cent, and any balance not so distributable shall be held by the Depositary (without liability for interest thereon) and shall be added to and be treated as part of the next sum received by the Depositary for distribution to Record Holders of Receipts then outstanding. Each Holder of a Receipt shall provide the Depositary with its certified tax identification number on a properly completed Form W-8 or W-9, as may be applicable. Each Holder of a Receipt acknowledges that, in the event of non-compliance with the preceding sentence, the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may require withholding by the Depositary of a portion of any of the distributions to be made to such Holder hereunder.
The Corporation acknowledges that the bank accounts maintained by the Depositary in connection with the services provided under this Deposit Agreement will be in the Depositary's name and that the Depositary may receive investment earnings in connection with the investment at the Depositary's risk and for its benefit of funds held in those accounts from time to time. Neither the Corporation nor the record holders will receive interest on any deposits or funds held by the Depositary hereunder.
Section 4.2. Distributions Other than Cash, Rights, Preferences or Privileges.
Whenever the Depositary shall receive any distribution other than cash, rights, preferences or privileges upon the Series C Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, distribute to Record Holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 such amounts of the securities or property received by it as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipts held by such Holders, in any manner that the Depositary may deem equitable and practicable for accomplishing such distribution. If in the opinion of the Depositary such distribution cannot be made proportionately among such Record Holders, or if for any other reason (including any requirement that the Corporation or the Depositary withhold an amount on account of taxes or charges) the Depositary deems, after consultation with the Corporation, such distribution not to be feasible, the Depositary may, with the approval of the Corporation, adopt such method as it deems equitable and practicable for the purpose of effecting such distribution, including the sale (at public or private sale) of the securities or property thus received, or any part thereof, in a commercially reasonable manner. The net proceeds of any such sale shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, be distributed or made available for distribution, as the case may be, by the Depositary to Record Holders of Receipts as provided by Section 4.1 in the case of a distribution received in cash. The Corporation shall not make any distribution of such securities or property to the Depositary and the Depositary shall not make any distribution of such securities or property to the Holders of Receipts unless the Corporation shall have provided an opinion of counsel stating that such securities or property have been registered under the Securities Act or do not need to be registered in connection with such distributions.
Section 4.3. Subscription Rights, Preferences or Privileges.
If the Corporation shall at any time offer or cause to be offered to the Persons in whose names shares of the Series C Preferred Stock is recorded on the books of the Corporation any rights, preferences or privileges to subscribe for or to purchase any securities or any rights,
 
preferences or privileges of any other nature, such rights, preferences or privileges shall in each such instance be communicated to the Depositary and made available by the Depositary to the Record Holders of Receipts in such manner as the Corporation shall direct and the Depositary shall agree, either by the issue to such Record Holders of warrants representing such rights, preferences or privileges or by such other method as may be approved by the Corporation in its discretion with the acknowledgement of the Depositary; , , that (i) if at the time of issue or offer of any such rights, preferences or privileges the Corporation determines that it is not lawful or (after consultation with the Depositary) not feasible to make such rights, preferences or privileges available to Holders of Receipts by the issue of warrants or otherwise, or (ii) if and to the extent so instructed by Holders of Receipts who do not desire to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges, then the Corporation, in its discretion (with acknowledgement of the Depositary, in any case where the Corporation has determined that it is not feasible to make such rights, preferences or privileges available), may, if applicable laws or the terms of such rights, preferences or privileges permit such transfer, sell such rights, preferences or privileges at public or private sale, at such place or places and upon such terms as it may deem proper. The net proceeds of any such sale shall be delivered to the Depositary and, if received, in accordance with the written instructions of the Corporation and, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, be distributed by the Depositary to the Record Holders of Receipts entitled thereto as provided by Section 4.1 in the case of a distribution received in cash.
provided
however
The Corporation shall notify the Depositary whether registration under the Securities Act of the securities to which any rights, preferences or privileges relate is required in order for Holders of Receipts to be offered or sold the securities to which such rights, preferences or privileges relate, and the Corporation agrees with the Depositary that it will file promptly a registration statement pursuant to the Securities Act with respect to such rights, preferences or privileges and securities and use its best efforts and take all steps available to it to cause such registration statement to become effective sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such Holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges. In no event shall the Depositary make available to the Holders of Receipts any right, preference or privilege to subscribe for or to purchase any securities unless and until such registration statement shall have become effective, or the Corporation shall have provided to the Depositary an opinion of counsel to the effect that the offering and sale of such securities to the Holders are exempt from registration under the provisions of the Securities Act.
The Corporation shall notify the Depositary whether any other action under the laws of any jurisdiction or any governmental or administrative authorization, consent or permit is required in order for such rights, preferences or privileges to be made available to Holders of Receipts, and the Corporation agrees with the Depositary that the Corporation will use its reasonable best efforts to take such action or obtain such authorization, consent or permit sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such Holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges.
 
Section 4.4. Notice of Dividends, etc.; Fixing Record Date for Holders of Receipts.
Whenever any cash dividend or other cash distribution shall become payable or any distribution other than cash shall be made, or if rights, preferences or privileges shall at any time be offered, with respect to the Series C Preferred Stock, or whenever the Depositary shall receive notice of any meeting at which holders of the Series C Preferred Stock are entitled to vote or of which holders of the Series C Preferred Stock are entitled to notice, or whenever the Depositary and the Corporation shall decide it is appropriate, the Depositary shall in each such instance fix a record date (which shall be the same date as the record date fixed by the Corporation with respect to or otherwise in accordance with the terms of the Series C Preferred Stock) for the determination of the Holders of Receipts who shall be entitled to receive such dividend, distribution, rights, preferences or privileges or the net proceeds of the sale thereof, or to give instructions for the exercise of voting rights at any such meeting, or who shall be entitled to notice of such meeting or for any other appropriate reasons.
Section 4.5. Voting Rights.
Subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, upon receipt of notice from the Corporation of any meeting at which the holders of the Series C Preferred Stock are entitled to vote, the Depositary shall, if requested in writing and provided with all necessary information and documents, as soon as practicable thereafter, mail or transmit by such other method approved by the Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, to the Record Holders of Receipts, as determined on the record date set forth in Section 4.4, a notice prepared by the Corporation which shall contain (i) such information as is contained in such notice of meeting, (ii) a statement that the Holders of Receipts at the close of business on a specified record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 may, subject to any applicable restrictions, instruct the Depositary as to the exercise of the voting rights pertaining to the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by their respective Depositary Shares (including an express indication that instructions may be given to the Depositary to give a discretionary proxy to a Person designated by the Corporation), and (iii) a brief statement as to the manner in which such instructions may be given. Upon the written request of the Holders of Receipts on the relevant record date, the Depositary shall endeavor insofar as practicable to vote or cause to be voted, in accordance with the instructions set forth in such requests, the maximum number of whole shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by all Receipts as to which any particular voting instructions are received. The Corporation hereby agrees to take all reasonable action which may be deemed necessary by the Depositary in order to enable the Depositary to vote such shares of the Series C Preferred Stock or cause such shares to be voted. In the absence of specific instructions from Holders of Receipts, the Depositary will not vote (but, at its discretion, may appear at any meeting with respect to the Series C Preferred Stock unless directed to the contrary by the Holders of all the Receipts) to the extent of the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipts. The Depositary shall not be required to exercise discretion in voting any Series C Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt.
Section 4.6. Changes Affecting Deposited Securities and Reclassifications, Recapitalizations, etc.
Upon any change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or any other reclassification of the Series C Preferred Stock, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, or upon any recapitalization, reorganization, merger or consolidation affecting the Corporation or to which it is a party, the Depositary shall, upon the written instructions of the
 
Corporation setting forth any adjustment, (i) make such adjustments as are certified by the Corporation in (a) the fraction of an interest represented by one Depositary Share in one share of the Series C Preferred Stock and (b) the ratio of the redemption price per Depositary Share to the redemption price per share of the Series C Preferred Stock, in each case as stated in such instructions and (ii) treat any securities or property (including cash) which shall be received by the Depositary in exchange for or upon conversion of or in respect of the Series C Preferred Stock as new deposited property so received in exchange for or upon conversion or in respect of such Series C Preferred Stock. In any such case, the Depositary shall, upon receipt of written instructions of the Corporation, execute and deliver additional Receipts or may call for the surrender of all outstanding Receipts to be exchanged for new Receipts specifically describing such new deposited property. Anything to the contrary herein notwithstanding, Holders of Receipts shall have the right from and after the effective date of any such change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or other reclassification of the Series C Preferred Stock or any such recapitalization, reorganization, merger or consolidation to surrender such Receipts to the Depositary with instructions to convert, exchange or surrender the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented thereby only into or for, as the case may be, the kind and amount of shares and other securities and property and cash into which the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by such Receipts might have been converted or for which such shares might have been exchanged or surrendered immediately prior to the effective date of such transaction.
Section 4.7. Delivery of Reports.
The Depositary shall make available for inspection by Holders of Receipts at the Depositary's Office and at such other places as it may from time to time deem advisable during normal business hours any reports and communications received from the Corporation that are both received by the Depositary as the holder of the Deposited Shares and which the Corporation is required to furnish to the holders of the Series C Preferred Stock. In addition, the Depositary shall transmit, upon written request by the Corporation, certain notices and reports to the Holders of Receipts as provided in Section 5.5.
Section 4.8. Lists of Receipt Holders.
Promptly upon request from time to time by the Corporation, the Registrar shall furnish to it a list, as of the most recent practicable date, of the names, addresses and holdings of Depositary Shares of all registered Holders of Receipts.
Section 4.9. Withholding.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Deposit Agreement, in the event that the Depositary determines that any distribution in property is subject to any tax or other charge that the Depositary is obligated by law to withhold, the Depositary may dispose of, by public or private sale, all or a portion of such property in such amounts and in such manner as the Depositary deems necessary and practicable to pay such taxes or charges, and the Depositary shall distribute the net proceeds of any such sale or the balance of any such property after deduction of such taxes or charges to the Holders of Receipts entitled thereto in proportion to the number of Depositary Shares held by them, respectively; provided, however, that in the event the Depositary determines that such distribution of property is subject to withholding tax only with
 
respect to some but not all Holders of Receipts, the Depositary will use its best efforts (i) to sell only that portion of such property distributable to such holders that is required to generate sufficient proceeds to pay such withholding tax and (ii) to effect any such sale in such a manner so as to avoid affecting the rights of any other Holders of Receipts to receive such distribution in property.
Section 5.1. Maintenance of Offices, Agencies and Transfer Books by the Depositary; Registrar.
Upon execution of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall maintain at the Depositary's Office, facilities for the execution and delivery, registration and registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of Receipts, and at the offices of the Depositary's Agents, if any, facilities for the delivery, registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of Receipts, all in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement.
The Depositary shall keep books at the Depositary's Office for the registration and registration of transfer of Receipts. Upon direction by the Corporation and with reasonable notice to the Depositary, the Registrar shall open its books for inspection by the Record Holders of Receipts as directed by the Corporation; that any record Holder shall be granted such right by the Corporation only after certifying that such inspection shall be for a proper purpose reasonably related to such Person's interest as an owner of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts.
provided
The Depositary or Registrar may close such books, at any time or from time to time, when deemed necessary or advisable by the Depositary, the Registrar, any Depositary's Agent or the Corporation because of any requirement of law or of any government, governmental body or commission, stock exchange or any applicable self-regulatory body.
If the Receipts or the Depositary Shares evidenced thereby or the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Shares shall be listed on one or more national securities exchanges, the Depositary may, with the written approval of the Corporation, appoint a Registrar (acceptable to the Corporation) for registration of the Receipts or Depositary Shares in accordance with any requirements of such exchange. Such Registrar (which may be the Depositary if so permitted by the requirements of any such exchange) may be removed and a substitute Registrar appointed by the Depositary upon the written request or with the written approval of the Corporation. If the Receipts, such Depositary Shares or the Series C Preferred Stock are listed on one or more other securities exchanges, the Depositary will, at the written request and expense of the Corporation, arrange such facilities for the delivery, registration, registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of such Receipts, such Depositary Shares or the Series C Preferred Stock as may be required by law or applicable securities exchange regulation.
 
Section 5.2. Prevention of or Delay in Performance by the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar or the Corporation.
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall incur any liability to any Holder of Receipt if by reason of any provision of any present or future law, or regulation thereunder, of the United States of America or of any other governmental authority or, in the case of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent or the Registrar, as the case may be, by reason of any provision, present or future, of the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including the Certificate of Designations) or by reason of any act of God or war or other circumstance beyond the control of the relevant party, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be prevented or forbidden from, or subjected to any penalty on account of, doing or performing any act or thing which the terms of this Deposit Agreement provide shall be done or performed; nor shall the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Corporation, as the case may be, incur liability to any Holder of a Receipt (i) by reason of any nonperformance or delay, caused as aforesaid, in the performance of any act or thing which the terms of this Deposit Agreement shall provide shall or may be done or performed, or (ii) by reason of any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any discretion provided for in this Deposit Agreement except as otherwise explicitly set forth in this Deposit Agreement.
Section 5.3. Obligations of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar, Transfer Agent and the Corporation.
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar, any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, assumes any obligation or shall be subject to any liability under this Deposit Agreement to Holders of Receipts or to any other Person other than for its gross negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation). Notwithstanding anything in this Deposit Agreement to the contrary, neither the Depositary, nor the Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be liable in any event for special, punitive, incidental, indirect or consequential losses or damages of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if they have been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action. Any liability of Depositary, any Depositary's Agent or the Registrar or Transfer Agent, as the case may be, under this Deposit Agreement will be limited in the aggregate to an amount equal to the annual fees paid by the Corporation to such Person, but not including reimbursable expenses; provided, however, that in the event that such liability arises as a result of misappropriation of funds by the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents (except for such Depositary's Agents which are not employees of the Depositary), any Registrar or any Transfer Agent, as the case may be, through fraud or willful misconduct on the part of such Person (as determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation), such limit shall not apply and such liability hereunder shall be instead limited to the amount of such misappropriated funds or the liability resulting from such fraud or willful misconduct. Solely with respect to those matters covered by Section 7.12(l), Section 7.12(l) shall prevail over anything to the contrary stated in this paragraph.
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be under any obligation to appear in, prosecute or defend any action, suit or other proceeding in respect of the Series C Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts which in its opinion may involve it in expense or liability unless indemnity satisfactory to it against all expense and liability be furnished as often as may be required.
 
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be liable for any action or any failure to act by it in reliance upon the written advice of legal counsel or accountants, or information from any Person presenting the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock for deposit, any Holder of a Receipt or any other Person believed by it to be competent to give such information. The Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar, any Transfer Agent and the Corporation, as the case may be, may each rely and shall each be protected in acting upon or omitting to act upon any written notice, request, direction or other document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or parties.
The Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, shall not be responsible for any failure to carry out any instruction to vote any of the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock or for the manner or effect of any such vote made, as long as any such action or non-action is not taken in bad faith, fraud, willful misconduct or gross negligence (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation). The Depositary undertakes, and any Depositary's Agent, Registrar and any Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall be required to undertake, to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Deposit Agreement, and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Deposit Agreement against the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, Registrar or any Transfer Agent.
The Depositary, its parent, Affiliate, or subsidiaries, any Depositary's Agents, and any Transfer Agent and any Registrar, as the case may be, may own and deal in any class of securities of the Corporation and its Affiliates and in Receipts or Depositary Shares or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Corporation or its Affiliates may be interested or contract with or lend money to or otherwise act as fully or as freely as if it were not the Depositary, the parent, Affiliate or subsidiary of the Depositary or the Depositary's Agent or Transfer Agent or Registrar hereunder. The Depositary may also act as transfer agent, trustee or registrar of any of the securities of the Corporation and its Affiliates or act in any other capacity for the Corporation or its Affiliates.
The Depositary shall not be under any liability for interest on any monies at any time received by it pursuant to any of the provisions of this Deposit Agreement or of the Receipts, the Depositary Shares or the Series C Preferred Stock nor shall it be obligated to segregate such monies from other monies held by it, except as required by law. The Depositary shall not be responsible for advancing funds on behalf of the Corporation and shall have no duty or obligation to make any payments if it has not timely received sufficient funds to make timely payments.
In the event the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, believes any ambiguity or uncertainty exists hereunder or in any notice, instruction, direction, request or other communication, paper or document received by the
 
Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar hereunder, or in the administration of any of the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall deem it necessary or desirable that a matter be proved or established prior to taking, omitting or suffering to take any action hereunder, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar may, in its sole discretion upon providing written notice to the Corporation, refrain from taking any action and the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall be fully protected and shall not be liable in any way to the Corporation, any Holders of Receipts or any other Person or entity for refraining from taking such action, unless the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar receives written instructions or a certificate of the Corporation which eliminates such ambiguity or uncertainty to the satisfaction of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar or which proves or establishes the applicable matter to the satisfaction of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar. Such written instructions shall be full and complete authorization to the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, and the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it under the provisions of this Deposit Agreement in reliance upon such written instructions.
In the event the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall receive conflicting claims, requests or instructions from any Holders of Receipts, on the one hand, and the Corporation, on the other hand, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall be entitled to act on such claims, requests or instructions received from the Corporation, and shall incur no liability and shall be entitled to the full indemnification set forth in Section 5.6 hereof in connection with any action so taken.
It is intended that the Depositary shall not be deemed to be an "issuer" of the securities under the federal securities laws or applicable state securities laws, it being expressly understood and agreed that the Depositary is acting only in a ministerial capacity as Depositary for the deposited Series C Preferred Stock. The Depositary will not be under any duty or responsibility to ensure compliance with any applicable federal or state securities laws in connection with the issuance, transfer or exchange of the Receipts, the shares of Series C Preferred Stock or Depositary Shares.
Neither the Depositary (or its officers, directors, employees or agents), any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar or any Transfer Agent makes any representation or has any responsibility as to the validity of any registration statement pursuant to which the Depositary Shares may be registered under the Securities Act, the deposited Preferred Shares, the Depositary Shares, the Receipts (except its countersignature thereon) or any instruments referred to therein or herein, or as to the correctness of any statement made in any such registration statement or herein.
The Depositary assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the description that appears in the Receipts. Notwithstanding any other provision herein or in the Receipts, the Depositary makes no warranties or representations as to the validity or genuineness of any shares of Series C Preferred Stock at any time deposited with the Depositary hereunder or of the
 
Depositary Shares, as to the validity or sufficiency of this Deposit Agreement, as to the value of the Depositary Shares or as to any right, title or interest of the record holders of Receipts in and to the Depositary Shares. The Depositary shall not be accountable for the use or application by the Corporation of the Depositary Shares or the Receipts or the proceeds thereof.
The Depositary, Depositary's Agent, any Registrar, and any Transfer Agent hereunder:
(i) shall have no duties or obligations other than those specifically set forth herein (and no implied duties or obligations), or as may subsequently be agreed to in writing by the parties;
(ii) shall have no obligation to make payment hereunder unless the Corporation shall have provided the necessary federal or other immediately available funds or securities or property, as the case may be, to pay in full amounts due and payable with respect thereto;
(iii) shall not be obligated to prosecute or defend any litigation or other proceeding hereunder; if, however, the Depositary determines to prosecute or defend any litigation or other proceeding hereunder, and, where the taking of such action might in the Depositary's judgment subject or expose it to any expense or liability, the Depositary shall not be required to act unless it shall have been furnished with an indemnity satisfactory to it;
(iv) may rely on and shall be authorized and protected in acting or failing to act upon any certificate, instrument, opinion, notice, letter, telegram, telex, facsimile transmission or other document or security delivered to the Depositary and believed by the Depositary to be genuine and to have been signed by the proper party or parties, and shall have no responsibility for determining the accuracy thereof;
(v) may rely on and shall be authorized and protected in acting or failing to act upon the written, telephonic, electronic and oral instructions, with respect to any matter relating to the Depositary's actions as Depositary covered by this Deposit Agreement (or supplementing or qualifying any such actions) of officers of the Corporation;
(vi) may consult counsel satisfactory to it, and the written advice of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by the Depositary hereunder in accordance with the advice of such counsel;
(vii) except as specifically set forth herein, shall not be called upon at any time to advise any Person with respect to the shares of Series C Preferred Stock or Receipts;
(viii) shall not be liable in any respect on account of the identity, authority or rights of the parties (other than with respect to the Depositary) executing or delivering or purporting to execute or deliver this Deposit Agreement or any documents or papers deposited or called for under this Deposit Agreement; and
 
(ix) shall not be liable for any failures, delays or losses, arising directly or indirectly out of conditions beyond their reasonable control, including, but not limited to, (i) work stoppages or labor disputes, electrical or mechanical failure or computer hardware or software failure, in each case other than of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, or (ii) acts of government, exchange or market ruling, suspension of trading, civil disobedience, riots, rebellions, communications facilities failures including telephone failure, war, terrorism, insurrection, fires, earthquakes, storms, floods, acts of God or similar occurrences.
The obligations of the Corporation set forth in this Section 5.3 shall survive the replacement, removal or resignation of the Depositary, Registrar, Transfer Agent or Depositary's Agent or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 5.4. Resignation and Removal of the Depositary; Appointment of Successor Depositary.
The Depositary may at any time resign as Depositary hereunder by delivering notice of its election to do so to the Corporation, such resignation to take effect upon the appointment of a successor Depositary and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
The Depositary may at any time be removed by the Corporation by notice of such removal delivered to the Depositary, such removal to take effect upon the appointment of a successor Depositary hereunder and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
In case at any time the Depositary acting hereunder shall resign or be removed, the Corporation shall, within sixty (60) days after the delivery of the notice of resignation or removal, as the case may be, appoint a successor Depositary, which shall be (i) a Person having its principal office in the United States of America and having a combined capital and surplus, along with its Affiliates, of at least $50,000,000 or (ii) an Affiliate of any such Person. In the event of such removal or resignation, the Corporation will appoint a successor depositary and inform the Depositary of the name and address of any successor depositary so appointed, provided that no failure by the Corporation to appoint such a successor depositary shall affect the termination of this Deposit Agreement or the discharge of the Corporation and the Depositary as depositary hereunder. Upon payment of all outstanding fees and expenses hereunder, the Depositary shall promptly forward to the successor depositary or its designee any shares of stock held by it and any certificates, letters, notices and other document that the Depositary may receive after its appointment has so terminated.
If no successor Depositary shall have been so appointed and have accepted appointment within sixty (60) days after delivery of such notice, the resigning or removed Depositary may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Depositary. Every successor Depositary shall execute and deliver to its predecessor and to the Corporation an instrument in writing accepting its appointment hereunder, and thereupon such successor Depositary, without any further act or deed, shall become fully vested with all the rights, powers, duties and obligations of its predecessor and for all purposes shall be the Depositary under this Deposit Agreement, and such predecessor, upon payment of all sums due it
 
and on the written request of the Corporation, shall promptly execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor all rights and powers of such predecessor hereunder, shall duly assign, transfer and deliver all right, title and interest in the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and any moneys or property held hereunder to such successor, and shall deliver to such successor a list of the Record Holders of all outstanding Receipts and such records, books and other information in its possession relating thereto. Any successor Depositary shall promptly mail or transmit by such other method approved by such successor Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, notice of its appointment to the Record Holders of Receipts.
Any Person into or with which the Depositary may be merged, consolidated or converted, or any Person to which all or a substantial part of the assets of the Depositary may be transferred or which succeeds to the shareholder services business of the Depositary shall be the successor of the Depositary without the execution or filing of any document or any further act, and notice thereof shall not be required hereunder. Such successor Depositary may authenticate the Receipts in the name of the predecessor Depositary or its own name as successor Depositary.
The removal or resignation of the Depositary shall automatically be deemed to be a removal of the Depositary as Registrar and Transfer Agent herein without any further act or deed.
Section 5.5. Corporate Notices and Reports.
The Corporation agrees that it will deliver to the Depositary, and the Depositary will, promptly after receipt of all necessary information and documents, transmit to the Record Holders of Receipts, in each case at the addresses recorded in the Depositary's or Registrar's books, copies of all notices and reports (including without limitation financial statements) required by law, by the rules of any national securities exchange upon which the Series C Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts are listed or by the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including the Certificate of Designations), to be furnished to the Record Holders of Receipts. Such transmission will be at the Corporation's expense and the Corporation will provide the Depositary with such number of copies of such documents as the Depositary may reasonably request. In addition, the Depositary will transmit to the Record Holders of Receipts at the Corporation's expense such other documents as may be requested in writing by the Corporation.
Section 5.6. Indemnification by the Corporation.
Notwithstanding Section 5.3 to the contrary, the Corporation shall indemnify the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar and any Transfer Agent (including each of their officers, directors, agents and employees) against, and hold each of them harmless from and against, any fee, loss, damage, cost, penalty, fine, judgment, liability or expense (including the reasonable costs and expenses of its legal counsel) which may arise out of acts performed, taken or omitted to be taken in connection with its acting as Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Registrar or Transfer Agent, respectively, under this Deposit Agreement (including, without limitation, the enforcement by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Registrar or Transfer Agent, as the case may be, of this Deposit Agreement) and the Receipts by the Depositary, any Registrar or any of their respective agents (including any Depositary's Agent) and any transactions or documents
 
contemplated hereby, except for any liability arising out of negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation) on the respective parts of any such Person or Persons. The obligations of the Corporation set forth in this Section 5.6 shall survive any succession of any Depositary, Registrar, Transfer Agent or Depositary's Agent or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 5.7. Fees, Charges and Expenses.
The Corporation agrees promptly to pay the Depositary the compensation, as set forth in Exhibit D hereto or, if thereafter separately agreed upon with the Corporation, in accordance with such subsequent agreed upon terms, for all services rendered by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Transfer Agent and Registrar hereunder and to reimburse the Depositary for its reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable counsel fees and expenses) incurred by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Transfer Agent and Registrar without gross negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud on its part (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation) in connection with the services rendered by it (or any agent of the Depositary) hereunder. The Corporation shall pay all charges of the Depositary in connection with the initial deposit of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and the initial issuance of the Depositary Shares, all withdrawals of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock by owners of Depositary Shares, and any redemption or exchange of shares of the Series C Preferred Stock at the option of the Corporation. The Corporation shall pay all transfer and other taxes and charges arising solely from the existence of the depositary arrangements. All other transfer and other taxes and charges shall be at the expense of Holders of Depositary Shares evidenced by Receipts. If, at the request of a Holder of Receipts, the Depositary incurs charges or expenses for which the Corporation is not otherwise liable hereunder, such Holder will be liable for such charges and expenses; , , that the Depositary may, at its sole option, require a Holder of a Receipt to prepay the Depositary any charge or expense the Depositary has been asked to incur at the request of such Holder of Receipts. The Depositary shall present its statement for charges and expenses to the Corporation at such intervals as the Corporation and the Depositary may agree.
provided
however
Section 6.1. Amendment.
The form of the Receipts and any provisions of this Deposit Agreement may at any time and from time to time be amended by agreement between the Corporation and the Depositary in any respect which they may deem necessary or desirable; , , that no such amendment (other than any change in the fees of any Depositary, Registrar or Transfer Agent) which shall materially and adversely alter the rights of the Holders of Receipts shall be effective against the Holders of Receipts unless such amendment shall have been approved by the Holders of Receipts representing in the aggregate at least a two-thirds of the Depositary Shares then outstanding. Every Holder of an outstanding Receipt at the time any such amendment becomes effective shall be deemed, by continuing to hold such Receipt, to consent and agree to such amendment and to be bound by the Deposit Agreement as amended thereby.
provided
however
 
In no event shall any amendment impair the right, subject to the provisions of Sections 2.5 and 2.6 and Article III, of any owner of Depositary Shares to surrender any Receipt evidencing such Depositary Shares to the Depositary with instructions to deliver to the Holder the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented thereby, except in order to comply with mandatory provisions of applicable law or the rules and regulations of any governmental body, agency or commission, or applicable securities exchange. As a condition precedent to the Depositary's execution of any amendment, the Corporation shall deliver to the Depositary a certificate that states that the proposed amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 6.1.
Section 6.2. Termination.
This Deposit Agreement may be terminated by the Corporation at any time upon not less than sixty (60) days prior written notice to the Depositary, in which case, at least thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed in such notice for such termination, the Depositary will mail notice of such termination to the record Holders of all Receipts then outstanding. If any Receipts shall remain outstanding after the date of termination of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary thereafter shall discontinue the transfer of Receipts, shall suspend the distribution of dividends to the Holders of the Receipts thereof and shall not give any further notices (other than notice of such termination) or perform any further acts under this Deposit Agreement, except that the Depositary shall continue to collect dividends and other distributions pertaining to the Series C Preferred Stock, and shall continue to deliver the Stock and any money and other property, if any, represented by Receipts upon surrender thereof by the Holders of Receipts thereof. At any time after the expiration of two years from the date of termination, as may be instructed by the Corporation in writing, the Depositary shall (i) sell the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock then held hereunder at public or private sale, at such places and upon such terms as it deems proper and may thereafter hold the net proceeds of any such sale, together with any money and other property held by it hereunder, without liability for interest, for the benefit, pro rata in accordance with their holdings, of the Holders of Receipts that have not theretofore been surrendered, or (ii) return such shares of Series C Preferred Stock to the Corporation. After making such sale, the Depositary shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except to account for such net proceeds and money and other property. The Depositary shall continue to receive its fees and expenses after termination of this Deposit Agreement so long as the Depositary continues to provide services in connection with this Deposit Agreement.
Subject to the first paragraph of this Section 6.2, this Deposit Agreement may be terminated by the Company or the Depositary only if (i) all outstanding Depositary Shares have been redeemed pursuant to Section 2.8; (ii) there shall have been made a final distribution in respect of the Series C Preferred Stock in connection with any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation and such distribution shall have been distributed to the Holders of Receipts representing Depositary Shares pursuant to Section 4.1 or 4.2, as applicable; or (iii) upon the consent of Holders of Receipts representing in the aggregate not less than two-thirds of the Depositary Shares outstanding.
 
Upon the termination of this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except for its obligations to the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent and any Registrar under Sections 5.6 and 5.7; that Section 5.3 and 5.6 shall survive the termination of this Deposit Agreement.
provided further
The provisions relating to termination and survival in Section 7.12 shall prevail over anything to the contrary stated in this Section 6.2.
Section 7.1. Counterparts.
This Deposit Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, and by each of the parties hereto on separate counterparts, each of which counterparts, when so executed and delivered, shall be deemed an original, but all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Deposit Agreement by facsimile or pdf shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 7.2. Exclusive Benefit of Parties.
This Deposit Agreement is for the exclusive benefit of the parties hereto, and their respective successors hereunder, and shall not be deemed to give any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim to any other Person whatsoever.
Section 7.3. Invalidity of Provisions.
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Deposit Agreement or in the Receipts should be or become invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein or therein shall in no way be affected, prejudiced or disturbed thereby.
Section 7.4. Notices.
Any and all notices to be given to the Corporation hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to the Corporation at:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
32 Old Slip,
New York, New York 10005
Attention: Corporate Treasury
Facsimile: (212) 495-1014
with a copy to:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286
Attention: Legal Department, Chief Securities Counsel
Facsimile: (212) 635-1698
or at any other addresses of which the Corporation shall have notified the Depositary in writing.
Any and all notices to be given to the Depositary hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to the Depositary at the Depositary's Office at
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC
Newport Office Center VII
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310
Attention: Relationship Manager
Facsimile: (732) 667-9521
with a copy to:
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC
Newport Office Center VII
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310
Attention: Legal Department
Facsimile: (201) 680-4610
or at any other address of which the Depositary shall have notified the Corporation in writing.
Any and all notices to be given to any Record Holder of a Receipt hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, recognized next day courier services, facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to such Record Holder at the address of such Record Holder as it appears on the books of the Depositary, or if such Holder shall have timely filed with the Depositary a written request that notices intended for such Holder be mailed to some other address, at the address designated in such request.
Delivery of a notice sent by mail or as provided in the previous sentence shall be deemed to be effected at the time when a duly addressed letter containing the same (or a confirmation thereof in the case of a facsimile transmission or electronic mail) is deposited, postage prepaid, in a post office letter box; , that the Depositary or the Corporation may, however, act upon any facsimile transmission or electronic mail received by it from the other or from any Holder of a Receipt, notwithstanding that such facsimile transmission or electronic mail shall not subsequently be confirmed by letter or as aforesaid.
provided
 
Section 7.5. Depositary's Agents.
The Depositary may from time to time appoint Depositary's Agents to act in any respect for the Depositary for the purposes of this Deposit Agreement and may at any time appoint additional Depositary's Agents and vary or terminate the appointment of such Depositary's Agents. The Depositary will promptly notify the Corporation of any such action.
Section 7.6. Appointment of Registrar, Dividend Disbursing Agent and Redemption Agent in Respect of the Series C Preferred Stock.
The Corporation hereby appoints Computershare as Registrar, Transfer Agent, dividend disbursing agent and redemption agent in respect of the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock deposited with the Depositary hereunder, and Computershare hereby accepts such appointments, subject to the express terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement (and no implied terms or conditions) and, as such, will reflect changes in the number of shares of deposited Series C Preferred Stock held by it by notation, book-entry or other appropriate method. With respect to the appointment of Computershare as Registrar, Transfer Agent, dividend disbursing agent and redemption agent in respect of the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock, Computershare, in its respective capacities under such appointments, shall be entitled to the same rights, indemnities, immunities and benefits as the Depositary hereunder as if explicitly named in each such provision, and shall provide the services listed in Exhibit C hereto, in the performance of its duties in such respective capacities.
Section 7.7. Holders of Receipts are Parties.
The Holders of Receipts from time to time shall be parties to this Deposit Agreement and shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions hereof and of the Receipts by acceptance of delivery thereof.
Section 7.8. Governing Law.
This Deposit Agreement and the Receipts and all rights hereunder and thereunder and provisions hereof and thereof shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to applicable conflicts of law principles.
Section 7.9. Inspection of Deposit Agreement.
Copies of this Deposit Agreement shall be filed with the Depositary and the Depositary's Agents and shall be made available for inspection during business hours upon reasonable notice to the Depositary by any Holder of a Receipt.
Section 7.10. Headings.
The headings of articles and sections in this Deposit Agreement and in the form of the Receipt set forth in Exhibit B hereto have been inserted for convenience only and are not to be regarded as a part of this Deposit Agreement or the Receipts or to have any bearing upon the meaning or interpretation of any provision contained herein or in the Receipts.
 
Section 7.11. Confidentiality.
The Depositary and the Corporation agree that all books, records, information and data pertaining to the business of the other party, including, , personal, non-public Holder information, which are exchanged or received pursuant to the negotiation or the carrying out of this Deposit Agreement, shall remain confidential, and shall not be voluntarily disclosed to any other Person, except as may be required by law or legal process.
inter alia
Section 7.12. Protection of Personal Information.
(a) In connection with the performance of Computershare's duties on behalf of the Corporation under this Deposit Agreement, Computershare is expected to obtain confidential information related to the Corporation or the Holders of Depositary Shares that is not available to the general public (""). Computershare agrees that the Confidential Information shall be held and treated by Computershare, its directors, officers, employees, Affiliates, agents and subcontractors (collectively, "") in confidence and, except as hereinafter provided, shall not be disclosed in any manner whatsoever except as otherwise required by law, regulation, subpoena or governmental authority. Confidential Information shall be used by Computershare and its Representatives only for the purposes for which provided and shall be disclosed by Computershare only to those Representatives who have a need to know in order to accomplish the business purpose in connection with which the Confidential Information has been provided. Information shall no longer be considered Confidential Information at such time as such information becomes publicly available other than by action of Computershare or its Representatives.
Confidential Information
Representatives
(b) "" means all information about individuals, including but not limited to, names, signatures, addresses, telephone numbers, account numbers, social security numbers, credit reports, demographic information, financial and other personal data, transaction information, and lists of customers, employees, or investors, received from or created or received on behalf of the Corporation by Computershare or to which Computershare has access in the course of performing its duties on behalf of the Corporation under this Deposit Agreement (the "").
Personal Information
Services
(c) Computershare agrees that all Personal Information is, and shall be considered, confidential and proprietary to the Corporation. Computershare shall not disclose Personal Information to any third party nor permit any third party to have access to any Personal Information, for any purpose except as otherwise provided below. Computershare shall not use Personal Information, nor shall Computershare duplicate Personal Information or retain records thereof, except as necessary to perform the Services. Computershare shall comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to Computershare relating to the Personal Information and shall comply with the Corporation's reasonable instructions concerning Personal Information that the Corporation reasonably believes are necessary for the Corporation to be in compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations relating to the Personal Information in Computershare's possession or control.
(d) Computershare shall implement and maintain a comprehensive written information security program (the "") which shall include all necessary measures, including the establishment and maintenance of policies and procedures, and technical, physical and administrative safeguards, designed to (i) ensure the security and
Information Security Program
 
confidentiality of the Personal Information, (ii) protect against any foreseeable threats or hazards to the security or integrity of Personal Information, (iii) protect against unauthorized access to or use of such information, and (iv) ensure secure and appropriate disposal of the Personal Information. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Information Security Program shall provide for (i) continual assessment and re-assessment of the risks to the security of Personal Information acquired or maintained by Computershare and its agents and contractors in connection with the Services, including, but not limited to, (X) identification of internal and external threats that could result in unauthorized disclosure, alteration or destruction of Personal Information and systems used by Computershare and its agents and contractors, (Y) assessment of the likelihood and potential damage of such threats, taking into account the sensitivity of such Personal Information, and (Z) assessment of the sufficiency of policies, procedures, information systems of Computershare and its agents and contractors, and other arrangements in place, to control risks; and (ii) appropriate protection against such risks. The Information Security Program shall provide for the encryption of Personal Information in electronic form while in transit and appropriate firewall and other protections for unencrypted personal information in storage. Computershare shall, and shall require its agents and contractors to, regularly test key controls, systems and procedures relating to the Information Security Program. The frequency and nature of such tests shall be determined by Computershare's risk assessment, in consultation with the Corporation. Computershare shall provide the Corporation with the results of all such tests and summaries of any other audit, review or examination of its Information Security Program. Computershare shall comply with its Information Security Program. Computershare certifies that its Information Security Program is and shall be in compliance with Title 201 of the Code of Massachusetts Regulations, Section 17.01 et seq., and other applicable laws, rules, regulations and orders. Computershare shall deliver separate certifications of such compliance upon the Corporation's reasonable request.
(e) The Corporation or its designee (which may include regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over the Corporation or any of its affiliates, or outside auditing firms retained by the Corporation) shall have the right, at the Corporation's sole expense, with prior written notice and not more than once annually, to enter any Computershare premises at which the Services, or any part thereof, are performed, for the purpose of inspecting and auditing the provision of such Services and to determine, among other things, whether the Services are being provided in accordance with applicable law and the terms of this Deposit Agreement, and whether Computershare and its subcontractors have adequate policies, procedures, safeguards, and controls in place to protect the security of Personal Information acquired or maintained by them in connection with the Services. Any inspection and audit performed by or on behalf of the Corporation pursuant to this Section 7.12(e) shall be upon at least 30 days written notice to Computershare by the Corporation. The foregoing 30-day notice provision and one annual audit or inspection limitation shall not apply to inspections or audits outside the control of the Corporation and performed or requested by regulatory authorities. During any such inspection or audit, or at any other reasonable time mutually agreed by the parties, Computershare shall make its relevant officers and employees available to the Corporation to discuss Computershare's measures related to its Information Security Program, including without limitation measures relating to oversight of Computershare's subcontractors and agents who have access to Personal Information, and give the Corporation or its designee access to records, in whatever form maintained, relating to the provision of the Services; provided, however, that Computershare may, in its sole discretion, prohibit the Corporation from entering certain areas of its facilities for
 
security reasons or from viewing certain records that are confidential to third parties, in which case Computershare will provide the Corporation with alternative access to the records, documents, other information or personnel in such restricted area, to the extent reasonably possible. In addition, Computershare shall arrange for the Corporation to conduct site visits at the premises of subcontractors and meet with information security representatives of its subcontractors as reasonably requested by the Corporation from time to time to review their information security measures. The Corporation may periodically submit to Computershare for itself and its subcontractors questionnaires concerning Computershare's Information Security Program, and concerning Computershare's and its subcontractors' security measures, business recovery plans, financial condition, ethics and compliance programs, and related measures. Computershare agrees to promptly respond to any such questionnaires and to any further inquiry by the Corporation its responses may entail, and promptly to require its subcontractors to do so. Computershare shall cooperate with the Corporation to agree upon prompt reasonable measures to mitigate any risks the Corporation may identify. Computershare shall maintain an ethics and compliance program substantially similar to the description in its questionnaire responses.
(f) Computershare shall notify the Corporation promptly, unless prohibited by law enforcement or court order, upon discovery of any unauthorized use, disclosure, acquisition, modification, or destruction of Personal Information, unauthorized access to Personal Information, or loss of Personal Information (each, a ""). Computershare shall investigate each Security Breach, provide the Corporation with a detailed written statement describing the circumstances surrounding each Security Breach, and provide and promptly implement a remediation plan, acceptable to the Corporation, to address the Security Breach and prevent any further incidents. Computershare will at its expense (subject to Paragraph (l) below) take all necessary or customary measures to mitigate any harmful effect of any such Security Breach, including without limitation notifications to affected individuals, if requested by the Corporation. Computershare shall also promptly notify the Corporation of any known attempts to commit a Security Breach.
Security Breach
(g) If there is a reasonable likelihood that, in the course of performing the Services, Computershare may become aware of activities, patterns of activity, or practices that indicate the possible existence of identity theft (as defined by regulations of the Federal Trade Commission), Computershare will implement appropriate measures, including the establishment and maintenance of policies and procedures, to detect such activities, patterns or practices, notify the Corporation upon such detection, and respond to such activities, patterns or practices. In addition, if Computershare does become aware of activities, patterns of activity, or practices indicating the possible existence of identity theft, Computershare will promptly notify the Corporation, and will take reasonable measures to assist the Corporation in implementing an appropriate response.
(h) Unless prohibited by law, Computershare shall (i) immediately notify the Corporation of any subpoena, court order, or other similar process for the purpose of obtaining Personal Information or other confidential information of the Corporation other than those received in the ordinary course of business and pertaining to a specifically identified individual, (ii) provide the Corporation with documentation thereof, and (iii) permit the Corporation adequate time to exercise its legal options to prohibit or limit disclosure.
 
(i) In the event that the Corporation determines that there has been a material breach by Computershare of any of Computershare's obligations with regard to Personal Information under this Section 7.12, the Corporation may terminate this Deposit Agreement without complying with the notice requirements set forth in Section 6.2. Computershare's obligations with regard to Personal Information shall survive the termination of the agreements with respect to any Personal Information so long as it remains in the possession of Computershare.
(j) Computershare shall return to the Corporation or, with the Corporation's permission, destroy all Personal Information and other confidential information of the Corporation in any form in Computershare's possession or in the possession of Computershare's agents or subcontractors in accordance with Computershare's records retention and destruction policies, and retain no copies thereof. Computershare will certify in writing any destruction of Personal Information and other confidential information of the Corporation. Computershare will upon request review its records retention and destruction policies with the Corporation.
(k) Computershare shall upon request from time to time provide the Corporation with a list of all subcontractors (including affiliates of Computershare) who have access to Personal Information. In addition, Computershare shall notify the Corporation in writing in advance of entering into a new agreement with any subcontractor that will have access to Personal Information. In the event that the Corporation objects to any new or existing subcontractor having access to Personal Information, Computershare shall work with the Corporation to resolve the Corporation's concerns. Computershare shall use appropriate diligence and care in selecting its subcontractors. Computershare agrees to include in written agreements with any agent or subcontractor to whom it provides access to Personal Information, confidentiality and security obligations with respect to such Information that are at least as restrictive as those that apply to Computershare hereunder, and to require the subcontractor to comply with such provisions and with Computershare's obligations under Section 7.12(e) above with respect to subcontractors; provided, however, that to the extent that Computershare's existing agreements with its agents and subcontractors do not require its agents and subcontractors to comply with Computershare's obligations under Section 7.12(e) above, Computershare shall by June 30, 2013 amend such agreements to require such compliance. Prior to June 30, 2013, Computershare shall not be deemed in breach of its obligations under Section 7.12 (e) above to arrange for the Corporation to conduct site visits of a subcontractor or requiring a subcontractor to complete the Corporation's questionnaires, if Computershare's agreement with such subcontractor does not enable Computershare to require such subcontractor to comply. Computershare shall enforce its agreements with its agents and subcontractors. Computershare shall be responsible for the acts and omissions of its agents and subcontractors to the same extent as if such acts and omissions were those of Computershare.
(l) Without regard to any limitation of liability in this or any other agreement, Computershare shall indemnify and hold the Corporation harmless for all costs, losses, fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees), claims, investigations, damages and expenses, including but not limited to monetary penalties, incurred by the Corporation or any of its affiliates as a result of a breach of Computershare's obligations under this Section 7.12; provided, however, that such obligation to indemnify and hold the Corporation harmless is subject to a monetary limit of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per calendar year, except that there shall be no
 
monetary limit in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct. In addition to any other rights the Corporation may have under this Deposit Agreement or at law, since unauthorized use or disclosure of Personal Information or other confidential information may result in immediate and irreparable injury to the Corporation for which monetary damages may not be adequate, in the event that Computershare or any officer, director, employee, agent, or subcontractor of Computershare uses or discloses, or in the Corporation's sole opinion is likely to use or disclose, Personal Information or other confidential information in breach of Computershare's obligations hereunder, the Corporation shall be entitled to equitable relief, including temporary and permanent injunctive relief and specific performance. The Corporation shall also be entitled to the recovery of any pecuniary gain realized by Computershare from the unauthorized use or disclosure of Personal Information or confidential information. In no event will any payments paid or payable under this Section 7.12(l) be included in the amount of damages or losses that are subject to any limitation of liability in any other provision of this Deposit Agreement or in any other agreement.
(m) The provisions of this Section 7.12 shall survive expiration or termination of this Deposit Agreement for any reason.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation and the Depositary have duly executed this Deposit Agreement as of the day and year first above set forth, and all Holders of Receipts shall become parties hereto by and upon acceptance by them of delivery of Receipts issued in accordance with the terms hereof.
 
Certificate C-
THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT ARE NOT SAVINGS ACCOUNTS, DEPOSITS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OF A BANK AND ARE NOT INSURED BY THE FEDERAL DEPOSIT INSURANCE CORPORATION OR ANY OTHER GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY.
SHARES                SERIES C NONCUMULATIVE PERPETUAL PREFERRED STOCK
This is to certify that is                the registered owner of                 fully paid and non-assessable shares of the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, having a liquidation preference of $100,000 per share, of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), the terms of which are provided for in the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation including the Certificate of Designations of the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, transferable on the books of the Corporation by the holder hereof in person or by its duly authorized attorney, upon surrender of this Certificate properly endorsed. This Certificate and the shares represented hereby are issued and shall be held subject to all of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and the By-laws of the Corporation and any amendments thereto. This Certificate is not valid unless countersigned and registered by the Transfer Agent and Registrar.
Corporation
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused this Certificate to be executed on its behalf by its duly authorized officers.
 
Countersigned and Registered:
Computershare Shareowner Services
LLC, as Transfer Agent and Registrar
By: 
                                                         
    
 
The Corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests, a full statement of the powers, designations and any preferences, conversion and other rights, restrictions, limitations as to dividends and other distributions, qualifications, and terms and conditions of redemption of the stock of each class which the Corporation has authority to issue and, if the Corporation is authorized to issue any preferred or special class in series, (i) the differences in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series to the extent set, and (ii) the authority of the Board of Directors to set such rights and preferences of subsequent series. The foregoing summary does not purport to be complete and is subject to and qualified in its entirety by reference to the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as amended from time to time, a copy of which will be sent without charge to each shareholder who so requests. Such request must be made to the Secretary of the Corporation at its principal office or to the Transfer Agent.
The following abbreviations, when used in the inscription on the face of this Certificate, shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations:
TEN COM - as tenants in common
TEN ENT - as tenants by the entireties
JT TEN - as joint tenants with right of survivorship and not as tenants in common
UNIF GIFT MIN ACT - Custodian
                                
                                        
(Custodian)                                         (Minor)
 under Uniform Gifts to Minors Act
                                  
(State)            
Additional abbreviations may also be used though not in the above list.
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto
                            
 
 
(PLEASE PRINT OR TYPEWRITE NAME AND ADDRESS, INCLUDING ZIP CODE, OF ASSIGNEE)
 
 
(PLEASE INSERT SOCIAL SECURITY OR OTHER IDENTIFYING NUMBER OF ASSIGNEE)
() shares represented by this Certificate and do(es) hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint , Attorney to transfer the said shares on the books of the Corporation, with full power of substitution in the premises.
                                     
                            
                                    
 
Signature(s) Guaranteed:
The signature(s) should be guaranteed by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Corporation's transfer agent. Guarantees by a notary public are not acceptable.
 
Certicate C-
Unless this receipt is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange, or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Depositary (the ""), hereby certifies that Cede & Co. is the registered owner of                  DEPOSITARY SHARES (""), each Depositary Share representing 1/4000th of one share of Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the ""), of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), on deposit with the Depositary, subject to the terms and entitled to the benefits of the Deposit Agreement dated as of September 17, 2012 (the ""), among the Corporation, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts. By accepting this Depositary Receipt, the holder hereof becomes a party to and agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the Deposit Agreement. This Depositary Receipt shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose or entitled to any benefits under the Deposit Agreement unless it shall have been executed by the Depositary by the manual signature of a duly authorized officer or, if executed in facsimile by the Depositary, countersigned by a Registrar in respect of the Depositary Receipts by the manual signature of a duly authorized officer thereof.
Depositary
Depositary Shares
Series C Preferred Stock
Corporation
Deposit Agreement
 
Dated: , 2012
                
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Depositary
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION WILL FURNISH WITHOUT CHARGE TO EACH RECEIPTHOLDER WHO SO REQUESTS A COPY OF THE DEPOSIT AGREEMENT AND A COPY OR SUMMARY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF DESIGNATIONS OF SERIES C NON-CUMULATIVE PERPETUAL PREFERRED STOCK OF THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION ANY SUCH REQUEST IS TO BE ADDRESSED TO THE DEPOSITARY NAMED ON THE FACE OF THIS RECEIPT.
 
 
The Corporation will furnish without charge to each receiptholder who so requests the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof of the Corporation, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights. Such request may be made to the Corporation or to the Transfer Agent.
The following abbreviations when used in the form of ownership on the face of this certificate shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations. Abbreviations in addition to those appearing below may be used.
 
 
 
For value received, hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto
                                                 
Depositary Shares represented by the within Receipt, and do(es) hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint Attorney to transfer the said Depositary Shares on the books of the within named Depositary with full power of substitution in the premises.
                                                                                      
Dated:
                
NOTICE: The signature to the assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of this Receipt in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
SIGNATURE GUARANTEED
NOTICE: The signature(s) should be guaranteed by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Corporation's transfer agent. Guarantees by a notary public are not acceptable.
 

Exhibit 5.1
September 19, 2012
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, NY 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), of up to 25,300,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share, $0.01 par value per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock"), of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and evidenced by a depositary receipt (the "Depositary Receipt") to be issued pursuant to a Deposit Agreement, dated as of September 17, 2012 (the "Deposit Agreement"), among the Company, Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary (the "Depositary"), and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipt described therein, I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that, (1) when (i) issued as contemplated by the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) (the "Registration Statement") and deposited by the Company with the Depositary in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement, and (ii) paid for in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, dated September 12, 2012 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among the Company and Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC, as Representatives of the several Underwriters named therein, the shares of the Series C Preferred Stock to be deposited with the Depositary pursuant to the Deposit Agreement relating to the Depositary Shares (the "Series C Preferred Shares") will have been validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable, (2) upon due issuance by the Depositary of the Depositary Receipt evidencing the Depositary Shares against the deposit of the Series C Preferred Shares in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement and payment therefor in accordance with the Underwriting Agreement, the Depositary Shares will have been validly issued, and (3) when (x) the Series C Preferred Shares have been issued as contemplated by the Registration Statement and deposited by the Company with the Depositary in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement and (y) the Depositary
 
 
Receipt have been issued in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement, the Depositary Receipt will constitute a valid and legally binding obligation of the Company and entitle the holder thereof to the rights specified in the Depositary Receipt and the Deposit Agreement, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the Federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on factual information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Series C Preferred Shares will have been deposited with the Depositary in accordance with the Deposit Agreement, that the Deposit Agreement will have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Depositary, that the certificates evidencing the Series C Preferred Shares and the Depositary Receipt will conform to the respective specimens thereof examined by me, that the certificate evidencing the Depositary Receipt will have been duly executed and delivered by one of the Depositary's authorized officers and, if executed in facsimile by the Depositary, will have been duly signed by a registrar of the Depositary Receipt, that the certificate for the Series C Preferred Shares will have been duly countersigned and registered by the registrar and transfer agent of the Series C Preferred Shares, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus Supplement, dated September 12, 2012, under the caption "Validity of Securities", which supplements the Prospectus, dated June 28, 2010. By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121017065124.txt.gz
TIME:20121017065124
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On October 17, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2012. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER EARNINGS OF $720 MILLION OR $0.61 PER COMMON SHARE
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT FEES UP 7% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
RECORD LEVEL OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT OF $1.4 TRILLION, UP 13% YEAR-OVER-YEAR, UP 5% SEQUENTIALLY
NET LONG-TERM INFLOWS OF $58 BILLION OVER LAST 12 MONTHS, $9 BILLION IN 3Q12
RECORD LEVEL OF ASSETS UNDER CUSTODY/ADMINISTRATION OF $27.9 TRILLION, UP 8% YEAR-OVER-YEAR, UP 3% SEQUENTIALLY
NONINTEREST EXPENSE DECLINED 2% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
ESTIMATED BASEL III TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY RATIO 9.3%
(a)
RETURN ON TANGIBLE COMMON EQUITY 22%
(a)
REPURCHASED OVER 13 MILLION COMMON SHARES FOR $288 MILLION IN 3Q12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported third quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $720 million, or $0.61 per common share, compared with $651 million, or $0.53 per common share, in the third quarter of 2011 and $466 million, or $0.39 per common share, in the second quarter of 2012.
NEW YORK, October 17, 2012 
"We are pleased to report solid earnings growth this quarter, led by the strength of Investment Management, which recorded its twelfth consecutive quarter of long-term inflows. New business trends for Asset Servicing were also strong, as we recorded the best quarter in new AUC wins since 2008, a testament to the breadth and quality of our capabilities. We remain focused on reducing expense growth through our operational excellence initiatives. During the quarter we completed the client integration for our BHF Asset Servicing acquisition in Germany, an example of our progress in integrating systems and retiring legacy platforms," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"We generated a 22 percent return on tangible equity, continued to return capital to shareholders and improved our capital position, with Basel III Tier I common equity ratio rising to above 9 percent at quarter end, all very positive signs of our business model's strength," added Mr. Hassell.
 
 
Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
Third Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The decreases in net interest margin (FTE) compared with both prior periods primarily reflect lower reinvestment yields, the elimination of interest on European Central Bank deposits, lower accretion and growth in customer deposits.
The was a credit of $5 million in the third quarter of 2012 primarily resulting from loan sales and repayments. The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2011 and a credit of $19 million in the second quarter of 2012.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 23.1% in the third quarter of 2012, which primarily reflects the benefit from completing various tax audits. Earnings per common share in the third quarter of 2012 benefited $0.04 as a result of the lower than expected effective tax rate.
effective tax rate
The was $2.5 billion at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with $1.4 billion at June 30, 2012. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio primarily reflects a decline in interest rates and improved credit spreads.
unrealized pre-tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
We generated $780 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the third quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 9.3% at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with 8.7% at June 30, 2012. The increase was primarily due to earnings retention and an increase in the value of the investment portfolio, partially offset by higher risk-weighted assets.
 On Oct. 17, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 6, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 29, 2012.
Dividends (common)
 On Oct. 17, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation also declared dividends for the dividend period ending in December 2012 of $1,011.11 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock") (equivalent to $10.11 per Normal Preferred Capital Security of Mellon Capital IV, referred to below, each representing 1/100
Dividends (preferred)
th
interest in a share of Series A Preferred Stock), and $1,314.44 per share on the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock") (equivalent to $0.33 per depositary share, each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of the Series C Preferred Stock (the "Depositary Shares")), payable on Dec. 20, 2012 to holders of record as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the December dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock to the holders of record, as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012, of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities. All of the outstanding shares of the Series C Preferred Stock are held by the depositary of the Depositary Shares, which will pass through the applicable portion of the December dividend on the Series C Preferred Stock to the holders of record, as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012, of the Depositary Shares.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $27.9 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.4 trillion in assets under management, services $11.6 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
 
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Sept. 30, 2012 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on Oct. 17, 2012. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on Oct. 17, 2012. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Oct. 17, 2012 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through Oct. 31, 2012 by dialing (888) 566-0103 (U.S.) or (402) 998- 0958 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Capital
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock, as well as the trust preferred securities which will be phased out of Basel I Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. The presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies. Additionally, BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011, and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such
 
M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP on a fully-phased in basis.
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our estimated capital ratios and our ability to reduce expense growth through our operational excellence initiatives. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-
 
looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Oct. 17, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121018091302.txt.gz
TIME:20121018091302
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION.
On October 17, 2012, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for third quarter 2012. The Registrant previously furnished the press release as Exhibit 99.1 to a Current Report on Form 8-K, dated October 17, 2012, pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K. A version of this press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. However, the references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K. The information included herein is to be considered "filed" under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is incorporated by reference into all filings made by the Registrant under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which state that this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated therein by reference.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS THIRD QUARTER EARNINGS OF $720 MILLION OR $0.61 PER COMMON SHARE
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT FEES UP 7% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
RECORD LEVEL OF ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT OF $1.4 TRILLION, UP 13% YEAR-OVER-YEAR, UP 5% SEQUENTIALLY
NET LONG-TERM INFLOWS OF $58 BILLION OVER LAST 12 MONTHS, $9 BILLION IN 3Q12
RECORD LEVEL OF ASSETS UNDER CUSTODY/ADMINISTRATION OF $27.9 TRILLION, UP 8% YEAR-OVER-YEAR, UP 3% SEQUENTIALLY
NONINTEREST EXPENSE DECLINED 2% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
ESTIMATED BASEL III TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY RATIO 9.3%
(a)
RETURN ON TANGIBLE COMMON EQUITY 22%
(a)
REPURCHASED OVER 13 MILLION COMMON SHARES FOR $288 MILLION IN 3Q12
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported third quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $720 million, or $0.61 per common share, compared with $651 million, or $0.53 per common share, in the third quarter of 2011 and $466 million, or $0.39 per common share, in the second quarter of 2012.
NEW YORK, October 17, 2012 
 
 
 
Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
Third Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The decreases in net interest margin (FTE) compared with both prior periods primarily reflect lower reinvestment yields, the elimination of interest on European Central Bank deposits, lower accretion and growth in customer deposits.
The was a credit of $5 million in the third quarter of 2012 primarily resulting from loan sales and repayments. The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in the third quarter of 2011 and a credit of $19 million in the second quarter of 2012.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
The was 23.1% in the third quarter of 2012, which primarily reflects the benefit from completing various tax audits. Earnings per common share in the third quarter of 2012 benefited $0.04 as a result of the lower than expected effective tax rate.
effective tax rate
The was $2.5 billion at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with $1.4 billion at June 30, 2012. The increase in the valuation of the investment securities portfolio primarily reflects a decline in interest rates and improved credit spreads.
unrealized pre-tax gain on our total investment securities portfolio
 
 
We generated $780 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the third quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 9.3% at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with 8.7% at June 30, 2012. The increase was primarily due to earnings retention and an increase in the value of the investment portfolio, partially offset by higher risk-weighted assets.
 On Oct. 17, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Nov. 6, 2012 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Oct. 29, 2012.
Dividends (common)
 On Oct. 17, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation also declared dividends for the dividend period ending in December 2012 of $1,011.11 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock") (equivalent to $10.11 per Normal Preferred Capital Security of Mellon Capital IV, referred to below, each representing 1/100
Dividends (preferred)
th
interest in a share of Series A Preferred Stock), and $1,314.44 per share on the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock") (equivalent to $0.33 per depositary share, each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of the Series C Preferred Stock (the "Depositary Shares")), payable on Dec. 20, 2012 to holders of record as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the December dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock to the holders of record, as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012, of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities. All of the outstanding shares of the Series C Preferred Stock are held by the depositary of the Depositary Shares, which will pass through the applicable portion of the December dividend on the Series C Preferred Stock to the holders of record, as of the close of business on Dec. 5, 2012, of the Depositary Shares.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $27.9 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.4 trillion in assets under management, services $11.6 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Capital
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock, as well as the trust preferred securities which will be phased out of Basel I Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. The presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies. Additionally, BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011, and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such
 
M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP on a fully-phased in basis.
 
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our estimated capital ratios and our ability to reduce expense growth through our operational excellence initiatives. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-
 
looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Oct. 17, 2012 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121019163657.txt.gz
TIME:20121019163657
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 17, 2012, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for third quarter 2012 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on October 17, 2012, a Quarterly Earnings Review and Financial Trends information. The Quarterly Earnings Review is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and the Financial Trends information is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this report. Both exhibits are "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and are not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to this report contain information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
THIRD QUARTER 2012 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
(comparisons are unannualized 3Q12 vs. 2Q12 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services. Sequential growth rates are unannualized.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $182 million compared with $200 million in the third quarter of 2011 and $180 million in the second quarter of 2012. In the third quarter of 2012, foreign exchange revenue totaled $121 million, a decrease of 45% year-over-year and 23% sequentially. Both decreases reflect lower volatility and volumes. Other trading revenue was $61 million in the third quarter of 2012 compared with a loss of $21 million in the third quarter of 2011 and revenue of $23 million in the second quarter of 2012. The increases compared with both prior periods reflect improved fixed income trading.
 
 
Investment and other income totaled $124 million compared with $83 million in the third quarter of 2011 and $48 million in the second quarter of 2012. The year-over-year increase primarily resulted from higher seed capital gains. Sequentially, the increase primarily resulted from seed capital gains, higher equity investment revenue and higher asset-related gains.
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONAL EXCELLENCE INITIATIVES UPDATE
 
 
Accomplishments
Through Sept. 30, 2012, we accomplished the following operational excellence initiatives:
Business Operations
 
 
 
 
 
Technology
 
 
 
Corporate Services
 
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
We generated $780 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the third quarter of 2012.
The following table presents our capital ratios.
 
 
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP was 9.3% at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with 8.7% at June 30, 2012. The increase was primarily due to earnings retention and an increase in the value of the investment portfolio, partially offset by higher risk-weighted assets.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Sept. 30, 2012, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $103.6 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $2.5 billion at Sept. 30, 2012 compared with $1.4 billion at June 30, 2012. During the third quarter of 2012, we received $215 million of paydowns and sold approximately $46 million of sub-investment grade securities.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
Nonperforming other residential mortgage loans decreased $62 million from Sept. 30, 2011 to $166 million at Sept. 30, 2012. The decrease primarily resulted from paydowns, sales, returns to accrual status and charge-offs.
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $5 million in 3Q12 primarily resulting from loan sales and repayments. The provision for credit losses was a credit of $22 million in 3Q11 and a credit of $19 million in 2Q12.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items. Results in 2011 include the Shareowner Services business.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock, as well as the trust preferred securities which will be phased out of Basel I Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. The presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies. Additionally, BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011; and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
The presentation of income (loss) from consolidated investment management funds, net of net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
 
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following tables present fee and other revenue and noninterest expense excluding Shareowner Services.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
(a) Preliminary.
 
 
Page - 23
BNY Mellon 3Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased-in basis.
 
 
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including statements made regarding our estimated capital ratios and our operational excellence initiatives, including targeted savings by the end of 2012. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Oct. 17, 2012, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 24

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Expense efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in 2010 and 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period's presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated October 17, 2012, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 or other reports filed with the SEC.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: See pages 3 through 6 for additional details of revenue/expense items impacting continuing operations.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS -11 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 11 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 11 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 11 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
n/m  not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 11 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121025165538.txt.gz
TIME:20121025165538
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
On October 25, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 0.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "3-Year Fixed Rate Notes"), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 1.300% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Fixed Rate Notes") and (iii) $400,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "Floating Rate Notes" and, together with the 3-Year Fixed Rate Notes and the 5-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 0.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "3-Year Fixed Rate Notes"), (ii) $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.300% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Fixed Rate Notes") and (iii) $400,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2015 (the "Floating Rate Notes", and, together with the 3-Year Fixed Rate Notes and the 5-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"), in each case pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement dated October 18, 2012 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement dated October 18, 2012 relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
 
on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement dated August 6, 2010 under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121026133741.txt.gz
TIME:20121026133741
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 26, 2012, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") sent a redemption notice to Manufacturers & Traders Trust Company, the Property Trustee for the trusts listed below, which will result in the redemption of the securities identified below on November 26, 2012. The redemption price of each security will be equal to 100% of the liquidation amount of the securities plus accumulated and unpaid distributions in the amount specified below. The Company issued a press release announcing the redemption of the below securities on October 26, 2012. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, October 26, 2012  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced that all outstanding 6.875% Trust Preferred Securities, Series E (NYSE: BKPrE), issued by BNY Capital IV (liquidation amount $25 per security and $200 million in the aggregate) and 5.95% Trust Preferred Securities, Series F (NYSE: BKPrF), issued by BNY Capital V (liquidation amount $25 per security and $350 million in the aggregate) will be redeemed on Monday, November 26, 2012. The redemption price for the 6.875% Trust Preferred Securities, Series E will be equal to $25 per security plus accrued and unpaid distributions up to and excluding the redemption date in the amount of $0.40582. The redemption price for the 5.95% Trust Preferred Securities, Series F will be equal to $25 per security plus accrued and unpaid distributions up to and excluding the redemption date in the amount of $0.10330.
The Trust Preferred Securities are held only in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Corporation ("DTC"). DTC will redeem the Trust Preferred Securities in accordance with its procedures and notify the holders. Holders of the Trust Preferred Securities need not take any action to receive payment of the redemption price.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. As of September 30, 2012, it had $27.9 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.4 trillion in assets under management, serviced $11.6 trillion in outstanding debt and processed global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter @BNYMellon.
The information presented in this press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond the Company's control). Factors that could cause the Company's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2012 and the Company's other filings with the SEC. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this press release. The Company expressly disclaims any obligation to release publicly any updates or revisions to any forward-looking statements contained herein to reflect any change in its expectations with regard thereto or change in events, conditions or circumstances on which any statement is based.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121205080359.txt.gz
TIME:20121205080359
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7.01.     REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE.
On Wednesday, December 5, 2012, at 11:40 a.m. (EST), Gerald L. Hassell, chairman, president and chief executive officer of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant") and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer of the Registrant, are scheduled to present at the 2012 Goldman Sachs Financial Services Conference in New York.
A copy of the presentation materials to be used by the Registrant during its presentation is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. A live webcast of the audio portion of the conference will also be available at the Registrant's website (). A series of related graphics will be available at the same website at approximately 8 a.m. EST on Wednesday, December 5. An archived version of the audio portion will be available at the same website, beginning at approximately 5 p.m. (EST) on December 5 and will remain available until 5 p.m. (EST) on Wednesday, December 19.
www.bnymellon.com/investorrelations
The information in this Item 7.01, and in Exhibit 99.1 attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K, is being "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and shall not be incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933, except as otherwise expressly stated in such filing.
ITEM 9.01.     FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121214080637.txt.gz
TIME:20121214080637
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.02. DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR CERTAIN OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF CERTAIN OFFICERS; COMPENSATORY ARRANGEMENTS OF CERTAIN OFFICERS.
(b)(c) On December 11, 2012, the Board of Directors of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") approved the appointment of Karen B. Peetz as President of BNY Mellon. The appointment will be effective on January 1, 2013.
Karen B. Peetz will assume Gerald L. Hassell's role as President. Mr. Hassell will continue to serve as BNY Mellon's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. Ms. Peetz is currently Vice Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of BNY Mellon's Financial Markets & Treasury Services. As President, Ms. Peetz will lead Global Client Management, Regional Management, Treasury Services and Human Resources, and will continue to report to Mr. Hassell.
A copy of the press release announcing the events described above and other executive appointments is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, December 14, 2012BNY Mellon Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Gerald L. Hassell today announced several executive appointments designed to accelerate the company's success as the global leader in investment management and investment services.
The following appointments will be effective Jan. 1, 2013:
Karen B. Peetz will become President of BNY Mellon. Ms. Peetz is currently Vice Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Financial Markets & Treasury Services. As President, Ms. Peetz will lead Global Client Management, Regional Management, Treasury Services and Human Resources.
Timothy F. Keaney will be named Chief Executive Officer of Investment Services as BNY Mellon aligns its Asset Servicing, Corporate Trust, Depositary Receipts, Global Markets, Global Collateral Services, Broker-Dealer Services, and Pershing businesses under his leadership. Mr. Keaney is currently Vice Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Asset Servicing. He will retain his Vice Chairman title.
Brian T. Shea will be named President of Investment Services and head of BNY Mellon's Global Operations and Technology group. He will also continue in his role as Chief Executive Officer of BNY Mellon's Pershing subsidiary and as head of Broker-Dealer and Advisor Services.
Vice Chairman Curtis Y. Arledge continues as Chief Executive Officer of Investment Management, BNY Mellon's asset and wealth management businesses.
"Each of these executives shares a common passion for putting clients at the center of our business strategy and for delivering excellence in all that we do," Mr. Hassell said. "Together, they will join me and our entire management team as we focus on enhancing revenue growth across all economic cycles, attracting and retaining the very best talent, and building upon BNY Mellon's 228-year history of industry leadership."
Ms. Peetz, Mr. Arledge and Mr. Keaney continue to report to Mr. Hassell. Mr. Shea will report to Mr. Hassell as head of Operations and Technology and to Mr. Keaney in his capacity as President of Investment Services.
Peetz joined BNY Mellon in 1998. In her current position, she oversees Treasury Services, Corporate Trust, Depositary Receipts, Pershing, Broker-Dealer Global Clearance and US Tri-Party Services. She is the chair of BNY Mellon's Women's Initiatives Network and in 2011 was named the most powerful woman in banking by American Banker. She serves on Pennsylvania State University's Board of Trustees. She is on the Board of Directors for SIFMA, the Private Export Funding Corporation (PEFCO), and SunCoke
Energy. Before joining BNY Mellon, Karen spent 16 years with JPMorgan Chase in a variety of sales and business management positions.
Keaney joined the company in 2000 and currently oversees the company's businesses that provide institutions worldwide with global custody, global fund services, foreign exchange, securities lending, transfer agency, transition management, trustee/depot bank services, offshore fund administration, benefit disbursements, performance analytics and alternative investment services. Before joining BNY Mellon, Keaney worked at Deutsche Bank where he had management responsibility for sales and client management for custody, asset administration, performance measurement, asset management, funds transfer and trade finance activities. He serves on the Board of Directors of Unum.
Shea joined Pershing in 1983 and currently heads BNY Mellon's Broker-Dealer and Advisor Services group, which includes serving as CEO of Pershing, a leading global provider of financial business solutions to more than 1,500 institutional and retail financial organizations and independent registered investment RIAs. Mr. Shea serves on the Board of Directors of the Insured Retirement Institute and the Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation. He serves on the Board of Trustees of St. John's University and is a member of the Board of the Tomorrow's Hope Foundation.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $27.9 trillion in assets under custody and administration and $1.4 trillion in assets under management, services $11.6 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.4 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter @BNYMellon.
This press release contains statements that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, enhancing revenue growth and attracting and retaining talent. These forward-looking statements are based on current beliefs and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). For additional information with respect to risks and other factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, see the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011, the Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2012 and September 30, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of December 14, 2012, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after December 14, 2012 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20121217164637.txt.gz
TIME:20121217164637
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.02. DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR CERTAIN OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF CERTAIN OFFICERS; COMPENSATORY ARRANGEMENTS OF CERTAIN OFFICERS.
(e) On December 11, 2012, Gerald L. Hassell, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company"), waived the remaining provisions of his Transition Agreement that the Company assumed from The Bank of New York Company, Inc. in 2007. The Company and Mr. Hassell entered into a waiver agreement, which is attached as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated herein by reference. As a result, no Company executive officer is party to an employment agreement (or other individual severance arrangement).
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 17, 2012
 

Exhibit 10.1
December 11, 2012
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street
New York, New York 10286
Attn: Jane Sherburne, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
 
Dear Jane:
This letter is in reference to the Transition Agreement, dated June 25, 2007, between The Bank of New York Company, Inc. and myself ("Transition Agreement") and assumed by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. I hereby waive any and all remaining rights that I may otherwise be entitled to under the Transition Agreement.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130116064345.txt.gz
TIME:20130116064345
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On January 16, 2013, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for full year 2012 and fourth quarter 2012. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
 
(d)     EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER EARNINGS OF $622 MILLION OR $0.53 PER COMMON SHARE
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT AND PERFORMANCE FEES UP 17% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT UP 10% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
 
ASSETS UNDER CUSTODY/ADMINISTRATION UP 9% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
 
ESTIMATED BASEL III TIER 1 COMMON EQUITY RATIO 9.8%
(a)
RETURN ON TANGIBLE COMMON EQUITY 19%
(a)
REPURCHASED 49.8 MILLION COMMON SHARES FOR $1.1 BILLION IN 2012
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported fourth quarter net income applicable to common shareholders of $622 million, or $0.53 per diluted common share, compared with $505 million, or $0.42 per diluted common share, in the fourth quarter of 2011 and $720 million, or $0.61 per diluted common share, in the third quarter of 2012.
NEW YORK, Jan. 16, 2013 
"We are pleased to report strong year-over-year growth in fees in our Investment Management, Asset Servicing, Clearing and Treasury Services businesses. We benefited from the improvement in market values and, more importantly, from our relentless focus on generating organic growth with our broad client base. We are also driving our operational excellence initiatives to improve our efficiency and help mitigate the impact on our high margin revenues due to the low interest rate environment and tepid capital markets activity. Our balance sheet and capital ratios strengthened in 2012 even after giving effect to the repurchase of approximately $1.1 billion of our common shares in 2012," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"I wish to thank all of my colleagues across the company for their tremendous dedication and ongoing focus on improving our performance, delivering excellence to our clients and creating shareholder value," added Mr. Hassell.
Net income applicable to common shareholders totaled $2.427 billion, or $2.03 per diluted common share, for the full-year 2012 compared with $2.516 billion, or $2.03 per diluted common share, for the full-year 2011.
 
 
Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services.
Fourth Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The decreases in net interest margin (FTE) compared with both prior periods primarily reflect higher interest-earning assets driven by higher deposits levels, lower reinvestment yields, the elimination of interest on European Central Bank deposits and lower accretion.
 
The was a credit of $61 million in the fourth quarter of 2012. The credit was largely driven by a reduction in the allowance for credit losses related to the residential mortgage loan portfolio. Our residential mortgage loan portfolio has experienced better performance compared to aggregate industry historical losses. In the fourth quarter of 2012, we began using our actual loan loss experience rather than industry data to estimate the allowance for credit losses. The provision for credit losses was $23 million in the fourth quarter of 2011 and a credit of $5 million in the third quarter of 2012.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
 
 
The was 24.3% in the fourth quarter of 2012, which primarily reflects a benefit associated with the reorganization of certain foreign operations.
effective tax rate
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
We generated $687 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in the fourth quarter of 2012.
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 9.8% at Dec. 31, 2012 compared with 9.3% at Sept. 30, 2012. The increase was primarily due to lower risk-weighted assets.
 On Jan. 16, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.13 per common share. This cash dividend is payable on Feb. 5, 2013 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on Jan. 28, 2013.
Dividends (common)
 On Jan. 16, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation also declared dividends for the dividend period ending in March 2013 of $1,000.00 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock") (equivalent to approximately $10.00 per Normal Preferred Capital Security of Mellon Capital IV, referred to below, each representing 1/100
Dividends (preferred)
th
interest in a share of Series A Preferred Stock), and $1,300.00 per share on the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock") (equivalent to approximately $0.33 per depositary share, each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of the Series C Preferred Stock (the "Depositary Shares")), payable on March 20, 2013 to holders of record as of the close of business on March 5, 2013. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the March dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock on a proportionate basis to the holders of record, as of the close of business on March 5, 2013, of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities. All of the outstanding shares of the Series C Preferred Stock are held by the depositary of the Depositary Shares, which will pass through the March dividend on the Series C Preferred Stock on a proportionate basis to the holders of record, as of the close of business on March 5, 2013, of the Depositary Shares.
BNY Mellon is a global financial services company focused on helping clients manage and service their financial assets, operating in 36 countries and serving more than 100 markets. BNY Mellon is a leading provider of financial services for institutions, corporations and high-net-worth individuals, offering superior investment management and investment services through a worldwide client-focused team. It has $26.7 trillion in assets under custody/administration and $1.4 trillion in assets under management, services $11.4 trillion in outstanding debt and processes global payments averaging $1.5 trillion per day. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
 
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through Dec. 31, 2012 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations  Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EST on Jan. 16, 2013. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EST on Jan. 16, 2013. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning Jan. 16, 2013 at approximately 2 p.m. EST through Jan. 30, 2013 by dialing (866) 465-2120 (U.S.) or (203) 369-1437 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
 
 
Capital
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock, as well as the trust preferred securities which will be phased out of Basel I Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. The presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies. Additionally, BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011, and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such
 
M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense excluding results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
The following table presents investment management fees net of performance fees.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP on a fully-phased in basis.
 
 
N/ANot applicable
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including our estimated capital ratios and preliminary operating measures and statements made regarding driving our operational excellence initiatives to improve our efficiency and help mitigate impacts on our revenues and the opportunity for us to realize gains in our investment securities portfolio. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond
 
BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2012 and Sept. 30, 2012, BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of Jan. 16, 2013 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130122194748.txt.gz
TIME:20130122194748
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On January 16, 2013, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for full year 2012 and fourth quarter 2012 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on January 16, 2013, a Quarterly Earnings Review and Financial Trends information. The Quarterly Earnings Review is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and the Financial Trends information is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this report. Both exhibits are "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and are not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
 
 
Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to this report contain information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
(d)     EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FOURTH QUARTER 2012 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
(comparisons are unannualized 4Q12 vs. 4Q11 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation. Unless otherwise noted, the results for all periods in 2011 include the impact of Shareowner Services. Sequential growth rates are unannualized.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the value of certain market indices at period end and on an average basis.
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $139 million compared with $228 million in 4Q11 and $182 million in 3Q12. In 4Q12, foreign exchange revenue totaled $106 million, a decrease of 42% year-over-year and 12% sequentially. Both decreases reflect a sharp decline in volatility and a modest decrease in volumes. Other trading revenue was $33 million in 4Q12 compared with $45 million in 4Q11 and $61 million in 3Q12. The decreases compared with both prior periods reflect lower fixed income trading revenue primarily driven by lower interest rate derivative trading revenue.
 
 
Investment and other income totaled $116 million compared with $146 million in 4Q11 and $124 million in 3Q12. The year-over-year decrease primarily reflects the pre-tax gain on the sale of the Shareowner Services business recorded in 4Q11 which was partially offset by the write-down on an equity investment also recorded in 4Q11. Additionally, 4Q12 includes higher net gains on loans held-for-sale retained from a previously divested bank subsidiary. Sequentially, the decrease primarily reflects lower seed capital gains and equity investment revenue, partially offset by higher leasing gains.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONAL EXCELLENCE INITIATIVES UPDATE
 
 
In 4Q12, program costs were lower than expected as we allocated the lease restructuring charge and severance costs to restructuring expense, consistent with prior periods.
Accomplishments
Through Dec. 31, 2012, we accomplished the following operational excellence initiatives:
Business Operations
 
 
 
 
 
Technology
 
 
 
 
Corporate Services
 
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
We generated $687 million of gross Basel I Tier 1 common equity in 4Q12.
The following table presents our capital ratios.
 
 
Our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP was 9.8% at Dec. 31, 2012 compared to 9.3% at Sept. 30, 2012. The increase was primarily due to lower risk-weighted assets.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At Dec. 31, 2012, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $100.7 billion. The unrealized pre-tax net gain on our total securities portfolio was $2.4 billion at Dec. 31, 2012 compared with $2.5 billion at Sept. 30, 2012. The decrease in the unrealized pre-tax gain was primarily driven by $50 million of net realized securities gains in 4Q12. During 4Q12, we received $195 million of paydowns and sold approximately $5 million of sub-investment grade securities.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
Nonperforming assets decreased $92 million from Dec. 31, 2011 to $249 million at Dec. 31, 2012. The decrease primarily resulted from paydowns, sales, return to accrual status and charge-offs, partially offset by additions.
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $61 million in 4Q12. The credit was largely driven by a reduction in the allowance for credit losses related to the residential mortgage loan portfolio. Our residential mortgage loan portfolio has experienced better performance compared to aggregate industry historical losses. In 4Q12, we began using our actual loan loss experience rather than industry data to estimate the allowance for credit losses. The provision for credit losses was $23 million in 4Q11 and a credit of $5 million in 3Q12.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, alternative investment services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related services, the leasing portfolio, corporate treasury activities, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items. Results in 2011 include the Shareowner Services business.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock, as well as the trust preferred securities which will be phased out of Basel I Tier 1 regulatory capital beginning in 2013. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. The presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies. Additionally, BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds and other revenue related to the Shareowner Services business, which was sold on Dec. 31, 2011; and expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges, amortization of intangible assets and direct expenses related to the Shareowner Services business. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business. BNY Mellon also presents revenue and noninterest expense excluding results relating to the Shareowner Services business so that an investor may compare those results with other periods, which do not include the Shareowner Services business.
The presentation of income (loss) from consolidated investment management funds, net of net income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents investment management and performance fees excluding the impact of the Meriten acquisition.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following table presents investment management fees generated in the Investment Management segment excluding the impact of the Meriten acquisition.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following tables present fee and other revenue and noninterest expense excluding Shareowner Services.
 
 
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a fully-phased-in basis.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including our estimated capital ratios and preliminary operating measures and statements made regarding our operational excellence initiatives, and the opportunity for us to realize gains as we rebalance and manage duration risk in our
 
 
Page - 23
BNY Mellon 4Q12 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
investment securities portfolio. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2012 and Sept. 30, 2012, BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of Jan. 16, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 24

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
Results for the first quarter of 2010 include a charge related to special litigation reserves.
Expense efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in 2010 and 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period's presentation.
Discontinued Operations Accounting:
The income/(loss) and average assets from discontinued operations accounting have not been allocated to any business.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference. Consolidated average assets include average assets of discontinued operations.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Non-GAAP Financial Measures' and Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated January 16, 2013, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data on the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 or other reports filed with the SEC.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: See pages 3 through 6 for additional details of revenue/expense items impacting continuing operations.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued)
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT/ CUSTODY AND ADMINISTRATION / SECURITIES LENDING - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT - 12 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
INVESTMENT SERVICES - 12 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
OTHER - 12 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
n/m - not meaningful
Note: See pages
9-11
for details of revenue/expense items impacting respective business results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
CONTINUING OPERATIONS - 12 Quarter Trend
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130212075635.txt.gz
TIME:20130212075635
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 11, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") issued a press release in response to a ruling by the U.S. Tax Court regarding the Internal Revenue Service's disallowance of certain foreign tax credits claimed for the 2001 and 2002 tax years. As a result of the ruling, BNY Mellon expects to take an after-tax charge of approximately $850 million during the first quarter of 2013. After taking the charge, BNY Mellon expects it will continue to be well capitalized and its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio will be impacted by approximately 55 basis points. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
The information presented in this Current Report on Form 8-K may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, our after-tax charge during the first quarter of 2013, our well capitalized status and the impact on our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, the Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2012 and September 30, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this Form 8-K speak only as of February 12, 2013 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update the information in this Form 8-K to reflect events or circumstances that arise after that date or reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events, except as required by federal securities laws.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, February 11, 2013  BNY Mellon issued the following statement in response to a ruling published today by the U.S. Tax Court regarding the Internal Revenue Service's disallowance of certain foreign tax credits claimed for the 2001 and 2002 tax years:
"We will appeal the court's decision. We continue to believe the tax treatment of the transaction was consistent with statutory and judicial authority existing at the time. As a result of the ruling, BNY Mellon expects to take an after-tax charge of approximately $850 million during the first quarter of 2013. After taking the charge, the company expects it will continue to be well capitalized and its Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio will be impacted by approximately 55 basis points. At December 31, 2012, our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio was 9.8%."
BNY Mellon is a global investments company dedicated to helping its clients manage and service their financial assets throughout the investment lifecycle. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, BNY Mellon delivers informed investment management and investment services in 36 countries and more than 100 markets. As of December 31, 2012, BNY Mellon had $26.7 trillion in assets under custody and administration, and $1.4 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on , or follow us on Twitter @BNYMellon.
www.bnymellon.com
Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio represents a non-GAAP measure. Additional disclosure regarding this and other non-GAAP measures is available in our reports filed with the SEC, including our current report on Form 8-K filed on January 16, 2013 and available at www.bnymellon.com/investorrelations.
This press release contains statements that are considered "forward-looking statements." These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, our expectations regarding our after-tax charge during the first quarter of 2013, our well-capitalized status and the impact on our Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio. These forward-looking statements are based on current beliefs and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). For additional information with respect to risks and other factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, see the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2011, the Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2012 and September 30, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of February 11, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after February 11, 2013 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130306161827.txt.gz
TIME:20130306161827
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
On March 6, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") issued (i) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 0.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "3-Year Fixed Rate Notes"), (ii) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "3-Year Floating Rate Notes"), (iii) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 1.350% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Fixed Rate Notes") and (iv) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Floating Rate Notes" and, together with the 3-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the 3-Year Floating Rate Notes and the 5-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832). In connection with this issuance, the legal opinion as to the legality of the Notes is being filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this report.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the issuance and sale by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), of (i) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 0.700% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "3-Year Fixed Rate Notes"), (ii) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2016 (the "3-Year Floating Rate Notes"), (iii) $600,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.350% Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Fixed Rate Notes") and (iv) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Senior Medium-Term Notes Series G due 2018 (the "5-Year Floating Rate Notes", and, together with the 3-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the 3-Year Floating Rate Notes and the 5-Year Fixed Rate Notes, the "Notes"), in each case pursuant to an Indenture dated as of July 18, 1991, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas (formerly known as Bankers Trust Company), as Trustee (the "Indenture"), a Distribution Agreement, dated June 15, 2006 (the "Distribution Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto, a Letter Agreement, dated March 4, 2013 (the "Letter Agreement"), among the Company and the agents party thereto and a Terms Agreement, dated March 4, 2013, relating to the Notes (the "Terms Agreement"), I, as counsel for the Company, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and established by the Company in conformity with the Indenture, and, when the Notes have been duly prepared, executed, authenticated and issued in accordance with the Indenture and delivered against payment in accordance with the Distribution Agreement, the Letter Agreement and the Terms Agreement, the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
I have relied as to certain matters on information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Trustee, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
This opinion letter has been prepared to be filed by the Company as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K"). The Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (333-167832). I assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter.
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus dated June 28, 2010, as supplemented by a Prospectus Supplement, dated August 6, 2010, under the captions "Validity of the Notes" and "Validity of Securities." By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130314165358.txt.gz
TIME:20130314165358
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 14, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company" or "BNY Mellon") announced in a press release that the Federal Reserve did not object to its 2013 capital plan submitted to the Federal Reserve in connection with its Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review. The Company also announced that its Board of Directors approved the repurchase of up to $1.35 billion of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"), beginning in the second quarter of 2013 and continuing through the first quarter of 2014, which may be executed through open market purchases, privately negotiated or through other means, at such prices, at such times and upon such other terms and conditions as any authorized officer may determine. This new share repurchase plan replaces all previously authorized share repurchase plans. The 2013 capital plan also included a 15 percent increase to BNY Mellon's quarterly Common Stock dividend in the second quarter of 2013, which the Board of Directors is expected to consider at its April meeting. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference, except for the contents of the Company's website referenced herein and in Exhibit 99.1 which are not incorporated into this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information presented in this Current Report on Form 8-K may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, Common Stock repurchases and dividends. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this Current Report on Form 8-K speak only as of March 14, 2013 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update the information to reflect events or circumstances that arise after that date or reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events, except as required by federal securities laws.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, March 14, 2013  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced that the Federal Reserve did not object to its 2013 capital plan submitted in connection with its Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review. As a result, the company's board of directors has approved the repurchase of up to $1.35 billion of its common stock, beginning in the second quarter of 2013 and continuing through the first quarter of 2014. The 2013 capital plan also included a 15 percent increase to BNY Mellon's quarterly common stock dividend in the second quarter of 2013, which the board of directors is expected to consider at its April meeting.
"Our board's action, along with the Federal Reserve's notice that it does not object to our capital plan, provides the opportunity to continue to return capital to shareholders," said Gerald L. Hassell, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer. "We are pleased that our business model generates significant capital that enables us to invest in growth opportunities, strengthen our balance sheet and deliver returns to our shareholders."
BNY Mellon also announced that it has published a summary of its and The Bank of New York Mellon's company-run results under the Dodd-Frank stress tests, applying the Federal Reserve's severely adverse scenario. These results are available in the Investor Relations section of the company's website at http://www.bnymellon.com/investorrelations/doddfrank.html.
BNY Mellon is a global investments company dedicated to helping its clients manage and service their financial assets throughout the investment lifecycle. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, BNY Mellon delivers informed investment management and investment services in 36 countries and more than 100 markets. As of December 31, 2012, BNY Mellon had $26.2 trillion in assets under custody and/or administration, and $1.4 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create, trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com, or follow us on Twitter @BNYMellon.
The information presented in this news release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, BNY Mellon's capital plan, including expectations with respect to the repurchase of shares of outstanding common stock and any increase in common stock dividends, and BNY Mellon's business model, including expectations regarding capital. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of March 14, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after March 14, 2013 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130409162246.txt.gz
TIME:20130409162246
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On April 9, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation issued a press release that its Board of Directors has approved a 15 percent increase in its quarterly common stock dividend from $0.13 per share to $0.15 per share. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, April 9, 2013  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced that its board of directors has approved a 15 percent increase in its quarterly common stock dividend, from $0.13 per share to $0.15 per share. This increased quarterly common stock dividend is payable on May 7, 2013 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 29, 2013.
The dividend increase and the previously announced common stock share repurchase of up to $1.35 billion were part of the company's 2013 capital plan submitted to the Federal Reserve.
"We are pleased that our business model generates significant capital and enables us to increase our dividend," said Gerald L. Hassell, BNY Mellon chairman and chief executive officer.
BNY Mellon also declared these preferred stock dividends for the dividend period ending in June 2013:
 
 
BNY Mellon is a global investments company dedicated to helping its clients manage and service their financial assets throughout the investment lifecycle. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, BNY Mellon delivers informed investment management and investment services in 36 countries and more than 100 markets. As of December 31, 2012, BNY Mellon had $26.2 trillion in assets under custody and/or administration, and $1.4 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create, trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (NYSE: BK). Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com, or follow us on Twitter @BNYMellon.
 
The information presented in this news release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language, relate to, among other things, BNY Mellon's dividends and share repurchase plans. These statements are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of April 9, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after April 9, 2013 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130410161246.txt.gz
TIME:20130410161246
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.07. SUBMISSION OF MATTERS TO A VOTE OF SECURITY HOLDERS.
At the Annual Meeting of Stockholders of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") on April 9, 2013, each nominee for director was elected by a majority of votes cast. Management proposals 2 and 3 were approved. The proposals below are described in detail in BNY Mellon's definitive proxy statement, dated March 8, 2013, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Abstentions and broker non-votes were counted for purposes of determining whether a quorum was present, but were not treated as votes cast on a proposal. Therefore, broker non-votes and abstentions did not have the effect of a vote for or against the proposal and were not counted in determining the number of votes required for approval.
The results are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130417070720.txt.gz
TIME:20130417070720
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On April 17, 2013, the Registrant issued a press release announcing results of operations for first quarter 2013. A copy of this press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report pursuant to General Instruction B.2 of Form 8-K and is not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and is not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933. The references in the press release to the Registrant's website, , shall not be deemed to include the contents of the website in the press release or in this Form 8-K.
http://www.bnymellon.com/
 
 
Exhibit 99.1 to this report contains information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Press Release
 
BNY MELLON REPORTS FIRST QUARTER LOSS OF $0.23 PER COMMON SHARE
EPS OF $0.50 EXCLUDING THE PREVIOUSLY ANNOUNCED CHARGE RELATED TO THE DISALLOWANCE OF CERTAIN TAX CREDITS
(a)
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT AND PERFORMANCE FEES UP 10% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
 
 
ASSET SERVICING FEES UP 3% YEAR-OVER-YEAR
AS PREVIOUSLY ANNOUNCED, BOARD APPROVED A COMMON STOCK DIVIDEND INCREASE OF 15% AND THE REPURCHASE OF UP TO $1.35 BILLION OF COMMON STOCK
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation ("BNY Mellon") (NYSE:BK) today reported a first quarter net loss applicable to common shareholders of $266 million, or $0.23 per diluted common share, which included a previously announced charge of $854 million, or $0.73 per common share, related to the U.S. Tax Court's disallowance of certain foreign tax credits. Excluding this charge, net income applicable to common shareholders was $588 million and earnings per diluted common share was $0.50. This compares with income of $619 million, or $0.52 per diluted common share, in the first quarter of 2012 and income of $622 million, or $0.53 per diluted common share, in the fourth quarter of 2012.
NEW YORK, April 17, 2013 
"We remain focused on our key priorities: investing in our businesses to drive organic growth and sustainable shareholder value; controlling discretionary expenses; maintaining a strong balance sheet and returning capital to shareholders," said Gerald L. Hassell, chairman and chief executive officer of BNY Mellon.
"We are pleased to report our fourteenth consecutive quarter of net long-term asset management flows, and continued growth in investment services fees," added Mr. Hassell. "Investments in our Investment Management, Global Collateral Services and Global Markets businesses have positioned us well for future growth, and we remain on track to deliver the savings from our operational excellence initiatives."
"Finally, the earnings power and strength of our business model allowed us to announce a capital plan that includes share repurchases of up to $1.35 billion, a 16% increase from the prior year's board authorization, and a 15% increase in the quarterly dividend to 15 cents per share beginning in the second quarter," concluded Mr. Hassell.
 
 
1
Sequential growth rates are unannualized. Please refer to the Quarterly Earnings Review for a detailed review of our businesses.
First Quarter Results 
Total revenue
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
The decrease in net interest margin (FTE) compared with the first quarter of 2012 primarily reflects higher average interest-earning assets driven by higher deposits levels, lower reinvestment yields, lower accretion and the elimination of interest on European Central Bank deposits.
 
The was a credit of $24 million in the first quarter of 2013. Approximately half of the credit was driven by a broad improvement in the credit quality of the loan portfolio and half related to a reduction in our qualitative allowance. The provision for credit losses was $5 million in the first quarter of 2012 and a credit of $61 million in the fourth quarter of 2012.
provision for credit losses
Total noninterest expense
 
 
 
The provision for income taxes totaled $1.0 billion and includes the $854 million charge related to the disallowance of certain foreign tax credits. Excluding this charge, the on an operating basis  Non-GAAP was 24% in the first quarter of 2013.
effective tax rate
 
3
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 As previously disclosed on April 9, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation announced a 15% increase in the quarterly common stock dividend, from $0.13 per share to $0.15 per share. This cash dividend is payable on May 7, 2013 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 29, 2013.
Dividends (common)
 As previously disclosed on April 9, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation also declared dividends for the dividend period ending in June 2013 of $1,022.22 per share on the Series A Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock") (equivalent to approximately $10.22 per Normal Preferred Capital Security of Mellon Capital IV, referred to below, each representing 1/100
Dividends (preferred)
th
interest in a share of Series A Preferred Stock), and $1,300.00 per share on the Series C Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock") (equivalent to approximately $0.33 per depositary share, each representing a 1/4,000th interest in a share of the Series C Preferred Stock), payable on June 20, 2013 to holders of record as of the close of business on June 5, 2013. All of the outstanding shares of the Series A Preferred Stock are owned by Mellon Capital IV, which will pass through the June dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock on a proportionate basis to the holders of record, as of the close of business on June 5, 2013, of its Normal Preferred Capital Securities. All of the outstanding shares of the Series C Preferred Stock are held by the depositary of the depositary shares, which will pass through the June dividend on the Series C Preferred Stock on a proportionate basis to the holders of record, as of the close of business on June 5, 2013, of the depositary shares.
BNY Mellon is a global investments company dedicated to helping its clients manage and service their financial assets throughout the investment lifecycle. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, BNY Mellon delivers informed investment management and investment services in 36 countries and more than 100 markets. As of March 31, 2013, BNY Mellon had $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and/or administration, and $1.4 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create, trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. Additional information is available on www.bnymellon.com, or follow us on Twitter@BNYMellon.
 
4
Supplemental Financial Information
The Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation have been updated through March 31, 2013 and are available at www.bnymellon.com (Investor Relations - Financial Reports).
Conference Call Data
Gerald L. Hassell, chairman and chief executive officer and Thomas P. Gibbons, vice chairman and chief financial officer, along with other members of executive management from BNY Mellon, will host a conference call and simultaneous live audio webcast at 8:00 a.m. EDT on April 17, 2013. This conference call and audio webcast will include forward-looking statements and may include other material information.
Persons wishing to access the conference call and audio webcast may do so by dialing (888) 677-5383 (U.S.) and (773) 799-3611 (International), and using the passcode: Earnings, or by logging on to www.bnymellon.com. The Earnings Release, together with the Quarterly Earnings Review and Supplemental Financial Trends, will be available at www.bnymellon.com beginning at approximately 6:30 a.m. EDT on April 17, 2013. Replays of the conference call and audio webcast will be available beginning April 17, 2013 at approximately 2 p.m. EDT through May 1, 2013 by dialing (800) 947-5189 (U.S.) or (203) 369-3554 (International). The archived version of the conference call and audio webcast will also be available at www.bnymellon.com for the same time period.
 
5
 
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
7
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation.
 
8
 
 
 
9
Capital
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
Supplemental information  Explanation of Non-GAAP financial measures
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Release certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon Tier 1 common equity and tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities from the numerator of the ratio. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds; expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges and amortization of intangible assets; as well as earnings per share and the provision for income taxes which exclude the charge related to the disallowance of certain foreign tax credits; and investment management fees excluding the impact of the acquisition of Meriten. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I
 
10
expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared with our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business.
In this Earnings Release, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice. The adjustment to an FTE basis has no impact on net income.
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and business-level basis.
The following table presents a reconciliation of earnings per common share and net income.
 
The following table presents the calculation of the return on common equity and the return on tangible common equity.
 
 
.
N/M  Not meaningful
 
11
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
The following table presents investment management and performance fees excluding the impact of the Meriten acquisition.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
The following table presents the calculation of the effective tax rate.
 
 
12
The following table presents the calculation of the equity to assets ratio and book value per common share.
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
 
 
13
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
Cautionary Statement
The information presented in this Earnings Release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including our estimated capital ratios and preliminary business metrics and statements made regarding our key priorities, operational excellence initiatives, investments in our businesses and the opportunity for us to realize gains in our investment securities portfolio. These statements, which may be expressed in a variety of ways, include the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of BNY Mellon which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Release, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements can be found in the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Release speak only as of April 17, 2013 and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130419165729.txt.gz
TIME:20130419165729
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On April 17, 2013, the Registrant conducted a conference call and webcast with respect to results of operations for first quarter 2013 for The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation. In conjunction with the conference call and webcast, the Registrant made available on its website, beginning on April 17, 2013, a Quarterly Earnings Review and Financial Trends information. The Quarterly Earnings Review is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and the Financial Trends information is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this report. Both exhibits are "furnished" pursuant to General Instruction B.2. of Form 8-K and are not "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are not incorporated by reference into any filings the Registrant has made or may make under the Securities Act of 1933.
 
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to this report contain information which may be considered to constitute "non-GAAP financial measures" as defined in Item 10 of Regulation S-K. The Registrant's management believes that these measures are useful to the investment community in analyzing the financial results and trends of ongoing operations. Management believes that they facilitate comparisons with prior periods and reflect the principal basis on which management monitors financial performance. Management also believes this presentation allows investors to more appropriately evaluate the impact of revenues from both taxable and tax-exempt sources.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FIRST QUARTER 2013 FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS
(comparisons are unannualized 1Q13 vs. 1Q12 unless otherwise stated)
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Certain immaterial reclassifications have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period presentation. Sequential growth rates are unannualized.
 
 
Page - 2
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 3
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CONSOLIDATED BUSINESS METRICS
 
 
 
 
Page - 4
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the value of certain market indices at period end and on an average basis.
 
 
 
 
Page - 5
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 6
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
Foreign exchange and other trading revenue totaled $161 million in 1Q13 compared with $191 million in 1Q12 and $139 million in 4Q12. In 1Q13, foreign exchange revenue totaled $149 million, an increase of 10% year-over-year and 41% sequentially. The year-over year increase primarily reflects higher volumes, partially offset by a decrease in volatility, while the sequential increase primarily reflects increased volatility and higher volumes. Other trading revenue was $12 million in 1Q13 compared with $55 million in 1Q12 and $33 million in 4Q12. Other trading revenue was lower principally due to losses on interest rate hedges and lower fixed income and equity trading.
 
 
Investment and other income totaled $72 million in 1Q13 compared with $139 million in 1Q12 and $116 million in 4Q12. Both decreases reflect lower leasing gains and lower foreign currency remeasurement. Additionally, the year-over-year decrease includes lower seed capital gains and the sequential decrease includes lower net gains on loans held for sale retained from a previously divested bank subsidiary.
 
 
 
Page - 7
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NET INTEREST REVENUE
 
bps  basis points.
FTE  fully taxable equivalent.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 8
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONINTEREST EXPENSE
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 9
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
OPERATIONAL EXCELLENCE INITIATIVES UPDATE
 
 
Accomplishments
During 1Q13, we accomplished the following operational excellence initiatives:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 10
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
CAPITAL
The following table presents our Basel I Tier 1 common equity generated.
 
The following table presents our capital ratios.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
 
 
Page - 11
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SECURITIES PORTFOLIO
At March 31, 2013, the fair value of our investment securities portfolio totaled $106.6 billion. The net unrealized pre-tax gain on our total securities portfolio was $2.2 billion at March 31, 2013 compared with $2.4 billion at Dec. 31, 2012. The decrease in the net unrealized pre-tax gain was primarily driven by an increase in market interest rates and $48 million of net realized securities gains in 1Q13. During 1Q13, we received $183 million of paydowns and sold $141 million of sub-investment grade securities.
The following table shows the distribution of our investment securities portfolio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 12
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
NONPERFORMING ASSETS
 
 
Nonperforming assets were $234 million at March 31, 2013, a decrease of $15 million from $249 million at Dec. 31, 2012. The decrease primarily resulted from paydowns, sales, return to accrual status and charge-offs in the other residential mortgage loan portfolio.
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS
 
The provision for credit losses was a credit of $24 million in 1Q13. Approximately half of the credit was driven by a broad improvement in the credit quality of the loan portfolio and half related to a reduction in our qualitative allowance. The provision for credit losses was $5 million in 1Q12 and a credit of $61 million in 4Q12.
REVIEW OF BUSINESSES
Segment results are subject to reclassification whenever improvements are made in the measurement principles or when organizational changes are made. In 1Q13, incentive expense related to restricted stock and certain corporate overhead charges were allocated to Investment Management and Investment Services businesses which were previous included in the Other segment. All prior periods were restated to reflect these changes. Additionally, 1Q13 reflects higher internal crediting rates for domestic deposits, which are regularly updated to reflect the value of deposit balances and distribution of overall interest revenue. There was no impact to consolidated results.
 
 
Page - 13
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides investment management services to institutional and retail investors, as well as investment management, wealth and estate planning and private banking solutions to high net worth individuals and families, and foundations and endowments.
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
 
 
Page - 14
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 15
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
provides global custody and related services, broker-dealer services, global collateral services, corporate trust, depositary receipt and clearing services as well as global payment/working capital solutions to global financial institutions.
INVESTMENT SERVICES
 
 
 
 
Page - 16
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
INVESTMENT SERVICES KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 17
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
primarily includes credit-related activities, leasing operations, corporate treasury activities, global markets and institutional banking services, business exits, M&I expenses and other corporate revenue and expense items.
OTHER SEGMENT
 
KEY POINTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page - 18
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION  EXPLANATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
BNY Mellon has included in this Earnings Review certain Non-GAAP financial measures based upon Tier 1 common equity and tangible common shareholders' equity. BNY Mellon believes that the ratio of Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets and the ratio of tangible common shareholders' equity to tangible assets of operations are measures of capital strength that provide additional useful information to investors, supplementing the Tier 1 and Total capital ratios which are utilized by regulatory authorities. The ratio of Basel I Tier 1 common equity to risk-weighted assets excludes preferred stock and trust preferred securities from the numerator of the ratio. Unlike the Basel I Tier 1 and Total capital ratios, the tangible common shareholders' equity ratio fully incorporates those changes in investment securities valuations which are reflected in total shareholders' equity. In addition, this ratio is expressed as a percentage of the actual book value of assets, as opposed to a percentage of a risk-based reduced value established in accordance with regulatory requirements, although BNY Mellon in its calculation has excluded certain assets which are given a zero percent risk-weighting for regulatory purposes. Further, BNY Mellon believes that the return on tangible common equity measure, which excludes goodwill and intangible assets net of deferred tax liabilities, is a useful additional measure for investors because it presents a measure of BNY Mellon's performance in reference to those assets which are productive in generating income. BNY Mellon has provided a measure of tangible book value per share, which it believes provides additional useful information as to the level of such assets in relation to shares of common stock outstanding. BNY Mellon has presented its estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio on a basis that is representative of how it currently understands the Basel III rules. Management views the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio as a key measure in monitoring BNY Mellon's capital position. Additionally, the presentation of the Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio allows investors to compare BNY Mellon's Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio with estimates presented by other companies.
BNY Mellon has presented revenue measures which exclude the effect of noncontrolling interests related to consolidated investment management funds; expense measures which exclude M&I expenses, litigation charges, restructuring charges and amortization of intangible assets; as well as earnings per share and the provision for income taxes which exclude the charge related to the disallowance of certain foreign tax credits; and investment management fees excluding the impact of the acquisition of Meriten. Return on equity measures and operating margin measures, which exclude some or all of these items, are also presented. BNY Mellon believes that these measures are useful to investors because they permit a focus on period-to-period comparisons which relate to the ability of BNY Mellon to enhance revenues and limit expenses in circumstances where such matters are within BNY Mellon's control. The excluded items in general relate to certain ongoing charges as a result of prior transactions or where we have incurred charges. M&I expenses primarily relate to the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing on July 1, 2010 and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH on Aug. 2, 2010. M&I expenses generally continue for approximately three years after the transaction and can vary on a year-to-year basis depending on the stage of the integration. BNY Mellon believes that the exclusion of M&I expenses provides investors with a focus on BNY Mellon's business as it would appear on a consolidated going-forward basis, after such M&I expenses have ceased. Future periods will not reflect such M&I expenses, and thus may be more easily compared to our current results if M&I expenses are excluded. Litigation charges represent accruals for loss contingencies that are both probable and reasonably estimable, but exclude standard business-related legal fees. Restructuring charges relate to our operational excellence initiatives and migrating positions to global delivery centers. Excluding these charges permits investors to view expenses on a basis consistent with how management views the business.
The presentation of income from consolidated investment management funds, net of net income attributable to noncontrolling interest related to the consolidation of certain investment management funds permits investors to view revenue on a basis consistent with prior periods. BNY Mellon believes that these presentations, as a supplement to GAAP information, give investors a clearer picture of the results of its primary businesses.
In this Earnings Review, the net interest margin is presented on an FTE basis. We believe that this presentation provides comparability of amounts arising from both taxable and tax-exempt sources, and is consistent with industry practice.
 
 
Page - 19
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
Each of these measures as described above is used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business-level basis.
The following table presents investment management and performance fees excluding the impact of the Meriten acquisition.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
The following table presents investment management fees generated in the Investment Management segment excluding the impact of the Meriten acquisition.
 
N/A  Not applicable.
The following table presents the calculation of the pre-tax operating margin ratio.
 
 
 
 
Page - 20
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of the returns on common equity and tangible common equity.
 
 
N/M  Not meaningful.
The following table presents income from consolidated investment management funds, net of noncontrolling interests.
 
The following table presents the line items in the Investment Management business impacted by the consolidated investment management funds.
 
 
 
Page - 21
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our Basel I Tier 1 common equity ratio  Non-GAAP.
 
 
 
 
Page - 22
BNY Mellon 1Q13 Quarterly Earnings Review
 
 
The following table presents the calculation of our estimated Basel III Tier 1 common equity ratio.
 
 
N/A  Not applicable.
Cautionary Statement
A number of statements (i) in this Quarterly Earnings Review, (ii) in our presentations and (iii) in the responses to questions on our conference call discussing our quarterly results and other public events may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including our estimated capital ratios and preliminary business metrics and statements made regarding our operational excellence initiatives, and the opportunity for us to realize gains as we rebalance and manage duration risk in our investment securities portfolio. These statements may be expressed in a variety of ways, including the use of future or present tense language. These statements and other forward-looking statements contained in other public disclosures of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation which make reference to the cautionary factors described in this Earnings Review, are based upon current beliefs and expectations and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). Actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied as a result of these risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the risk factors and other uncertainties set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2012 and BNY Mellon's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements in this Earnings Review speak only as of April 17, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after that date or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
 
 
Page - 23

Exhibit 99.2
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Financial Trends
Notes:
The following transactions/changes have impacted the reporting of our results:
In the first quarter of 2013, incentive expense related to restricted stock and certain corporate overhead charges were allocated to Investment Management and Investment Services businesses which were previously included in the Other segment. All prior periods were restated to reflect these changes. Additionally, the first quarter of 2013 reflects higher internal crediting rates for domestic deposits, which are regularly updated to reflect the value of deposit balances and distribution of overall interest revenue. There was no impact to consolidated results.
On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
On July 1, 2010 and August 2, 2010 we completed the acquisitions of Global Investment Servicing ("GIS") and BHF Asset Servicing GmbH ("BAS"). The financial results for GIS are included in the Investment Services and Other businesses. The financial results for BAS are included in the Investment Services business.
On January 1, 2010, we adopted SFAS No. 167, "Amendments to FASB Interpretation No. 46 (R)." Certain investment management funds are disclosed separately on our balance sheet and securitizations are included in available-for-sale securities. The income statement separately discloses the operations of consolidated asset management funds and the net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of consolidated investment management funds; previously these were disclosed as investment management and performance fees revenue and investment and other income.
The following items have impacted the comparability of our results:
The first quarter of 2013 includes a tax charge related to the disallowance of certain foreign tax credits.
The second quarter of 2012 includes a charge related to the settlement of the Sigma class action lawsuit.
2010 includes a charge related to special litigation reserves in the first quarter.
Expense efficiency restructuring charges - Recorded charges in 2010 and 2011
All of these items are detailed in the trends that follow.
Certain immaterial reclassifications/revisions have been made to prior periods to place them on a basis comparable with the current period's presentation.
Average Assets:
In businesses where average deposits are greater than average loans, average assets include an allocation of investment securities equal to the difference.
Return on Common and Tangible Common Equity/Pretax Operating Margin:
Ratios are presented for continuing operations basis only in 2010. Quarterly return on common and tangible common equity ratios are annualized.
Non-GAAP Measures:
Certain Non-GAAP measures are included in the following schedules. These measures are used by management to monitor financial performance, both on a company-wide and on a business basis. These Non-GAAP measures impact certain revenue/expense categories, percentages and ratios by the exclusion and/or adjustment of items listed above and described in footnotes. For further information, see Supplemental Information - Explanation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures' in The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Quarterly Earnings Review dated April 17, 2013, furnished as an exhibit to the Report on Form 8-K to which these Financial Trends are furnished as an exhibit.
Summations may not equal due to rounding. As a result of this rounding convention, immaterial differences may exist between the business trends data versus business data in the Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 or other reports filed with the SEC.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
9 Quarter Trend
 
 
Note: See pages 3 through 6 for additional details of revenue/expense items impacting continuing operations.
N/M - Not meaningful
N/A - Not available
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
FEE AND OTHER REVENUE - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
N/A - Not available
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Average Balances and Interest Rates - 9 Quarter Trend
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
Average Balances and Interest Rates (continued) - 9 Quarter Trend
 
Note: Interest and average rates were calculated on a taxable equivalent basis, at tax rates of approximately 35%, using dollar amounts in thousands and the actual number of days in the year.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
NONINTEREST EXPENSE - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT, CUSTODY AND/OR ADMINISTRATION AND SECURITIES LENDING - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
N/A - Not available
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT NET FLOWS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT BUSINESS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
INVESTMENT SERVICES BUSINESS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
N/A - Not available
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
OTHER SEGMENT- 9 Quarter Trend
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
BUSINESSES
 
Note: On December 31, 2011, BNY Mellon sold its Shareowner Services business. In the first quarter of 2012, we reclassified the results of the Shareowner Services business from the Investment Services business to the Other segment. The reclassification did not impact the consolidated results. All prior periods have been restated.
 
N/M - Not meaningful
Note: See page
10
for businesses results.
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
NONPERFORMING ASSETS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION
ALLOWANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES, PROVISION AND NET CHARGE-OFFS - 9 Quarter Trend
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130514163714.txt.gz
TIME:20130514163714
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 14, 2013, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Company") sent a redemption notice to Manufacturers & Traders Trust Company, the Property Trustee for BNY Institutional Capital Trust A, which will result in the redemption of its $300,000,000 liquidation amount of 7.78% Capital Securities, Series A ($1,000 liquidation amount per security), CUSIP No. 05563QAA8, on June 14, 2013. The redemption price of each security will be equal to 101.556% of the liquidation amount of the securities plus accumulated and unpaid distributions in the amount of $2.80944 per security. Accrued semi-annual distributions of $38.90 per security will be paid on June 1, 2013 to holders of record as of the close of business on May 16, 2013 in the customary manner.
 
(d) EXHIBITS.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEW YORK, May 14, 2013  BNY Mellon, the global leader in investment management and investment services, today announced that all outstanding 7.78% Capital Securities, Series A, issued by BNY Institutional Capital Trust A (liquidation amount $1,000 per security and $300 million in the aggregate) will be redeemed on June 14, 2013. The redemption price for the 7.78% Capital Securities, Series A will be equal to $1,015.56 per security plus accrued and unpaid distributions up to and excluding the redemption date in the amount of $2.80944.
The Capital Securities are held only in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Corporation ("DTC"). DTC will redeem the Capital Securities in accordance with its procedures and notify the holders. Holders of the Capital Securities need not take any action to receive payment of the redemption price.
BNY Mellon is a global investments company dedicated to helping its clients manage and service their financial assets throughout the investment lifecycle. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, BNY Mellon delivers informed investment management and investment services in 36 countries and more than 100 markets. As of March 31, 2013, BNY Mellon had $26.3 trillion in assets under custody and/or administration, and $1.4 trillion in assets under management. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create, trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments. BNY Mellon is the corporate brand of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation.
This press release contains statements that are considered "forward-looking statements." These forward-looking statements are based on current beliefs and assumptions that involve risks and uncertainties and that are subject to change based on various important factors (some of which are beyond BNY Mellon's control). For additional information with respect to risks and other factors that could cause BNY Mellon's results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, see the risk factors set forth in BNY Mellon's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended Dec. 31, 2012 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All statements in this press release speak only as of May 14, 2013, and BNY Mellon undertakes no obligation to update any statement to reflect events or circumstances after May 14, 2013 or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BK/BK-8K-20130516164254.txt.gz
TIME:20130516164254
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 3.03. Material Modification to Rights of Security Holders.
Upon issuance of the Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference $100,000 per share, par value $0.01 per share (the "Series D Preferred Stock") by The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation (the "Registrant") on May 17, 2013, the ability of the Registrant to declare or pay dividends on, or purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, shares of its common stock or any shares of the Registrant that rank junior to the Series D Preferred Stock will be subject to certain restrictions in the event that the Registrant does not declare and pay (or set aside) dividends on the Series D Preferred Stock for the last preceding dividend period. The terms of the Series D Preferred Stock, including such restrictions, are more fully described in the Certificate of Designations (as defined in Item 5.03 below), a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this current report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On May 16, 2013, the Registrant filed a Certificate of Designations (the "Certificate of Designations") with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware to establish the preferences, limitations and relative rights of the Series D Preferred Stock. The Certificate of Designations became effective upon filing, and a copy is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 10, 2013, the Registrant entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., UBS Securities LLC and BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC, as representatives of the several underwriters listed therein (the "Underwriters"), relating to the public offering (the "Offering") of 500,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/100th interest in a share of the Series D Preferred Stock. The Underwriting Agreement contains various representations, warranties and agreements by the Registrant, conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties and termination provisions. The description of the Underwriting Agreement set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Underwriting Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. This Current Report on Form 8-K is being filed for the purpose of filing Exhibit 1.1 as an exhibit to the Registrant's registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) (the "Registration Statement") and such exhibit is hereby incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
A copy of the opinion of Craig T. Beazer, Chief Securities Counsel of the Registrant, relating to the legality of the issuance and sale of Series D Preferred Stock is attached as Exhibit 5.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. Exhibits 5.1 and 23.1 of this Current Report on Form 8-K are hereby incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
The Deposit Agreement, dated as of May 16, 2013 (the "Deposit Agreement"), by and among the Registrant, Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depositary receipts described therein, relating to the Depositary Shares is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. The form of certificate representing the Series D Preferred Stock and the form of depositary receipt representing the Depositary Shares are filed and included as Exhibit A and Exhibit B, respectively, to the Deposit Agreement and are incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
Execution Version
May 10, 2013
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
UBS Securities LLC
BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC
As representatives (the "")
Representatives
of the several Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
c/o Goldman, Sachs & Co.
200 West Street
New York, New York 10282
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation registered as a financial holding company and a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (the ""), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, to issue and sell 500,000 depositary shares (the ""), each representing a 1/100
Company
Depositary Shares
th
interest in a share of Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock (the "") of the Company (such number of Depositary Shares, the "), to the several Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ""), for whom you are acting as representatives. The Preferred Stock shall have the rights, powers and preferences set forth in the certificate of designations to be dated on or about May 16, 2013 relating thereto (the ""). The shares of Preferred Stock represented by the Securities are to be deposited by the Company against delivery of depositary receipts evidencing the Securities (the "") that are to be issued by Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary (the ""), under a Deposit Agreement, to be dated on or about May 17, 2013 (the ""), among the Company, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts issued thereunder.
Preferred Stock
"Securities
Underwriters
Certificate of Designations
Depositary Receipts
Depositary
Deposit Agreement
1. . The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) An "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) in respect of the Securities has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the
Act
"") not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; such registration statement, and any post-effective amendment thereto, became effective on filing; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of such registration statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose has been initiated or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, any request on the part of the Commission for additional information with respect to such registration statement has been complied with, and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company (the base prospectus filed as part of such registration statement, in the form in which it has most recently been filed with the Commission on or prior to the date of this Agreement, is hereinafter called the ""; any preliminary prospectus (including any preliminary prospectus supplement) relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act is hereinafter called a ""; the various parts of such registration statement, including all exhibits thereto but excluding any Form T-1 and including any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities that is filed with the Commission and deemed by virtue of Rule 430B to be part of such registration statement, each as amended at the time such part of the registration statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the ""; the Basic Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time (as defined in Section 1(c) hereof), is hereinafter called the ""; the Pricing Prospectus, together with the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5(i) hereof, is hereinafter called the ""; the form of the final prospectus relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof is hereinafter called the ""; any reference herein to the Basic Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act, as of the date of such prospectus; any reference to any amendment or supplement to the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement, any prospectus supplement relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and any documents filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), and incorporated therein, in each case after the date of the Basic Prospectus, such Preliminary Prospectus, or the Prospectus, as the case may be; any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statement shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the effective date of the Registration Statement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement; and any "issuer free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433 under the Act relating to the Securities is hereinafter called an "");
Commission
Basic Prospectus
Preliminary Prospectus
Registration Statement
Pricing Prospectus
Pricing Disclosure Package
Prospectus
Exchange Act
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
(b) No order of the Commission preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been received by the Company, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
 
(c) For the purposes of this Agreement, the "" is 3:30 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of this Agreement. The Pricing Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule II(a) hereto does not conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, and each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as supplemented by and taken together with the Pricing Disclosure Package as of the Applicable Time, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to statements or omissions made in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
Applicable Time
provided
however
(d) The documents incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
(e) The Registration Statement conforms, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, in the case of the Registration Statement, as of the applicable effective date as to each part of the Registration Statement, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and in the case of the Prospectus, as of the applicable filing date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives, expressly for use therein;
provided
however
 
(f) Except as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Disclosure Package, (i) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any transactions, not in the ordinary course of business, that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis and (ii) there has not been any material adverse effect on, or any development involving a prospective material adverse effect on, the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholder's equity or results of operation of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or adversely affect the compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder, other than, with respect to clause (ii), any such effect resulting from changes in the general economic or equity or debt market conditions in the United States or changes in the financial services industry in general and not specifically relating to the Company or its subsidiaries (a "");
Material Adverse Effect
(g) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation for the transaction of business and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification except where failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(h) The Bank of New York Mellon (the "") has been duly organized and is validly existing as a banking corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of New York, and has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and to conduct its business as and to the extent described in the Pricing Prospectus, and has been duly qualified as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of each other jurisdiction in which it owns or leases properties or conducts any business so as to require such qualification, except where any failure to so qualify or to be in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; the only "significant subsidiary" of the Company, within the meaning assigned to such term in Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission, is The Bank of New York Mellon;
Significant Subsidiary
(i) The Company has an authorized equity capitalization as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company (including the Preferred Stock) has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable and conforms to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Significant Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and non-assessable (except, in the case of each of its national bank subsidiaries, as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 55, as amended, and in the case of each of its New York state chartered banks, as provided in New York Banking Law Section 114); except for directors' qualifying shares, all issued and outstanding capital stock of the Significant Subsidiary
 
is owned by the Company free and clear of any mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity; and except as set forth or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of or ownership interest in the Company are outstanding and the issuance of the shares of Preferred Stock relating to the Securities will not be subject to any preemptive or similar rights;
(j) The Company has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement (collectively, the ""), and to perform its respective obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents; the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken; and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company;
Transaction Documents
(k) The Certificate of Designations has been duly and validly authorized by the Company;
(l) The Deposit Agreement has been duly authorized and, prior to the Time of Delivery (as defined in Section 4(b) hereof), will have been executed and delivered by the Company; assuming the Deposit Agreement is duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Depositary, at the Time of Delivery, the Deposit Agreement will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles relating to enforceability, and except as to the indemnity and contribution provisions therein to the extent any such provision is, in the opinion of the Commission, against public policy as expressed in the Act;
(m) Five thousand (5,000) shares of the Preferred Stock have been duly and validly authorized by the Company, and, when the Securities are issued and delivered to and paid for by the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement, the shares of Preferred Stock deposited with the Depositary under the Deposit Agreement with respect to the Securities will be fully paid and nonassessable; assuming due execution and delivery of the Depositary Receipts and the Deposit Agreement by the Depositary, each Depositary Share will be duly and validly issued and will entitle the holder thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement;
(n) The issue and sale of the Securities and the compliance by the Company with the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "") or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended (the "") or (iii) result in any violation of the provisions of any statute or any
Certificate of Incorporation
By-Laws
 
order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or the Significant Subsidiary or any of their properties (each, a ""), except in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) for conflicts, defaults or violations which, individually or in aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any such Governmental Entity is required for the issue and sale of the Securities or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents except (x) such as have been obtained under the Act and (y) such as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws and by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. ("") in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters;
Governmental Entity
FINRA
(o) The statements set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the captions "Description of Preferred Stock", "Description of Depositary Shares", "Description of the Series D Preferred Stock" and "Description of the Depositary Shares", insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Preferred Stock or the Depositary Shares, as applicable, of the Company, and under the captions "Material United States Federal Income Tax Considerations" and "Certain ERISA Considerations", insofar as they purport to describe the provisions of the laws and documents referred to therein, constitute a fair and accurate summary of such terms or provisions, as applicable, in all material respects;
(p) Each Transaction Document conforms in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus.
(q) Other than as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending to which the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is a party or of which any property of the Company or the Significant Subsidiary is the subject, which, taking into account the likelihood of the outcome, the damages or other relief sought and other relevant factors, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and, to the Company's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others;
(r) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus will not be an "investment company", as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "");
Investment Company Act
(s) (A) (i) At the time of filing the Registration Statement, (ii) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act or form of prospectus), and (iii) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) under the Act) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 under the Act, the Company was a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; and (B) at the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Act) of the Securities, the Company was not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act;
 
(t) The Company maintains a system of internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or under their supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective and the Company is not aware of any material weaknesses in its internal control over financial reporting;
(u) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Prospectus, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting;
(v) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that have been designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company and its subsidiaries is made known to the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer by others within those entities; such disclosure controls and procedures were effective as of March 31, 2013; and since March 31, 2013, the Company has not become aware of any significant change in factors that would materially and adversely affect the effectiveness of the Company's disclosure controls and procedures;
(w) The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and the Pricing Disclosure Package fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and has been prepared in all material respects in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto;
(x) The Company has not taken, directly or indirectly (except through any Underwriter or any affiliate thereof, as to which no representation is made), any action designed to or that would constitute or that would reasonably be expected to cause or result in, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities;
(y) None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate, in each case acting on behalf of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, has taken any action, directly or indirectly, that would result in a violation by such persons of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (the "") except where such violation would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole; and the Company and its subsidiaries have instituted and maintain policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure, and which are reasonably expected to continue to ensure, continued compliance with the FCPA in all material respects;
FCPA
 
(z) To the knowledge of the Company, the operations of the Company and its subsidiaries are currently in material compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all jurisdictions in which the Company and its subsidiaries conduct their businesses, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any Governmental Entity (collectively, the ""); and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any Governmental Entity involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened; and
Money Laundering Laws
(aa) None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate or representative of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is an individual or entity ("") currently the subject of any sanctions ("") administered or enforced by the United States Government, including, without limitation, the U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control (""); and the Company will not directly or knowingly and indirectly use the proceeds of the sale of the Securities, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiaries, joint venture partners or other Person, to fund any activities of or business with any Person, or in any country or territory, that is currently the subject of Sanctions.
Person
Sanctions
OFAC
2. . On the basis of the representations and warranties herein set forth, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at a purchase price per Security of $990.00 (the ""), the number of Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto under the heading "Number of Securities to Be Purchased" (or such number of Securities increased as set forth in Section 10 hereof).
Purchase and Sale of Securities by the Underwriters
Purchase Price
3. . The Company understands that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representatives is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus.
The Offering
4. .
Settlement
(a) The Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in book-entry only form represented by one or more Depositary Receipts deposited with The Depository Trust Company ("") and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Company shall be delivered by the Company to the Representatives, through the facilities of DTC, for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the Purchase Price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account(s) specified by the Company to the Representatives at least forty-eight hours in advance. The Depositary Receipts will be made available for checking and packaging at least twenty-four hours prior to the Time of Delivery with respect thereto at the office of DTC or its designated custodian (the "").
DTC
Designated Office
 
(b) The time and date of delivery of and payment for the Securities shall be 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on May 17, 2013 or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. Such time and date for delivery of the Securities is herein called the "".
Time of Delivery
(c) The documents to be delivered at the Time of Delivery by or on behalf of the parties hereto pursuant to Section 8 hereof, including the cross-receipt for the Securities and any additional documents requested by the Underwriters pursuant to Section 8(l) hereof, will be delivered at the offices of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, One Liberty Plaza, New York, New York 10006 (the ""), and the Securities will be delivered at the Designated Office, at the Time of Delivery. A meeting will be held at the Closing Location at 4:00 p.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next preceding the Time of Delivery, at which meeting the final drafts of the documents to be delivered pursuant to the preceding sentence will be available for review by the parties hereto. For the purposes of Section 2 and of this Section 4, "" shall mean each Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday and Friday which is not a day on which banking institutions in New York City are generally authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
Closing Location
New York Business Day
5. . The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters:
Covenants
(a) To prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commission's close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement; to make no further amendment or any supplement to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus prior to the Time of Delivery which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives promptly after reasonable notice thereof; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus has been filed; to file promptly all other material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus in respect of the Securities, of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act, of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or other prospectus or suspending any such qualification, to promptly use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order; and in the
 
event of any such issuance of a notice of objection, promptly to take such steps including, without limitation, amending the Registration Statement or filing a new registration statement, at its own expense, as may be necessary to permit offers and sales of the Securities by the Underwriters (references herein to the Registration Statement shall include any such amendment or new registration statement);
(b) If required by Rule 430B(h) under the Act, to prepare a form of prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such form of prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than may be required by Rule 424(b) under the Act; and to make no further amendment or supplement to such form of prospectus which shall be reasonably disapproved by the Representatives promptly after reasonable notice thereof;
(c) If by the third anniversary (the "") of the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, any of the Securities remain unsold by the Underwriters, the Company will file, if it has not already done so and is eligible to do so, a new automatic shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives. If at the Renewal Deadline the Company is no longer eligible to file an automatic shelf registration statement, the Company will, if it has not already done so, file a new shelf registration statement relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives and will use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement to be declared effective within 180 days after the Renewal Deadline. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the expired registration statement relating to the Securities. References herein to the Registration Statement shall include such new automatic shelf registration statement or such new shelf registration statement, as the case may be;
Renewal Deadline
(d) Promptly from time to time to take such action as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives may reasonably request and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of the Securities, that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction;
provided
(e) Prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement and from time to time, to furnish the Underwriters with written and electronic copies of the Prospectus in New York City in such quantities as the Representatives may reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is required at any time prior to the expiration of nine months after the time of issue of the Prospectus in connection with the offering or sale of the Securities and if at any such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the
 
Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Representatives and to file such document and to prepare and furnish to each Underwriter and to any dealer in the Securities as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of an amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance, (i) if such untrue statement or omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through any of the Representatives expressly for use therein, at the expense of such Underwriter and (ii) in other cases, without charge to any such Underwriter or dealer; and in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales of any of the Securities at any time nine months or more after the time of issue of the Prospectus, upon the request of the Representatives but at the expense of such Underwriter to prepare and deliver to such Underwriter as many written and electronic copies as the Representatives may request of an amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Act;
(f) To make generally available to its securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158 under the Act);
(g) During the period beginning from the date hereof and continuing to and including the date 30 days after the date of the Prospectus, not to, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, directly or indirectly offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge, sell or grant any option, right or warrant to purchase, make any short sale or otherwise dispose of any securities of the Company that in the judgment of the Representatives are substantially similar to the Securities or any securities convertible into, or exchangeable for, such securities, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, owned directly by the Company (including holding as a custodian) or with respect to which the Company has beneficial ownership within the rules and regulations of the Commission, except that (i) the Company may engage in any activity described in this Section 5(g) if and to the extent required by applicable law or by any notice, order or regulation of any regulatory authority which is binding upon the Company and (ii) the Company may issue or grant any securities (including restricted stock, restricted stock units and phantom stock), and options to acquire securities, of the Company to its employees and directors (including on a cashless exercise basis) pursuant to an employee benefit plan or director plan that exists as of the date hereof (including, without limitation, The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan);
(h) To pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1) under the Act and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) under the Act;
 
(i) To prepare a final term sheet in a form approved by the Representatives and to file such term sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Act within the time required by such Rule. Any such final term sheet shall be an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(j) To use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, if any, in the manner specified in the Pricing Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds"; and
(k) Upon request of any Underwriter, to furnish, or cause to be furnished, to such Underwriter an electronic version of the Company's trademarks, servicemarks and corporate logo for use on the website, if any, operated by such Underwriter for the purpose of facilitating the on-line offering of the Securities (the ""); , that the License shall be used solely for the purpose described above, is granted without any fee and may not be assigned or transferred.
License
provided, however
6. .
Free Writing Prospectuses
(a) The Company represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Act; each Underwriter represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a free writing prospectus, other than any such free writing prospectus the use of which has been consented to by the Company or the Representatives, as applicable, that is listed on Schedule II(a) hereto or a preliminary term sheet transmitted through the Bloomberg system;
(b) The Company has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 under the Act applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission or retention where required and legending; and
(c) The Company agrees that if at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus any event occurred or occurs as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus would conflict with the information in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, the Company will give prompt notice thereof to the Representatives and, if requested by the Representatives, will prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or other document which will correct such conflict, statement or omission; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions in an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
provided
however
7. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Company's counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Securities under the Act and all other expenses (excluding the fees incurred by the counsel for the
Expenses
 
Underwriters) in connection with the preparation, printing, reproduction and filing of the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivering of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers; (ii) the cost of printing or producing any Agreement among Underwriters, the Transaction Documents, the Blue Sky Memorandum, closing documents (including any compilations thereof) and any other documents in connection with the offering, purchase, sale and delivery of the Securities; (iii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 5(c) hereof, including the fees and disbursements of counsels for the Underwriters in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky survey, up to a maximum of $10,000 in the aggregate; (iv) the cost of preparing the Securities; (v) the cost and charges of any transfer agent or registrar; (vi) the fees and expenses of the Depositary in connection with the deposit of the Preferred Stock and the offering of the Securities; and (vii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, and Sections 9 and 12 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their respective counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
8. . The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder, as to the Securities to be delivered at the Time of Delivery shall be subject, in the discretion of the Representatives, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company herein are, at and as of the Time of Delivery, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
Conditions
(a) The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by the rules and regulations under the Act and in accordance with Section 5(a) hereof; all material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated by the Commission and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act shall have been received; no stop order suspending or preventing the use of the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been initiated by the Commission; and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission shall have been complied with, or is being complied with, to the reasonable satisfaction of Representatives; FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of this Agreement;
(b) Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, shall have furnished to the Representatives such written opinion or opinions, dated the Time of Delivery, in form and substance satisfactory to each of the Representatives, and such counsel shall have received such papers and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
 
(c) The chief securities counsel of the Company shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsel's written opinion and letter, dated the Time of Delivery, in the forms attached hereto as Exhibits A-1 and A-2, respectively;
(d) On the date of the Prospectus at a time prior to the execution of this Agreement, at 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the effective date of any post effective amendment to the Registration Statement filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement and also at the Time of Delivery, the independent accounting firm of the Company who has certified the financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus shall have furnished to the Representatives a letter or letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, containing statements and information of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus;
(e) (i) Neither the Company nor the Significant Subsidiary shall have sustained since the date of the latest audited financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Disclosure Package any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package; and (ii) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Pricing Disclosure Package, there shall not have been any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the general affairs, management, financial position, shareholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiary taken as a whole, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii), otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Pricing Disclosure Package or the effect of which is in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(f) On or after the Applicable Time (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Company's debt securities or preferred stock by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as that term is defined in Section 3(a)(62) of the Exchange Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities or preferred stock;
(g) On or after the Applicable Time there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) a suspension or material limitation in trading in the Company's securities on the New York Stock Exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York State authorities or a material
 
disruption in securities settlement or clearance services in the United States; (iv) the outbreak or escalation of hostilities involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war; or (v) the occurrence of any other calamity or crisis or any change in financial, political or economic conditions in the United States or elsewhere, if the effect of any such event specified in clause (iv) or (v) in the judgment of the Representatives after consultation with the Company (to the extent practicable) makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering or the delivery of the Securities being delivered at the Time of Delivery on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus;
(h) The Company shall have complied with the provisions of Section 5(e) hereof with respect to the furnishing of prospectuses on the New York Business Day next succeeding the date of this Agreement;
(i) The Certificate of Designations shall have been duly filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware;
(j) The Representatives shall have received from the Depositary a copy of the certificate evidencing the deposit of the shares of Preferred Stock underlying the Securities delivered at the Time of Delivery; and
(k) The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives at the Time of Delivery certificate of the Chief Financial Officer or the Treasurer of the Company satisfactory to the Representatives (i) to the effect that (A) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 1 of this Agreement are true and correct on and as of the Time of Delivery with the same force and effect as though expressly made on and as of the Time of Delivery and (B) the Company has complied with all the agreements hereunder and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Time of Delivery, and (ii) as to such other matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
9. . (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and any affiliate of such Underwriter that is acting as a selling agent of such Underwriter in connection with the distribution of the Securities against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such affiliate, as the case may be, in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the
Indemnification and Contribution
provided
however
 
extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
(b) Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Pricing Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Underwriter may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability except to the extent that it has been prejudiced in any material respect by such failure or from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect the settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of any
 
judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action or claim in respect of which indemnification or contribution may be sought hereunder (whether or not the indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such action or claim) unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act, by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 9 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, from the offering of the Securities. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above and such indemnifying party was prejudiced in a material respect by such failure, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the indemnifying party, on the one hand, and the indemnified party, on the other, in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Underwriters, in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total commissions or discounts received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Securities. The relative fault of the Company or the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as a single entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total public offering price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
 
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters, under this Section 9 shall be in addition to any liability that the Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
10. . (a) If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Securities which it has agreed to purchase hereunder at the Time of Delivery, the Representatives may in their discretion arrange for them or another party or other parties to purchase such Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty-six hours after such default by any Underwriter the Representatives do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty-six hours within which to procure another party or other parties satisfactory to the Representatives to purchase such Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed periods, the Representatives notify the Company that they have so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, or the Company notifies the Representatives that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Securities, the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for a period of not more than seven days, in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in the opinion of the Representatives may thereby be made necessary. The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall include any person substituted under this Section 10 with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to this Agreement with respect to such Securities.
Underwriter Defaults
(b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased at the Time of Delivery, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the number of shares which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder at the Time of Delivery and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the number of Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
(c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate number of such Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one eleventh of the aggregate number of all the Securities to be purchased
 
at the Time of Delivery, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then this Agreement shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 7 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in Section 9 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from any liability it may have to the Company or any non-defaulting Underwriter for its default.
11. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or the Company, or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Survival
12. . If this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 10 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof; but, if for any other reason, any Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket expenses approved in writing by the Representatives, including fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in connection with the Transaction Documents and the offering of Securities contemplated hereby, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter except as provided in Sections 7 and 9 hereof.
Liabilities Upon Termination
13. . In all dealings hereunder, the Representatives shall act on behalf of each of the Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by the Representatives.
Notices, etc
All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the Representatives; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement, Attention: Secretary; , , that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 9(c) hereof shall be delivered or sent by mail or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its Underwriters' Questionnaire, which address will be supplied to the Company by the Representatives upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
provided
however
In accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), the Underwriters are required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies their respective clients, including the Company, which information may include the name and address of their respective clients, as well as other information that will allow the Underwriters to properly identify their respective clients.
 
14. . This Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters and the Company and, to the extent provided in Sections 9 and 11 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company or any Underwriter and each person who controls the Company or any Underwriter and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties to Agreement
15. . Time shall be of the essence of this Agreement. As used herein, the term "" shall mean any day when the Commission's office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
Time Is of the Essence
business day
16. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (i) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby are arm's-length commercial transactions among the Company and the several Underwriters, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Underwriters is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, (iii) none of the Underwriters has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) or any other obligation to the Company except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (iv) the Underwriters may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from the Company and (v) the Company has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters, or any of them, has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Underwriters Not Fiduciaries
17. . The Transaction Documents supersede all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) among the Company and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Supercedes Prior Agreements
18.
. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
19. . Each of the Company and the Underwriters hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
20. . This Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
21. . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company is authorized to disclose to any persons the U.S. federal and state income tax treatment and tax structure of the potential transaction and all materials of any kind (including tax opinions and
Disclosures
 
other tax analyses) provided to the Company relating to that treatment and structure, without the Underwriters' imposing any limitation of any kind. However, any information relating to the tax treatment and tax structure shall remain confidential (and the foregoing sentence shall not apply) to the extent necessary to enable any person to comply with securities laws. For this purpose, "" is limited to any facts that may be relevant to that treatment.
tax structure
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon the acceptance hereof by the Representatives, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof shall constitute a binding agreement among each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that the acceptance of this letter by the Representatives on behalf of each of the Underwriters is pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request, but without warranty on the part of the Representatives as to the authority of the signers thereof.
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
CREDIT SUISSE SECURITIES (USA) LLC
 
On behalf of each of the Underwriters
 
(a) Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses: Final term sheet, dated May 10, 2013, relating to the Securities
(b) Additional Documents Incorporated by Reference: None.

Exhibit 3.1
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION, a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""), in accordance with the provisions of Sections 103, 141 and 151 thereof, does hereby certify that:
Corporation
In accordance with the resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Corporation (the ""), adopted at a meeting duly called and held on December 11, 2012, the provisions of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation and the Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Corporation and applicable law, a Pricing Committee of the Board of Directors, by a written consent dated as of May 10, 2013, adopted the following resolution creating a series of Preferred Stock of the Corporation designated as "Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock".
Board of Directors
, that pursuant to the resolutions of the Board of Directors adopted at a meeting duly called and held on December 11, 2012, the Delaware General Corporation Law and the Restated Certificate of Incorporation and the Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Corporation, the Pricing Committee hereby establishes a series of Preferred Stock, with a liquidation preference of $100,000 per share, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation (the "Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock") and fixes and determines the designation, voting rights, preferences, redemption rights, qualifications, privileges, limitations, restrictions and special or relative rights thereof as follows:
RESOLVED
. The series will be designated the "Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock" (hereinafter called the "Series D") and will initially consist of 5,000 shares. The number of shares constituting this Series may be increased from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors), without the vote or consent of the holders of the Series D in accordance with law up to the maximum number of shares of Preferred Stock authorized to be issued under the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, less all shares at the time authorized of any other series of Preferred Stock. Shares of this Series will be dated the date of issue. Shares of the Series D that are redeemed, purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation, or converted into another series of Preferred Stock, shall, after such redemption, purchase or acquisition, have the status of authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock of the Corporation, without designation as to series until such shares are once more designated as part of a particular series by the Board of Directors.
Section 1. Designation and Number, Issue Date
. As used herein with respect to the Series D:
Section 2. Definitions
" means the "appropriate federal banking agency" with respect to the Corporation as defined in Section 3(q) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C.  1813(q)), or any successor provision.
"Appropriate Federal Banking Agency
"" means the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Board of Directors
"" means the Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Corporation, as may be amended from time to time.
Bylaws
 
"" means each weekday on which banking institutions in New York, New York are not authorized or obligated by law, regulation or executive order to close.
Business Day
"" means, at any time, the person or entity appointed by the Corporation and serving as such agent at such time.
Calculation Agent
"" means this Certificate of Designations relating to the Series D, as it may be amended from time to time.
Certificate of Designations
"" means the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as it may be amended from time to time, and shall include this Certificate of Designations.
Certificate of Incorporation
"" means the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Corporation.
Common Stock
"" has the meaning specified in Section 3(b).
Dividend Parity Stock
"" means (i) each June 20 and December 20, commencing December 20, 2013, to but excluding June 20, 2023, and (ii) each March 20, June 20, September 20 and December 20, from and including June 20, 2023; provided, however, that (x) if any such date on or before June 20, 2023 is not a Business Day, then such date shall nevertheless be a Dividend Payment Date but dividends on the Series D, when, as and if declared, shall be paid on the next succeeding Business Day (without adjustment in the amount of the dividend per share of Series D), and (y) if any such date after June 20, 2023 is not a Business Day, then the next succeeding Business Day shall be the applicable Dividend Payment Date and dividends, when, as and if declared, shall be paid on such next succeeding Business Day. Each Dividend Payment Date "" to the Dividend Period most recently ending before such Dividend Payment Date, and (with the words "" and "" having correlative meanings).
Dividend Payment Date
relates
vice versa
related
relating
"" means each period from and including a Dividend Payment Date (except that the initial Dividend Period shall commence on the Original Issue Date) and continuing to but not including the next succeeding Dividend Payment Date.
Dividend Period
"" has the meaning specified in Section 3(a).
Dividend Record Date
"" means each Dividend Period relating to a Dividend Payment Date on or before June 20, 2023.
Fixed Rate Period
"" means each Dividend Period relating to a Dividend Payment Date after June 20, 2023.
Floating Rate Period
"" means the Common Stock and any other class or series of stock of the Corporation (other than the Series D) that ranks junior to the Series D either or both as to the payment of dividends and/or as to the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
Junior Stock
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4(b).
Liquidation Preference
"" means any day on which commercial banks are open for general business (including dealings in deposits in U.S. dollars) in London, England.
London Banking Day
"" has the meaning specified in Section 6(b).
Nonpayment Event
"" means the first date on which any share of Series D is issued and outstanding.
Original Issue Date
"" means any and all series of Preferred Stock, having a par value of $0.01 per share, of the Corporation, including the Series D.
Preferred Stock
 
"" has the meaning specified in Section 6(b).
Preferred Stock Director
"" means the good faith determination by the Corporation that, as a result of (i) any amendment to, or change in, the laws or regulations of the United States (including, for the avoidance of doubt, any agency or instrumentality of the Unites States, including the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and other federal bank regulatory agencies) or any political subdivision of or in the United States that is enacted or becomes effective after the initial issuance of any share of Series D, (ii) any proposed change in those laws or regulations that is announced or becomes effective after the initial issuance of any share of Series D, or (iii) any official administrative decision or judicial decision or administrative action or other official pronouncement interpreting or applying those laws or regulations that is announced after the initial issuance of any share of Series D, there is more than an insubstantial risk that the Corporation will not be entitled to treat the full liquidation preference amount of $100,000 per share of Series D then outstanding as "" (or its equivalent) for purposes of the capital adequacy guidelines of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or, as and if applicable, the capital adequacy guidelines or regulations of any successor Appropriate Federal Banking Agency) as then in effect and applicable, for so long as any share of Series D is outstanding.
Regulatory Capital Treatment Event
tier 1 capital
"" means the display designated on the Reuters 3000 Xtra (or such other page as may replace that page on that service or such other service as may be nominated by the British Bankers' Association for the purpose of displaying London interbank offered rates for U.S. dollar deposits).
Reuters Screen LIBOR01
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4(a).
Series D Liquidation Amount
"" means, with respect to any Floating Rate Period, the offered rate expressed as a percentage per annum for deposits in U.S. dollars for a three-month period commencing on the first day of such Floating Rate Period, as that rate appears on Reuters Screen LIBOR01 as of 11:00 A.M., London time, on the second London Banking Day immediately preceding the first day of such Floating Rate Period.
Three-month LIBOR
If Three-month LIBOR does not appear on Reuters Screen LIBOR01, Three-month LIBOR shall be determined on the basis of the rates at which deposits in U.S. dollars for a three-month period, commencing on the first day of such Floating Rate Period, and in a principal amount of not less than $1,000,000 are offered to prime banks in the London interbank market by four major banks in that market selected by the Calculation Agent at approximately 11:00 A.M., London time, on the second London Banking Day immediately preceding the first day of such Floating Rate Period. The Calculation Agent shall request the principal London office of each of these banks to provide a quotation of its rate. If at least two such quotations are provided, Three-month LIBOR for such Floating Rate Period shall be the arithmetic mean of such quotations (rounded upward if necessary to the nearest 0.00001%).
If fewer than two such quotations are provided as described in the preceding paragraph, Three-month LIBOR with respect to such Floating Rate Period shall be the arithmetic mean (rounded upward if necessary to the nearest 0.00001%) of the rates quoted by three major banks in New York City selected by the Calculation Agent at approximately 11:00 A.M., New York City time, on the first day of such Floating Rate Period for loans in U.S. dollars to leading European banks for a three-month period, commencing on the first day of such Floating Rate Period, and in a principal amount of not less than $1,000,000.
If fewer than three banks selected by the Calculation Agent to provide quotations are quoting as described in the preceding paragraph, Three-month LIBOR with respect to such Floating Rate Period shall be the Three-month LIBOR in effect for the prior Floating Rate Period or, in the case of the first Floating Rate Period, the most recent Three-month LIBOR that could have been determined had the Floating Rate Period been applicable prior to the first Floating Rate Period.
"" means, with regard to any election or removal of a Preferred Stock Director or any other matter as to which the holders of Series D are entitled to vote as specified in Section 6 of this Certificate of Designations, any and all series of Preferred Stock (other than the Series D) that rank equally with the Series D as to the payment of dividends, whether bearing dividends on a non-cumulative or cumulative basis, and having voting rights equivalent to those described in Section 6(b).
Voting Preferred Stock
 
Section 3. Dividends.
. Holders of the Series D shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors), on each Dividend Payment Date, out of funds legally available therefor, non-cumulative cash dividends on the Series D Liquidation Amount of $100,000 per share of Series D at a rate equal to (i) 4.50% on each Dividend Payment Date relating to a Fixed Rate Period (and for such Fixed Rate Period) and (ii) Three-month LIBOR plus 2.46% on each Dividend Payment Date relating to a Floating Rate Period (and for such Floating Rate Period). Such dividends shall be payable in arrears (as provided below in this Section 3(a)), but only when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors). Dividends on the Series D shall not be cumulative; holders of Series D shall not be entitled to receive any dividends not declared by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) and no interest, or sum of money in lieu of interest, shall be payable in respect of any dividend not so declared.
(a) Rate
per annum
Dividends on the Series D shall not be declared or set aside for payment if and to the extent such dividends would cause the Corporation to fail to comply with the capital adequacy guidelines of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or, as and if applicable, the capital adequacy guidelines or regulations of any successor Appropriate Federal Banking Agency) applicable to the Corporation.
Dividends that are payable on the Series D on any Dividend Payment Date will be payable to holders of record of the Series D as they appear on the stock register of the Corporation on the applicable record date, which shall be the 15th calendar day before such Dividend Payment Date or such other record date fixed by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) that is not more than 60 nor less than 10 days prior to such Dividend Payment Date (each, a ""). Any such day that is a Dividend Record Date shall be a Dividend Record Date whether or not such day is a Business Day.
Dividend Record Date
Dividends payable on the Series D in respect of each Fixed Rate Period shall be computed by the Calculation Agent on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, and dividends payable on the Series D in respect of each Floating Rate Period shall be computed by the Calculation Agent by multiplying the per annum dividend rate in effect for that Floating Rate Period by a fraction, the numerator of which will be the actual number of days in that Floating Rate Period and the denominator of which will be 360, and multiplying the rate obtained by $100,000 to determine the dividend per share of Series D.
The Calculation Agent's determination of any dividend rate, and its calculation of the amount of dividends for any Dividend Period, will be maintained on file at the Corporation's principal offices and will be available to any stockholder upon request and will be final and binding in the absence of manifest error.
The Corporation may terminate the appointment of the Calculation Agent and may appoint a successor agent at any time and from time to time, that the Corporation shall use its best efforts to ensure that there is, at all relevant times when the Series D is outstanding, a person or entity appointed and serving as such agent. The Calculation Agent may be a person or entity affiliated with the Corporation.
provided
Holders of the Series D shall not be entitled to any dividends, whether payable in cash, securities or other property, other than dividends (if any) declared and payable on the Series D as specified in this Section 3 (subject to the other provisions of this Certificate of Designations).
. So long as any share of Series D remains outstanding, no dividend shall be declared or paid on the Common Stock or any other shares of Junior Stock (other than (1) a dividend payable solely in Junior Stock or (2) any dividend in connection with the implementation of a shareholders' rights plan or the redemption or repurchase of any rights under any such plan), unless (i) full dividends for the last preceding Dividend Period on all outstanding shares of Series D have been declared and paid (or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof has been set aside) and (ii) the Corporation is not in default on its obligation to redeem any shares of Series D that have been called for redemption. The Corporation and its subsidiaries shall not purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, for consideration any shares of Common Stock or other Junior Stock (other than (1) as a result of a reclassification of such Junior Stock for or into other Junior Stock, (2) the exchange or conversion of one share of such Junior Stock for or into another share of such Junior Stock, (3) through the use of
(b) Priority of Dividends
 
the proceeds of a substantially contemporaneous sale of other shares of Junior Stock, (4) purchases, redemptions or other acquisitions of shares of Junior Stock in connection with any employment contract, benefit plan or other similar arrangement with or for the benefit of employees, officers, directors or consultants, (5) purchases of shares of Junior Stock pursuant to a contractually binding requirement to buy Junior Stock existing prior to the preceding Dividend Period, including under a contractually binding stock repurchase plan, or (6) the purchase of fractional interests in shares of Junior Stock pursuant to the conversion or exchange provisions of such securities or the security being converted or exchanged) nor shall the Corporation pay or make available any monies for a sinking fund for the redemption of any shares of Common Stock or any other shares of Junior Stock during a Dividend Period, unless the full dividends for the most recently-completed Dividend Period on all outstanding shares of Series D have been declared and paid (or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof has been set aside). The foregoing provision shall not restrict the ability of the Corporation or any other affiliate of the Corporation to engage in any market-making transactions in Junior Stock in the ordinary course of business.
When dividends are not paid in full upon the shares of Series D and other equity securities ranking on a parity with the Series D as to payment of dividends (""), all dividends paid or declared for payment on a dividend payment date with respect to the Series D and the Dividend Parity Stock shall be shared (i) first ratably by the holders of any Dividend Parity Stock who have the right to receive dividends with respect to past dividend periods for which such dividends were not declared and paid, in proportion to the respective amounts of the undeclared and unpaid dividends relating to past dividend periods, and thereafter (ii) ratably by the holders of Series D and any Dividend Parity Stock, in proportion to the respective amounts of the undeclared and unpaid dividends relating to the current dividend period. To the extent a dividend period with respect to any Dividend Parity Stock coincides with more than one Dividend Period with respect to the Series D, for purposes of the immediately preceding sentence the Board of Directors shall treat such dividend period as two or more consecutive dividend periods, none of which coincides with more than one Dividend Period with respect to the Series D, or shall treat such dividend period(s) with respect to any Dividend Parity Stock and Dividend Period(s) with respect to the Series D for purposes of the immediately preceding sentence in any other manner that it deems to be fair and equitable in order to achieve ratable payments of dividends on such Dividend Parity Stock and the Series D. To the extent a Dividend Period with respect to the Series D coincides with more than one dividend period with respect to any Dividend Parity Stock, for purposes of the first sentence of this paragraph the Board of Directors shall treat such Dividend Period as two or more consecutive Dividend Periods, none of which coincides with more than one dividend period with respect to such Dividend Parity Stock, or shall treat such Dividend Period(s) with respect to the Series D and dividend period(s) with respect to any Dividend Parity Stock for purposes of the first sentence of this paragraph in any other manner that it deems to be fair and equitable in order to achieve ratable payments of dividends on the Series D and such Dividend Parity Stock. The term "" as used in this paragraph means such dividend periods as are provided for in the terms of any Dividend Parity Stock and, in the case of shares of Series D, Dividend Periods applicable to shares of Series D; and the term "" as used in this paragraph means such dividend payment dates as are provided for in the terms of any Dividend Parity Stock and, in the case of shares of Series D, Dividend Payment Dates applicable to shares of Series D.
Dividend Parity Stock
dividend period
dividend payment dates
Subject to the foregoing, such dividends (payable in cash, securities or other property) as may be determined by the Board of Directors (or a duly authorized committee of the Board of Directors) may be declared and paid on any securities, including Common Stock, any other Junior Stock and any Dividend Parity Stock, from time to time out of any funds legally available for such payment, and the Series D shall not be entitled to participate in any such dividends.
Section 4. Liquidation Rights.
. In the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the affairs of the Corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary, holders of Series D shall be entitled to receive, out of the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof (whether capital or surplus) available for distribution to stockholders of the Corporation, and after satisfaction of all liabilities and obligations to creditors of the Corporation, before any distribution of such assets or proceeds is made to or set aside for the holders of Common Stock and any other stock of the Corporation ranking junior to the Series D as to such distribution, in full an amount equal to $100,000 per share (the ""), together with an amount equal to all dividends (if any) that have been declared but not paid prior to the date of payment of such distribution (but without any amount in respect of dividends that have not been declared prior to such payment date). After payment of the full amount of such liquidation distribution, the holders of Series D shall not be entitled to any further participation in any distribution of assets of the Corporation.
(a) Voluntary or Involuntary Liquidation
Series D Liquidation Amount
 
. If in any distribution described in Section 4(a) above the assets of the Corporation or proceeds thereof are not sufficient to pay the Liquidation Preferences (as defined below) in full to all holders of Series D and all holders of any stock of the Corporation ranking equally with the Series D as to such distribution, the amounts paid to the holders of Series D and to the holders of all such other stock shall be paid in accordance with the respective aggregate Liquidation Preferences of the holders of Series D and the holders of all such other stock. In any such distribution, the "" of any holder of stock of the Corporation shall mean the amount otherwise payable to such holder in such distribution (assuming no limitation on the assets of the Corporation available for such distribution), including an amount equal to any declared but unpaid dividends (and, in the case of any holder of stock other than the Series D and on which dividends accrue on a cumulative basis, an amount equal to any unpaid, accrued, cumulative dividends, whether or not declared, as applicable).
(b) Partial Payment
pro rata
Liquidation Preference
. If the Liquidation Preference has been paid in full to all holders of Series D and any other stock of the Corporation ranking equally with the Series D as to distribution described in Section 4(a) above, the holders of other stock of the Corporation shall be entitled to receive all remaining assets of the Corporation (or proceeds thereof) according to their respective rights and preferences.
(c) Residual Distributions
. For purposes of this Section 4, the merger or consolidation of the Corporation with any other corporation or other entity, including a merger or consolidation in which the holders of Series D receive cash, securities or other property for their shares, or the sale, lease or exchange (for cash, securities or other property) of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation, shall not constitute a liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
(d) Merger, Consolidation and Sale of Assets Not Liquidation
.
Section 5. Redemption
. The Series D is perpetual and has no maturity date. The Corporation may, at its option, redeem the shares of Series D (i) in whole or in part, from time to time, on any Dividend Payment Date on or after the Dividend Payment Date in June 2023, or (ii) in whole but not in part at any time within 90 days following a Regulatory Capital Treatment Event, in each case, at a cash redemption price equal to $100,000 per share, together (except as otherwise provided herein) with an amount equal to any dividends that have been declared but not paid prior to the redemption date (but with no amount in respect of any dividends that have not been declared prior to such date). The redemption price for any shares of Series D shall be payable on the redemption date to the holder of such shares against surrender of the certificate(s) evidencing such shares to the Corporation or its agent, if the shares of Series D are issued in certificated form. Any declared but unpaid dividends payable on a redemption date that occurs subsequent to the Dividend Record Date for a Dividend Period shall not be paid to the holder entitled to receive the redemption price on the redemption date, but rather shall be paid to the holder of record of the redeemed shares on such Dividend Record Date relating to the Dividend Payment Date as provided in Section 3 above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Corporation may not redeem shares of Series D without having received the prior approval of the Appropriate Federal Banking Agency if then required under capital guidelines applicable to the Corporation.
(a) Optional Redemption
. The Series D will not be subject to any mandatory redemption, sinking fund or other similar provisions. Holders of Series D will have no right to require redemption of any shares of Series D.
(b) No Sinking Fund
. Notice of every redemption of shares of Series D shall be given by first class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the holders of record of the shares to be redeemed at their respective last addresses appearing on the books of the Corporation. Such mailing shall be at least 30 days and not more than 60 days before the date fixed for redemption. Any notice mailed as provided in this Subsection shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given, whether or not the holder receives such notice, but failure duly to give such notice by mail, or any defect in such notice or in the mailing thereof, to any holder of shares of Series D designated for redemption shall not affect the validity of the proceedings for the redemption of any other shares of Series D. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Series D or any depositary shares representing interests in the Series D are issued in book-entry form through The Depository Trust Company or any other similar facility, notice of redemption
(c) Notice of Redemption
 
may be given to the holders of Series D at such time and in any manner permitted by such facility. Each such notice given to a holder shall state: (1) the redemption date; (2) the number of shares of Series D to be redeemed and, if less than all the shares held by such holder are to be redeemed, the number of such shares to be redeemed from such holder; (3) the redemption price or the manner of its calculation; and (4) if the shares of Series D are issued in certificated form, the place or places where certificates for such shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price.
. In case of any redemption of only part of the shares of Series D at the time outstanding, the shares to be redeemed shall be selected by the Corporation either or by lot or in such other manner as the Corporation may determine to be fair and equitable. Subject to the provisions hereof, the Corporation shall have full power and authority to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which shares of Series D shall be redeemed from time to time. If fewer than all the shares represented by any certificate (if the shares of Series D are issued in certificated form) are redeemed, a new certificate shall be issued representing the unredeemed shares without charge to the holder thereof.
(d) Partial Redemption
pro rata
. If notice of redemption has been duly given and if on or before the redemption date specified in the notice all funds necessary for the redemption have been set aside by the Corporation, separate and apart from its other funds, in trust for the benefit of the holders of the shares called for redemption, so as to be and continue to be available therefor, then, notwithstanding that any certificate for any share so called for redemption has not been surrendered for cancellation in the case that the shares of Series D are issued in certificated form, on and after the redemption date dividends shall cease to accrue on all shares so called for redemption, all shares so called for redemption shall no longer be deemed outstanding and all rights with respect to such shares shall forthwith on such redemption date cease and terminate, except only the right of the holders thereof to receive the amount payable on such redemption, without interest. Any funds unclaimed at the end of two years from the redemption date, to the extent permitted by law, shall be released to the Corporation, after which time the holders of the shares so called for redemption shall look only to the Corporation for payment of the redemption price of such shares.
(e) Effectiveness of Redemption
pro rata
Section 6. Voting Rights.
. The holders of Series D shall not have any voting rights except as set forth below or as otherwise from time to time required by applicable law.
(a) General
. If and whenever the dividends on the Series D and any other class or series of Voting Preferred Stock have not been declared and paid in an aggregate amount (i) in the case of the Series D and any other class or series of Voting Preferred Stock bearing non-cumulative dividends, in full for at least six quarterly dividend periods or their equivalent (whether or not consecutive) or (ii) in the case of any class or series of Voting Preferred Stock bearing cumulative dividends, in an aggregate amount equal to full dividends for at least six quarterly dividend periods or their equivalent (whether or not consecutive) (a ""), the number of directors then constituting the Board of Directors shall automatically be increased by two and the holders of Series D, together with the holders of any outstanding shares of Voting Preferred Stock, voting together as a single class, shall be entitled to elect the two additional directors (the ""), that it shall be a qualification for election for any such Preferred Stock Director that the election of such director shall not cause the Corporation to violate the corporate governance requirement of the New York Stock Exchange (or any other securities exchange or other trading facility on which securities of the Corporation may then be listed or traded) that listed or traded companies must have a majority of independent directors and that the Board of Directors shall at no time include more than two Preferred Stock Directors (including, for purposes of this limitation, all directors that the holders of any series of Voting Preferred Stock are entitled to elect pursuant to like voting rights).
(b) Right To Elect Two Directors Upon Nonpayment Events
Nonpayment Event
Preferred Stock Directors
provided
provided further
In the event that the holders of Series D and such other holders of Voting Preferred Stock shall be entitled to vote for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors following a Nonpayment Event, such directors shall be initially elected following such Nonpayment Event only at a special meeting called at the request of the holders of record of at least 20% of the Series D and each other series of Voting Preferred Stock then outstanding (unless such request for a special meeting is received less than 90 days before the date fixed for the next annual or special meeting of the stockholders of the Corporation, in which event such election shall be held only at such next annual
 
or special meeting of stockholders), and at each subsequent annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. Such request to call a special meeting for the initial election of the Preferred Stock Directors after a Nonpayment Event shall be made by written notice, signed by the requisite holders of Series D or Voting Preferred Stock, and delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation in such manner as provided for in Section 8 below, or as may otherwise be required by applicable law. If the Secretary of the Corporation fails to call a special meeting for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors within 20 days of receiving proper notice, any holder of Series D may call such a meeting at the Corporation's expense solely for the election of the Preferred Stock Directors, and for this purpose only such Series D holder shall have access to the Corporation's stock ledger.
When dividends have been paid in full on the Series D and any and all series of non-cumulative Voting Preferred Stock (other than the Series D) for Dividend Periods, whether or not consecutive, equivalent to at least one year after a Nonpayment Event and all dividends on any cumulative Voting Preferred Stock have been paid in full, then the right of the holders of Series D to elect the Preferred Stock Directors shall cease (but subject always to revesting of such voting rights in the case of any future Nonpayment Event), and, if and when any rights of holders of Series D and Voting Preferred Stock to elect the Preferred Stock Directors shall have ceased, the terms of office of all the Preferred Stock Directors shall forthwith terminate and the number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall automatically be reduced accordingly.
Any Preferred Stock Director may be removed at any time without cause by the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of Series D and Voting Preferred Stock, when they have the voting rights described above (voting together as a single class). The Preferred Stock Directors elected at any such special meeting shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the stockholders if such office shall not have previously terminated as below provided. In case any vacancy shall occur among the Preferred Stock Directors, a successor shall be elected by the Board of Directors to serve until the next annual meeting of the stockholders upon the nomination of the then remaining Preferred Stock Director or, if no Preferred Stock Director remains in office, by the vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of Series D and such Voting Preferred Stock for which dividends have not been paid, voting as a single class. The Preferred Stock Directors shall each be entitled to one vote per director on any matter that shall come before the Board of Directors for a vote.
. So long as any shares of Series D are outstanding, in addition to any other vote or consent of stockholders required by law or by the Certificate of Incorporation, the vote or consent of the holders of at least two-thirds of the shares of Series D at the time outstanding and entitled to vote thereon, voting separately as a single class, given in person or by proxy, either in writing without a meeting or by vote at any meeting called for the purpose, shall be necessary for effecting or validating:
(c) Other Voting Rights
. Any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws to authorize or create, or increase the authorized amount of, any shares of any class or series of capital stock of the Corporation ranking senior to the Series D with respect to either the payment of dividends or the distribution of assets on any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation;
(i) Authorization of Senior Stock
. Any amendment, alteration or repeal of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws so as to adversely affect the special rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers of the Series D; , , that any amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation to authorize or create or to increase the authorized amount of any Junior Stock or any class or series or any securities convertible into shares of any class or series of Dividend Parity Stock or other series of Preferred Stock ranking equally with the Series D with respect to the distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation will not be deemed to adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges or voting powers of the Series D; or
(ii) Amendment of Series D
provided
however
. Any consummation of a binding share exchange or reclassification involving the Series D, or of a merger or consolidation of the Corporation with another corporation, or any merger or consolidation of the Corporation with or into any entity other than a corporation unless in each case (x) the shares of Series D remain outstanding or, in the case of any such merger or consolidation with respect to which the Corporation is not the surviving or resulting corporation, are converted into or exchanged for preference securities of the surviving or resulting corporation or a corporation controlling such corporation, and (y) such shares remaining outstanding or such preference securities, as the case may be, have such rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof, as would not require a vote of the holders of the Preferred Stock pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii) above if such change were effected by an amendment of the Certificate of Incorporation.
(iii) Share Exchanges, Reclassifications, Mergers and Consolidations
 
If any amendment, alteration, repeal, share exchange, reclassification, merger or consolidation specified in this Section 6(c) would adversely affect the Series D and one or more but not all other series of Preferred Stock, then only the Series D and such series of Preferred Stock as are adversely affected by and entitled to vote on the matter shall vote on the matter together as a single class in proportion to their respective stated amounts (in lieu of all other series of Preferred Stock).
. Without the consent of the holders of Series D, so long as such action does not adversely affect the rights, preferences, privileges and voting powers, and limitations and restrictions thereof, of the Series D, the Corporation may amend, alter, supplement or repeal any terms of the Series D:
(d) Changes for Clarification
to cure any ambiguity, or to cure, correct or supplement any provision contained in this Certificate of Designations that may be defective or inconsistent; or
(i)
to make any provision with respect to matters or questions arising with respect to the Series D that is not inconsistent with the provisions of this Certificate of Designations.
(ii)
. No vote or consent of the holders of Series D shall be required pursuant to Section 6(b) or (c) above if, at or prior to the time when any such vote or consent would otherwise be required pursuant to such Section, all outstanding shares of Series D shall have been redeemed, or shall have been called for redemption upon proper notice and sufficient funds shall have been set aside for such redemption, in each case pursuant to Section 5 above.
(e) Changes after Provision for Redemption
. The rules and procedures for calling and conducting any meeting of the holders of Series D (including, without limitation, the fixing of a record date in connection therewith), the solicitation and use of proxies at such a meeting, the obtaining of written consents and any other aspect or matter with regard to such a meeting or such consents shall be governed by any rules the Board of Directors, in its discretion, may adopt from time to time, which rules and procedures shall conform to the requirements of the Certificate of Incorporation, the Bylaws, applicable law and any national securities exchange or other trading facility on which the Series D is listed or traded at the time. Whether the vote or consent of the holders of a plurality, majority or other portion of the shares of Series D and any Voting Preferred Stock has been cast or given on any matter on which the holders of shares of Series D are entitled to vote shall be determined by the Corporation by reference to the specified liquidation amounts of the shares voted or covered by the consent.
(f) Procedures for Voting and Consents
For purposes of determining the voting rights of the holders of Series D under this Section 6, each holder will be entitled to one vote for each $100,000 of Series D Liquidation Amount to which his or her shares are entitled. Holders of shares of Series D will be entitled to one vote for each such share of Series D held by them.
 
. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Corporation and the transfer agent for the Series D may deem and treat the record holder of any share of Series D as the true and lawful owner thereof for all purposes, and neither the Corporation nor such transfer agent shall be affected by any notice to the contrary.
Section 7. Record Holders
. All notices or communications in respect of the Series D shall be sufficiently given if given in writing and delivered in person or by first class mail, postage prepaid, or if given in such other manner as may be permitted in this Certificate of Designations, in the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws or by applicable law.
Section 8. Notices
. No share of Series D shall have any rights of preemption whatsoever as to any securities of the Corporation, or any warrants, rights or options issued or granted with respect thereto, regardless of how such securities, or such warrants, rights or options, may be designated, issued or granted.
Section 9. No Preemptive Rights
. The shares of Series D shall not have any voting powers, preferences or relative, participating, optional or other special rights, or qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, other than as set forth herein or in the Certificate of Incorporation or as provided by applicable law.
Section 10. Other Rights
. The Corporation may at its option issue shares of Series D without certificates.
Section 11. Certificates
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned Corporation has caused this Certificate to be signed by a duly authorized officer this 16th day of May, 2013.
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
DEPOSIT AGREEMENT, dated as of May 16, 2013, among (i) THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation; (ii) COMPUTERSHARE SHAREOWNER SERVICES LLC, a New Jersey limited liability company (""); and (iii) the holders from time to time of the Receipts described herein.
Computershare
WHEREAS, it is desired to provide, as hereinafter set forth in this Deposit Agreement, for the deposit of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock of the Corporation from time to time with the Depositary for the purposes set forth in this Deposit Agreement and for the issuance hereunder of Receipts evidencing Depositary Shares in respect of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock so deposited; and
WHEREAS, the Receipts are to be substantially in the form of Exhibit B attached hereto, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided in this Deposit Agreement;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises, the parties hereto agree as follows:
.
Section 1.1. Definitions
The following definitions shall for all purposes, unless otherwise indicated, apply to the respective terms used in this Deposit Agreement:
"" shall mean, with respect to any person or entity, any person or entity directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, such other person or entity. For the purpose of this definition, "controlling," "controlled by" or "under common control with" mean the ownership, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the operation or management and policies of a person or entity, whether through the ownership or control of voting interests, by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
"" shall mean the relevant Certificate of Designations filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware establishing the Series D Preferred Stock as a series of preferred stock of the Corporation.
Certificate of Designations
"" shall mean The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation, and its successors.
Corporation
"" shall mean this Deposit Agreement, as amended or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof.
Deposit Agreement
"" shall mean Computershare and any successor as Depositary hereunder.
Depositary
"" shall mean the depositary shares, each representing one-hundredth (1/100
Depositary Shares
th
) of one share of the Series D Preferred Stock, and evidenced by a Receipt.
"" shall mean an agent appointed by the Depositary pursuant to Section 7.5.
Depositary's Agent
"" shall mean the office of the Depositary at which at any particular time its depositary receipt business shall be administered, which at the date of this Deposit Agreement is located at 480 Washington Blvd., 29
Depositary's Office
th
Floor, Jersey City, NJ 07310.
"" shall mean The Depositary Trust Company.
DTC
"" shall mean with respect to any Global Registered Receipt:
Exchange Event
(1) (A) the Global Receipt Depository which is the Holder of such Global Registered Receipt notifies the Corporation that it is no longer willing or able to properly discharge its responsibilities under any Letter of Representations or that it is no longer eligible or in good standing under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and (B) the Corporation has not appointed a qualified successor Global Receipt Depository within ninety (90) calendar days after the Corporation received such notice, or
(2) the Corporation in its sole discretion notifies the Depositary in writing that the Receipts or portion thereof issued or issuable in the form of one or more Global Registered Receipts shall no longer be represented by such Global Registered Receipt.
"" shall mean, with respect to any Receipt issued hereunder, DTC or such other entity designated as Global Receipt Depository by the Corporation in or pursuant to this Deposit Agreement, which entity must be, to the extent required by any applicable law or regulation, a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Global Receipt Depository
"" shall mean a global registered Receipt registered in the name of a nominee of DTC.
Global Registered Receipt
"" shall mean any applicable agreement among the Corporation, the Depositary and a Global Receipt Depository with respect to such Global Receipt Depository's rights and obligations with respect to any Global Registered Receipt, as the same may be amended, supplemented, restated or otherwise modified from time to time and any successor agreement thereto.
Letter of Representations
"" shall mean any natural person, partnership, joint venture, firm, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, unincorporated association, trust or other entity, and shall include any successor (by merger or otherwise) of the foregoing.
Person
"" shall mean one of the depositary receipts issued hereunder, substantially in the form set forth as Exhibit B hereto, whether in definitive or temporary form, and evidencing the number of Depositary Shares with respect to shares of the Series D Preferred Stock held of record by the Record Holder of such Depositary Shares.
Receipt
 
"" or "" as applied to a Receipt shall mean the Person in whose name such Receipt is registered on the books of the Depositary maintained for such purpose.
Record Holder
Holder
"" shall mean the Depositary or such other successor bank or trust company which shall be appointed by the Corporation to register ownership and transfers of Receipts as herein provided and if a successor Registrar shall be so appointed, references herein to "the books" of or maintained by the Depository shall be deemed, as applicable, to refer as well to the register maintained by such Registrar for such purpose.
Registrar
"" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Securities Act
"" shall mean the shares of the Corporation's Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, $100,000 liquidation preference per share, designated in the Certificate of Designations.
Series D Preferred Stock
"" shall mean the Depositary or such other successor bank or trust company which shall be appointed by the Corporation to transfer the Receipts or the deposited shares of Series D Preferred Stock, as the case may be, as herein provided.
Transfer Agent
.
Section 2.1. Form and Transfer of Receipts
The definitive Receipts shall be substantially in the form set forth in Exhibit B attached to this Deposit Agreement, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided (but which do not affect the rights, duties, obligations or immunities of the Depositary as set forth in this Deposit Agreement without the Depositary's consent). Pending the preparation of definitive Receipts, the Depositary, upon the written order of the Corporation, delivered in compliance with Section 2.2, shall be authorized and instructed to, and shall execute and deliver temporary Receipts which may be printed, lithographed, typewritten, mimeographed or otherwise substantially of the tenor of the definitive Receipts in lieu of which they are issued and with such appropriate insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as the Persons executing such Receipts may determine, as evidenced by their execution of such Receipts. If temporary Receipts are issued, the Corporation and the Depositary will cause definitive Receipts to be prepared without unreasonable delay. After the preparation of definitive Receipts, the temporary Receipts shall be exchangeable for definitive Receipts upon surrender of the temporary Receipts at an office described in the penultimate paragraph of Section 2.2, without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Receipts, the Depositary is hereby authorized and instructed to, and shall execute and deliver in exchange therefor definitive Receipts representing the same number of Depositary Shares as represented by the surrendered temporary Receipt or Receipts registered in the name (and only in the name) of the holder of the temporary Receipt(s); provided that, the Depositary has been provided with all necessary information that it may request in order to execute and deliver such definitive
 
Receipts. Such exchange shall be made at the Corporation's expense and without any charge therefor. Until so exchanged, the temporary Receipts shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Deposit Agreement, and with respect to the Series D Preferred Stock, as definitive Receipts.
Any Receipt to be executed by the Depositary pursuant to this Deposit Agreement shall be executed by the Depositary by the manual or facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of the Depositary. No Receipt shall be entitled to any benefits under this Deposit Agreement or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless it shall have been executed manually or by the facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of the Depositary or, if a Registrar for the Receipts (other than the Depositary) shall have been appointed, by manual or facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer of such Registrar. The Depositary shall record on its books each Receipt so signed and delivered as hereinafter provided.
Receipts shall be in denominations of any number of whole Depositary Shares. All Receipts shall be dated the date of their issuance.
Receipts may be endorsed with or have incorporated in the text thereof such legends or recitals or changes not inconsistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, all as may be required by the Depositary and approved by the Corporation or required to comply with any applicable law or any regulation thereunder or with the rules and regulations of any securities exchange upon which the Series D Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts may be listed or to conform with any usage with respect thereto, or to indicate any special limitations or restrictions to which any particular Receipt is subject (but which do not affect the rights, duties, obligations or immunities of the Depositary as set forth in this Deposit Agreement without the Depositary's consent).
Title to Depositary Shares evidenced by a Receipt which is properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer, shall be transferable by delivery of such Receipt with the same effect as if such Receipt were a negotiable instrument; , , that until transfer of any particular Receipt shall be registered on the books of the Depositary as provided in Section 2.3, the Depositary may, notwithstanding any notice to the contrary, treat the Record Holder thereof at such time as the absolute owner thereof for the purpose of determining the Person entitled to distributions of dividends or other distributions or to any notice provided for in this Deposit Agreement and for all other purposes.
provided
however
.
Section 2.2. Deposit of the Series D Preferred Stock; Execution and Delivery of Receipts in Respect Thereof
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation may from time to time deposit shares of the Series D Preferred Stock under this Deposit Agreement by delivery to the Depositary of a certificate or certificates for such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock to be deposited, properly endorsed or accompanied, if required by the Depositary, by a duly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Depositary, together with (i) all such certifications as may be required by the Depositary pursuant to this Deposit Agreement and (ii) an instruction letter from the Corporation authorizing the Depositary to register such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock in book-entry
 
form, each in form satisfactory to the Depositary, together with all such certifications as may be required by the Depositary in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, and together with a written order of the Corporation directing the Depositary to execute and deliver to, or upon the written order of, the Person or Persons stated in such order a Receipt or Receipts evidencing in the aggregate the number of Depositary Shares representing such deposited shares of the Series D Preferred Stock.
The shares of the Series D Preferred Stock that is deposited shall be held by the Depositary at the Depositary's Office or at such other place or places as the Depositary shall determine. The Depositary shall not lend any shares of the Series D Preferred Stock deposited hereunder.
Upon receipt by the Depositary of a certificate or certificates for shares of the Series D Preferred Stock deposited in accordance with the provisions of this Section 2.2, together with the other documents required as above specified, and upon recordation of the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock on the books of the Corporation (or its duly appointed transfer agent) in the name of the Depositary or its nominee, the Depositary, subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, shall execute and deliver to or upon the order of the Person or Persons named in the written order delivered to the Depositary referred to in the first paragraph of this Section 2.2, a Receipt or Receipts evidencing in the aggregate the number of Depositary Shares representing the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock so deposited and registered in such name or names as may be requested by such Person or Persons. The Depositary shall execute and deliver such Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or such other offices, if any, as the Depositary may designate. Delivery at other offices shall be at the risk and expense of the Person requesting such delivery.
.
Section 2.3. Registration of Transfer of Receipts
The Corporation hereby appoints Computershare as the Registrar and Transfer Agent for the Receipts and Computershare hereby accept such appointment, subject to the express terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement (and no implied terms or conditions) and, as such, shall register on its books from time to time transfers of Receipts upon any surrender thereof by the Holder in person or by duly authorized attorney, properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement, including a guarantee of the signature thereon by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Transfer Agent (a ""), together with evidence of the payment of any taxes or charges as may be required by law. Thereupon, the Depositary shall execute a new Receipt or Receipts evidencing the same aggregate number of Depositary Shares as those evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered and deliver such new Receipt or Receipts to or upon the order of the Person entitled thereto. With respect to the appointment of the Depositary as Registrar and Transfer Agent in respect of the Receipts, the Depositary, in its respective capacities under such appointments, shall be entitled to the same rights, indemnities, immunities and benefits as the Depositary hereunder as if explicitly named in each such provision, and shall provide the services listed in Exhibit C hereto, in the performance of its duties in such respective capacities. Any references to the Depositary herein shall, to the extent applicable, mean the Depositary as the Transfer Agent and Registrar.
Signature Guarantee
 
.
Section 2.4. Split-ups and Combinations of Receipts; Surrender of Receipts and Withdrawal of the Series D Preferred Stock
Upon surrender of a Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or at such other offices as it may designate for the purpose of effecting a split-up or combination of such Receipt or Receipts, and the receipt by the Depositary of all other necessary information and documents, and subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall execute a new Receipt or Receipts in the authorized denomination or denominations requested, evidencing the aggregate number of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered, and shall deliver such new Receipt or Receipts to or upon the order of the Holder of the Receipt or Receipts so surrendered.
Any Holder of a Receipt or Receipts may withdraw the number of whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented thereby by surrendering such Receipt or Receipts at the Depositary's Office or at such other offices as the Depositary may designate for such withdrawals; provided, however, that a Holder of Receipt or Receipts may not withdraw such whole shares of Series D Preferred Stock (or money and other property, if any, represented thereby) which has previously been called for redemption. After such surrender and upon the receipt of written instructions from the Holder of such Receipt or Receipts, without unreasonable delay (provided the Corporation has provided the Depositary with all necessary documentation), the Depositary shall deliver to such Holder, or to the Person or Persons designated by such Holder as hereinafter provided, the number of whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented by the Receipt or Receipts so surrendered for withdrawal, but Holders of such whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock will not thereafter be entitled to deposit such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock hereunder or to receive a Receipt evidencing Depositary Shares therefor. Delivery of such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and such money and other property being withdrawn may be made by the delivery of such certificates, documents of title and other instruments as the Depositary may deem appropriate, which, if required by the Depositary, shall be properly endorsed or accompanied by proper instruments of transfer. If a Receipt delivered by the Holder to the Depositary in connection with such withdrawal shall evidence a number of Depositary Shares in excess of the number of Depositary Shares representing the number of whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock to be withdrawn, the Depositary shall at the same time, in addition to such number of whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and such money and other property, if any, to be so withdrawn, deliver to such Holder, or subject to Section 2.3 upon his order, a new Receipt evidencing such excess number of Depositary Shares.
In no event will fractional shares of the Series D Preferred Stock (or any cash payment in lieu thereof) be delivered by the Depositary. Delivery of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and money and other property, if any, being withdrawn may be made by the delivery of such certificates, documents of title and other instruments as the Depositary may deem appropriate.
If shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the money and other property, if any, being withdrawn are to be delivered to a Person or Persons other than the Record Holder of the related Receipt or Receipts being surrendered for withdrawal of such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock, such Holder shall execute and deliver to the Depositary a written order so
 
directing the Depositary and the Depositary may require that the Receipt or Receipts surrendered by such Holder for withdrawal of such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock be properly endorsed in blank or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer in blank.
Delivery of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the money and other property, if any, represented by Receipts surrendered for withdrawal shall be made by the Depositary at the Depositary's Office, except that, at the request, risk and expense of the Holder surrendering such Receipt or Receipts and for the account of the Holder thereof, such delivery may be made at such other place as may be designated by such Holder.
.
Section 2.5. Limitations on Execution and Delivery, Transfer, Surrender and Exchange of Receipts
As a condition precedent to the execution and delivery, registration of transfer, split-up, combination, surrender or exchange of any Receipt, the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents or the Corporation may require (i) payment to it of a sum sufficient for the payment (or, in the event that the Depositary or the Corporation shall have made such payment, the reimbursement to it) of any charges, taxes or expenses payable by the Holder of a Receipt pursuant to Section 5.7 (including any such tax or charge with respect to the shares of Series D Preferred Stock being deposited or withdrawn or any charges or expense pursuant to Section 3.2), (ii) the production of evidence satisfactory to it as to the identity and genuineness of any signature (which evidence may include a Signature Guarantee), and (iii) any other reasonable evidence of authority that may be required by the Depositary, and may also require compliance with such regulations, if any, as the Depositary or the Corporation may establish consistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement and/or applicable law.
The deposit of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock may be refused, the delivery of Receipts against shares of the Series D Preferred Stock may be suspended, the registration of transfer of Receipts may be refused and the registration of transfer, surrender or exchange of outstanding Receipts may be suspended (i) during any period when the register of stockholders of the Corporation is closed or (ii) if any such action is deemed necessary or advisable by the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents or the Corporation at any time or from time to time because of any requirement of law or of any government or governmental body or commission or under any provision of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 2.6. Lost Receipts, etc.
In case any Receipt shall be mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen, the Depositary in its discretion may execute and deliver a Receipt of like form and tenor in exchange and substitution for such mutilated Receipt, or in lieu of and in substitution for such destroyed, lost or stolen Receipt, only upon (i) the filing by the Holder thereof with the Depositary of evidence satisfactory to the Depositary of such destruction or loss or theft of such Receipt, of the authenticity thereof and of his or her ownership thereof; and (ii) the Holder thereof furnishing of the Depositary with indemnification satisfactory to the Depositary. Such Holder shall also comply with such other reasonable regulations and pay such other reasonable charges as the Depositary may prescribe and as required by Section 8-405 of the Uniform Commercial Code in effect in the State of New York.
 
.
Section 2.7. Cancellation and Destruction of Surrendered Receipts
All Receipts surrendered to the Depositary or any Depositary's Agent shall be cancelled by the Depositary. Except as prohibited by applicable law or regulation, the Depositary is authorized and directed to destroy all Receipts so cancelled.
.
Section 2.8. Redemption of the Series D Preferred Stock
Whenever the Corporation shall be permitted and shall elect to redeem shares of the Series D Preferred Stock in accordance with the terms of the Certificate of Designations, it shall (unless otherwise agreed to in writing with the Depositary) give or cause to be given to the Depositary, not less than thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days prior to the Redemption Date (as defined below), notice of the date of such proposed redemption of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and of the number of such shares held by the Depositary to be so redeemed and the applicable redemption price, which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from the Corporation stating that such redemption of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock is in accordance with the provisions of the Certificate of Designations. On the date of such redemption, that the Corporation shall then have paid or caused to be paid in full to the Depositary the redemption price of $100,000 per share of the Series D Preferred Stock to be redeemed, plus an amount equal to any declared and unpaid dividends thereon to the date fixed for redemption to be redeemed, in accordance with the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, the Depositary shall redeem the number of Depositary Shares representing such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock. The Depositary shall, if requested in writing and provided with all necessary information, mail the notice of the Corporation's redemption of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the proposed simultaneous redemption of the number of Depositary Shares representing such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock to be redeemed by first-class mail, postage prepaid, at the respective last addresses as they appear on the records of the Depositary, or transmit by such other method approved by the Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, in either case not less than thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days prior to the date fixed for redemption of such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares (the ""), to the Record Holders of the Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares to be so redeemed at the addresses of such Holders as they appear on the records of the Depositary; but neither failure to mail or transmit any such notice of redemption of Depositary Shares to one or more such Holders nor any defect in any notice of redemption of Depositary Shares to one or more such Holders shall affect the sufficiency of the proceedings for redemption as to the other Holders. Each such notice shall be prepared by the Corporation and shall state: (i) the Redemption Date; (ii) the number of Depositary Shares to be redeemed and, if less than all the Depositary Shares held by any such Holder are to be redeemed, the number of such Depositary Shares held by such Holder to be so redeemed; (iii) the redemption price; (iv) the place or places where Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price; and (v) that dividends in respect of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Shares to be redeemed will cease to accrue on such Redemption Date. In case less than all the outstanding Depositary Shares are to be redeemed, the Depositary Shares to be so redeemed shall be selected either pro rata or by lot or in such other manner as the Corporation may determine to be fair and equitable (which determination the Corporation will promptly notify the Depositary in writing).
provided
Redemption Date
 
Notice having been mailed or transmitted by the Depositary as aforesaid, from and after the Redemption Date (unless the Corporation shall have failed to provide the funds necessary to redeem shares of the Series D Preferred Stock evidenced by the Depositary Shares called for redemption) (i) all dividends on the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock so called for Redemption shall cease to accrue from and after such date; (ii) the Depositary Shares being redeemed from such proceeds shall be deemed no longer to be outstanding; (iii) all rights of the Holders of Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares (except the right to receive the redemption price) shall, to the extent of such Depositary Shares, cease and terminate; and (iv) upon surrender in accordance with such redemption notice of the Receipts evidencing any such Depositary Shares called for redemption (properly endorsed or assigned for transfer, if the Depositary or applicable law shall so require), such Depositary Shares shall be redeemed by the Depositary at a redemption price per Depositary Share equal to one-hundredth (1/100
th
) of the redemption price per share of the Series D Preferred Stock so redeemed plus all money and other property, if any, represented by such Depositary Shares, including all amounts paid by the Corporation in respect of dividends which on the Redemption Date have been declared on the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock to be so redeemed and have not therefore been paid.
If fewer than all of the Depositary Shares evidenced by a Receipt are called for redemption, the Depositary will deliver to the Holder of such Receipt upon its surrender to the Depositary, together with the redemption payment, a new Receipt evidencing the Depositary Shares evidenced by such prior Receipt and not called for redemption.
Section 2.9. Receipts Issuable in Global Registered Form.
If the Corporation shall determine in a writing delivered to the Depositary that the Receipts are to be issued in whole or in part in the form of one or more Global Registered Receipts, then the Depositary shall, if instructed and provided with all necessary information, in accordance with the other provisions of this Deposit Agreement, execute and deliver one or more Global Registered Receipts evidencing the Receipts of such series, which (i) shall represent, and shall be denominated in an amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of, the Receipts to be represented by such Global Registered Receipt or Receipts and (ii) shall be registered in the name of the Global Receipt Depository therefor or its nominee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Deposit Agreement to the contrary, unless otherwise provided in the Global Registered Receipt, a Global Registered Receipt may only be transferred in whole and only by the applicable Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt to a nominee of such Global Receipt Depository, or by a nominee of such Global Receipt Depository to such Global Receipt Depository or another nominee of such Global Receipt Depository, or by such Global Receipt Depository or any such nominee to a successor Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt selected or approved by the Corporation or to a nominee of such successor Global Receipt Depository. Except as provided below, owners solely of beneficial interests in a Global Registered Receipt shall not be entitled to receive physical delivery of the Receipts represented by such Global Registered Receipt. Neither any such beneficial owner nor any direct or indirect participant of a Global Receipt Depository shall have any rights under this Deposit Agreement with respect to any Global Registered Receipt held on their behalf by a Global Receipt Depository and such Global Receipt Depository may be treated by the Corporation, the Depositary and any director, officer,
 
employee or agent of the Corporation or the Depositary as the Holder of such Global Registered Receipt for all purposes whatsoever. Unless and until definitive Receipts are delivered to the owners of the beneficial interests in a Global Registered Receipt, (1) the applicable Global Receipt Depository will make book-entry transfers among its participants and receive and transmit all payments and distributions in respect of the Global Registered Receipts to such participants, in each case, in accordance with its applicable procedures and arrangements, and (2) whenever any notice, payment or other communication to the holders of Global Registered Receipts is required under this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation and the Depositary shall give all such notices, payments and communications specified herein to be given to such holders to the applicable Global Receipt Depository.
If an Exchange Event has occurred with respect to any Global Registered Receipt, then, in any such event, the Depositary shall, upon receipt of a written order from the Corporation authorizing and directing the Depositary to execute and deliver the individual definitive registered Receipts in exchange for such Global Registered Receipt, execute and deliver, individual definitive registered Receipts, in authorized denominations and of like tenor and terms in an aggregate principal amount equal to the principal amount of the Global Registered Receipt in exchange for such Global Registered Receipt. The Depositary shall have no duties, obligations or liability under this paragraph unless and until such written order have been received by the Depositary.
Definitive registered Receipts issued in exchange for a Global Registered Receipt pursuant to this Section shall be registered in such names and in such authorized denominations as the Global Receipt Depository for such Global Registered Receipt, pursuant to instructions from its participants, shall instruct the Depositary in writing. The Depositary shall deliver such Receipts to the Persons in whose names such Receipts are so registered.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Deposit Agreement, should the Corporation determine that the Receipts should be issued as a Global Registered Receipt, the parties hereto shall comply with the terms of each Letter of Representations.
.
Section 3.1. Filing Proofs, Certificates and Other Information
Any Holder of a Receipt may be required from time to time to file such proof of residence, or other matters or other information, to execute such certificates and to make such representations and warranties as the Depositary or the Corporation may reasonably deem necessary or proper. The Depositary or the Corporation may withhold the delivery, or delay the registration of transfer or redemption, of any Receipt or the withdrawal of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares and evidenced by a Receipt or the distribution of any dividend or other distribution or the sale of any rights or of the proceeds thereof until such proof or other information is filed or such certificates are executed or such representations and warranties are made.
 
.
Section 3.2. Payment of Taxes or Other Governmental Charges
Holders of Receipts shall be obligated to make payments to the Depositary of certain charges and expenses, as provided in Section 5.7. Registration of transfer of any Receipt or any withdrawal of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and all money or other property, if any, represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt may be refused until any such payment due is made, and any dividends, interest payments or other distributions may be withheld or any part of or all shares of the Series D Preferred Stock or other property represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt and not theretofore sold may be sold for the account of the Holder thereof (after attempting by reasonable means to notify such Holder prior to such sale), and such dividends, interest payments or other distributions or the proceeds of any such sale may be applied to any payment of such charges or expenses, the Holder of such Receipt remaining liable for any deficiency.
Section 3.3. Warranty as to the Series D Preferred Stock.
The Corporation hereby represents and warrants that shares of the Series D Preferred Stock, when issued, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. Such representation and warranty shall survive the deposit of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the issuance of the related Receipts.
Section 3.4. Warranty as to Receipts.
The Corporation hereby represents and warrants that the Receipts, when issued, will represent legal and valid interests in shares of the Series D Preferred Stock. Such representation and warranty shall survive the deposit of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the issuance of the Receipts.
.
Section 4.1. Cash Distributions
Whenever the Depositary shall receive any cash dividend or other cash distribution on the Series D Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2 and, if received, in accordance with written instructions from the Corporation, distribute to Record Holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 such amounts of such dividend or distribution as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts held by such Holders; , , that in case the Corporation or the Depositary shall be required to withhold and shall withhold from any cash dividend or other cash distribution in respect of the Series D Preferred Stock an amount on account of taxes, the amount made available for distribution or distributed in respect of Depositary Shares shall be reduced accordingly. The Depositary shall distribute or make available for distribution, as the case may be and, if received, in accordance with the Corporation's written instructions, only such amount, however, as can be distributed without attributing to any Holder of Receipts a fraction of one cent, and any balance not so distributable shall be held by the Depositary (without liability for interest thereon) and shall be added to and
provided
however
 
be treated as part of the next sum received by the Depositary for distribution to Record Holders of Receipts then outstanding. Each Holder of a Receipt shall provide the Depositary with its certified tax identification number on a properly completed Form W-8 or W-9, as may be applicable. Each Holder of a Receipt acknowledges that, in the event of non-compliance with the preceding sentence, the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may require withholding by the Depositary of a portion of any of the distributions to be made to such Holder hereunder.
The Corporation acknowledges that the bank accounts maintained by the Depositary in connection with the services provided under this Deposit Agreement will be in the Depositary's name and that the Depositary may receive investment earnings in connection with the investment at the Depositary's risk and for its benefit of funds held in those accounts from time to time. Neither the Corporation nor the record holders will receive interest on any deposits or funds held by the Depositary hereunder.
.
Section 4.2. Distributions Other than Cash, Rights, Preferences or Privileges
Whenever the Depositary shall receive any distribution other than cash, rights, preferences or privileges upon the Series D Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, distribute to Record Holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 such amounts of the securities or property received by it as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipts held by such Holders, in any manner that the Depositary may deem equitable and practicable for accomplishing such distribution. If in the opinion of the Depositary such distribution cannot be made proportionately among such Record Holders, or if for any other reason (including any requirement that the Corporation or the Depositary withhold an amount on account of taxes or charges) the Depositary deems, after consultation with the Corporation, such distribution not to be feasible, the Depositary may, with the approval of the Corporation, adopt such method as it deems equitable and practicable for the purpose of effecting such distribution, including the sale (at public or private sale) of the securities or property thus received, or any part thereof, in a commercially reasonable manner. The net proceeds of any such sale shall, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, be distributed or made available for distribution, as the case may be, by the Depositary to Record Holders of Receipts as provided by Section 4.1 in the case of a distribution received in cash. The Corporation shall not make any distribution of such securities or property to the Depositary and the Depositary shall not make any distribution of such securities or property to the Holders of Receipts unless the Corporation shall have provided an opinion of counsel stating that such securities or property have been registered under the Securities Act or do not need to be registered in connection with such distributions.
.
Section 4.3. Subscription Rights, Preferences or Privileges
If the Corporation shall at any time offer or cause to be offered to the Persons in whose names shares of the Series D Preferred Stock is recorded on the books of the Corporation any rights, preferences or privileges to subscribe for or to purchase any securities or any rights, preferences or privileges of any other nature, such rights, preferences or privileges shall in each such instance be communicated to the Depositary and made available by the Depositary to the Record Holders of Receipts in such manner as the Corporation shall direct and the Depositary shall agree, either by the issue to such Record Holders of warrants representing such rights,
 
preferences or privileges or by such other method as may be approved by the Corporation in its discretion with the acknowledgement of the Depositary; , , that (i) if at the time of issue or offer of any such rights, preferences or privileges the Corporation determines that it is not lawful or (after consultation with the Depositary) not feasible to make such rights, preferences or privileges available to Holders of Receipts by the issue of warrants or otherwise, or (ii) if and to the extent so instructed by Holders of Receipts who do not desire to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges, then the Corporation, in its discretion (with acknowledgement of the Depositary, in any case where the Corporation has determined that it is not feasible to make such rights, preferences or privileges available), may, if applicable laws or the terms of such rights, preferences or privileges permit such transfer, sell such rights, preferences or privileges at public or private sale, at such place or places and upon such terms as it may deem proper. The net proceeds of any such sale shall be delivered to the Depositary and, if received, in accordance with the written instructions of the Corporation and, subject to Sections 3.1 and 3.2, be distributed by the Depositary to the Record Holders of Receipts entitled thereto as provided by Section 4.1 in the case of a distribution received in cash.
provided
however
The Corporation shall notify the Depositary whether registration under the Securities Act of the securities to which any rights, preferences or privileges relate is required in order for Holders of Receipts to be offered or sold the securities to which such rights, preferences or privileges relate, and the Corporation agrees with the Depositary that it will file promptly a registration statement pursuant to the Securities Act with respect to such rights, preferences or privileges and securities and use its best efforts and take all steps available to it to cause such registration statement to become effective sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such Holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges. In no event shall the Depositary make available to the Holders of Receipts any right, preference or privilege to subscribe for or to purchase any securities unless and until such registration statement shall have become effective, or the Corporation shall have provided to the Depositary an opinion of counsel to the effect that the offering and sale of such securities to the Holders are exempt from registration under the provisions of the Securities Act.
The Corporation shall notify the Depositary whether any other action under the laws of any jurisdiction or any governmental or administrative authorization, consent or permit is required in order for such rights, preferences or privileges to be made available to Holders of Receipts, and the Corporation agrees with the Depositary that the Corporation will use its reasonable best efforts to take such action or obtain such authorization, consent or permit sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such Holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges.
.
Section 4.4. Notice of Dividends, etc.; Fixing Record Date for Holders of Receipts
Whenever any cash dividend or other cash distribution shall become payable or any distribution other than cash shall be made, or if rights, preferences or privileges shall at any time be offered, with respect to the Series D Preferred Stock, or whenever the Depositary shall receive notice of any meeting at which holders of the Series D Preferred Stock are entitled to vote or of which holders of the Series D Preferred Stock are entitled to notice, or whenever the Depositary and the Corporation shall decide it is appropriate, the Depositary shall in each such
 
instance fix a record date (which shall be the same date as the record date fixed by the Corporation with respect to or otherwise in accordance with the terms of the Series D Preferred Stock) for the determination of the Holders of Receipts who shall be entitled to receive such dividend, distribution, rights, preferences or privileges or the net proceeds of the sale thereof, or to give instructions for the exercise of voting rights at any such meeting, or who shall be entitled to notice of such meeting or for any other appropriate reasons.
.
Section 4.5. Voting Rights
Subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, upon receipt of notice from the Corporation of any meeting at which the holders of the Series D Preferred Stock are entitled to vote, the Depositary shall, if requested in writing and provided with all necessary information and documents, as soon as practicable thereafter, mail or transmit by such other method approved by the Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, to the Record Holders of Receipts, as determined on the record date set forth in Section 4.4, a notice prepared by the Corporation which shall contain (i) such information as is contained in such notice of meeting, (ii) a statement that the Holders of Receipts at the close of business on a specified record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.4 may, subject to any applicable restrictions, instruct the Depositary as to the exercise of the voting rights pertaining to the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by their respective Depositary Shares (including an express indication that instructions may be given to the Depositary to give a discretionary proxy to a Person designated by the Corporation), and (iii) a brief statement as to the manner in which such instructions may be given. Upon the written request of the Holders of Receipts on the relevant record date, the Depositary shall endeavor insofar as practicable to vote or cause to be voted, in accordance with the instructions set forth in such requests, the maximum number of whole shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by all Receipts as to which any particular voting instructions are received. The Corporation hereby agrees to take all reasonable action which may be deemed necessary by the Depositary in order to enable the Depositary to vote such shares of the Series D Preferred Stock or cause such shares to be voted. In the absence of specific instructions from Holders of Receipts, the Depositary will not vote (but, at its discretion, may appear at any meeting with respect to the Series D Preferred Stock unless directed to the contrary by the Holders of all the Receipts) to the extent of the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipts. The Depositary shall not be required to exercise discretion in voting any Series D Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt.
Section 4.6. Changes Affecting Deposited Securities and Reclassifications, Recapitalizations, etc.
Upon any change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or any other reclassification of the Series D Preferred Stock, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Designations, or upon any recapitalization, reorganization, merger or consolidation affecting the Corporation or to which it is a party, the Depositary shall, upon the written instructions of the Corporation setting forth any adjustment, (i) make such adjustments as are certified by the Corporation in (a) the fraction of an interest represented by one Depositary Share in one share of the Series D Preferred Stock and (b) the ratio of the redemption price per Depositary Share to the redemption price per share of the Series D Preferred Stock, in each case as stated in such
 
instructions and (ii) treat any securities or property (including cash) which shall be received by the Depositary in exchange for or upon conversion of or in respect of the Series D Preferred Stock as new deposited property so received in exchange for or upon conversion or in respect of such Series D Preferred Stock. In any such case, the Depositary shall, upon receipt of written instructions of the Corporation, execute and deliver additional Receipts or may call for the surrender of all outstanding Receipts to be exchanged for new Receipts specifically describing such new deposited property. Anything to the contrary herein notwithstanding, Holders of Receipts shall have the right from and after the effective date of any such change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or other reclassification of the Series D Preferred Stock or any such recapitalization, reorganization, merger or consolidation to surrender such Receipts to the Depositary with instructions to convert, exchange or surrender the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented thereby only into or for, as the case may be, the kind and amount of shares and other securities and property and cash into which the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by such Receipts might have been converted or for which such shares might have been exchanged or surrendered immediately prior to the effective date of such transaction.
.
Section 4.7. Delivery of Reports
The Depositary shall make available for inspection by Holders of Receipts at the Depositary's Office and at such other places as it may from time to time deem advisable during normal business hours any reports and communications received from the Corporation that are both received by the Depositary as the holder of the Deposited Shares and which the Corporation is required to furnish to the holders of the Series D Preferred Stock. In addition, the Depositary shall transmit, upon written request by the Corporation, certain notices and reports to the Holders of Receipts as provided in Section 5.5.
Section 4.8. Lists of Receipt Holders.
Promptly upon request from time to time by the Corporation, the Registrar shall furnish to it a list, as of the most recent practicable date, of the names, addresses and holdings of Depositary Shares of all registered Holders of Receipts.
Section 4.9. Withholding.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Deposit Agreement, in the event that the Depositary determines that any distribution in property is subject to any tax or other charge that the Depositary is obligated by law to withhold, the Depositary may dispose of, by public or private sale, all or a portion of such property in such amounts and in such manner as the Depositary deems necessary and practicable to pay such taxes or charges, and the Depositary shall distribute the net proceeds of any such sale or the balance of any such property after deduction of such taxes or charges to the Holders of Receipts entitled thereto in proportion to the number of Depositary Shares held by them, respectively; provided, however, that in the event the Depositary determines that such distribution of property is subject to withholding tax only with respect to some but not all Holders of Receipts, the Depositary will use its best efforts (i) to sell only that portion of such property distributable to such holders that is required to generate sufficient proceeds to pay such withholding tax and (ii) to effect any such sale in such a manner so as to avoid affecting the rights of any other Holders of Receipts to receive such distribution in property.
 
.
Section 5.1. Maintenance of Offices, Agencies and Transfer Books by the Depositary; Registrar
Upon execution of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall maintain at the Depositary's Office, facilities for the execution and delivery, registration and registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of Receipts, and at the offices of the Depositary's Agents, if any, facilities for the delivery, registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of Receipts, all in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement.
The Depositary shall keep books at the Depositary's Office for the registration and registration of transfer of Receipts. Upon direction by the Corporation and with reasonable notice to the Depositary, the Registrar shall open its books for inspection by the Record Holders of Receipts as directed by the Corporation; that any record Holder shall be granted such right by the Corporation only after certifying that such inspection shall be for a proper purpose reasonably related to such Person's interest as an owner of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts.
provided
The Depositary or Registrar may close such books, at any time or from time to time, when deemed necessary or advisable by the Depositary, the Registrar, any Depositary's Agent or the Corporation because of any requirement of law or of any government, governmental body or commission, stock exchange or any applicable self-regulatory body.
If the Receipts or the Depositary Shares evidenced thereby or the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Shares shall be listed on one or more national securities exchanges, the Depositary may, with the written approval of the Corporation, appoint a Registrar (acceptable to the Corporation) for registration of the Receipts or Depositary Shares in accordance with any requirements of such exchange. Such Registrar (which may be the Depositary if so permitted by the requirements of any such exchange) may be removed and a substitute Registrar appointed by the Depositary upon the written request or with the written approval of the Corporation. If the Receipts, such Depositary Shares or the Series D Preferred Stock are listed on one or more other securities exchanges, the Depositary will, at the written request and expense of the Corporation, arrange such facilities for the delivery, registration, registration of transfer, surrender and exchange of such Receipts, such Depositary Shares or the Series D Preferred Stock as may be required by law or applicable securities exchange regulation.
 
Section 5.2. Prevention of or Delay in Performance by the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar or the Corporation.
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall incur any liability to any Holder of Receipt if by reason of any provision of any present or future law, or regulation thereunder, of the United States of America or of any other governmental authority or, in the case of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent or the Registrar, as the case may be, by reason of any provision, present or future, of the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including the Certificate of Designations) or by reason of any act of God or war or other circumstance beyond the control of the relevant party, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be prevented or forbidden from, or subjected to any penalty on account of, doing or performing any act or thing which the terms of this Deposit Agreement provide shall be done or performed; nor shall the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Corporation, as the case may be, incur liability to any Holder of a Receipt (i) by reason of any nonperformance or delay, caused as aforesaid, in the performance of any act or thing which the terms of this Deposit Agreement shall provide shall or may be done or performed, or (ii) by reason of any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any discretion provided for in this Deposit Agreement except as otherwise explicitly set forth in this Deposit Agreement.
.
Section 5.3. Obligations of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar, Transfer Agent and the Corporation
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar, any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, assumes any obligation or shall be subject to any liability under this Deposit Agreement to Holders of Receipts or to any other Person other than for its gross negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation). Notwithstanding anything in this Deposit Agreement to the contrary, neither the Depositary, nor the Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be liable in any event for special, punitive, incidental, indirect or consequential losses or damages of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if they have been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action. Any liability of Depositary, any Depositary's Agent or the Registrar or Transfer Agent, as the case may be, under this Deposit Agreement will be limited in the aggregate to an amount equal to the annual fees paid by the Corporation to such Person, but not including reimbursable expenses; provided, however, that in the event that such liability arises as a result of misappropriation of funds by the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents (except for such Depositary's Agents which are not employees of the Depositary), any Registrar or any Transfer Agent, as the case may be, through fraud or willful misconduct on the part of such Person (as determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation), such limit shall not apply and such liability hereunder shall be instead limited to the amount of such misappropriated funds or the liability resulting from such fraud or willful misconduct. Solely with respect to those matters covered by Section 7.12(l), Section 7.12(l) shall prevail over anything to the contrary stated in this paragraph.
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be under any obligation to appear in, prosecute or defend any action, suit or other proceeding in respect of the Series D Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts which in its opinion may involve it in expense or liability unless indemnity satisfactory to it against all expense and liability be furnished as often as may be required.
 
Neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar nor any Transfer Agent nor the Corporation, as the case may be, shall be liable for any action or any failure to act by it in reliance upon the written advice of legal counsel or accountants, or information from any Person presenting the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock for deposit, any Holder of a Receipt or any other Person believed by it to be competent to give such information. The Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar, any Transfer Agent and the Corporation, as the case may be, may each rely and shall each be protected in acting upon or omitting to act upon any written notice, request, direction or other document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or parties.
The Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, shall not be responsible for any failure to carry out any instruction to vote any of the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock or for the manner or effect of any such vote made, as long as any such action or non-action is not taken in bad faith, fraud, willful misconduct or gross negligence (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation). The Depositary undertakes, and any Depositary's Agent, Registrar and any Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall be required to undertake, to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Deposit Agreement, and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Deposit Agreement against the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, Registrar or any Transfer Agent.
The Depositary, its parent, Affiliate, or subsidiaries, any Depositary's Agents, and any Transfer Agent and any Registrar, as the case may be, may own and deal in any class of securities of the Corporation and its Affiliates and in Receipts or Depositary Shares or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Corporation or its Affiliates may be interested or contract with or lend money to or otherwise act as fully or as freely as if it were not the Depositary, the parent, Affiliate or subsidiary of the Depositary or the Depositary's Agent or Transfer Agent or Registrar hereunder. The Depositary may also act as transfer agent, trustee or registrar of any of the securities of the Corporation and its Affiliates or act in any other capacity for the Corporation or its Affiliates.
The Depositary shall not be under any liability for interest on any monies at any time received by it pursuant to any of the provisions of this Deposit Agreement or of the Receipts, the Depositary Shares or the Series D Preferred Stock nor shall it be obligated to segregate such monies from other monies held by it, except as required by law. The Depositary shall not be responsible for advancing funds on behalf of the Corporation and shall have no duty or obligation to make any payments if it has not timely received sufficient funds to make timely payments.
In the event the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, believes any ambiguity or uncertainty exists hereunder or in any notice, instruction, direction, request or other communication, paper or document received by the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar hereunder, or in the
 
administration of any of the provisions of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall deem it necessary or desirable that a matter be proved or established prior to taking, omitting or suffering to take any action hereunder, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar may, in its sole discretion upon providing written notice to the Corporation, refrain from taking any action and the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall be fully protected and shall not be liable in any way to the Corporation, any Holders of Receipts or any other Person or entity for refraining from taking such action, unless the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar receives written instructions or a certificate of the Corporation which eliminates such ambiguity or uncertainty to the satisfaction of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar or which proves or establishes the applicable matter to the satisfaction of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar. Such written instructions shall be full and complete authorization to the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar, as the case may be, and the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, any Transfer Agent or Registrar shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it under the provisions of this Deposit Agreement in reliance upon such written instructions.
In the event the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall receive conflicting claims, requests or instructions from any Holders of Receipts, on the one hand, and the Corporation, on the other hand, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, shall be entitled to act on such claims, requests or instructions received from the Corporation, and shall incur no liability and shall be entitled to the full indemnification set forth in Section 5.6 hereof in connection with any action so taken.
It is intended that the Depositary shall not be deemed to be an "issuer" of the securities under the federal securities laws or applicable state securities laws, it being expressly understood and agreed that the Depositary is acting only in a ministerial capacity as Depositary for the deposited Series D Preferred Stock. The Depositary will not be under any duty or responsibility to ensure compliance with any applicable federal or state securities laws in connection with the issuance, transfer or exchange of the Receipts, the shares of Series D Preferred Stock or Depositary Shares.
Neither the Depositary (or its officers, directors, employees or agents), any Depositary's Agent nor any Registrar or any Transfer Agent makes any representation or has any responsibility as to the validity of any registration statement pursuant to which the Depositary Shares may be registered under the Securities Act, the deposited Preferred Shares, the Depositary Shares, the Receipts (except its countersignature thereon) or any instruments referred to therein or herein, or as to the correctness of any statement made in any such registration statement or herein.
The Depositary assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the description that appears in the Receipts. Notwithstanding any other provision herein or in the Receipts, the Depositary makes no warranties or representations as to the validity or genuineness of any shares of Series D Preferred Stock at any time deposited with the Depositary hereunder or of the Depositary Shares, as to the validity or sufficiency of this Deposit Agreement, as to the value of
 
the Depositary Shares or as to any right, title or interest of the record holders of Receipts in and to the Depositary Shares. The Depositary shall not be accountable for the use or application by the Corporation of the Depositary Shares or the Receipts or the proceeds thereof.
The Depositary, Depositary's Agent, any Registrar, and any Transfer Agent hereunder:
(i) shall have no duties or obligations other than those specifically set forth herein (and no implied duties or obligations), or as may subsequently be agreed to in writing by the parties;
(ii) shall have no obligation to make payment hereunder unless the Corporation shall have provided the necessary federal or other immediately available funds or securities or property, as the case may be, to pay in full amounts due and payable with respect thereto;
(iii) shall not be obligated to prosecute or defend any litigation or other proceeding hereunder; if, however, the Depositary determines to prosecute or defend any litigation or other proceeding hereunder, and, where the taking of such action might in the Depositary's judgment subject or expose it to any expense or liability, the Depositary shall not be required to act unless it shall have been furnished with an indemnity satisfactory to it;
(iv) may rely on and shall be authorized and protected in acting or failing to act upon any certificate, instrument, opinion, notice, letter, telegram, telex, facsimile transmission or other document or security delivered to the Depositary and believed by the Depositary to be genuine and to have been signed by the proper party or parties, and shall have no responsibility for determining the accuracy thereof;
(v) may rely on and shall be authorized and protected in acting or failing to act upon the written, telephonic, electronic and oral instructions, with respect to any matter relating to the Depositary's actions as Depositary covered by this Deposit Agreement (or supplementing or qualifying any such actions) of officers of the Corporation;
(vi) may consult counsel satisfactory to it, and the written advice of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by the Depositary hereunder in accordance with the advice of such counsel;
(vii) except as specifically set forth herein, shall not be called upon at any time to advise any Person with respect to the shares of Series D Preferred Stock or Receipts;
(viii) shall not be liable in any respect on account of the identity, authority or rights of the parties (other than with respect to the Depositary) executing or delivering or purporting to execute or deliver this Deposit Agreement or any documents or papers deposited or called for under this Deposit Agreement; and
 
(ix) shall not be liable for any failures, delays or losses, arising directly or indirectly out of conditions beyond their reasonable control, including, but not limited to, (i) work stoppages or labor disputes, electrical or mechanical failure or computer hardware or software failure, in each case other than of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Transfer Agent, as the case may be, or (ii) acts of government, exchange or market ruling, suspension of trading, civil disobedience, riots, rebellions, communications facilities failures including telephone failure, war, terrorism, insurrection, fires, earthquakes, storms, floods, acts of God or similar occurrences.
The obligations of the Corporation set forth in this Section 5.3 shall survive the replacement, removal or resignation of the Depositary, Registrar, Transfer Agent or Depositary's Agent or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 5.4. Resignation and Removal of the Depositary; Appointment of Successor Depositary.
The Depositary may at any time resign as Depositary hereunder by delivering notice of its election to do so to the Corporation, such resignation to take effect upon the appointment of a successor Depositary and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
The Depositary may at any time be removed by the Corporation by notice of such removal delivered to the Depositary, such removal to take effect upon the appointment of a successor Depositary hereunder and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
In case at any time the Depositary acting hereunder shall resign or be removed, the Corporation shall, within sixty (60) days after the delivery of the notice of resignation or removal, as the case may be, appoint a successor Depositary, which shall be (i) a Person having its principal office in the United States of America and having a combined capital and surplus, along with its Affiliates, of at least $50,000,000 or (ii) an Affiliate of any such Person. In the event of such removal or resignation, the Corporation will appoint a successor depositary and inform the Depositary of the name and address of any successor depositary so appointed, provided that no failure by the Corporation to appoint such a successor depositary shall affect the termination of this Deposit Agreement or the discharge of the Corporation and the Depositary as depositary hereunder. Upon payment of all outstanding fees and expenses hereunder, the Depositary shall promptly forward to the successor depositary or its designee any shares of stock held by it and any certificates, letters, notices and other document that the Depositary may receive after its appointment has so terminated.
If no successor Depositary shall have been so appointed and have accepted appointment within sixty (60) days after delivery of such notice, the resigning or removed Depositary may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Depositary. Every successor Depositary shall execute and deliver to its predecessor and to the Corporation an instrument in writing accepting its appointment hereunder, and thereupon such successor Depositary, without any further act or deed, shall become fully vested with all the rights, powers, duties and obligations of its predecessor and for all purposes shall be the Depositary under this Deposit Agreement, and such predecessor, upon payment of all sums due it
 
and on the written request of the Corporation, shall promptly execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor all rights and powers of such predecessor hereunder, shall duly assign, transfer and deliver all right, title and interest in the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and any moneys or property held hereunder to such successor, and shall deliver to such successor a list of the Record Holders of all outstanding Receipts and such records, books and other information in its possession relating thereto. Any successor Depositary shall promptly mail or transmit by such other method approved by such successor Depositary, in its reasonable discretion, notice of its appointment to the Record Holders of Receipts.
Any Person into or with which the Depositary may be merged, consolidated or converted, or any Person to which all or a substantial part of the assets of the Depositary may be transferred or which succeeds to the shareholder services business of the Depositary shall be the successor of the Depositary without the execution or filing of any document or any further act, and notice thereof shall not be required hereunder. Such successor Depositary may authenticate the Receipts in the name of the predecessor Depositary or its own name as successor Depositary.
The removal or resignation of the Depositary shall automatically be deemed to be a removal of the Depositary as Registrar and Transfer Agent herein without any further act or deed.
.
Section 5.5. Corporate Notices and Reports
The Corporation agrees that it will deliver to the Depositary, and the Depositary will, promptly after receipt of all necessary information and documents, transmit to the Record Holders of Receipts, in each case at the addresses recorded in the Depositary's or Registrar's books, copies of all notices and reports (including without limitation financial statements) required by law, by the rules of any national securities exchange upon which the Series D Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts are listed or by the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including the Certificate of Designations), to be furnished to the Record Holders of Receipts. Such transmission will be at the Corporation's expense and the Corporation will provide the Depositary with such number of copies of such documents as the Depositary may reasonably request. In addition, the Depositary will transmit to the Record Holders of Receipts at the Corporation's expense such other documents as may be requested in writing by the Corporation.
.
Section 5.6. Indemnification by the Corporation
Notwithstanding Section 5.3 to the contrary, the Corporation shall indemnify the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar and any Transfer Agent (including each of their officers, directors, agents and employees) against, and hold each of them harmless from and against, any fee, loss, damage, cost, penalty, fine, judgment, liability or expense (including the reasonable costs and expenses of its legal counsel) which may arise out of acts performed, taken or omitted to be taken in connection with its acting as Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Registrar or Transfer Agent, respectively, under this Deposit Agreement (including, without limitation, the enforcement by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Registrar or Transfer Agent, as the case may be, of this Deposit Agreement) and the Receipts by the Depositary, any Registrar or any of their respective agents (including any Depositary's Agent) and any transactions or documents
 
contemplated hereby, except for any liability arising out of negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation) on the respective parts of any such Person or Persons. The obligations of the Corporation set forth in this Section 5.6 shall survive any succession of any Depositary, Registrar, Transfer Agent or Depositary's Agent or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
.
Section 5.7. Fees, Charges and Expenses
The Corporation agrees promptly to pay the Depositary the compensation, as set forth in Exhibit D hereto or, if thereafter separately agreed upon with the Corporation, in accordance with such subsequent agreed upon terms, for all services rendered by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Transfer Agent and Registrar hereunder and to reimburse the Depositary for its reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable counsel fees and expenses) incurred by the Depositary, Depositary's Agent, Transfer Agent and Registrar without gross negligence, willful misconduct, bad faith or fraud on its part (each as finally determined by a non-appealable judgment, order, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction, an arbitral award or an agreement with the Corporation) in connection with the services rendered by it (or any agent of the Depositary) hereunder. The Corporation shall pay all charges of the Depositary in connection with the initial deposit of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and the initial issuance of the Depositary Shares, all withdrawals of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock by owners of Depositary Shares, and any redemption or exchange of shares of the Series D Preferred Stock at the option of the Corporation. The Corporation shall pay all transfer and other taxes and charges arising solely from the existence of the depositary arrangements. All other transfer and other taxes and charges shall be at the expense of Holders of Depositary Shares evidenced by Receipts. If, at the request of a Holder of Receipts, the Depositary incurs charges or expenses for which the Corporation is not otherwise liable hereunder, such Holder will be liable for such charges and expenses; , , that the Depositary may, at its sole option, require a Holder of a Receipt to prepay the Depositary any charge or expense the Depositary has been asked to incur at the request of such Holder of Receipts. The Depositary shall present its statement for charges and expenses to the Corporation at such intervals as the Corporation and the Depositary may agree.
provided
however
.
Section 6.1. Amendment
The form of the Receipts and any provisions of this Deposit Agreement may at any time and from time to time be amended by agreement between the Corporation and the Depositary in any respect which they may deem necessary or desirable; , , that no such amendment (other than any change in the fees of any Depositary, Registrar or Transfer Agent) which shall materially and adversely alter the rights of the Holders of Receipts shall be effective against the Holders of Receipts unless such amendment shall have been approved by the Holders of Receipts representing in the aggregate at least a two-thirds of the Depositary Shares then outstanding. Every Holder of an outstanding Receipt at the time any such amendment becomes effective shall be deemed, by continuing to hold such Receipt, to consent and agree to such amendment and to be bound by the Deposit Agreement as amended thereby. In
provided
however
 
no event shall any amendment impair the right, subject to the provisions of Sections 2.5 and 2.6 and Article III, of any owner of Depositary Shares to surrender any Receipt evidencing such Depositary Shares to the Depositary with instructions to deliver to the Holder the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock and all money and other property, if any, represented thereby, except in order to comply with mandatory provisions of applicable law or the rules and regulations of any governmental body, agency or commission, or applicable securities exchange. As a condition precedent to the Depositary's execution of any amendment, the Corporation shall deliver to the Depositary a certificate that states that the proposed amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 6.1.
.
Section 6.2. Termination
This Deposit Agreement may be terminated by the Corporation at any time upon not less than sixty (60) days prior written notice to the Depositary, in which case, at least thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed in such notice for such termination, the Depositary will mail notice of such termination to the record Holders of all Receipts then outstanding. If any Receipts shall remain outstanding after the date of termination of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary thereafter shall discontinue the transfer of Receipts, shall suspend the distribution of dividends to the Holders of the Receipts thereof and shall not give any further notices (other than notice of such termination) or perform any further acts under this Deposit Agreement, except that the Depositary shall continue to collect dividends and other distributions pertaining to the Series D Preferred Stock, and shall continue to deliver the Stock and any money and other property, if any, represented by Receipts upon surrender thereof by the Holders of Receipts thereof. At any time after the expiration of two years from the date of termination, as may be instructed by the Corporation in writing, the Depositary shall (i) sell the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock then held hereunder at public or private sale, at such places and upon such terms as it deems proper and may thereafter hold the net proceeds of any such sale, together with any money and other property held by it hereunder, without liability for interest, for the benefit, pro rata in accordance with their holdings, of the Holders of Receipts that have not theretofore been surrendered, or (ii) return such shares of Series D Preferred Stock to the Corporation. After making such sale, the Depositary shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except to account for such net proceeds and money and other property. The Depositary shall continue to receive its fees and expenses after termination of this Deposit Agreement so long as the Depositary continues to provide services in connection with this Deposit Agreement.
Subject to the first paragraph of this Section 6.2, this Deposit Agreement may be terminated by the Company or the Depositary only if (i) all outstanding Depositary Shares have been redeemed pursuant to Section 2.8; (ii) there shall have been made a final distribution in respect of the Series D Preferred Stock in connection with any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation and such distribution shall have been distributed to the Holders of Receipts representing Depositary Shares pursuant to Section 4.1 or 4.2, as applicable; or (iii) upon the consent of Holders of Receipts representing in the aggregate not less than two-thirds of the Depositary Shares outstanding.
 
Upon the termination of this Deposit Agreement, the Corporation shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except for its obligations to the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent and any Registrar under Sections 5.6 and 5.7; that Section 5.3 and 5.6 shall survive the termination of this Deposit Agreement.
provided further
The provisions relating to termination and survival in Section 7.12 shall prevail over anything to the contrary stated in this Section 6.2.
Section 7.1. Counterparts.
This Deposit Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, and by each of the parties hereto on separate counterparts, each of which counterparts, when so executed and delivered, shall be deemed an original, but all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Deposit Agreement by facsimile or pdf shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Deposit Agreement.
Section 7.2. Exclusive Benefit of Parties.
This Deposit Agreement is for the exclusive benefit of the parties hereto, and their respective successors hereunder, and shall not be deemed to give any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim to any other Person whatsoever.
Section 7.3. Invalidity of Provisions.
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Deposit Agreement or in the Receipts should be or become invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein or therein shall in no way be affected, prejudiced or disturbed thereby.
Section 7.4. Notices.
Any and all notices to be given to the Corporation hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to the Corporation at:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
32 Old Slip,
New York, New York 10005
Attention: Corporate Treasury
Facsimile: (212) 495-1014
 
with a copy to:
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
One Wall Street,
New York, New York 10286
Attention: Legal Department, Chief Securities Counsel
Facsimile: (212) 635-1698
or at any other addresses of which the Corporation shall have notified the Depositary in writing.
Any and all notices to be given to the Depositary hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to the Depositary at the Depositary's Office at
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC
Newport Office Center VII
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310
Attention: Relationship Manager
Facsimile: (732) 667-9521
with a copy to:
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC
Newport Office Center VII
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310
Attention: Legal Department
Facsimile: (201) 680-4610
or at any other address of which the Depositary shall have notified the Corporation in writing.
Any and all notices to be given to any Record Holder of a Receipt hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, recognized next day courier services, facsimile transmission or electronic mail, confirmed by letter, addressed to such Record Holder at the address of such Record Holder as it appears on the books of the Depositary, or if such Holder shall have timely filed with the Depositary a written request that notices intended for such Holder be mailed to some other address, at the address designated in such request.
Delivery of a notice sent by mail or as provided in the previous sentence shall be deemed to be effected at the time when a duly addressed letter containing the same (or a confirmation thereof in the case of a facsimile transmission or electronic mail) is deposited, postage prepaid, in a post office letter box; , that the Depositary or the Corporation may, however, act upon any facsimile transmission or electronic mail received by it from the other or from any Holder of a Receipt, notwithstanding that such facsimile transmission or electronic mail shall not subsequently be confirmed by letter or as aforesaid.
provided
 
Section 7.5. Depositary's Agents.
The Depositary may from time to time appoint Depositary's Agents to act in any respect for the Depositary for the purposes of this Deposit Agreement and may at any time appoint additional Depositary's Agents and vary or terminate the appointment of such Depositary's Agents. The Depositary will promptly notify the Corporation of any such action.
Section 7.6. Appointment of Registrar, Dividend Disbursing Agent and Redemption Agent in Respect of the Series D Preferred Stock.
The Corporation hereby appoints Computershare as Registrar, Transfer Agent, dividend disbursing agent and redemption agent in respect of the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock deposited with the Depositary hereunder, and Computershare hereby accepts such appointments, subject to the express terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement (and no implied terms or conditions) and, as such, will reflect changes in the number of shares of deposited Series D Preferred Stock held by it by notation, book-entry or other appropriate method. With respect to the appointment of Computershare as Registrar, Transfer Agent, dividend disbursing agent and redemption agent in respect of the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock, Computershare, in its respective capacities under such appointments, shall be entitled to the same rights, indemnities, immunities and benefits as the Depositary hereunder as if explicitly named in each such provision, and shall provide the services listed in Exhibit C hereto, in the performance of its duties in such respective capacities.
Section 7.7. Holders of Receipts are Parties.
The Holders of Receipts from time to time shall be parties to this Deposit Agreement and shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions hereof and of the Receipts by acceptance of delivery thereof.
Section 7.8. Governing Law.
This Deposit Agreement and the Receipts and all rights hereunder and thereunder and provisions hereof and thereof shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to applicable conflicts of law principles.
Section 7.9. Inspection of Deposit Agreement.
Copies of this Deposit Agreement shall be filed with the Depositary and the Depositary's Agents and shall be made available for inspection during business hours upon reasonable notice to the Depositary by any Holder of a Receipt.
Section 7.10. Headings.
The headings of articles and sections in this Deposit Agreement and in the form of the Receipt set forth in Exhibit B hereto have been inserted for convenience only and are not to be regarded as a part of this Deposit Agreement or the Receipts or to have any bearing upon the meaning or interpretation of any provision contained herein or in the Receipts.
 
Section 7.11. Confidentiality.
The Depositary and the Corporation agree that all books, records, information and data pertaining to the business of the other party, including, , personal, non-public Holder information, which are exchanged or received pursuant to the negotiation or the carrying out of this Deposit Agreement, shall remain confidential, and shall not be voluntarily disclosed to any other Person, except as may be required by law or legal process.
inter alia
Section 7.12. Protection of Personal Information.
(a) In connection with the performance of Computershare's duties on behalf of the Corporation under this Deposit Agreement, Computershare is expected to obtain confidential information related to the Corporation or the Holders of Depositary Shares that is not available to the general public (""). Computershare agrees that the Confidential Information shall be held and treated by Computershare, its directors, officers, employees, Affiliates, agents and subcontractors (collectively, "") in confidence and, except as hereinafter provided, shall not be disclosed in any manner whatsoever except as otherwise required by law, regulation, subpoena or governmental authority. Confidential Information shall be used by Computershare and its Representatives only for the purposes for which provided and shall be disclosed by Computershare only to those Representatives who have a need to know in order to accomplish the business purpose in connection with which the Confidential Information has been provided. Information shall no longer be considered Confidential Information at such time as such information becomes publicly available other than by action of Computershare or its Representatives.
Confidential Information
Representatives
(b) "" means all information about individuals, including but not limited to, names, signatures, addresses, telephone numbers, account numbers, social security numbers, credit reports, demographic information, financial and other personal data, transaction information, and lists of customers, employees, or investors, received from or created or received on behalf of the Corporation by Computershare or to which Computershare has access in the course of performing its duties on behalf of the Corporation under this Deposit Agreement (the "").
Personal Information
Services
(c) Computershare agrees that all Personal Information is, and shall be considered, confidential and proprietary to the Corporation. Computershare shall not disclose Personal Information to any third party nor permit any third party to have access to any Personal Information, for any purpose except as otherwise provided below. Computershare shall not use Personal Information, nor shall Computershare duplicate Personal Information or retain records thereof, except as necessary to perform the Services. Computershare shall comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to Computershare relating to the Personal Information and shall comply with the Corporation's reasonable instructions concerning Personal Information that the Corporation reasonably believes are necessary for the Corporation to be in compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations relating to the Personal Information in Computershare's possession or control.
(d) Computershare shall implement and maintain a comprehensive written information security program (the "") which shall include all necessary measures, including the establishment and maintenance of policies and procedures, and technical, physical and administrative safeguards, designed to (i) ensure the security and
Information Security Program
 
confidentiality of the Personal Information, (ii) protect against any foreseeable threats or hazards to the security or integrity of Personal Information, (iii) protect against unauthorized access to or use of such information, and (iv) ensure secure and appropriate disposal of the Personal Information. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Information Security Program shall provide for (i) continual assessment and re-assessment of the risks to the security of Personal Information acquired or maintained by Computershare and its agents and contractors in connection with the Services, including, but not limited to, (X) identification of internal and external threats that could result in unauthorized disclosure, alteration or destruction of Personal Information and systems used by Computershare and its agents and contractors, (Y) assessment of the likelihood and potential damage of such threats, taking into account the sensitivity of such Personal Information, and (Z) assessment of the sufficiency of policies, procedures, information systems of Computershare and its agents and contractors, and other arrangements in place, to control risks; and (ii) appropriate protection against such risks. The Information Security Program shall provide for the encryption of Personal Information in electronic form while in transit and appropriate firewall and other protections for unencrypted personal information in storage. Computershare shall, and shall require its agents and contractors to, regularly test key controls, systems and procedures relating to the Information Security Program. The frequency and nature of such tests shall be determined by Computershare's risk assessment, in consultation with the Corporation. Computershare shall provide the Corporation with the results of all such tests and summaries of any other audit, review or examination of its Information Security Program. Computershare shall comply with its Information Security Program. Computershare certifies that its Information Security Program is and shall be in compliance with Title 201 of the Code of Massachusetts Regulations, Section 17.01 et seq., and other applicable laws, rules, regulations and orders. Computershare shall deliver separate certifications of such compliance upon the Corporation's reasonable request.
(e) The Corporation or its designee (which may include regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over the Corporation or any of its affiliates, or outside auditing firms retained by the Corporation) shall have the right, at the Corporation's sole expense, with prior written notice and not more than once annually, to enter any Computershare premises at which the Services, or any part thereof, are performed, for the purpose of inspecting and auditing the provision of such Services and to determine, among other things, whether the Services are being provided in accordance with applicable law and the terms of this Deposit Agreement, and whether Computershare and its subcontractors have adequate policies, procedures, safeguards, and controls in place to protect the security of Personal Information acquired or maintained by them in connection with the Services. Any inspection and audit performed by or on behalf of the Corporation pursuant to this Section 7.12(e) shall be upon at least thirty (30) days written notice to Computershare by the Corporation. The foregoing 30-day notice provision and one annual audit or inspection limitation shall not apply to inspections or audits outside the control of the Corporation and performed or requested by regulatory authorities. During any such inspection or audit, or at any other reasonable time mutually agreed by the parties, Computershare shall make its relevant officers and employees available to the Corporation to discuss Computershare's measures related to its Information Security Program, including without limitation measures relating to oversight of Computershare's subcontractors and agents who have access to Personal Information, and give the Corporation or its designee access to records, in whatever form maintained, relating to the provision of the Services; provided, however, that Computershare
 
may, in its sole discretion, prohibit the Corporation from entering certain areas of its facilities for security reasons or from viewing certain records that are confidential to third parties, in which case Computershare will provide the Corporation with alternative access to the records, documents, other information or personnel in such restricted area, to the extent reasonably possible. In addition, Computershare shall arrange for the Corporation to conduct site visits at the premises of subcontractors and meet with information security representatives of its subcontractors as reasonably requested by the Corporation from time to time to review their information security measures. The Corporation may periodically submit to Computershare for itself and its subcontractors questionnaires concerning Computershare's Information Security Program, and concerning Computershare's and its subcontractors' security measures, business recovery plans, financial condition, ethics and compliance programs, and related measures. Computershare agrees to promptly respond to any such questionnaires and to any further inquiry by the Corporation its responses may entail, and promptly to require its subcontractors to do so. Computershare shall cooperate with the Corporation to agree upon prompt reasonable measures to mitigate any risks the Corporation may identify. Computershare shall maintain an ethics and compliance program substantially similar to the description in its questionnaire responses.
(f) Computershare shall notify the Corporation promptly, unless prohibited by law enforcement or court order, upon discovery of any unauthorized use, disclosure, acquisition, modification, or destruction of Personal Information, unauthorized access to Personal Information, or loss of Personal Information (each, a ""). Computershare shall investigate each Security Breach, provide the Corporation with a detailed written statement describing the circumstances surrounding each Security Breach, and provide and promptly implement a remediation plan, acceptable to the Corporation, to address the Security Breach and prevent any further incidents. Computershare will at its expense (subject to Paragraph (l) below) take all necessary or customary measures to mitigate any harmful effect of any such Security Breach, including without limitation notifications to affected individuals, if requested by the Corporation. Computershare shall also promptly notify the Corporation of any known attempts to commit a Security Breach.
Security Breach
(g) If there is a reasonable likelihood that, in the course of performing the Services, Computershare may become aware of activities, patterns of activity, or practices that indicate the possible existence of identity theft (as defined by regulations of the Federal Trade Commission), Computershare will implement appropriate measures, including the establishment and maintenance of policies and procedures, to detect such activities, patterns or practices, notify the Corporation upon such detection, and respond to such activities, patterns or practices. In addition, if Computershare does become aware of activities, patterns of activity, or practices indicating the possible existence of identity theft, Computershare will promptly notify the Corporation, and will take reasonable measures to assist the Corporation in implementing an appropriate response.
(h) Unless prohibited by law, Computershare shall (i) immediately notify the Corporation of any subpoena, court order, or other similar process for the purpose of obtaining Personal Information or other confidential information of the Corporation other than those received in the ordinary course of business and pertaining to a specifically identified individual, (ii) provide the Corporation with documentation thereof, and (iii) permit the Corporation adequate time to exercise its legal options to prohibit or limit disclosure.
 
(i) In the event that the Corporation determines that there has been a material breach by Computershare of any of Computershare's obligations with regard to Personal Information under this Section 7.12, the Corporation may terminate this Deposit Agreement without complying with the notice requirements set forth in Section 6.2. Computershare's obligations with regard to Personal Information shall survive the termination of the agreements with respect to any Personal Information so long as it remains in the possession of Computershare.
(j) Computershare shall return to the Corporation or, with the Corporation's permission, destroy all Personal Information and other confidential information of the Corporation in any form in Computershare's possession or in the possession of Computershare's agents or subcontractors in accordance with Computershare's records retention and destruction policies, and retain no copies thereof. Computershare will certify in writing any destruction of Personal Information and other confidential information of the Corporation. Computershare will upon request review its records retention and destruction policies with the Corporation.
(k) Computershare shall upon request from time to time provide the Corporation with a list of all subcontractors (including affiliates of Computershare) who have access to Personal Information. In addition, Computershare shall notify the Corporation in writing in advance of entering into a new agreement with any subcontractor that will have access to Personal Information. In the event that the Corporation objects to any new or existing subcontractor having access to Personal Information, Computershare shall work with the Corporation to resolve the Corporation's concerns. Computershare shall use appropriate diligence and care in selecting its subcontractors. Computershare agrees to include in written agreements with any agent or subcontractor to whom it provides access to Personal Information, confidentiality and security obligations with respect to such Information that are at least as restrictive as those that apply to Computershare hereunder, and to require the subcontractor to comply with such provisions and with Computershare's obligations under Section 7.12(e) above with respect to subcontractors; provided, however, that to the extent that Computershare's existing agreements with its agents and subcontractors do not require its agents and subcontractors to comply with Computershare's obligations under Section 7.12(e) above, Computershare shall by June 30, 2013 amend such agreements to require such compliance. Prior to June 30, 2013, Computershare shall not be deemed in breach of its obligations under Section 7.12 (e) above to arrange for the Corporation to conduct site visits of a subcontractor or requiring a subcontractor to complete the Corporation's questionnaires, if Computershare's agreement with such subcontractor does not enable Computershare to require such subcontractor to comply. Computershare shall enforce its agreements with its agents and subcontractors. Computershare shall be responsible for the acts and omissions of its agents and subcontractors to the same extent as if such acts and omissions were those of Computershare.
(l) Without regard to any limitation of liability in this or any other agreement, Computershare shall indemnify and hold the Corporation harmless for all costs, losses, fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees), claims, investigations, damages and expenses, including but not limited to monetary penalties, incurred by the Corporation or any of its affiliates as a
 
result of a breach of Computershare's obligations under this Section 7.12; provided, however, that such obligation to indemnify and hold the Corporation harmless is subject to a monetary limit of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per calendar year, except that there shall be no monetary limit in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct. In addition to any other rights the Corporation may have under this Deposit Agreement or at law, since unauthorized use or disclosure of Personal Information or other confidential information may result in immediate and irreparable injury to the Corporation for which monetary damages may not be adequate, in the event that Computershare or any officer, director, employee, agent, or subcontractor of Computershare uses or discloses, or in the Corporation's sole opinion is likely to use or disclose, Personal Information or other confidential information in breach of Computershare's obligations hereunder, the Corporation shall be entitled to equitable relief, including temporary and permanent injunctive relief and specific performance. The Corporation shall also be entitled to the recovery of any pecuniary gain realized by Computershare from the unauthorized use or disclosure of Personal Information or confidential information. In no event will any payments paid or payable under this Section 7.12(l) be included in the amount of damages or losses that are subject to any limitation of liability in any other provision of this Deposit Agreement or in any other agreement.
(m) The provisions of this Section 7.12 shall survive expiration or termination of this Deposit Agreement for any reason.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation and the Depositary have duly executed this Deposit Agreement as of the day and year first above set forth, and all Holders of Receipts shall become parties hereto by and upon acceptance by them of delivery of Receipts issued in accordance with the terms hereof.
 
 
Certificate D-
THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS INSTRUMENT ARE NOT SAVINGS ACCOUNTS, DEPOSITS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OF A BANK AND ARE NOT INSURED BY THE FEDERAL DEPOSIT INSURANCE CORPORATION OR ANY OTHER GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY.
SHARES             SERIES D NONCUMULATIVE PERPETUAL PREFERRED STOCK
This is to certify that is the registered owner of fully paid and non-assessable shares of the Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, having a liquidation preference of $100,000 per share, of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), the terms of which are provided for in the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation including the Certificate of Designations of the Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, transferable on the books of the Corporation by the holder hereof in person or by its duly authorized attorney, upon surrender of this Certificate properly endorsed. This Certificate and the shares represented hereby are issued and shall be held subject to all of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and the By-laws of the Corporation and any amendments thereto. This Certificate is not valid unless countersigned and registered by the Transfer Agent and Registrar.
Corporation
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused this Certificate to be executed on its behalf by its duly authorized officers.
Dated:
 
Countersigned and Registered:
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Transfer Agent and Registrar
By:
                            
 
 
The Corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests, a full statement of the powers, designations and any preferences, conversion and other rights, restrictions, limitations as to dividends and other distributions, qualifications, and terms and conditions of redemption of the stock of each class which the Corporation has authority to issue and, if the Corporation is authorized to issue any preferred or special class in series, (i) the differences in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series to the extent set, and (ii) the authority of the Board of Directors to set such rights and preferences of subsequent series. The foregoing summary does not purport to be complete and is subject to and qualified in its entirety by reference to the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as amended from time to time, a copy of which will be sent without charge to each shareholder who so requests. Such request must be made to the Secretary of the Corporation at its principal office or to the Transfer Agent.
The following abbreviations, when used in the inscription on the face of this Certificate, shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations:
 
Additional abbreviations may also be used though not in the above list.
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto
                                
 
 
(PLEASE PRINT OR TYPEWRITE NAME AND ADDRESS, INCLUDING ZIP CODE, OF ASSIGNEE)
 
 
(PLEASE INSERT SOCIAL SECURITY OR OTHER IDENTIFYING NUMBER OF ASSIGNEE)
() shares represented by this Certificate and do(es) hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint , Attorney to transfer the said shares on the books of the Corporation, with full power of substitution in the premises.
                                             
                        
                                    
 
Signature(s) Guaranteed:
The signature(s) should be guaranteed by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Corporation's transfer agent. Guarantees by a notary public are not acceptable.
 
Unless this receipt is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange, or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Depositary (the ""), hereby certifies that Cede & Co. is the registered owner of             DEPOSITARY SHARES (""), each Depositary Share representing 1/100
Depositary
Depositary Shares
th
of one share of Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share, liquidation preference $100,000 per share (the ""), of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), on deposit with the Depositary, subject to the terms and entitled to the benefits of the Deposit Agreement dated as of May 16, 2013 (the ""), among the Corporation, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts. By accepting this Depositary Receipt, the holder hereof becomes a party to and agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the Deposit Agreement. This Depositary Receipt shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose or entitled to any benefits under the Deposit Agreement unless it shall have been executed by the Depositary by the manual signature of a duly authorized officer or, if executed in facsimile by the Depositary, countersigned by a Registrar in respect of the Depositary Receipts by the manual signature of a duly authorized officer thereof.
Series D Preferred Stock
Corporation
Deposit Agreement
 
Dated: , 20
                            
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Depositary
 
 
 
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION WILL FURNISH WITHOUT CHARGE TO EACH RECEIPTHOLDER WHO SO REQUESTS A COPY OF THE DEPOSIT AGREEMENT AND A COPY OR SUMMARY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF DESIGNATIONS OF SERIES D NON-CUMULATIVE PERPETUAL PREFERRED STOCK OF THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON CORPORATION ANY SUCH REQUEST IS TO BE ADDRESSED TO THE DEPOSITARY NAMED ON THE FACE OF THIS RECEIPT.
 
 
The Corporation will furnish without charge to each receiptholder who so requests the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof of the Corporation, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights. Such request may be made to the Corporation or to the Transfer Agent.
The following abbreviations when used in the form of ownership on the face of this certificate shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations. Abbreviations in addition to those appearing below may be used.
 
 
 
For value received, hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto
                        
 
 
Depositary Shares represented by the within Receipt, and do(es) hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint Attorney to transfer the said Depositary Shares on the books of the within named Depositary with full power of substitution in the premises.
                                        
Dated:
                        
NOTICE: The signature to the assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of this Receipt in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
SIGNATURE GUARANTEED
NOTICE: The signature(s) should be guaranteed by a participant in a Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Corporation's transfer agent. Guarantees by a notary public are not acceptable.
 

Exhibit 5.1
May 17, 2013
The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation,
        One Wall Street,
            New York, NY 10286.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), of up to 500,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/100
th
interest in a share of Series D Noncumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock, liquidation preference of $100,000 per share, $0.01 par value per share (the "Series D Preferred Stock"), of The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and evidenced by a depositary receipt (the "Depositary Receipt") to be issued pursuant to a Deposit Agreement, dated as of May 16, 2013 (the "Deposit Agreement"), among the Company, Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as depositary (the "Depositary"), and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipt described therein, I, as counsel for the Company, or attorneys under my supervision, have examined such corporate records, certificates and other documents, and such questions of law, as I have considered necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Upon the basis of such examination, it is my opinion that, (1) when (i) issued as contemplated by the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-167832) (the "Registration Statement") and deposited by the Company with the Depositary in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement, and (ii) paid for in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, dated May 10, 2013 (the "Underwriting Agreement"), among the Company and Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., UBS Securities LLC and BNY Mellon Capital Markets, LLC, as Representatives of the several Underwriters named therein, the shares of the Series D Preferred Stock to be deposited with the Depositary pursuant to the Deposit Agreement relating to the Depositary Shares (the "Series D Preferred Shares") will have been validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable, (2) upon due issuance by the Depositary of the Depositary Receipt evidencing the Depositary Shares against the deposit of the Series D Preferred Shares in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement and payment therefor in accordance with the Underwriting Agreement, the Depositary Shares will have been validly issued, and (3)
 
 
when (x) the Series D Preferred Shares have been issued as contemplated by the Registration Statement and deposited by the Company with the Depositary in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement and (y) the Depositary Receipt have been issued in accordance with the terms of the Deposit Agreement, the Depositary Receipt will constitute a valid and legally binding obligation of the Company and entitle the holder thereof to the rights specified in the Depositary Receipt and the Deposit Agreement, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
The foregoing opinion is limited to the Federal laws of the United States, the laws of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, and I am expressing no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction.
I have relied as to certain matters on factual information obtained from public officials, officers of the Company and other sources believed by me to be responsible, and I have assumed that the Series D Preferred Shares will have been deposited with the Depositary in accordance with the Deposit Agreement, that the Deposit Agreement will have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Depositary, that the certificates evidencing the Series D Preferred Shares and the Depositary Receipt will conform to the respective specimens thereof examined by me, that the certificate evidencing the Depositary Receipt will have been duly executed and delivered by one of the Depositary's authorized officers and, if executed in facsimile by the Depositary, will have been duly signed by a registrar of the Depositary Receipt, that the certificate for the Series D Preferred Shares will have been duly countersigned and registered by the registrar and transfer agent of the Series D Preferred Shares, and that the signatures on all documents examined by me are genuine, assumptions which I have not independently verified.
I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Form 8-K and to the use of my name therein and in the Prospectus Supplement, dated May 10, 2013, under the caption "Validity of Securities", which supplements the Prospectus, dated June 28, 2010. By giving such consent, I do not hereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consents are required under Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
